<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1 </DOCNO>
<HT>  "cr00000019294001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<H1>   CREATED REPORTS </H1>
<H2>  April Reports </H2>
<DATE1>  3 April 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FQR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-3lMar94-Russia 
<H3> <TI>      RTV Increasingly Cynical of U.S. Motives </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       RTV Increasingly Cynical of U.S. Motives </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
SUMMARY 

                                      Recent commentaries on state-owned Russian Television's (RTV) 
Vesti news broadcasts suggest growing disillusionment with U.S. 
policies towards the nations of the former Soviet bloc, 
portraying the United States as a self-interested meddler along 
Russia's periphery, willing to undermine Russian national 
interests in areas which Russia has traditionally viewed as its 
exclusive sphere of influence.  The cynical view of U.S. motives 
exhibited in these commentaries contrasts sharply with previous 
commentary from Vesti, a staunchly pro-reform news program. 

                                  END SUMMARY 

Vesti commentary on the controversial visit to Moscow by former 
President Richard Nixon, which blasted Nixon for meeting with key 
political foes of Russian President Boris Yeltsin and presented 
his visit against the backdrop of what it viewed as U.S. 
negotiations with Ukraine and Georgia behind Russia's back, was 
the first commentary observed to exhibit this strongly critical 
tone (Russian Television, 9 March).  Setting the scene for 
Nixon's diplomatic contretemps, Commentator G. Shakhov asserted 
that the results of Ukrainian President Kravchuk's recent meeting 
in Washington with President Clinton had to such a degree 
superseded the agreement signed on 14 January in Moscow by 
Yeltsin, Clinton, and Kravchuk on the withdrawal of strategic 
nuclear weapons from Ukraine that they forced one to ask: "was 
there really a Moscow meeting" of the three leaders?  Similarly, 
Shakhov continued, a visit by Georgian President Eduard 
Shevardnadze to Washington revived the possibility of "bringing 
UN peacekeepers to Abkhazia" when previously, Tbilisi and Sukhumi 
had agreed to disengage their armed forces "at Russia's 
initiative," presumably making the introduction of UN forces 
unnecessary.  Shakhov lamented that "earlier agreements reached 
with Russia's participation" had been "effectively revised in 
both cases" and questioned whether this represented merely "some 
kind of maneuvering" by the U.S. or a fundamental "change of 
political direction." 

A subsequent Shakhov commentary revived cold-war rhetoric to 
describe the NATO Partnership for Peace, decrying the initiative 
as an attempt to place "arsenals of American weapons" along 
Russia's periphery (Russian Television, 24 March).  This 
initiative is disturbing, he said, because the weapons making up 
such arsenals are made not to "adorn pompous parades" but "to 
shoot."  Shakhov also invoked the cold-war bugaboo, the U.S. 
"military-industrial complex," whose Incentive in Partnership for 
Peace is, he asserted, "the more arms exported, the more money 
imported."  He then cited other examples of alleged U.S. 
military-industrial complex mischief.  "Even today" he claimed, 
all sides to the Afghan conflict are using "the latest U.S. 
missiles," and in other "hot spots" around the world "it is not 
difficult to find the widest assortment" of U.S. weaponry.  Every 
year, Shakhov charged, Washington earns from $5 to $7 billion via 
production of the "weaponry of death." 

A third commentary, by A. Goncharov, following the recent visit 
to Kazakhstan by U.S. Secretary of Defense William Perry, 
returned to the theme of alleged U.S. attempts to undercut 
Russian relations with neighboring states.  The commentary 
suggested that the U.S. was attempting to deal behind Russia's 
back with the Kazakhstanis to develop the Baykonur space facility 
(Russian Television, 28 March).  According to Goncharov, Perry 
held discussions "behind closed doors" with the Kazakhstanis on 
the creation of a joint U.S.-Ukrainian-Kazakhstani aerospace 
venture which would operate "without Russian participation." 
Goncharov asserted that "Kiev was in favor" of the deal, but that 
the U.S. did not succeed in "enticing" the Kazakhstanis, who, 
"after much delay" realized that their "real partner" in 
aerospace activities is Russia. 

These commentaries contrast sharply with past Vesti depict ions of 
the United States.  A commentary by N. Svanidze on the eve of the 
June 1992 Yeltsin-Bush summit in Washington, for example, spoke 
in deferential tones of the West as a potential benefactor "from 
whom real money is wanted," but who might be scared off from 
providing needed aid by opposition "reactionaries" (Russian 
Television, 14 June 1992).  Another Svanidze commentary, 
following the April 1993 Vancouver summit, placed Russia and the 
U.S. on equal footing and asserted that the two countries 
"consider themselves partners in the name of democracy, security, 
and peace" and praised U.S. President Bill Clinton as a new "John 
Kennedy" who brought "fresh blood" to U.S. foreign policy 
(Russian Television, 5 April 1993). 

Implications 

RTV's airing of three critical commentaries in quick succession 
suggests that at least some influential officials in the Yeltsin 
administration approve of Vesti's recent change in tone, possibly 
as a demonstration that Russia will pursue what it sees as its 
own interests, particularly in what it judges to be its exclusive 
sphere of influence, even in opposition to U.S. positions.  Being 
state-owned and being in the throes of a major financial crisis, 
RTV would be unlikely to pursue such a change against the wishes 
of its official patrons.  RTV has since its inception in 1990 
been among the most strongly pro-reform media in Russia, and has 
both helped to form and reflected the views of ardently pro- 
reform Russians.  The sharp criticism of the United States in 
these commentaries suggests an attempt to prepare this most pro- 
Western segment of Russian society for a move from the quite 
friendly relations of recent years to a much more adversarial 
climate in U.S.-Russian relations. 

(AUTHOR:  CRIMMINS.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL 
CHIEF, ANALYSIS BRANCH, RUSSIA DIVISION (703) 733-6070.) 
ENEAG/BLOUGH/sdj 01/0008Z APR 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-2 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000019394001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   3 April 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
FOREIGN MEDIA NOTE--FB PN 94-046--Mongolia 
<H3> <TI>      MONGOLIA:  KEY APPOINTMENTS, No 2, 1994 </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       MONGOLIA:  KEY APPOINTMENTS, No 2, 1994 </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
This      FMN reports the names of one newly appointed ambassador, the 
recipients of five diplomatic title awards, three ministerial and 
six judicial appointees and the new State Security Administration 
press representative. 

   President Punsalmaagiyn Ochirbat appointed Dariyn Puntsag 
Mongolian ambassador extraordinary and plenipotentiary to the 
Republic of Cuba.  (Ulaanbaatar ARDYN ERH in Mongolian 15 Jan 94 p 

   The president also awarded the diplomatic title of ambassador 
extraordinary and plenipotentiary to O. Ochirbal, director of the 
European and American Desk of Ministry of Foreign Affairs, and the 
diplomatic titles of envoy extraordinary and plenipotentiary to the 
following: 

   L. Dabaagib, Mongolian ambassador extraordinary and 
plenipotentiary to the U.S.; 

   A. Tsolmon, Mongolian ambassador extraordinary and 
plenipotentiary to Germany; 

   D. Chuluundorj, director of the Press and Information Department 
of the Ministry of Foreign Relations;  and 

   L. Erdenechuluun, permanent Mongolian representative to the 
United Nations.  (ARDYN ERH 19 Jan 94 p 1) 

   At the conclusion of the 14 January 1994 meeting of the State 
Great Hural, the following changes in senior assignments were made 
as a result of restructuring the Mongolian government and merging 
ministries: 

   R. Sandalhan was relieved of his duties as minister of highways, 
transportation and communications and appointed minister of 
infrastructure development;  and 

   B. Jigjid was relieved of his former duties as minister of fuel 
and power and appointed minister of power, geology and mining. 

   With the abolishment of two ministries the following were 
relieved of their assignments: 

   T. Damiran as minister of construction and town planning;  and 

   D. Tsogbaatar as minister of geology and mineral resources. 
(ARDYN ERH 18 Jan 94 p 1) 

   The Government of Mongolia appointed Dagbadorjiyn Tserendorj 
deputy minister of culture.  (ARDYN ERH 22 Feb 94 p 2) 

   Based on the recommendation of the General Council of the Court, 
B. Batsangee was appointed judge for a Darhan City District People's 
Court and  B. Haldzad judge for a Dundgobi Aymag District People's 
Court, and N. Dulamsuren was released from his duties as a member of 
the Suhbaatar Aymag Court. 

   At the recommendation of the General Council of the Court based 
on paragraph 2 of Article 51 of the Constitution the following 
appointments were made: 

   J. Hashdorj and P. Tsengee as judges of the Supreme Court; and 

   N. Dulamsuren as Suhbaatar Aymag Appeals Court judge.  (ARDYN ERH 
15 Jan 94 p 1) 

   In accordance with an order of the State Security Administration, 
N. Tomorhuyag was appointed the press and information representative 
of the administration.  (ARDYN ERH 12 Jan 94 p 1) 

(AUTHOR:  MIAB/CISD.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
MILITARY/INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS BRANCH, CIS DIVISION (703) 733-6375.) 
ENEAG/31 MAR/POLCHF/CIS DIVISION/ta 31/1915z mar 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-3 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000019494001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   3 April 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-31MAR94-DPRK-U. S.-IAEA 
<H3> <TI>      DPRK Hints at Willingness to Talk With IAEA on Inspection </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       DPRK Hints at Willingness to Talk With IAEA on Inspection </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY 
                             Pyongyang has used the authoritative vehicle of a Foreign 
Ministry spokesman's statement to hint that resolution of the 
current impasse over nuclear inspections through direct 
negotiations with the IAEA is still a possibility. 
                       END SUMMARY 
   Pyongyang's latest authoritative statement on the nuclear 
inspection issue, a 31 March Foreign Ministry spokesman's 
statement, seemed to fall short of conditioning resolution of the 
issue on the resumption of high-level bilateral talks with 
Washington.  It also avoided ruling out direct negotiations with 
the IAEA for further nuclear inspections.  In what appeared to be 
deliberately vague phraseology, the statement said that Pyongyang 
"would not oppose" solving the issue "through negotiations," if 
Washington 1) stops attempting to apply "international pressure" 
and 2) "proceeds with the reestablishment of the foundation of 
the DPRK-U.S. talks" (Pyongyang radio, 31 March).  The statement 
failed to specify who should "negotiate" with Pyongyang on the 
inspection issue, what it means by "reestablishing the 
foundation" for bilateral talks with Washington, or how to 
"proceed" toward that goal.  Thus, Pyongyang appeared to leave 
open the possibility that Pyongyang could start negotiating with 
the IAEA on additional inspections before high-level U.S.-North 
Korea talks reconvene--something Washington had been urging North 
Korea to do. 
   Nevertheless, the statement left no doubt about Pyongyang's 
preference for resuming bilateral talks with Washington first. 
It declared that had the bilateral high-level talks previously 
slated for 21 March in Geneva been held, "routine and ad hoc" 
IAEA inspections could have resumed and the inter-Korean exchange 
of special envoys would have taken place.  Implying that 
Pyongyang still hopes to salvage bilateral talks, the statement 
said that if Washington continues to "abuse" North Korea's 
efforts to resolve the nuclear issue, it will "no longer" pin its 
hopes on the DPRK-U.S. talks. 
   The statement attempted to explain the disagreement over recent 
IAEA inspections by revealing what it depicted as the 
understandings reached at a series of  working-level contacts 
with U.S. officials in New York, meetings that preceded the 
recent IAEA inspections in North Korea.  The statement claimed 
that Washington had agreed at the talks that the IAEA would 
conduct "strictly limited" inspections and had asked Pyongyang 
not to publicize the "limited" nature of their agreement in order 
to "save face."  It also alleged that the U.S. side had agreed to 
attend the high-level talks once the IAEA inspections were made, 
"irrespective of their results." 
   Conciliatory Tone     Demonstrating Pyongyang's aversion to being 
seen as caving in to international pressure to make concessions 
on the nuclear issue, the statement used the unprecedented(SEE 
NOTE) format of a question-and-answer session with an 
unidentified KCNA reporter, a format apparently designed to give 
the impression that the spokesman is simply clarifying North 
Korea's stance and not making any new proposals.  Yet, in sharp 
contrast to the 21 March Foreign Ministry spokesman's statement, 
which openly threatened North Korean withdraw from the Nuclear 
Nonproliferation Treaty, the 31 March statement contained no 
threat, promising only that Pyongyang would "counter" any U.S. 
pressure.  Although the statement repeated allegations of U.S. 
bad faith, using words such as "faithless," "false promises," and 
"unjustifiable preconditions" to describe Washington's action, it 
was devoid of the kind of bluster that has marked recent North 
Korean pronouncements. 
   (NOTE: Although Pyongyang media have occasionally carried a 
Foreign Ministry spokesman's answers to questions that were 
purportedly posed by KCNA reporters, they had not been observed 
to carry their questions.) 
   Implications     The 31 March statement seemed designed to give 
the impression that Pyongyang could still negotiate with the IAEA 
to resolve the current nuclear impasse in return for some 
symbolic gesture from Washington. 
   (AUTHOR:  YIM.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
ASIA DIVISION ANALYSIS TEAM, (703) 733-6534.) 
EAG/HORTON/ta 31/2152z mar 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-4 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000019594001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   6 April 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS ANALYSIS-04Apr94-Ukraine 
<H3> <TI>      Media Developments:  Special Issue on Ukrainian News Agencies </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Media Developments:  Special Issue on Ukrainian News Agencies </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
INTRODUCTION 
                               While two government news agencies--Moscow-base- TASS and APN- 
-had an official monopoly on news under the communist regime, new 
independent news agencies have arisen in Ukraine since the end of 
communist rule and may overshadow the government's present news 
agency.  By mid-1993 the Ukrainian Government's Ukrinform, 
successor to the Ukrainian TASS, came up against stiff 
competition from three independent agencies--UNIAN, UNIAR, and 
Post-Postup--and from an agency affiliated with the nationalist 
political movement Rukh, Rukh-Pres.  The latter three had their 
roots in dissident organizations begun under the communist 
regime. 
   Of the new agencies, UNIAN seems the most important, distributing 
numerous news items and important analytical pieces.  Rukh-Pres 
is both a news agency and a propaganda organ for Rukh and 
sometimes stirs controversy by publishing reports and articles 
with partisan overtones.  Some papers have become very dependent 
on the new agencies for news reporting.  For example, the Kiev 
paper Khreshchatyk carries whole pages of UNIAN and UNIAR items. 
FBIS subscribes directly to Ukrinform, UNIAN, UNIAR, and Post- 
Postup. 
                      END INTRODUCTION 
   Ukrinform (Ukrainske Natsionalne Informatsiyne Ahentstvo) 
   Ukrinform is the government information agency, successor to the 
Ukrainian TASS affiliate, RATAU (Radio-Telegraph Agency of 
Ukraine), which was the main supplier of news to the Ukrainian 
press until mid-1990.  Benefiting from being the heir to RATAU, 
Ukrinform appears to have the biggest staff and best facilities 
of all Ukrainian news agencies.  It has, for example, an 
analytical-information center, which gathers material from 
Ukrinform's local correspondents and also from the local press 
(Molod Ukrainy, 31 August 1993). 
   RATAU was renamed Ukrinform in May 1990, because, as its director 
explained in a 22 May 1990 Radyanska Ukraina article, it no 
longer sent its items to local papers by telegraph or by 
dictation over the radio and therefore its name needed to be 
changed.  It was further reorganized after Ukrainian 
independence, when a 27 November 1991 Cabinet of Ministers 
decree, "proceeding from the Act of Proclamation of Ukrainian 
Independence," changed the "Ukrainian Information Agency 
Ukrinform" into the "Ukrainian National Information Agency 
Ukrinform" (Uryadovyy Kuryer, No. 38-39, December 1991).  It is 
now independent of Moscow's TASS, which was renamed ITAR-TASS and 
became a Russian news agency after the dissolution of the USSR. 
ITAR-TASS still disseminates items from Ukrinform, some of which 
are labeled "TASS-Ukrinform" in Moscow papers. 
   UNIAN (Ukrainske Nezalezhne Informatsiyne Ahentstvo Novyn) 
   UNIAN, which appears to be the strongest of the new agencies, is 
the successor in Ukraine to APN (Novosti Press Agency), the 
second main Soviet-era news agency.  Although its name (Ukrainian 
Independent Information News Agency) labels it independent, it 
was formed by the government and works in APN's former 
government-owned facilities.  At the end of August 1991 the 
Ukrainian Supreme Soviet Presidium created UNIAN "on the basis of 
the disbanded APN" and later gave it APN's building (Holos 
Ukrainy, 9 February 1993).  The founders of UNIAN do not include 
any government agency, however: they are listed as the 
Journalists Union of Ukraine, the Prosvita (Enlightenment) 
Society, the Ukraina Society, the National Press Club, and the 
Union of Lawyers (Holos Ukrainy, 9 February 1993; Khreshchatyk, 
16 February 1993).  The former correspondent of the independent 
Moscow paper Moskovskiye Novosti, Volodymyr Ruban, is chief 
editor of the agency, and Supreme Soviet deputy Mykhaylo Batih is 
the general director of UNIAN (Holos Ukrainy, 9 February 1993). 
Batih was editor of the Lviv Oblast paper Leninska Molod and a 
communist party member (Radyanska Ukraina, 24 March 1990), but 
later became a member of Rukh (Narodna Hazeta, No. 38, October 
1992).  Despite inheriting APN's facilities, it took some time 
for UNIAN to start operating after its formation.  According to 
the 16 February 1993 Khreshchatyk, "for a year and a half the 
former 'APN-ers' were not able to organize the work of the 
agency" and it started work only early in 1993.  It had 10 
journalists by early 1993 (Holos Ukrainy, 9 February 1993) drawn 
from the government papers Holos Ukrainy and Uryadovyy Kuryer, 
Ukrinform, UT-1 (Ukrainian TV channel one), and the weekly paper 
for foreigners Visti z Ukrainy (Khreshchatyk, 16 February 1993). 
   In an August 1993 advertisement, UNIAN offered three services: 
   -- An "Express-News" service on political, economic, social, and 
cultural developments, issued twice daily (1500-1600 and 2100- 
2200 Kiev time) except Saturday and Sunday, in 8-10 pages in 
Ukrainian. 
   -- A weekly "Visnyk UNIAN: (UNIAN Herald) Observations, 
Commentaries, Forecasts" including analytical pieces on 
political, economic, social and cultural subjects, in 25-30 
pages, available in Ukrainian or Russian. 
   -- A weekly Ukrainian-language "advertising-information bulletin" 
"Tyzhden" (Week) on the most important recent events. 
   UNIAN's advertisement also announced plans to start a weekly 
" 
analytical-forecasting" bulletin of economic information "UNIAN- 
Biznes" in September 1993. 
   UNIAN's television service has also been producing and 
distributing programs, films, and commercials, according to the 
16 February 1993 Khreshchatyk. 
   Examples of the analytical items UNIAN provides include the 
following: 
   -- Staffers Aleksandr Kharchenko and Anatoliy Drobyazko wrote an 
article blaming massive credits for agriculture for the fall in 
the value of the karbovanets in mid-1993 ("Waterloo of the 
Ukrainian Karbovanets").  The article was carried in the 28 July 
Holos Ukrainy, 29 July Pravda Ukrainy, and 29 July Rada. 
   -- Mykhaylo Pashkov and Leonid Tupchiyenko wrote an analysis of 
potential party coalitions that was carried in the 23 July 1993 
Khreshchatyk and Nezavisimost. 
   -- Vasiliy Zorya analyzed the August currency exchange crisis for 
Izvestiya (21 August 1993). 
   The agency also commissions public opinion polls, which its 
staffers write up.  Aleksandr Vishnyak wrote about a poll of 
Kievites that showed negative attitudes toward the soviets and 
political parties (Pravda Ukrainy, 30 July 1993).  Vishnyak 
reported on a poll on attitudes toward an economic union with CIS 
(Nezavisimost, 22 September 1993).  Volodymyr Hubenko reported on 
a poll on selling the Black Sea Fleet (Vecherniy Kiev, 15 
September 1993). 
   A wide range of papers have subscribed to UNIAN's services and 
are using its material.  Both the main government paper Holos 
Ukrainy and the main anti-government paper Nezavisimost sometimes 
carry UNIAN items, as do Molod Ukrainy, Pravda Ukrainy, Ukraina 
Moloda, Kievskiye Novosti, Rada, and Kiev city papers 
Khreshchatyk, Kyivska Pravda, and Vecherniy Kiev--suggesting that 
UNIAN's material is objective enough to be used by all sides. 
Moscow's Izvestiya has also used UNIAN, for example, on 21 August 
carrying an article on the fall of the karbovanets on the 
Ukrainian currency exchange written "specially for Izvestiya" by 
UNIAN correspondent Vasiliy Zorya. 
   UNIAR (Ukrainska Nezalezhna Informahentsiya "Respublika") 
   UNIAR, a completely non-government agency, originated in the 
dissident movement under the communist regime.  It was set up in 
1988 in Kiev as an underground news operation linked to the 
dissident Ukrainian Helsinki Union led by present Rukh Chairman 
Vyacheslav Chornovil, and it initially focused on sending 
information on internal events to Radio Liberty in Munich, 
according to an interview by its chief editor Serhiy Naboka in 
the 3 October 1993 emigre newspaper Ukrainian Weekly.  When the 
Ukrainian Helsinki Union became the Ukrainian Republican Party in 
early 1990, the news agency remained linked to the party, 
becoming the URP press service, according to Naboka.  Later it 
became independent and changed its name to the "Respublika 
Information Agency." 
   Respublika's items appeared in the Ukrainian Weekly and were used 
by Radio Liberty, and later, after the communist regime fell, its 
items began appearing in the Ukrainian press.  Items labeled 
"Respublika" appeared in Molod Ukrainy in July 1992, and starting 
31 July 1992 Molod Ukrainy began carrying items from UNIAR--the 
new name for Respublika.  A newspaper named Respublika was set up 
in early 1992, but, according to information UNIAR provided to 
subscribers in October 1993, the "Respublika Information Agency" 
was not associated with the newspaper Respublika. 
   According to Naboka, UNIAR now has 60 employees in Kiev and about 
40 elsewhere and is organized into four branches: the press 
agency, video-TV productions, an analytical research department, 
and a press monitoring section.  In describing its services to 
potential subscribers, UNIAR in October 1993 said it had 58 
correspondents, publishes analyses, commentaries, and reviews by 
independent experts, as well as news, and also produces a daily 
television program "UNIAR News" on channel 37 (UTaR Television 
Company) and a weekly half-hour analytical program "Desyatka." 
   UNIAR items are not carried by as many newspapers as UNIAN's but 
have appeared in the Kiev city paper Khreshchatyk (which carries 
whole pages of UNIAR material), the Ukrainian Republican Party's 
paper Samostiyna Ukraina, and the youth papers Molod Ukrainy and 
Ukraina Moloda.  In addition to news reports, a few UNIAR 
analytical pieces have appeared in the press, such as an article 
on Ukraine's political situation published in the 19 May 
Samostiyna Ukraina.  UNIAR lists among its subscribers Radio 
Liberty, Voice of America, Radio Australia, Polish Television, 
Moscow's Ekho Moskvy radio, the Moscow papers Segodnya, 
Izvestiya, and Argumenty i Fakty, the St. Petersburg paper Sankt- 
Peterburgskiye Vedomosti, and Ukrainian papers Respublika, 
Khreshchatyk, Molod Ukrainy, Narodna Armiya, Samostiyna Ukraina, 
and Post-Postup. 
   Naboka said in his 3 October interview that UNIAR is the only 
Ukrainian news agency that is not financially supported by any 
governmental, party, business, or other organization.  In another 
sign of UNIAR's independence of the government, Naboka was 
elected chief editor of the "Elections 94" press center set up 
for the March 1994 parliamentary election to collect and provide 
information independent of the government (Ukrainian Weekly, 20 
February). 
   Post-Postup 
   The newest of the news agencies, Post-Postup was set up in 
September 1991, at the time the Lviv paper of the same name, 
Post-Postup, was officially registered, according to information 
provided by the Post-Postup news agency in October 1993.  The 
statement explained that the paper Post-Postup is the successor 
to an earlier underground Lviv paper called Postup (Progress), 
which started publication in early 1989.  After the August 1991 
attempted coup and end of the communist regime, the paper was 
registered officially and renamed Post-Postup (i.e., "after 
Postup") and the news agency, which appears to use the same 
correspondents, was also established.  The news agency sometimes 
refers to itself as "Post-Inform." 
   Post-Postup is smaller than the other main news agencies and, 
unlike the others, is based in Lviv rather than Kiev.  Post- 
Postup is still issuing items only twice a week instead of daily 
as other agencies do, and relatively few Post-Postup items have 
been showing up in the press.  Vecherniy Kiev on 11 August 
carried an article from the paper Post-Postup describing a 
struggle for control of the mass-circulation Kiev weekly 
Kievskiye Vedomosti, and Kievskiye Novosti on 7 May 1993 carried 
a Post-Postup newspaper interview with reform economist Volodymyr 
Lanovyy.  The agency also disseminates items over Ukrainian 
government radio, according to the 12 February 1993 Kyivska 
Pravda.  It has 40 correspondents covering oblasts around the 
republic, according to Post-Postup's October 1993 statement, and 
the agency-paper is apparently growing.  The paper Post-Postup 
announced on 15-21 June 1993 that "Post-Postup is expanding" and 
recruiting journalists and listed rates it will pay journalists 
for written material and photographs. 
   Rukh-Pres 
   The nationalist organization Rukh created its own organization 
that serves both as a press office to disseminate information 
from Rukh and as a news agency that gathers information. 
Chairman of Rukh's Secretariat Viktor Burlakov, in a report to 
the 1992 Rukh congress on the work of Rukh's Information 
Department which he supervises, mentioned that Rukh-Pres, which 
comes under his department, prepares daily "press-releases" about 
events in Rukh and in the republic in general, including comments 
by Rukh leaders and other leaders of the democratic bloc.  Rukh- 
Pres, he said, sends its material by fax to radio, television, 
Radio Liberty, VOA, the papers Holos Ukrainy, Vechirniy Kyiv, and 
Za Vilnu Ukrainu, and also has published items in the paper 
Narodna Hazeta (at that time Rukh's paper) and the Kiev paper 
Rada.  It also issues an English-language bulletin on Ukrainian 
events, Rukh-Faks, which it sends to the Toronto Star, Japan's 
Yomiuri Simbun, London's Daily Telegraph, France Press, and the 
American, German, Canadian, and Swedish embassies, he said 
(Narodna Hazeta, No. 9, March 1992).  Other parties--the 
Ukrainian Republican Party, the Liberal Party, the Party of 
Greens, and the Congress of National Democratic Forces--have 
press services also, but these sources are not as active as Rukh- 
Pres and appear to publicize only information on their own 
parties. 
   In contrast, Rukh-Pres also acts as a news agency and many Rukh- 
Pres items have appeared in the press--in the government papers 
Holos Ukrainy and Uryadovyy Kuryer, the anti-government paper 
Nezavisimost, the former Rukh paper Narodna Hazeta, the URP's 
paper Samostiyna Ukraina, Lviv's Vysokyy Zamok, Demokratychna 
Ukraina, Khreshchatyk, and Ukraina Moloda--and have been picked 
up on the radio and in the rival news agency UNIAR. 
   Rukh-Pres also turns out analyses and even openly polemical 
stories aimed at foes of Rukh or of Rukh Chairman Chornovil. 
Opponents have accused it of spreading false information about 
Chornovil's political rivals and foes: 
   -- From local sources Rukh-Pres picked up controversial remarks 
by Kravchuk adviser and former First Deputy Premier Valentyn 
Symonenko attacking Premier Leonid Kuchma at a 20 March 1993 
Odessa conference and sent this material to various papers. 
Carried by Kiev city papers Khreshchatyk, Vecherniy Kiev, and 
Kyivskyy Visnyk, Lviv's Vysokyy Zamok, and the URP paper 
Samostiyna Ukraina, the reports embarrassed Symonenko.  Later 
Rukh-Pres reported from circles close to Kravchuk that the president 
had rebuked Symonenko for making these remarks and 
ordered him to retract them or resign as his adviser.  Symonenko 
attacked Rukh-Pres's reports (Vecherniy Kiev, 1 April 1993), 
threatened a law suit, and claimed that Rukh-Pres was spreading 
these reports because of Chornovil's hostility to him 
(Demokratychna Ukraina, 30 March 1993).  Symonenko had been 
bypassed for premier in favor of Kuchma in late 1992 partly 
because of the opposition of Rukh and other reformers. 
   -- Rukh-Pres spread reports that Levko Lukyanenko (a bitter 
personal rival of Chornovil) was misusing his post as ambassador 
to Canada.  Narodna Hazeta (No. 17, May 1993), however, disputed 
the Rukh-Pres report and carried a Congress of National 
Democratic Forces item attributing Rukh-Pres's action to 
Chornovil's longtime dislike for Lukyanenko (who like Chornovil 
was a candidate in Ukraine's December 1991 presidential election 
and whom Chornovil has often accused of undermining his chances 
by splitting Rukh's vote). 
   -- A Rukh-Pres item carried in the 8 May 1993 Nezavisimost (the 
most anti-establishment national paper) accused former Rukh 
leader Dmytro Pavlychko (a bitter rival of Chornovil) of misusing 
his power as chairman of the Supreme Soviet's International 
Affairs Commission during a visit to South Africa. 
   Perhaps because of its polemical slant, Rukh-Pres is apparently 
viewed with hostility by the Kravchuk administration.  Rukh-Pres 
on 29 September assailed President Kravchuk's press service for 
consistently refusing contacts with Rukh-Pres, treating it as 
non-existent, and insisting it "register as an information 
agency."  Rukh-Pres insisted that as the "information department 
of Rukh's Secretariat" it is a press service, not an information 
agency (Rada, 30 September 1993). 
   Joint Agencies/Newspapers 
   Some newspapers--in addition to Post-Postup--also act as news 
agencies, disseminating to other media information gathered by 
their own correspondents, which may be more than the paper can 
publish.  The shortage of newsprint and the high cost of 
newsprint and mail delivery have forced many papers to change 
from dailies to publishing two-three times a week or weekly, so 
they have less space to publish material.  Selling material to 
other papers and organizations can also help financially. 
   For example, the newspaper Nezavisimost created its own 
information agency "Nezavisimost" in January 1992 (Nezavisimost, 
17 January 1992).  The head of the new agency, Boris Zaporozhets, 
told an interviewer that the agency planned to sell items to all 
republic papers and to city, oblast, and rayon papers, to Moscow 
and St. Petersburg publications, foreign information agencies, 
and agencies of other CIS states (Nezavisimost, 17 January 1992). 
   Other News Agencies 
   Moscow's ITAR-TASS also has its own correspondents in Ukraine who 
file items to Moscow on Ukrainian events, and Russia's Interfax 
News Agency also operates in Ukraine and turns out many news 
items on Ukraine.  A 27 September 1993 Interfax item even 
referred to "Interfax-Ukraine" as an entity. 
   Other news agencies are occasionally mentioned in the press, but 
there is little information on them and they appear unimportant. 
A "UPresA" interview of economist Volodymyr Lanovyy was published 
in the 6 August 1993 Nezavisimost.  Nezavisimost on 3 November 
1993 carried an article on coming elections by a "Ukrainian 
Independent Center for Political Research" of UPresA.  Items from 
Informahentsiya "Visnyk" appeared in Molod Ukrainy on 2 April, 1 
May, and 30 June 1992, and items from the Informatsiyne Ahentstvo 
Yevro appeared in Molod Ukrainy on 21 May and 19 June 1992.  Some 
may be more or less one-man operations.  For example, Sergey 
Zarya, identifying himself as a representative from the "Zarya 
Information Agency," asked a question at a 6 September Kravchuk 
news conference (Kiev radio, 6 September 1993). 
   (AUTHOR:  HAHN.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
ANALYSIS BRANCH, RUSSIA DIVISION (703) 733-6070.) 
ENEAG/BLOUGH/GSP 04/2043z APR 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-5 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000019694001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   6 April 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-04APR94-CROATIA-YUGO 
<H3> <TI>      Croatia-Yugoslavia </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Croatia-Yugoslavia </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
Serbs      Agree to Ceasefire But Still Press Claim to Statehood 

                            SUMMARY 

   While tensions may be lessened in the near term by the ceasefire 
agreement between the Croatian Government and the leaders of the 
self-proclaimed "Republic of Serbian Krajina" (RSK), neither the 
Krajina Serbs nor the regime of Serbian President Slobodan 
Milosevic have shown any sign of compromising on the fundamental 
dispute between the Serbs and Croats in Croatia.  The Serbs claim 
that the RSK is not part of Croatia and has the right to join 
other Serbs to create a Greater Serbia.  At the same time, 
Milosevic and the RSK leadership appear to be willing to delay 
the establishment of a Greater Serbia, perhaps hoping that this 
would be viewed as enough of a contribution toward a peaceful 
settlement to justify the lifting of the UN's economic sanctions 
against Belgrade. 

                           END SUMMARY 

   Although willing to accept a ceasefire with the Croatian 
government and hinting at a willingness to open communication and 
transportation lines closed since the 1991 war, the Krajina Serb 
leadership continues to press its demand for recognition of the 
RSK as an independent state.  Following the signing of the 30 
March ceasefire agreement in Zagreb, RSK "President" Milan Martic 
claimed that the participation of the United States and Russia 
constituted, "in a certain way, recognition" of the RSK and its 
"acceptance" as a "state with its own territory, authorities, and 
population."  He predicted that formal international recognition 
would follow "in the next phase" of the negotiating process 
(Belgrade TV, 30 March).  However, Martic suggested in an earlier 
interview that the Krajina Serbs were willing to delay the 
fulfillment of their longstanding goal of union with the Federal 
Republic of Yugoslavia (FRY--Serbia and Montenegro).  While he 
predicted that a "solution" to the "question of unification" 
would be found "this year," he suggested that its actual 
implementation might be a protracted process.  He warned that the 
Serbs would need to display much "patience" before their "great 
aim" was realized (Vecernje Novosti, 27 March). 

   Support From Belgrade 

   Recent statements by leaders of the FRY indicate that Belgrade 
continues to support the Krajina Serbs' separatist claims: 
   -- FRY Foreign Minister Vladislav Jovanovic told an interviewer 
that, Croatia's recognition as an independent state by much of 
the world community did not apply to Krajina because recognition 
had been granted at a time "when Croatia had not established 
sovereignty" over the RSK (Le Monde, 29 March).  This comports 
with recent statements by the RSK leadership that the territories 
they now hold were never controlled by the Croatian Government 
and are thus legally still a part of the former Yugoslavia. 

   -- On the day the ceasefire was signed in Zagreb, Milosevic- 
controlled Belgrade television highlighted Martic's claim that 
the negotiating process implied the recognition of the RSK's 
claim to the status of an independent state (Belgrade TV, 30 
March). 

   -- A member of the FRY Government, speaking in Serb-held Tenja (a 
town in eastern Croatia) at a meeting of a local branch of 
Milosevic's Socialist Party of Serbia, reassured the Krajina 
Serbs that the party "shall continue" to do "everything" to 
support the RSK's "right to self-determination" (Novi Sad TV, 3 
April). 

   No authoritative voice from the FRY political leadership or media 
has been observed to suggest that the Krajina should submit to 
Croatian sovereignty over the RSK. 

   At the same time, Milosevic may seek to gain a lifting of the 
sanctions against the FRY by portraying his willingness to delay 
the Serbs' eventual unification as a compromise contributing to a 
peaceful resolution of the armed conflict.  In an interview with 
an Amsterdam newspaper, Mihailo Markovic, vice president of 
Milosevic's Socialist Party of Serbia and an adviser to the 
Serbian president, suggested that "Serbia should not regard" 
uniting the Serbs of Croatia and Bosnia-Herzegovina with the 
"Serbian 'motherland'" as its "highest priority."  He proposed 
that the "first goal" for the RSK and the neighboring "Republic 
of Srpska" in Bosnia-Herzegovina should be to "develop a very 
good independent existence" with economic ties to Serbia and 
other neighboring countries.  After a consolidation stage that 
"could last a very long time," he said, a decision "must be made" 
about their permanent status, including "possible unification" 
with the FRY.  He said he was "certain" that the Krajina Serbs 
did not want to be part of the Croatian state, but insisted that 
"Serbia would not oppose" the outcome "in any way" if the Krajina 
Serbs voted in a referendum to join Croatia (De Volkskrant, 1 
April). 

(AUTHOR:  NASH.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
EUROPE AND LATIN AMERICA GROUP, (703) 733-6120.) 
ELAG/GILISON/CJR 05/0156Z APR 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-6 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000019794001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   6 April 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-04APR94-DPRK-IAEA-U. S. 
<H3> <TI>      Pyongyang Reaffirms Willingness to Talk With IAEA </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Pyongyang Reaffirms Willingness to Talk With IAEA </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
SUMMARY 

                                Pyongyang has used the occasion of rejecting a UN statement on 
the North Korean nuclear inspection issue to reinforce its 
earlier hints of a willingness to negotiate with the 
International Atomic Energy Agency (IAEA) on the issue.  However, 
North Korea also warned that should the United States persists in 
applying "pressure" on the DPRK, it would resume reprocessing 
activities. 

                              END SUMMARY 

   Pyongyang seems to be underscoring an earlier hint that it might 
be willing to try to resolve its differences with the IAEA in 
talks with the IAEA itself.  This new hint of openness to DPRK- 
IAEA talks came in a 4 April DPRK-Foreign Ministry spokesman's 
statement ostensibly designed to reject a statement by the 
president of the UN Security Council calling on the DPRK to allow 
IAEA inspectors to complete their unfinished inspection 
activities in North Korea (Pyongyang radio, 4 April).  While 
accusing the UN Security Council of "politicizing" the North 
Korean nuclear issue, the spokesman's statement contended that, 
whatever "differences of views" that may have arisen in the 
course of recent IAEA inspections of North Korean nuclear 
facilities, they should be settled "strictly between" the IAEA 
and the "inspected country." 

   The 4 April North Korean statement, in line with most earlier 
North Korean pronouncements on the nuclear issue, also contained 
a threat that seemed designed to show that Pyongyang will not 
back down under U.S. pressure.  Thus the statement accused the 
United States and "some Western powers" of using the UN Security 
Council as a forum to apply pressure on Pyongyang, claiming that 
the Security Council based its discussions on the "unjust and 
biased" findings of the IAEA Board of Governors.  Once again 
blaming Washington for "deliberately aggravating" the situation 
in its quest to "crush" Pyongyang, the statement warned that 
Washington's "total reliance" on pressure tactics has given 
Pyongyang "no choice but to conduct" unspecified "peaceful 
nuclear activities" that it had "unilaterally frozen" in order to 
promote high-level bilateral talks with Washington.  Those 
nuclear activities presumably include the refueling of the 
controversial 5-megawatt reactor in Yongbyon, with resultant 
spent fuel made available for plutonium extraction.  The 
statement, however, failed to call for concrete action on 
anyone's part.(SEE NOTE) 

   (NOTE: By contrast, the 10 April 1993 Foreign Ministry 
spokesman's statement that was issued in reply to an 8 April 1993 
UN Security Council president's statement on the North Korean 
nuclear issue called on the Security Council to take "practical 
measures" to promote direct negotiations between Pyongyang and 
Washington to resolve the issue.) 

   Implications     The absence of a call for specific action in the 
Foreign Ministry spokesman's statement seemed designed to convey 
the impression that Pyongyang, having urged Washington to take 
unspecified steps to restore the "foundation" of bilateral talks, 
is awaiting Washington's next move. 

(AUTHOR:  YIM.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
ASIA DIVISION ANALYSIS TEAM, (703) 733-6534.) 
EAG/HEBBEL/CJR 05/0208Z APR 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-7 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000019894001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   6 April 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-04APR94-JAPAN-U.S. 
<H3> <TI>      Japanese Government, Private Sector View Market Opening Steps </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Japanese Government, Private Sector View Market Opening Steps </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
SUMMARY 

                                The Japanese business community and the Japanese media have 
sharply criticized the market opening package that the Japanese 
Government released on 29 March--and by implication the 
government of Prime Minister Morihiro Hosokawa--for failing to 
include concrete measures to reduce Japan's trade surplus and 
ease trade tensions with the United States.  Japanese press 
reporting suggests that a number of Japanese Government officials 
are concerned that this criticism--along with that of Washington- 
-may further weaken Hosokawa's increasingly shaky domestic 
political standing.  These officials appear to be trying to limit 
the damage by portraying Prime Minister Hosokawa as favoring 
bolder steps and trying to shift the blame for the package's 
weaknesses onto a recalcitrant bureaucracy.  Public comments on 
the package by senior Japanese leaders, meanwhile, have suggested 
that the government remains divided over how to flesh the package 
out in follow-up measures promised for June. 

                            END SUMMARY 

   Japanese business leaders and the Japanese press have for the 
most part expressed disappointment in the Japanese Government's 
market opening package.  Either directly or in somewhat veiled 
terms, they have criticized it for its lack of detail and its 
failure to address some of the measures that they believe are 
needed to jump-start the floundering Japanese economy and reduce 
trade tensions with the United States.  For example: 

   -- According to a 29 March Kyodo report, Kosaku Inaba, chairman 
of the Japan Chamber of Commerce and Industry, described the 
package as containing "little substance." 

   -- Tadashi Okuda, president of Japan's largest bank, Dai Ichi 
Kangyo and chairman of the Federation of Bankers Associations of 
Japan, also reportedly complained about the lack of detail in the 
package, stating that "almost all the main parts" were left to be 
fleshed out in the follow-up package promised for June. 
According to a 29 March Kyodo report,  Okuda warned that unless 
the package is fleshed out quickly, it will do little to 
alleviate bilateral trade tensions. 

   -- Although Gaishi Hiraiwa, chairman of the Federation of 
Economic Organizations (Keidanren), Japan's largest business 
organization, reportedly praised the intentions behind the 
package, he criticized it indirectly by indicating that the 
government needed to include concrete proposals for a three-year 
tax cut and a significant 100 trillion yen increase in public 
works spending in the follow-up program (Kyodo, 29 March). 

   Press Commentary 

   Much Japanese press commentary has also criticized the package, 
often calling on the government to take measures similar to those 
being sought by the United States in its negotiations with Japan. 
In an unusually blunt editorial on 30 March, Japan's most 
influential economic newspaper, Nihon Keizai Shimbun, criticized 
the package for failing to present effective proposals to reduce 
bilateral trade tensions, for delaying until June concrete 
proposals on deregulating the Japanese economy, and for offering 
only vague promises, couched in phrases like "attempts will be 
made to further improve" and "plans will be drawn up," about its 
plans to reduce Japan's trade surplus.  The paper argued that 
Japan was "at a stage where it must pay serious attention to 
'results'" and  that achieving good trade results has become a 
priority task for Japan itself."  It concluded by calling on the 
government to devise concrete measures to reduce the trade 
surplus.  Similarly, Asahi Shimbun, Japan's second largest 
newspaper, described the package as "not a satisfactory answer to 
the United States" and criticized it for failing to spell out 
"concrete measures to ease regulations" and for delaying until 
June a decision on tax cuts and increased public spending.  The 
paper added that it was "imperative" for the government to draw 
up "substantial market-opening measures" by the end of June. 

   Press commentary on the market opening package has not been 
entirely supportive of measures sought by Washington, however. 
Both the Nihon Keizai Shimbun and Asahi Shimbun editorials 
criticized the United States for demanding the setting of 
numerical targets to measure Japan's trade performance.  Nihon 
Keizai Shimbun described Prime Minister Hosokawa's refusal to 
accept such targets at his February summit with President Clinton 
as "the right answer to the demand" and characterized the 
"results-oriented trade policy" of the United States and the 
strategy adopted by Washington to achieve it as "worrisome." 
Asahi Shimbun stated that if Japan and the United States "try to 
increase dealings forcibly by setting targets in trade talks, 
there will be distortions in economic activities."  The paper 
added that while Japan needed to increase imports by boosting 
domestic demand and reducing market barriers, it "has to reject 
unreasonable demands." 

   Some of the press commentary on the package may help to further 
erode public confidence in the Hosokawa cabinet because it either 
blamed the government directly for the package's weaknesses or 
highlighted Hosokawa's ineffectiveness in the face of 
bureaucratic opposition and infighting within his coalition.  The 
30 March Nihon Keizai Shimbun editorial, for instance, criticized 
the government for failing to move beyond its refusal to accept 
U.S. demands for the setting of objective criteria to measure 
Japan's trade performance and "prepare an alternative" to present 
to Washington.  In a 30 March editorial, Yomiuri Shimbun, Japan's 
most widely read newspaper, questioned Hosokawa's leadership, 
suggesting that he had failed to get many of his "political 
decisions and ideas" included in the package.  The paper argued 
that in the absence of "political decision-making on key issues," 
the market-opening package was bound to be weak.  Similarly, a 30 
March Sankei Shimbun article portrayed the prime minister as 
almost completely paralyzed by bureaucratic opposition.  It 
quoted a Ministry of Finance official as asserting that, during 
negotiations over the market opening package, "the Prime 
Minister's Office was isolated." 

   Concern About Political Repercussions 

   A number of Japanese officials have reacted to the criticism of 
the package in somewhat defensive terms, suggesting that they are 
are trying to avoid further exacerbating friction with the United 
States and limit the domestic impact of the criticism.  Chief 
Cabinet Secretary Masayoshi Takemura, who was closely involved in 
brokering the package, reportedly responded to U.S. Trade 
Representative Mickey Kantor's criticism of the package by 
stressing that more measures would be forthcoming in June. 
According to a 30 March Kyodo report, Takemura stated that it was 
"enormously important for the Japanese Government to put all its 
energy into compiling such measures in June, because the U.S. is 
focusing on our June package."  According to another 30 March 
Kyodo report, an unidentified government source countered 
Ambassador Kantor's criticism by claiming that the package was in 
fact a "significant step" in trade negotiations with the United 
States, adding, like Takemura, that fuller measures would come in 
June.  Japanese Ambassador to Washington Takakazu Kuriyama told 
Nihon Keizai Shimbun on 29 March that Japan had "to make (the 
United States) understand that this is not a one-shot effort" 
(Nihon Keizai Shimbun, 30 March). 

   The tone of some of the comments some officials made to the press 
suggests that officials around the prime minister may be 
particularly concerned about the domestic political impact that 
criticism will have on Hosokawa's government, and may be moving 
to try to minimize it.  For example, an unidentified government 
source described the prime minister as having been forced "by 
opposition from bureaucrats . . . to give up all of his ideas and 
delay formulating a program."   The source went on to describe the 
prime minister as having been in favor of many of the measures 
called for by Japanese business, the Japanese press, and 
Washington, including significantly increased public investment, 
a long-term income tax cut, and a commitment to reduce Japan's 
trade surplus by a specific target.  The source asserted that 
bureaucrats in the Ministry of Finance (MOF), the Ministry of 
International Trade and Industry (MITI), and the Economic 
Planning Agency (EPA) resisted the prime minister's proposals and 
the prime minister was "at the mercy of the bureaucrats in MITI 
and MOF."  Similarly, an unidentified senior government official 
reportedly told the 30 March Yomiuri Shimbun that some of the 
positive features of the market opening package, including the 
projection that Japan would reduce the ratio of its current 
account surplus to its gross domestic product (GDP) in 1994 to 
2.8 percent, was included only at the insistence of Hosokawa's 
office. 

   Continued Government Divisions 

   Judging from the public comments of senior Japanese Government 
officials on the market opening package, the government remains 
divided over how far it must go to flesh out the package in the 
June measures.  According to a 29 March Kyodo report, Finance 
Minister Hirohisa Fujii sought to minimize the scope of the 
current package, telling the press that the projection for 
reducing Japan's current account surplus to 2.8 percent of GDP 
was "not a numerical target."  He added that he remained opposed 
to using construction bonds to finance the increased public works 
spending that is under consideration for the June package- 
-raising doubts that the government will be able to agree on a 
significant increase in time to include it in the enhanced 
package.  Repeating a standard argument used by the Ministry of 
Finance to oppose spending increases, Fujii argued that such 
bonds would incur public debt and be a burden for future 
generations.   According to another 29 March Nihon Keizai Shimbun 
report, EPA Director General Manae Kubota also told a news 
conference on the 29th that the 2.8 percent figure was not a 
"promise or target,"  and indicated only that the government 
would "make efforts" to achieve it. 

   Outlook 

   Prime Minister Hosokawa's government is likely to have difficulty 
reaching a consensus on how to flesh out the market opening 
package because parts of his ruling coalition and the bureaucracy 
continue to oppose some of the proposed measures.  In addition, 
Hosokawa's continuing political problems--including the 
allegations that he was involved in a questionable financial 
dealing and the difficulty he is having in getting the fiscal 
year 1994 budget through the Diet--may weaken the prime minister 
to the extent that he will be unable to exert the authority 
necessary to break the deadlock over the package.  Despite the 
attempts of those around the prime minister to distance Hosokawa 
from the weak points of the market opening package, domestic 
criticism of the package may further compound Hosokawa's 
political problems, contributing to the growing impression that 
he is  ineffective and further eroding public confidence in his 
government. 

(AUTHOR:  BOUNDS.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
ASIA DIVISION ANALYSIS TEAM, (703)-733-6534.) 
EAG/HORTON/CJR 05/0235Z APR 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-8 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000019994001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   6 April 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-O5APR94-Russia 
<H3> <TI>      Competing Proposals for Accord Likely To Fuel Confrontation </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Competing Proposals for Accord Likely To Fuel Confrontation </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
SUMMARY 

                              In the wake of the State Duma's declaration of a political 
amnesty, President Boris Yeltsin has attempted to regain the 
political initiative and increase pressure on opposition groups 
by proposing the adoption of a national reconciliation agreement. 
Yeltsin's "memorandum of accord," however, contains a number of 
conditions--such as a ban on early elections and politically 
charged constitutional amendments--that are unlikely to be 
acceptable to the opposition, and a new center-left coalition, 
"Accord for Russia," is attempting to outmaneuver Yeltsin with a 
competing accord proposal.  The apparently irreconcilable aims of 
the rival accord proposals will probably fuel more political 
confrontation in Moscow while diverting attention from important 
issues such as economic reform. 

                        END SUMMARY 

   At a 31 March press briefing, presidential spokesman Vyacheslav 
K6stikov summarized the main points of Yeltsin's draft memorandum 
of accord and said that Yeltsin had submitted it to both 
parliamentary chambers for review.  Kostikov said the memorandum 
is needed to establish a "moratorium on political bat ties" and to 
reach "political accord among various social forces" (Izvestiya, 
1 April).  As outlined in press summaries, the memorandum 
attempts t6 define the limits of acceptable political activity 
until terms for the president and current parliament expire in 
1996--as set in the constitution's transitional provisions (See 
Note 1)--and new elections are held (see box 1). Yeltsin 
presented the draft accord to State Duma Chairman Ivan Rybkin and 
Federation Council Chairman Vladimir Shumeyko on 31 March, with 
the understanding that they will submit it for parliamentary 
discussion, and he optimistically asserted that the draft will be 
ready for "Russia's main political forces" to sign on 28 April 
(Interfax, 31 March; ITAR-TASS, 31 March, 1 April).  Rybkin, 
however, has indicated that the Duma sees Yeltsin's draft as only 
a starting draft, to be reconciled with at least one other 
version being prepared (see box 2). 
   (Note 1) Under the constitution's transitional provisions, 
Yeltsin has the right to serve out his term of office, to June 
1996.  However, Yeltsin has never officially rescinded his 23 
September 1993 edict scheduling presidential elections for June 
1994. 

   Motivation for Memorandum 
   Yeltsin appears to have seized on the idea for the memorandum of 
accord in the wake of theDuma's 23 February adoption of a 
political amnesty as he searched for a way to force the Duma to 
accept accountability for the actions of the amnestied prisoners. 
At a meeting with Rybkin on 1 March, Yeltsin apparently extracted 
a" pledge that the Duma would adopt a memorandum on the 
responsibility of state institutions and politicians for 
preserving civic calm in Russia" (Moscow radio, 1 March). 
Yeltsin himself articulated the need for a memorandum of "civic 
peace" at a cabinet meeting on 4 March, stating that the 
memorandum should include "mechanisms stipulating accountability 
for decisions that are adopted" and adding that the Duma's 
"leadership" had "reacted positively to this proposal" (Moscow 
radio, 4 March).  Speaking to reporters at a commemoration for 
Soviet astronaut Yuriy Gagarin, Yeltsin stated that a document on 
"civil peace" "must be reached among various parties, movements, 
and branches of authority" (Interfax, 9 March). 
   Whereas Yeltsin previously had seemed to count on the adoption of 
the new constitution to put an end to the protracted battling 
between the executive and legislative branches, he now appears to 
feel the need to promote the memorandum of accord to provide him 
an additional tool for maintaining the political upper hand.  In 
his 24 February address to the Federal Assembly, Yeltsin 
optimistically called the constitution the "legal basis of future 
constructive accord" (Rossiyskaya Gazeta, 25 February).  However, 
Yeltsin's public statements and the priority he is giving to the 
memorandum suggest that, having found the constitution no 
obstacle to the Duma's declaration of amnesty for his bitterest 
political foes, he thinks the memorandum can provide an 
additional tool to forestall future political challenges: 
   --  In an interview given to Izvestiya (26 March) while he was 
still on vacation, Yeltsin called the adoption of the memorandum 
of accord "the most important matter which, in my view, will 
determine the political health of society."  At the same time, 
however, he said he does not expect the memorandum to "resolve 
all problems," though he is "convinced" that it is one "step." 
   --  Kostikov indicated that finalizing the memorandum of accord 
will be the "main item" on Yeltsin's agenda in April (ITAR-TASS, 
31 March). 
   Comments by other reformist political figures suggest, however, 
that rather than expecting the memorandum to actually succeed in 
bringing about reconciliation, Yeltsin instead hopes to use it to 
enhance his sagging popularity by casting himself as the 
initiator of national reconciliation while putting the spotlight 
on groups that refuse to sign it and publicly branding them as 
promoters of continued social and political strife: 
   --  Yeltsin's National Security Assistant Yuriy Baturin, an 
outspoken opponent of the amnesty, bluntly stated that the 
memorandum of accord will "prove its worth" if it results in a 
published "list" of political leaders and organizati6ns that 
refuse to sign it, and by so doing, admit that they "do not want 
to move toward accord" (Izvestiya, 19 March). 
   --  Mikhail Mityukov, first deputy chairman of the Duma and a 
member of the pro-Yeltsin Russia's Choice bloc, combatively 
suggested that those who refuse to sign the memorandum of accord 
would be flouting the wishes of an electorate exhausted by 
Moscow's political infighting and increasingly apathetic to it: 
"To oppose this idea would be to oppose the prevailing opinion 
among the population that it is time to end confrontation, that 
peace and accord are needed" (Rossiyskiye Vesti, 12 March). 
   --  Party of Russian-Unity and Accord leader Sergey Shakhray, 
whose own version of a memorandum of accord was part of the 
package of amnesty decrees adopted by the Duma, has said- 
-apparently referring to Yeltsin's draft--that the memorandum of 
accord could be codified in law and warned that any "parties and 
movements refusing to sign-it will--remain outside- the political 
process" (Interfax, 30 March). 

   Little Support for Accord 

   Despite reformers' efforts to generate pressure to support 
Yeltsin's accord, a number of hard-line opposition groups- 
-including some opposition parties in parliament--oppose the 
accord or have stipulated conditions for signing that Yeltsin is 
unlikely to accept: 
   --  In a report to a Communist Party of Russia (CPRF) Central 
Executive Committee plenum on 15 March, party leader Gennadiy 
Zyuganov declared that the CPRF, which went along with Shakhray's 
memorandum of accord, has "formulated further conditions 
necessary for national reconciliation."  They included some 
conditions certain to be unacceptable to Yeltsin, such as: a 
"change of socioeconomic course," the "formation of a government 
of national confidence based on a parliamentary majority," and 
the "restoration of a renewed union state on a voluntary basis" 
(Sovetskaya Rossiya, 17 March). 
   --  The nationalist parliamentary group "Russian Way" led by 
Sergey Baburin and 1991 coup plotter Anatoliy Lukyanov dismissed 
Yeltsin's memorandum of accord, calling it an "hypocrisy" and a 
"memorandum of humility" (ITAR-TASS, 17 March). 
   --  Former Vice President Aleksandr Rutskoy, recently released 
from prison under the amnesty act and a declared presidential 
candidate, reacted to Yeltsin's accord proposal by asking why 
there should be any "compromise with those who plundered and 
ruined the country and bombed the parliament"--a polemical but 
transparent reference to Yeltsin and his government (Interfax, 22 
March). 
   Of the major anti-reform figures, only Liberal Democratic Party 
of Russia (LDPR) leader Vladimir Zhirinovskiy has publicly 
supported Yeltsin's accord initiative, though only tepidly. 
Zhirinovskiy said that the LDPR is "ready" to sign the memorandum 
of accord but claimed that the document is likely to have only 
"moral significance" and prove ineffective because it is "naive 
to think" that its adoption will bring about national 
reconciliation (Interfax, 29 March). 
   Even some of Yeltsin's advisers have expressed wariness about his 
accord proposal out of concern that it will divert attention from 
more pressing problems.  Presidential Council member Leonid 
Smirnyagin expressed concern that the "struggle" for a memorandum 
of accord "will appear to voters as merely a deal struck between 
politicians in Moscow."  Clearly expecting the memorandum to have 
little practical effect, Smirnyagin contended that "it is time to 
get down to specific tasks rather than the infighting between 
various authorities" (Rossiyskiye Vesti, 26 March). 

   Rival "Accord for Russia" 

   A head-on challenge to Yeltsin's memorandum of accord comes from 
the formation in mid-March of a center-left coalition, "Accord 
for Russia" (Soglasiye vo Imya Rossii), which has issued a 
competing appeal for accord.  The publication of the coalition's 
appeal, which occurred while Yeltsin was on vacation, appeared to 
be an attempt to keep him on the defensive and take the accord 
issue away from him.  The appeal spoke of the need for a "social 
contract between all patriotic forces, movements, ideologies, and 
faiths that reject violence, racism, and nationalism."  Former 
Constitutional Court Chairman Valeriy Zorkin--described as one of 
the coalition's initiators--asserted that Accord for Russia aims 
to "unite various social and political forces" and claimed that 
its appeal is not intended to be "in opposition to" Yeltsin's 
memorandum of accord (Interfax, 28 March).  In just one 
indication of the appeal's anti-Yeltsin thrust, however, it lists 
as one of its goals putting a stop to "reforms 'for reforms' 
sake'" (Pravda, 18 March; Sovetskaya Rossiya, 19 March).  In 
response to the coalition's appeal, Yeltsin's press service 
issued a statement that said, in part: "The president's 
Administration expects the new association to make a specific 
contribution to the preparation of an agreement on civil peace in 
Russia and. . . to its practical implementation" (Radio Rossii, 
Interfax, 18 March). 
   Unlike earlier attempts by the nationalist and comiTiunist 
opposition to form a common front--the hard-line National 
Salvation Front (NSF), for example--the new coalition is 
potentially a more powerful force because it includes 
representatives of moderate opposition forces and appears to be 
deliberately excluding extremists.  The coalition describes 
itself as "open" to such disparate social groups as "liberals and 
communists, entrepreneurs and workers, private farmers and 
kolkhoz workers . . . republicans and supporters of presidential 
authority."  Rutskoy, Zorkin, Baburin, the CPRF's Zyuganov, 
Agrarian Party leader Mikhail Lapshin, centrist Democratic Party 
of Russia (DPR) deputy Sergey Glazyev, and other notables signed 
the appeal.  Significantly, the appeal was not signed by 
political extremists such as Zhirinovskiy or former NSF 
cochairman Ilya Konstantinov (Pravda, 18 March; Sovetskaya 
Rossiya, 19 March).  Zhirinovskiy indicated that he knew 
"nothing" about Accord for Russia before its appeal was published 
and asserted that the coalition's leaders "had never asked him to 
sign the document" (Interfax, 17 March).  Underscoring the 
coalition's reluctance to associate with Zhirinovskiy, Zyuganov 
stated at a press conference that "our movement does not set the 
aim of making dashes to the south"--a reference to Zhirinovskiy's 
expansionist aims and the title of his autobiography (Sovetskaya 
Rossiya, 19 March). 

   Anticipating Early Elections 

   Russian journalists across the political spectrum have linked the 
formation 9f Accord for Russia to the start of an election 
campaign, anticipating-alike some prominent politicians--that 
elections will be held before 1996 (see box 3).  In introductory 
comments to its publication of Accord for Russia's 
appeal, Pravda (18 March) noted that "various political blocs, 
coalitions, and alliances are taking shape ahead of possible 
presidential elections."  An article in the official government 
newspaper Rossiyskiye Vesti (23 March) noted that Accord for 
Russia's leaders had formed an "election coalition" in a "normal 
attempt to win the upcoming presidential campaign."  Izvestiya 
(19 March) warned that Accord for Russia represents the 
successful "consolidation of antireform forces rejecting broad 
civil accord" and assailed the "passivity" of reformist parties, 
contending that they had opened the door to a rival "organization 
that can pool its efforts in the fight for power." 

   Outlook 

   A movement to establish a national accord can be successful--as 
in the case of the Moncloa agreement in post-Franco Spain, for 
example--if the major political forces seriously desire to avoid 
the danger that political conflict will escalate into 
unacceptably costly violence.  Despite the violence of early 
October, political figures in Russia appear more interested in 
posturing before the voters and scoring political points against 
their opponents than in making the difficult compromises needed 
for an effective accord.  Given the continuing deep divisions 
between Yeltsin and his opponents and their eagerness to exploit 
what they see as his weakened authority in order to force early 
elections, Russia's competing proposals for accord appear more 
likely to fuel rather than dampen political conflict. 
   BEGIN BOX 1 

            Main Points of Yeltsin's Memorandum of Accord 

   President Yeltsin formally presented his idea for a memorandum of 
accord at a 10 March meeting attended by parliamentary leaders, 
political figures, and some trade union representatives--probably 
from the reformist Independent Miners' Union and the Sotsprof 
organization.  Leaders of major opposition groups which Yeltsin 
claims to want to win over were apparently excluded, however 
(Izvestiya, 11 March).  According to press summaries, Yeltsin's 
draft: 
   --  Prohibits the holding of national elections before the 
expiration of Yeltsin's and the current parliament's terms in 
1996 and the introduction of "destabilizing" amendments to the 
constitution (an earlier draft had reportedly set a two-year 
prohibition on any amendments).  These are probably the most 
controversial provisions 9f the memorandum, and Communist Party 
leader Gennadiy Zyuganov has already indicated that he is against 
them (Interfax, 1 April). 
   --  Obligates signatories not to use "interpretations" of last 
autumn's constitutional crisis or the August 1991 coup attempt as 
a "pretext" for further confrontation.  This provision is an 
obvious attempt to forestall opposition efforts to publicly 
challenge the constitutionality of Yeltsin's September 1993 edict 
dissolving the legislature. 
   --  Precludes Federation components from altering their 
constitutional status (i.e., oblasts declaring themselves 
republics) and concluding bilateral treaties with federal 
authorities such as the one recently signed by Tatarstan, a move 
that may run into opposition in the Federation Council and from 
the Federation components. 
   --  Prohibits workers from striking for additional state funding. 
   --  Establishes a "Conciliation Commission" to be composed of 
representatives of all signatories and vested with the authority 
to demand that individuals and political groups that violate any 
of the accord's provisions be "removed from office" or otherwise 
"excluded" from political-activity. 
   Sources:  Pravda, 23 March; Kommersant-Daily, 26, 29 March; 
Interfax, 31 March; Izvestiya, 1 April. 

   END BOX 1 

   BEGIN BOX 2 

               Drafting the Memorandum of Accord 

   Yeltsin entrusted the drafting of his memorandum of accord to a 
five-part working group headed by Boris Topornin, cochairman of 
Yeltsin's Public Chamber--an advisory body representing non-state 
political and social organizations (ITAR-TASS, 1O March).  At the 
same time, a parliamentary working group headed by Women of 
Russia leader Alevtina Fedulova was also established to work on a 
parallel draft evidently to be incorporated in the final version. 
The group reportedly includes representatives of all party 
factions in the Duma (Rossiyskiye Vesti, 18 March).  Yeltsin's 
draft was reportedly completed on 29 March, but he has indicated 
that it will not be published "for the time being" to allow 
political parties and groups time to review it and make 
"suggestions" (ITAR-TASS, 29 March, 1 April). 

   END BOX 2 

   BEGIN BOX 3 

                 Maneuvering for Early Elections 
   Although both President Yeltsin (Izvestiya, 26 March) and Duma 
Chairman Rybkin (Die Woche, 3O March) have said that elections 
will not occur before 1996, a number of political figures have 
predicted early presidential elections: 
   --  Sergey Shakhray has predicted that there remains "as little 
as a year and a half" before presidential elections and, contrary 
to expectations, announced that he will not be a candidate (ITAR- 
TASS, 23 March; Segodnya, 31 March). 
   --  Vladimir Zhirinovskiy, who makes no secret of his 
presidential ambitions, has stated that elections "may take place 
already this year" (RIA, 19 March). 
   --  At the CPRF Central Executive Committee plenum, Gennadiy 
Zyuganov said that early presidential elections may prove "the 
best way out of the situation of confrontation" (Sovetskaya 
Rossiya, 17 March). 
   In the meantime, political organizations are regrouping and 
maneuvering in the kind of activity reminiscent of last summer, 
when the Congress of People's Deputies was still resisting calls 
for early elections, but their scheduling was nonetheless 
anticipated: 
   --  Russia's Choice leader Yegor Gaydar has announced his bloc's 
intention to become a formal political party, even though the 
move risks losing the support of the loose-knit Democratic Russia 
movement (Segodnya, 31 March).  According to Gaydar, Yeltsin will 
support the new Russia's Choice party and will not try to 
establish a rival presidential party (ITAR-TASS, 1 April). 
   --  In an example of the fluid political groupings that occur in 
Russia, Segodnya on 1 April announced the creation of a new 
Russian "patriotic movement" called "People's Alliance."  Unlike 
other, usually highly nationalistic movements that call 
themselves "patriotic," however, this one includes such moderate 
figures as constitutional specialist Oleg Rumyantsev, the DPR's 
Glazyev (who also signed Accord for Russia's appeal), and Yuriy 
Boldyrev, a cochairman of the moderate reformist Yabloko 
parliamentary faction. 

   END BOX 3 
(AUTHOR:  O'CONNELL.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL 
CHIEF, ANALYSIS BRANCH, (7O3) 733-6070.) 
ENEAG/BLOUGH cs 6/0057z apr 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-9 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000020094001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   6 April 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-O5APR94-RUSSIA 
<H3> <TI>      Zhirinovskiy Gains Firm Control Over LDPR </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Zhirinovskiy Gains Firm Control Over LDPR </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
Vladimir      Zhirinovskiy demonstrated his firm grip over the 
ultranationalist Liberal Democratic Party of Russia (LDPR) at the 
party's 2 April congress, persuading the gathering to alter the 
party's rules to formally give him virtually unchallengeable 
powers.  Reportedly at his behest, the congress voted to extend 
his powers as party chairman until 2004.  Previously the party 
charter stipulated that the chairman's term lasted three years. 
The congress also granted him the power to personally appoint and 
dismiss members of the party's Supreme Council and to assume its 
powers in the newly approved three-year interim between 
congresses.  Previously, the Supreme Council and the chairman 
"jointly" served as the LDPR's "supreme" governing body between 
congresses, held on an annual basis.  Finally, the congress 
confirmed Zhirinovskiy as the LDPR candidate in future 
presidential elections (LDPR Press Release, December 1993; ITAR- 
TASS, Interfax, 2 April).  The congress was extensively covered 
by the independent news agency Interfax and the state-run ITAR- 
TASS agency as well as the two main television news programs 
"Vesti" and "Novosti" (ITAR-TASS, Interfax, Russian TV, Ostankino 
TV, 2 April). 
   Although Zhirinovskiy now has the power single-handedly to expel 
party members, the State Duma has so far thwarted his efforts to 
introduce an amendment into its draft rules that would allow him 
to expel party heretics from the LDPR's parliamentary faction and 
replace them with loyalists.  Known as the "imperative mandate," 
this rule would allow parties to take away a rebellious deputy's 
credentials and substitute the next member on the party's 
election list (ITAR-TASS, 18 March).  Zhirinovskiy has proposed 
the imperative mandate amendment for adoption at least twice in 
the Duma, prompted by high-level defections from the LDPR in mid- 
February.  At that time deputies Viktor Kobelev, the party's 
administrator, and Aleksandr Pronin, a leading official in the 
LDPR's Moscow organization, announced their resignation from the 
party after denouncing Zhirinovskiy's extremist foreign policy 
statements (Trends of 16 February 1994, page 33).  More recently, 
Vyacheslav Marychev--the party's number two candidate on its 
election list behind Kobelev and a highly visible deputy in the 
Duma--announced that he had been expelled from the LDPR because 
of his opposition to the imperative mandate (Interfax, 4 April). 
(AUTHOR:  O'CONNELL.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL 
CHIEF, ANALYSIS BRANCH, (703) 733-6070.) 
ENEAG/BLOUGH CS 6/0104z apr 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-10 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000020194001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   7 April 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-06APR94-EL SALVADOR 
<H3> <TI>      Leftists Looking For Gains in Legislature </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Leftists Looking For Gains in Legislature </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
SUMMARY 

                               While El Salvador's leftist coalition is unlikely to win the 
runoff elections for president next month, the former rebels in 
the coalition are looking to become the main opposition force in 
the legislature where the final vote remains undecided. 

                          END SUMMARY 

   The 20 March contest to elect a new president, deputies to the 
Legislative Assembly and mayors--the first elections held since 
the January 1992 Chapultepec peace accords ended El Salvador's 
civil war--left the ruling party frontrunner just short of the 
absolute majority needed to win the presidency.  Consequently, on 
24 April, Armando Calderon Sol, candidate from the ruling right- 
wing Nationalist Republican Alliance (ARENA) party--who won 49.03 
percent of the vote according to the Supreme Electoral Tribunal 
(TSE)--will face the second highest vote-getter, leftist 
candidate Ruben Zamora.  Zamora, representing the Democratic 
Convergence (CD), an electoral coaliton of leftist parties, 
including the former rebels of the Farabundo Marti National 
Liberation Front (FMLN), won 24.90 percent of the vote, according 
to TSE figures (San Salvador Canal Doce Television, 31 March) 
(See Note 1). 

   (Note 1) Beset by internal divisions, the former ruling party 
during the mid-1980's, the Christian Democratic Party, took only 
16.39 percent of the presidential vote (Canal Doce Television, 31 
March). 

   Campaign rhetoric notwithstanding, Zamora is unlikely to boost 
his percentage of the presidential vote in the April elections by 
the nearly 26 percent required to win the presidency.  The CD 
candidate's plans "to win the presidency in the runoff" by 
reaching out to a broader "coalition of forces "--expressed by 
Zamora on 22 March in a television interview--will unlikely 
generate enough additional votes given the "decision" by the 
centrist Christian Democratic Party (PDC) not to endorse the 
leftist candidate (Panama City ACAN, 25 March) (See Note 2). 

   (Note 2) The PDC declined to endores the ARENA candidate, as 
well. 

   Although Zamora also suggested that the elimination of 
administrative obstacles facing voters during the March elections 
would help the CD ticket win in April, prominent FMLN leader 
Joaquin Villalobos indicated that "anomalies" in the voting 
process would probably make little difference in the presidential 
vote (See Note 3).  Thus, although Zamora asserted that it is to 
the CD's "advantage" to have "another opportunity to correct. . 
. the serious deficiencies of the first election," in a press 
conference on 22 March, Villalobos noted that alleged incidents 
of electoral fraud "may not affect the final outcome of the 
presidential elections" (Canal Doce Television, 22 March). 

   (Note 3) According to the United Nations Observers for El 
Salvador, some 25,000 Salvadorans--out of approximately 2.5 
million eligible voters--were unable to vote on 20 March because 
their names did not appear on voter registers (San Salvador Radio 
Cadena YSKL, 22 March). 

   Focus on Legislature 

   On the other hand, Villalobos indicated that the FMLN viewed 
voting irregularities as a much more significant issue in the 
legislative--and mayoral--races and suggested that his party will 
push to have votes it considers affected by "fraud" resolved in 
the FMLN's favor.  In comparison to the presidential race, 
Villalobos noted that electoral irregularities "did indeed 
affect" the March legislative elections because local elections 
can be "decided" by a relatively small number of votes. 
Reflecting the FMLN's concern that irregularities in voting 
results could deprive the FMLN of seats in the legislature--where 
it stands to become the main political opposition--Villalobos 
indicated that because the FMLN is "extremely worried" that 
"anomalies" in the deputy vote count "are designed to establish a 
PCN-ARENA majority in the Legislative Assembly," it is 
"contesting" questionable vote counts through "legal means," 
presumably by appealing to the Supreme Electoral Tribunal (San 
Salvador Radio Maya Vision, 23 March) (See Note 4). 

   (Note 4) "Unofficial" figures on the vote for deputies to the 84- 
seat Legislative Assembly, indicate that, on the right, ARENA won 
40 seats and the National Conciliation Party (PCN), 3.  Among the 
opposition parties of the center and left, the PDC won 16; the 
FMLN, 20; and the CD, 3.  A remaining seat was won by an 
evangelical party (San Salvador Radio Cadena YSKL, 22 March). 

   Outlook 

   Although the Salvadoran left will continue to promote the 
upcoming presidential runoff as an opportunity for victory over 
the ruling ARENA party, at best the elections will enhance the 
left's position as a viable political force if leftist candidate 
Zamora manages to better last month's vote count.  A more 
important indication of the left's performance in its first 
meaningful participation in electoral politics will be the number 
of seats it can gain in the Legislative Assembly, where the 
former rebels stand to become the main opposition party. 

(AUTHOR: ROLLINS.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF 
ANALYST, EUROPE/LATIN AMERICA GROUP (703) 733-6120.) 
ELAG/GILISON/JF 06/1809Z APR 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-11 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000020294001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   7 April 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-06APR94-POLAND 
<H3> <TI>      Walesa Intensifies Campaign Against Government </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Walesa Intensifies Campaign Against Government </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
SUMMARY 

                              Apparently clearing the way for a reelection bid in 1995, 
President Lech Walesa has stepped up his criticism of the 
governing coalition's largest party, the formerly communist 
Alliance of the Democratic Left (SLD), in an effort to boost his 
sagging popularity.  Walesa has also put the government under 
extreme pressure by blocking some of its important legislation 
and appointments, while at the same time threatening to dissolve 
parliament and call early elections. 

                          END SUMMARY 

   Walesa's reelection strategy appears to center on his past 
credentials as an ardent anticommunist.  In recent 
pronouncements, he has indicated that his decision to run will be 
based on the country's need for a strong defender against the 
threat of resurgent communism.  During a 30 March meeting with 
journalists from the Catholic daily Slowo--Dziennik Katolicki, 
Walesa said that he was becoming "increasingly more convinced" 
that "once again" he would have to "fight for" the presidency in 
the 1995 elections.  Referring to SLD members in the government, 
he declared that "once again the Politburo wants to have all the 
power" and suggested that legislators should present him with 
"proposals on file-checking and decommunization" to investigate 
possible collaborators with the former communist regime 
(Rzeczpospolita, 31 March).  Walesa also suggested that other 
possible presidential candidates, such as Prime Minister Waldemar 
Pawlak, are not fit to handle the chaos that "times like these 
will bring," saying that Pawlak has "no experience with people in 
the streets, stone throwing, and strikes" and that "some people 
can already smell gunpowder while some still cannot" (Warsaw 
Radio, 30 March). 

   Walesa's Actions 

   In a flurry of activity before the Easter holidays, Walesa has 
also blocked government-sponsored legislation and appointments, 
challenging the government's legitimacy and accusing it of 
communist-era tactics in response to SLD protests of his moves. 

   --On 25 March, Walesa rejected the governing coalition's 
candidate for finance minister, Dariusz Rosati.  After the SLD 
announced that the government would not withdraw Rosati's 
candidacy, Walesa accused it of "still behaving as if" the 
nomination "were a decision made by the Politburo" 
(Rzeczpospolita, 31 March). 

   --On 30 March, Walesa threatened to "omit the Sejm" in passing 
the Concordat with the Vatican if the SLD musters enough 
parliamentary votes to block its passage (Rzeczpospolita, 31 
March) 

   --On 31 March, Walesa vetoed the government's law replacing the 
tax on large wage increases in state-run firms with a tax that 
includes punitive measures against private firms that grant 
similar wage increases (PAP, 31 March). 

   --The same day, dismissing government questioning of his 
authority to dismiss Marek Markiewicz as head of the Polish 
Television and Radio Council, Walesa named Ryszard Bender, a 
member of the anticommunist Christian National Union, as 
Markiewicz's replacement (PAP, 31 March). 

   --In a 31 March interview with PAP, Walesa threatened to dissolve 
the Sejm if the governing coalition attempts to limit his powers, 
saying that he would "tell the people" that "now we can see a 
monopoly of the communist type being established.  Aren't you 
afraid that communism is coming back?" 

   Popularity 

   Walesa's campaign against former communists comes at a time when 
he is suffering from low popularity ratings.  According to the 
Public Opinion Research Center (CBOS), 60 percent of respondents 
in a mid-March poll agreed that the "president's actions weakened 
the state" while only 17 percent disagreed (PAP, 28 March). 
Suggesting that it would be an uphill struggle for Walesa to make 
a bid for reelection, he finished fourth in a CBOS presidential 
preference poll with only nine percent, behind SLD leader 
Aleksander Kwasniewski's 17 percent and the eleven percent of 
Pawlak and former Foreign Minister Krzysztof Skubiszewski 
(Rzeczpospolita, 29 March). 

   Implications 

   Portraying himself as an opposition figure battling against a 
"communist" government, Walesa appears to be making an effort to 
regain his base of support among staunchly anticommunist voters 
from the ranks of the former Solidarity movement.  Despite the 
SLD's victory in the fall parliamentary elections, its status as 
a governing party during a time of continuing economic woes--and 
Walesa's calculation that he has little to lose by alienating SLD 
voters--has apparently made the party an easy target for the 
president.  This strategy has been undermined, however, by 
Walesa's frequent conflicts with virtually all the former 
Solidarity parties and the Solidarity trade union, and his lack 
of a strong political base outside of a group that he helped to 
form, the small Nonparty Bloc in Support of Reforms, which 
garnered only five percent of the vote in the fall elections. 

(AUTHOR:  MIHAILOVICH.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL 
CHIEF ANALYST, EUROPE/LATIN AMERICA GROUP, (703) 733-6120.) 
ELAG/GILISON/JF 06/1916Z APR 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-12 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000020394001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   7 April 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-06APR94-JAPAN-EU 
<H3> <TI>      Japan-EU:  Tokyo Seeks EU Support Against U.S. Trade Policy </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Japan-EU:  Tokyo Seeks EU Support Against U.S. Trade Policy </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
Recent      Japanese press reporting has suggested that the Japanese 
Government is attempting to enlist the support of the European 
Union (EU) against U.S. efforts to force open Japanese markets, 
particularly Washington's recent revival of the Super 301 
provision of the 1988 Omnibus Trade Bill.  Minister of 
International Trade and Industry Hiroshi Kumagai, for example, 
appears to have used French Foreign Minister Alain Juppe's 31 
March-3 April visit to Tokyo to coordinate Japanese and French 
strategy toward any possible U.S. use of Super 301, which permits 
Washington to identify countries that discriminate against U.S. 
exports and impose sanctions if those countries fail to remove 
barriers to U.S. products.  According to a 1 April Kyodo report, 
Japanese officials reported that during a 1 April meeting, 
Kumagai and Juppe agreed that Tokyo and Paris would "oppose 
unilateral U.S. trade retaliation" such as that mandated by Super 
301.  In comments suggesting that the two countries might attempt 
to lobby against Super 301 during the upcoming 12-15 April 
ministerial conference of the General Agreement on Tariffs and 
Trade (GATT) in Marrakech, Morocco, Juppe reportedly told Kumagai 
that he hoped retaliatory measures, such as Super 301, would be 
abolished after GATT members sign the final accord of the Uruguay 
Round of multilateral trade talks in Marrakech (Kyodo, 1 April). 

   Japanese media reporting about Foreign Minister Tsutomu Hata's 
plans for the Marrakech meeting also suggests that Tokyo has been 
lining up European support against Super 301.  According to a 6 
April Kyodo report, an undentified Japanese Government source 
stated that, during meetings with U.S. Trade Representative 
Mickey Kantor, Hata will urge Washington not to invoke Super 301 
against Japan by citing European and Asian criticism of the 
provision.  Hata may have solicited support from EU Commissioner 
Sir Leon Brittan for this effort when, according to the 29 March 
Mainichi Shimbun, Hata called Brittan on 29 March to explain the 
Japanese market opening package announced that day. 

(AUTHOR:  BOUNDS.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
ASIA DIVISION ANALYSIS TEAM, (703)-733-6096.) 
EAG/HEBBEL/JF 06/2050Z APR 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-13 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000020494001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   7 April 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U. S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-06Apr94-Ukraine 
<H3> <TI>      Communists Win Election in East, Democrats Win in West </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Communists Win Election in East, Democrats Win in West </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY 
                                   Voters in the 27 March Ukrainian Supreme Soviet election voted 
heavily for the recently reconstituted Communist Party of Ukraine 
(CPU), especially in the east and south, preferring it to other 
leftist parties--the Socialist Party of Ukraine (SPU) and Labor 
Party--which were almost shut out.  Rukh ran very well in Kiev 
city, and democrats dominated in the west, accentuating the 
regional divergences in the country.  Despite the apparent lack 
of enthusiasm for parties and the huge number of nonparty 
candidates running, candidates with party affiliation did very 
well in the first round and also got about half the places in the 
runoffs, suggesting that parties may play a bigger role in the 
new parliament than had been expected. 
                              END SUMMARY 
   Very few seats were settled on this first round of the election 
The Central Election Commission announced on 29 March that 49 of 
the 450 seats had been decided in the 27 March first round and 
that the victors included 12 from the CPU; 4 from Rukh; 2 each 
from the URP (Ukrainian Republican Party), SelPU (Peasant Party 
of Ukraine), KUN (Congress of Ukrainian Nationalists), and SPU; 
and 1 from the UKRP (Ukrainian Conservative Republican Party- 
-Stepan Khmara's party), while 24 have no party affiliations 
(UNIAN, 29 March).  UNIAR, however, on 30 March said 48 seats had 
been decided and presented a different list of victors, including 
11 independents, 10 CPU, 6 Rukh, 3 "Ukraine Democratic 
Association," 3 KUN, 3 New Wave, 2 DemPU (Democratic Party of 
Ukraine), 2 SPU, 2 SOU (Union of Officers of Ukraine), 2 URP, and 
1 each for SelPU, UKRP, UNA (Ukrainian National Assembly), and 
MBR (InterregionaL Bloc of Reforms--the bloc of former Premier 
Leonid Kuchma and former Supreme Soviet Deputy Chairman Volodymyr 
Hrynyov). 
   Leftists Run Well 
   In addition to its Lead in the small number of settled contests, 
the CPU and other leftist parties are poised for significant 
gains in the runoffs, having placed far more candidates in the 
runoff contests than the democratic parties.  Interfax reported 
on 30 March that 159 CPU members and 29 SPU would be in the 
runoffs--25 percent of the total number of second-round 
candidates--while 70 Rukh, 24 URP, and 6 KUN candidates would 
compete and that combined democratic candidates would total about 
125 (a figure including 6 from the ultranationalist UNA), versus 
about 400 independent candidates.  Demokratychna Ukraina reported 
on 31 March that 185 CPU members would go into the runoffs along 
with 26 SPU and 83 for the communist-inclined SelPU, versus only 
55 Rukh (71, if one counts candidates backed by Rukh) and 27 URP. 
Other Leftist parties, such as the SPU and Labor, were almost 
shut out by the CPU--even though the CPU was banned until 
recently and presumably was not as well organized as the SPU or 
other Longer-established parties.  Leftist voters apparently were 
attracted by the communist Label, not by a more moderate form of 
socialism, or wished to register protest by voting communist. 
The CPU even beat out non-nationalist democrats based in the 
east:  The Kuchma-Hrynyov MBR only won 40 places in the runoffs, 
according to the 1 April Nezavisimaya Gazeta. 
   The efforts by democratic parties to avoid destructive 
competition and present a united front against leftists and 
rightists achieved some success, although probably not as much as 
some democrats are claiming.  The democratic bloc--now titled 
"Ukraine Democratic Association"--set up by Rukh, URP, DemPU, and 
other democratic parties, did well in Lviv and appears to have 
helped the democrats at Least get into the runoffs in some 
eastern and southern districts.  Democratic bloc leader Levko 
Lukyanenko optimistically claimed after the election that 182 
democratic candidates had gotten into the runoffs versus 170 CPU 
and Less than 30 SPU (Kiev radio, 30 March).  He broke these down 
as 88 from the democratic bloc plus 94 independents he considered 
"of democratic orientation."  He also claimed 24 of the first 
round victors as representatives of his bloc (Kyivska Pravda, 1 
April), apparently adding together all democratically-inclined 
victors. 
   Voters Support Parties 
   In another notable trend, voters gave more support than expected 
to party-affiliated candidates, leading them to dominate the 
first-round winners and claim a Large share of places in the 
runoffs.  UNIAR's List of the 48 first-round winners included 37 
with party affiliation and only 11 without, suggesting that ties 
to a party gave a real advantage.  This idea is reinforced by the 
large number of party candidates who made it into the runoffs- 
-402 party candidates versus 400 independents, according to the 
30 March Interfax.  In contrast, only 11 percent of first-round 
candidates had been nominated by parties, according to the 2 
March Holos Ukrainy, although many others had party affiliations. 
The apparent discouraging of parties in the election law, the 
many nonparty candidates, the often-voiced anti-party sentiment, 
and the preference of many prominent, establishment candidates 
for running as independents had encouraged expectation that the 
overwhelming majority of those elected would be people without 
party ties, leaving only tiny party factions in the new 
parliament.  The first round suggests that parties may play a 
bigger role than expected and that, with voters concentrating 
their votes on the CPU and Rukh, there will be fewer parties and 
bigger party factions in the new parliament--although the 
majority may still be independents. 
   Regional Variations 
   The election appeared to not only reflect polarization between 
the CPU and Rukh but also to accentuate regional divergences in 
Ukraine, with the CPU far ahead in the east and south and Rukh 
candidates and other democrats sweeping Kiev city and the west. 
   South 
   The CPU was clearly dominant in the southern oblasts of Odesa, 
Mykolaiv, and Kherson, which altogether contain 45 districts. 
(No substantial results from Krym, where many potential voters 
refused to participate, have been reported yet.)  With all but 
one district reported in these three oblasts, the CPU won the 
only seat settled and won places in 16 runoffs, while fellow 
leftists in the SPU and SeLPU won only 2 runoff places apiece. 
The Hrynyov-Kuchma bloc MBR won 3 runoff places and the Liberal 
Party 1.  Democratic nationalists won hardly any places in the 
runoffs:  Rukh 4, URP 1, Union of Officers of Ukraine (SOU) 1, 
and Greens 1 (SEE BOX ONE). 
   -- In Odesa Oblast's 23 districts, CPU First Secretary Mykhaylo 
Myaskovskyy won the only seat settled (Post-Postup News Agency, 
29 March), while the CPU placed candidates in 5 runoffs, and 
other runoffs will include a "Union of Communists of Odesa" 
candidate, a pro-communist candidate, and a SeLPU candidate 
(Post-Postup, 29 March).  Rukh ran only 12 candidates (its list 
of candidates was printed in the 17 March Rada) and got none into 
the runoffs, while the democratic bloc put up 19 candidates (its 
list of candidates appeared in Narodna Hazeta, No. 11-12) and got 
one (a DemPU) candidate in the runoffs. 
   -- In Kherson, no seats were filled on the first round.  The CPU 
placed candidates in runoffs in 8 of the 11 districts, while the 
SPU placed 2 candidates and the SeLPU 1.  Non-nationalist 
democrats--reformers got 1 Liberal candidate and 1 MBR candidate 
in runoffs (Post-Postup, 30 March).  Rukh and the democratic bloc 
had run 10 candidates (Rada, 17 March; Narodna Hazeta, No. 11-12) 
and placed 2 candidates in the runoffs, both running under the 
label "Ukraine Democratic Association" (Post-Postup, 30 March). 
   -- In Mykolaiv, no seats were filled, but democrats did somewhat 
better than in Odesa and Kherson.  The CPU placed candidates in 
runoffs in 4 of the 11 districts, the MBR in 2, Rukh in 2, URP in 
1, SOU in 1, and Greens in 1 (Post-Postup, 29 March).  The 
democratic bloc as a whole outscored the CPU, getting 5 in the 
runoffs (the Rukh, URP, SOU, and Greens candidates) out of the 11 
it nominated (Narodna Hazeta, No. 11-12).  Rukh had nominated 
candidates in all districts (Rada, 17 March) and 3 candidates it 
endorsed (including 1 SOU candidate) got into the runoffs. 
   East 
Democrats expected an uphill struggle in the east and so had 
largely united their efforts, with the democratic bloc usually 
able to field far more candidates than Rukh alone (see the Rukh 
list in the 17 March Rada and the democratic bloc list in Narodna 
Hazeta, No. 11-12).  Rukh appeared especially weak in Kharkiv and 
Dnipropetrovsk, where the democratic bloc endorsed more URP or 
DemPU candidates than Rukh candidates (SEE BOX TWO). 
   Election returns from the east are still incomplete but show a 
big CPU lead, with 11 CPU members already elected and at least 55 
in runoffs, plus 9 SPU and 4 SeLPU candidates.  Meanwhile, the 
democratic parties so far appear to have only about 20 in 
runoffs.  Even the eastern-oriented Hrynyov-Kuchma MBR and the 
Liberal Party appear to be getting only a handful of candidates 
into the runoffs. 
   ---- In Zaporizhzhya, with all 18 districts reporting, the CPU 
won 
the only seat settled and got candidates into 8 runoffs, SeLPU 
got 3 into the runoffs, but SPU got none.  Independents got 18 in 
the runoffs, while democrats got some into runoffs running as the 
"Ukraine" bloc (2) or the "We" bloc (4).  The Liberals and MBR 
got none.  Rukh put up candidates in 13 districts (Rada, 17 
March) and got 3 into runoffs, but as "Ukraine" bloc or non-party 
candidates (Post-Postup, 30 March), while the democratic bloc put 
up 15 candidates (Narodna Hazeta, No. 11-12) and got 4 into 
runoffs, as "Ukraine" bloc, "We" bloc, or nonparty.  Three of 
these were also Rukh candidates, and the fourth was from the PDVU 
(the centrist Party of Democratic Revival of Ukraine). 
   -- In Luhansk, the CPU's strength was demonstrated dramatically 
when CPU candidates won 6 of the 25 districts in the first round. 
One independent also won (UNIAR, 28 March).  Almost all districts 
have only communists in the runoffs, according to local democrats 
(Post-Postup, 1 April). 
   -- In Dnipropetrovsk, the one seat settled in the first round 
went to a SeLPU member, while democrats have a slight lead in 
runoff spots for the other 33 seats, with 11 for the "Ukraine" 
democratic bloc (including 3 backed by Rukh).  Eight CPU, 3 MBR, 
2 Labor Party, 2 Rukh (plus 2 in the Ukraine bloc), and 1 SelPU 
candidates also placed in the runoffs  (Post-Postup, 30, 31 
March). 
   -- In Kharkiv, returns from 14 of the 28 districts filled no 
seats but put 8 CPU candidates into runoffs, as against 3 SPU, 2 
Rukh, 1 MBR, and 1 DemPU (Post-Postup, 30 March). 


-- In Donetsk, the Donetsk paper Aktsent on 1 April characterized 
the election as a "colossal success" for leftists and a "full 
defeat" for nationalists, citing several districts where 
democrats got only a tiny percentage of votes.  The paper 
reported that 4 of the 7 seats filled went to the CPU, while 32 
of the 81 runoff candidates are CPU, 6 SPU, 4 Labor Party, 2 
Civil Congress of Ukraine, and 1 each for SeLPU and the Liberal 
Party.  There is no evidence so far that Rukh, the democratic 
bloc, or even the Hrynyov-Kuchma MBR got into the runoffs. 
Although Aktsent reported that only one Liberal Party candidate 
got into the runoffs, the party itself claimed 4 of its 
candidates would be in the runoffs (Rada, 31 March). 
   Rukh Territory 
   In sharp contrast to the east and south, Kiev city and the west 
seem likely to be swept by the democratic bloc and Rukh, with the 
CPU making little showing. 
   Kiev city.  Rukh did very well in the capitol, winning two seats 
outright and getting into the runoffs in almost all of the 21 
remaining districts, giving it a good chance of winning the 
overwhelming majority of Kiev seats.  The two seats won by Rukh- 
backed candidates--Rukh leader Serhiy Holovatyy and independent 
radical economist Volodymyr Lanovyy--were the only Kiev city 
seats won on the first round.  Judging by the list published by 
the Post-Postup News Agency on 30 March and in the 29 March 
Vecherniy Kiev, Rukh candidates or candidates affiliated with 
Rukh got into runoffs in 20 of the other 21 districts, while Rukh 
lost out in only one district.  Rukh's success is all the more 
surprising because some of its prominent figures, such as Les 
Tanyuk, chose to run outside Kiev city, leaving Rukh leaders 
Holovatyy, Ivan Zayets, and Yuriy Kostenko, and independents 
Vecherniy Kiev editor Vitaliy Karpenko, former Defense Minister 
Kostyantyn Morozov, and economist Lanovyy the only big names on 
Rukh's endorsed list (published in the 17 March Rada).  Several 
of the successful candidates on Rukh's endorsed list were 
independents (Morozov, Karpenko, Lanovyy) or URP or KUN 
candidates, rather than actual Rukh members. 
   No other party came anywhere near Rukh's success in Kiev city. 
The UNA got 4 candidates into runoffs, the URP 3, CPU 3, SPU 1, 
KUN 1, and the KNDS (Congress of National Democratic Forces) 1. 
Ten independents got into runoffs.  Leftists were splintered, as 
the CPU and SPU competed against each other in almost every 
district (Post-Postup newspaper, 17-24 March). 
   Rukh even outstripped the democratic bloc of which it is a 
member.  The democratic bloc endorsed candidates in only 14 of 
the 23 districts, including 7 Rukh candidates, 4 URP, 1 KUN, and 
2 independents (Narodna Hazeta, No. 11-12), and 13 of the 14 were 
the same candidates as Rukh endorsed.  But the democratic bloc 
did not endorse Lanovyy or Holovatyy and so backed neither of the 
two elected in the first round, leaving it with no winners even 
though Rukh won two.  Bloc-endorsed candidates placed in 12 
district runoffs. 
   Lviv.  As expected, national democrats did very well in Lviv. 
Rukh candidates won 3 of the nine seats settled on the first 
round (out of 23 districts), the moderate national democratic New 
Wave bloc also won 3, while the ultranationalist parties UKRP and 
KUN each won 1, and an independent probably close to Rukh (Yevhen 
Zherebetskyy, who actually had helped found the local Rukh in 
1989, according to the 29 March Post-Postup) won the remaining 
seat. 
   The democratic bloc, locally called the Political Consultative 
Council of Lviv, did better than Rukh and may wind up with the 
overwhelming majority of Lviv's seats.  It endorsed candidates 
for all 23 districts, but since its member---parties often could 
not agree on one single candidate, it usually endorsed two or 
three candidates per district.  Its list of endorsees was 
published in the 5 March Vysokyy Zamok.  Six of the endorsees won 
on the first round (3 Rukh, 3 New Wave), and in one district both 
runoff candidates are endorsees, guaranteeing a seventh seat for 
the bloc.  In 10 other districts the bloc got at least one 
candidate in the runoff, while its candidates lost in 6 
districts.  Thus, the bloc has a chance of getting as many as 17 
of the 23 seats.  Its loss in at least one district--number 268- 
-appeared to be caused by the bloc backing two or three 
candidates who probably split the democratic vote, allowing 
candidates from the right extreme (KUN) and left extreme (CPU- 
SPU) to win the two runoff positions. 
   Rukh did not do as well in Lviv as it did in the last election, 
when, as the main democratic umbrella organization, it won most 
seats, and it will have fewer members on Lviv's delegation to the 
Supreme Soviet than the present 10 or so who still identify 
themselves with Rukh, rather than with some other party.  This 
year it ran candidates in 15 districts (Rada, 17 March) and saw 3 
win, another 6 get into runoffs, and 6, including Lviv Rukh 
Chairman Yuriy Klyuchkovskyy (who lost to a KUN candidate), lose. 
In addition, Rukh backed 3 candidates from New Wave who were 
elected.  In total, Rukh might get as much as 9 seats. 
   Among the other main parties in the democratic bloc, New Wave, a 
coalition of democrats, did well, probably because it had 
prominent candidates such as Ihor Yukhnovskyy and Viktor 
Pynzenyk.  It fielded only nine candidates (listed in the 12 
January Za Vilnu Ukrainu), three got elected (Yukhnovskyy, 
Pynzenyk, Ihor Koliushko), two got into runoffs (Taras Stetskiv 
and Zoreslava Romovska), and four lost. 
   The URP, although based in Lviv and one of the oldest democratic 
parties, did very poorly.  It ran candidates in 17 districts 
(listed in the 24 March Za Vilnu Ukrainu), but none were elected 
on the first ballot and only 4 got into runoffs, while 13 were 
defeated.  Especially humiliating, its national chairman Mykhaylo 
Horyn was defeated by ultranationalist Stepan Khmara in district 
261. 
   Ultranationalist parties--KUN, UNA, UKRP, OUN (Organization of 
Ukrainian Nationalists), and SNPU (Social---National Party of 
Ukraine)--did poorly, probably because they ran so many 
candidates against each other.  Ultranationalist candidates won 2 
of the 9 seats settled and got candidates in the runoffs in 8 
districts, but lost in 12 districts.  Their biggest success was 
Khmara's defeat of Horyn, a sweet revenge for Khmara, since he 
had been ousted as deputy leader of the URP in mid-1992 by 
incoming Chairman Horyn as part of a move to shift the URP toward 
a more centrist stance.  The other success was KUN nominee Ivan 
Bilas's defeat of Lviv Rukh Chairman Klyuchkovskyy in district 
278.  Most of the far right's successes, however, were by the 
relatively moderate KUN, which won one seat and got candidates 
into 6 runoffs.  The more radical UNA got candidates into 2 
runoffs, including commander of its paramilitary arm (UNSO) Oleh 
Vitovych in district 275 and UNA-UNSO chief of staff Yaroslav 
Ilyasevich in district 282.  The semi-fascist SNPU, which had put 
up candidates in 21 districts (Post-Postup newspaper, 17-24 
March), got no one into runoffs (Post-Postup News Agency, 29 
March). 
   Among leftists, few SPU and even fewer CPU candidates even 
registered in Lviv, and it is not clear if the few that did had 
any serious organizational support.  The lef t's only successes 
were getting one SPU-CPU candidate (Ivan Kelman) into the runoff 
in district 268 and one CPU candidate (Oleksandr Holub) into the 
runoff in district 266.  In the latter case, the victory was a 
fluke, since URP candidate Oleksandr Shandryuk won just under 50 
percent, and in a badly splintered field Holub came in second 
with only 7.7 percent (Post-Postup, 29 March). 
   Ivano-Frankivsk, Ternopil 
   Few results from the other two Galician oblasts are in yet, but 
they, like Lviv, settled a high proportion of seats in the first 
round and appeared to vote for national democrats or 
ultranationalists.  Ivano-Frankivsk filled 6 of its 12 seats, 
with 2 democratic bloc candidates, 2 DemPU, 1 URP, and 1 KUN 
candidate winning, while Ternopil filled 4 of its 10 seats, 
electing 1 each from Rukh, URP, UNA, and KUN (Post-Postup, 29 
March). 
   Implications 
   Concentration of votes for the CPU and Rukh and the democratic 
bloc may help reduce the large number of parties and create 
larger factions in the new parliament, bringing improvement over 
the present confused situation where few deputies adhere to any 
faction and a majority is hard to rally.  The difficulties Rukh 
and the democratic bloc have suffered in trying to agree on 
common candidates suggests that they probably will not succeed in 
creating a well-unified bloc in parliament.  The pre-election 
expectation of a majority of unaffiliated deputies appeared to 
favor President Leonid Kravchuk, Supreme Soviet Chairman Ivan 
Plyushch, and the present establishment--all of whom appeared to 
want to keep parties weak.  A large CPU faction may pose a threat 
to Kravchuk and to any future president, such as Kuchma, as well 
as to reformers, since they will not be as subject to 
manipulation as non-party deputies often dependent on the 
establishment.  The apparent weakness of other leftist parties 
and of the Liberal Party and MBR appears to throw the heavily 
populated and politically dominant east and south into the hands 
of the CPU.  Such a strong regional base for the CPU may 
accentuate the tension with west Ukraine and more reformist 
areas.  Thus, the election already may be signaling a significant 
political realignment of political parties and regional forces. 
   Box 1 
                        Party Candidates in Runoffs in South 
                                 45 districts* 
               CPU   Rukh   MBR   SPU  SeLPU  Liberals URP  Dembloc 
   Total        16     4     3     2    2       1       1     8 
Odesa         5     0     0     0    1       0       0     1 
Kherson       8     2     1     2    1       1       0     2 
Mykolaiv      4     2     2     0    0       0       1     5 
   *One CPU candidate in Odesa won on the first round. 
   End Box 1 


Box 2 
                  National Democratic Candidates in East 
                           152 Districts 
            Donetsk   Zaporizhzhya  Luhansk  Dnipropetrovsk 
Kharkiv 
        (47)         (18)         (25)        (34)          (28) 
   Rukh      18         13          16       14              15 
Bloc      39         15          21       34              28 
(included in the democratic bloc candidates are the following 
party candidates: 
Rukh       8          6          11        6               2 
URP        8          1           5        7               2 
DemPU      5          1                                    6 
   End Box 2 
   Box 3 
                  Results of First Round in Lviv* 
                           23 districts 
                       Won    In       Losses   Maximum 
                           Runoffs           Possible 
   Dembloc             6       11      6       17 
Rukh                3        6      6        9 
New Wave            3        2      4        5 
URP                 0        4     13        4 
Ultranationalists   2        8     12       10 
SPU---CPU           0        2      ?**      2 
   *Post-Postup, 28 March; Vysokyy Zamok, 29 March; Za Vilnu 
Ukrainu, 30 March. 
   **Lists of SPU or CPU candidates were not published, so it is 
unclear how many got onto the ballot at all.  Incomplete Lviv 
press listings of district candidates included 4 SPU candidates 
and only 2 CPU. 
   End Box 3 
   (AUTHOR:  HAHN.  QUESTIONS AND/OR,COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
ANALYSIS BRANCH, RUSSIA DIVISION (703) 733-6070.) 
ENEAG/BLOUGH JEG 06/2307Z APR 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-14 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000020694001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   7 April 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-6APR94-CHINA-LIBYA-UN 
<H3> <TI>      Beijing Reiterates Stance Against Sanctions </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Beijing Reiterates Stance Against Sanctions </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
In   a move that could complicate international efforts to maintain 
pressure on Libya for its alleged involvement in the bombing of 
Pan Am Flight 103 in 1988 and a French airliner in 1989, Beijing 
has forcefully reiterated its opposition to sanctions against 
Libya and expressed greater support for Libya's position than in 
the past.  Meeting with Libyan foreign minister 'Umar Mustafa al- 
Muntasir on the second day of his 28-30 March visit to Beijing, 
PRC Foreign Minister and Vice Premier Qian Qichen restated the 
position Beijing adopted against sanctions when it intensified 
its support of Libya prior to the United Nations Security Council 
(UNSC) vote imposing sanctions in March 1992.  According to a 29 
March Xinhua account of the talks, Qian said that Beijing 
continues to "disapprove of imposing sanctions against Libya, let 
alone stepping up sanctions," and "favors settlement of the 
Lockerbie crisis through consultation and negotiation by the 
parties concerned."  Reiterating China's "opposition to terrorism 
of any description," Qian said that the sanctions had "escalated 
tensions in the region" and should be settled "through peaceful 
means."  Last November the PRC Ambassador to the United Nations 
Li Zhaoxing had similarly registered Beijing's authoritative 
opposition to new UNSC sanctions against Libya, declaring that 
"to intensify sanctions" against Libya may further "complicate" 
the problem (Xinhua, 12 November 1993). 
   Although Qian's remarks did not revise China's official stance on 
sanctions, he seemed to express stronger public support for 
Libya's views than has appeared in previous PRC media coverage of 
the issue, treatment suggesting that Beijing wishes to further 
distance itself from the West on this question.  Stating that 
"China fully understands and sympathizes with Libya's plight" and 
"does not want to see the situation worsen," Qian went on to 
express "appreciation" for Libya's "flexibility" in trying to 
settle the problem through "peaceful negotiations."  Qian gave no 
indication of how China will vote on any future UNSC resolutions 
to toughen the sanctions.  China abstained from voting on 
Resolution 748 authorizing sanctions in 1992 and again on the 
UNSC resolution approving new sanctions last November (Xinhua, 31 
March 1992, 12 November 1993). 
   (AUTHOR: SIMON. QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
CHINA ANALYSIS TEAM, (703) 733-6097.) 
EAG/HEBBEL JEG 07/0045Z APR 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-15 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000020794001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   7 April 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-06APR94-KUWAIT 
<H3> <TI>      Crown Prince Announces Cabinet Reshuffle, Slams Press </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Crown Prince Announces Cabinet Reshuffle, Slams Press </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY 
                                   Crown Prince and Prime Minister Shaykh Sa'd al-'Abdallah al-Salim 
al-Sabah has used the announcement of a forthcoming cabinet 
reshuffle to warn the Kuwaiti press to temper its criticism of 
the government and to signal his displeasure with Kuwait's 
National Assembly. 
                              END SUMMARY 
   While devoting much of his speech to a review of current foreign 
and domestic economic policy issues, Shaykh Sa'd began by 
directing sharp criticism at the press and, by implication, at 
the National Assembly, which was dissolved in 1986 and reinstated 
in 1992 following the Gulf War (Kuwait TV, 4 April).  He 
reaffirmed a commitment to "constitutional democracy" as an 
"irreversible option" but charged that "some practices have 
exploited the atmosphere of freedom by going in for exaggeration 
and excesses" and have "gone beyond the limits and controls which 
the constitution laid down."  In an evident allusion to the 
assembly, a majority of whose members were elected in October 
1992 as independents or representatives of political groupings 
outside the government, Shaykh Sa'd complained that "groupings 
and blocs have appeared which are on the verge of becoming 
parties" and which "undermine our unity" and "spread the spirit 
of division and fragmentation in our ranks."  Although informal 
political groups are tolerated in Kuwait, official political 
parties are banned.  "True democracy," the shaykh explained, 
entails "responsible behavior and sincere commitment to the 
values and traditions of society." 
   Although Shaykh Sa'd refrained from explicit attacks on the 
National Assembly, an article appearing in the the London daily 
Al-Hayah on 2 April indicated that the principal target of his 
ire is six members of the current cabinet taken from the ranks of 
the National Assembly when the current government was formed as 
part of a deal by which the assembly would defer some demands for 
political reform in return for being allowed some direct 
participation in the government.  The article cited an unnamed 
source close to the shaykh as saying that the shaykh "was not 
satisfied with the way some ministers, who are also members of 
the National Assembly, act in their ministerial posts" and as 
charging that these ministers "act in light of their alliances 
and sympathy with the political forces at the expense of their 
commitment to maintain solidarity among the members of the 
government."  On the 6th, Al-Hayah reported considerable 
speculation in Kuwaiti political circles concerning the reshuffle 
but added that no official announcements are likely before 11 
April. 
   Turning to the press, on which prepublication censorship was 
lifted in January 1992, Shaykh Sa'd claimed that "some of our 
papers have made of themselves an arena for the infighting of 
quarreling groups and blocs," quite likely a reference in 
particular to the daily Al-Oabas, which has frequently been a 
thorn in the government's side.  Such papers, the shaykh added, 
have engaged in "bigotry, intellectual intimidation, insults, and 
discrediting" and "have become tools destroying our national 
unity."  Without threatening any specific sanctions, Shaykh Sa'd 
warned against "the negative consequences of the continuation of 
the practice of irresponsible freedom" and added that the goal of 
press freedom "is not chaos but a commitment to truth, 
objectivity, and the good of the nation." 
   Implications 
   Judging from Shaykh Sa'd's speech, the reshuffle may involve both 
the removal or shifting of at least some of the six ministers 
from the National Assembly, as well as some movement of ministers 
holding various domestic economic portfolios.  Notwithstanding 
the shaykh's obvious irritation with the press and the National 
Assembly, both of which have demonstrated a clear willingness to 
attack the government since the restoration of parliament in 
1992, his reassurances of his commitment to constitutional 
government probably also reflects a recognition by the ruling 
family that it must live with a degree of political pluralism and 
debate given the substantially changed political climate in 
Kuwait brought on by the Gulf War. 
   (AUTHOR: MORTON.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
NEAR EAST ANALYSIS BRANCH (703) 733-6094.) 
ENEAG/BLOUGH JEG 07/0109Z APR 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-16 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000020894001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   7 April 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-06APR94-JORDAN 
<H3> <TI>      New TV News Program, Broadcasting Chief </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       New TV News Program, Broadcasting Chief </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
In   an apparent effort to modernize and expand its Arabic-language 
news programming, state-run Jordan TV recently inaugurated a weekly 
news magazine entitled "60 Minutes," which replaces the station's 
30-minute nightly newscast on Fridays. According to an official 
announcement, the new program is intended "to develop the ordinary 
newscast into a comprehensive, objective, and accurate news magazine 
to keep up with media technology, which is progressing 
continuously" (Jordan TV, 25 March).  To date, programs aired have 
included a "special news report" on Jordanian-Arab relations in the 
wake of King Husayn's recent visits to Oman and Qatar; reports on 
the impact of the UN inspection of ships bound for al-'Aqaba port; 
segments on domestic issues, including features on crime and human 
rights; and a general mix of economic, regional, and international 
news (Jordan TV, 25 March, l April). 
   In an apparently unrelated development, Information Minister 
Jawad al-'Anani announced the retirement of Jordan Radio and 
Television Corporation Director General Radi Alkhas--without further 
comment or explanation--and named Ibrahim Shahzadah as acting head. 
Shahzadah, previously director of Jordan Television, has been 
associated with Jordan radio and television since 1957 (Jordan 
Times, 22 March). 
(AUTHOR:  MURRAY.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEAS CALL CHIEF, NEAR 
EAST ANALYSIS BRANCH, (703) 733-6094.) 
ENEAG/BLOUGH JEG 07/0421Z APR 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-17 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000020594001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   7 April 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
(DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS, THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT CONSUMERS. IT IS 
BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT 
COORDINATION WITH OTHER U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS) 
FOREIGN MEDIA NOTE--FB PN 94-047--MAGHREB 
<H3> <TI>      MAGHREB PRESS REVIEW No. 4 </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       MAGHREB PRESS REVIEW No. 4 </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
This      press review series focuses on economic, social, and 
demographic issues in the Maghreb countries of Algeria, Libya, 
Morocco, and Tunisia. 

   REGIONAL AFFAIRS 

   Maghreb Computer Market Expanding 

   Paris weekly JEUNE AFRIQUE has reported that there are 60 
computer sales and service companies in Algeria, 200 in Tunisia, and 
400 in Morocco.  In Tunisia, the value of computer-related imports 
rose from 13 million dinars in 1987 to 59 million dinars in 1992. 
France was the source of one-fourth of these imports, the United 
States provided 20 percent, and the United Kingdom, 11 percent. 
Taiwan's share in the Tunisian computer market has risen from 4 
percent in 1991 to 10 percent in 1992. Overall, the Maghreb computer 
market is growing at a rate of 10 percent per year.  JEUNE AFRIQUE 
cited the publication L'ORDINATEUR AFRICAIN as its source of 
information.  (Paris JEUNE AFRIQUE 9 Mar 94) 

   ALGERIA 

   Debt Payments in Arrears 

   Although Algeria has continued to service its short-term debt, it 
has not made a payment on most of its medium- or long-term debt 
since January.  The government has reportedly cited "technical 
difficulties" as the cause for the delay.  Algeria has continued to 
pay for cereals and other products purchased through the U.S. 
Department of Agriculture, drawing on some $550 million in FY-94 
farm credits, but has ceased paying its largest creditors, including 
French export credit agency Coface and Italy's SACE.  The Algerian 
Government is pushing for bilateral rescheduling of these debts. 
(London MEED 25 Feb 94) 

   Food Shortages in Guelma 

   Guelma Wilaya is reportedly experiencing a significant price 
increase for meat, fruits, and vegetables.  Tension is said to 
persist over the prices of popular food items, such as coffee, oil, 
yeast, and flour, and over daily bread lines.  The price of potatoes 
has gone from 16 to 23 dirhams (DA); green onions are up from 26 to 
30 DA; oranges from 22 to 28 DA; meat from 220 to 280 DA or higher. 
Local leaders have reassured citizens that the situation will 
gradually improve as recently received food supplies are distributed 
throughout the region.  (Algiers LIBERTE 10 Feb 94) 
   Fuel Supply Disrupted in Tiaret 

   Long lines at gas stations have been reported in Tiaret and other 
towns.  According to the director of National Enterprise for 
Refining and Distributing Petroleum Products (NAFTAL), fuel supplies 
have been temporarily disrupted due to construction on a section of 
the Mechraa-SFA-Tiaret rail line.  The train transports 12 to 18 
30,000-liter tanks of gasoline and diesel oil daily.  (Algiers 
LIBERTE 10 Feb 94) 

   Security-Related Departure of Foreigners Affecting Economy 

   The number of foreigners who have left Algeria since 31 October 
has reportedly forced businesses to close or to reduce personnel. 
The Algerian Hilton, of Algerian and South Korean ownership, closed 
six months after opening due to ''low profit margins.''  The hotel 
experienced a  significant drop in its occupancy rate due to the 
security situation."  In addition, the French-managed Sofitel hotel 
has brought its French employees home, including managers, and plans 
to direct operations from France.  Sati-Michelin, the only producer 
of tires in Algeria, has laid off 160 workers for an indefinite 
period.  The firm was reportedly robbed by "terrorists" in 1993. 
The French firms Peugeot, Renault, and Air France have all cut back 
operations by drawing down personnel until the security situation in 
the country improves.  (Algiers LIBERTE 7 Feb 94; Algiers LE SOIR 
D'ALGERIE 8 Feb 94) 

   LIBYA 

   Qadhdhafi Announces Acceptance of World Court Judgment on Chad 

   In a 4 March press conference to commemorate the 17th anniversary 
of the Jamahiraya's founding, Libyan leader Mu'amar al-Qadhdhafi 
declared that Libya would implement the World Court's ruling that 
Chad should reclaim sovereignty over the Aouzou Strip from Libya. 
He said that the conflict between Libya and Chad has "finally ended" 
and that "arrangements are under way to implement" the ruling. 
(London AL-HAYAH 5 Mar 94) 

   MOROCCO 

   Nuclear Program Coordination Group Proposed 

   The National Council for Nuclear Energy (CNEN) recently met with 
Minister of National Education Mohamed Knidri to discuss 
establishing a group to coordinate and supervise the use of nuclear 
technology.  According to Knidri, there is a lack of equipment, 
skills, laws, and regulations in this field which handicaps the 
development of nuclear technology.  At the meeting, Minister of 
Energy Abdellatif Guerroui emphasized the need to speed up work on 
developing regulations for nuclear installations and protection 
against radioactivity, and the importance of quickly naming a 
secretarial staff at CNEN.  Guerroui also requested that three 
commissions be formed:  a nuclear regulatory commission, a committee 
to coordinate nuclear activities, and a commission responsible for 
programs for international cooperation.  (Casablanca MAG 7 20 Feb 
94) 

   Election Results in 13 Districts Annulled 

   The Moroccan Constitutional Chamber has declared invalid the 
results of last September's indirect elections in the following 13 
electoral districts: 


BOT 

District/Province/         Deputy                 Party 

Imine-Tanoute/Chichaoua    Ali Rehaymi            National Rally of 
                                                  Independents (RNI) 
Mejjate/Chichaoua          Lehsan Belkatou        Party for Progress 
                                                  and Socialism 
                                                  (PPS) 
El Hajeb/El Hajeb          Bensalem Oulghazi      Istiqlal (PI) 
Bouznika/Benslimane        Abdelkamel El Reghay   RNI 
Tamlalet/Qil'at al-        El-Tehami El-Khayari   PPS 
  Si raghanah 
Zaio/Nador                 Mohamed Ettayyibi      PI 
Central Oujda/Oujda        Aziz El-Housayni       RNI 
Asfi Bayada/Asfi           Abderrezak Chakouri    PI 
Ben Ahmed/Settat           Mohamed Faris          RNI 
Tangier/Tanger             Mohamed Arselan        Popular Movement 
Tan-Tan/Tan-Tan            Mohamed Djalleti       Constitutional 
Union 
Taliouine/Taroudannt       Hasan Belyemeni        Constitutional 
Union 
Bab-el-Muraysa/Sale        Abderrahman El-Qadiri  RNI 
                              (deceased) 

EOT 

   New elections are slated for these districts on 26 April.  There 
will also be elections for municipal and village councils in various 
areas.  According to Paris daily LE MONDE, nine of the 13 affected 
districts in the September elections were won by the current 
majority party in Parliament, with four carried by the opposition. 
If the opposition won all 13 districts in April, it would then hold 
only 135 of the 333 parliamentary seats.  (London AL-SHARQ AL-AWSAT 
4 Mar 94; Paris LE MONDE 4 Mar 94) 

   Agreement Signed With South Africa for Coal Imports 

   The Casablanca firm Socacharbo has announced a purchase of 
400,000 tons of coal from South Africa to use in thermoelectric 
plants.  The $60 million deal will be financed through an agreement 
between the National Bank of Paris and the Moroccan Foreign Trade 
Bank.  The purchase is the largest between Morocco and South Africa 
since they resumed bilateral relations. (London AL-HAYAH 3 Feb 94) 

   Increase in Foreign Reserves Reported 

   Foreign reserves rose to 36.1 billion Moroccan dirhams (MD) in 
1993, up from MD31.5 billion the previous year.  The Casablanca- 
based Moroccan Economy Center says reserves are equivalent to seven 
months of imports, up from six months in 1992.  Official forecasts 
estimate a further increase in reserves to MD38.8 billion by the end 
of 1994. (London MEED 25 Feb 94) 

   Increased Cooperation With Romania 

   Moroccan Trade Minister Abdellatif Filali and Romanian Trade 
Minister Teodor Viorel Melescanu met recently to discuss improving 
bilateral trade by instituting periodic reciprocal trade missions, 
creating mixed firms, and opening a joint bank.  Morocco currently 
sells phosphates and agricultural food products to Romania and 
purchases durable goods and manufactured products.  Romania is 
involved in port construction and other projects in Morocco, 
including metallurgy, geology, and mining, and in training Moroccan 
professionals.  Melescanu confirmed Romania's interest in 
participation in construction of ports, airports, railroads, and 
highways, as well as agricultural cooperation.  (Casablanca AL 
BAYANE 29 Jan 94) 
   Hydroelectric Power Production Drops Due to Drought 

   The Moroccan Bank of Foreign Trade (BMCE) has reported that 
hydroelectric power production dropped 55 percent during the first 
nine months of 1993 compared to the same period in l992.  This 
figure represents only 5.7 percent of 1993 production from all 
energy sources, compared to 11.5 percent in l992 and 15.4 percent in 
1991.  Due to recent droughts, water reserves have been reduced to 
630 million cubic meters, or 9.3 percent of capacity.  (Rabat 
ALMAGHRIB 21 Feb 94) 

   Students Sentenced After University Violence 

   A Fez court has imposed prison sentences ranging from six months 
to two years on 27 students found guilty in connection with violent 
confrontations at Fez University in January.  Two rival groups -- 
the fundamentalist Justice and Charity Organization (Juma'at al- 
'Adal wal-Ihsan) and the leftist Rank and File (al-Qa'adiyun), 
reportedly clashed on and off the law school campus over issues 
related to the fundamentalists' call for a boycott of classes and 
the alleged display by leftists of The Satanic Verses at a cultural 
week exhibition. (London AL-SHARQ AL-AWSAT 17 Feb 94) 

   TUNISIA 

   Foreign Exchange Opens 

   In an interview with Tunis-7 television, Central Bank Director 
Ibrahim El Haji discussed the official opening of a foreign exchange 
following the government's decision to make the dinar convertible 
and to lift restrictions on interest rates.  According to El Haji, 
banks will be able to "fix foreign currencies rates in relation to 
the Tunisian dinar.  Naturally, the Central Bank will still be able 
to intervene in this foreign exchange to adjust the exchange rates 
whenever it is necessary."  El Haji also stated that the foreign 
exchange is restricted to the domestic market, Tunisian banks, and 
the Tunisian financial banking system, although foreign banks can 
participate on behalf of their clients.  (Tunis Tunis-7 Television 1 
Mar 94) 

   Market Data Base for TTP 

   The "Tunisian Trade Point" (TTP), part of the Center for the 
Promotion of Exports (CEPEX), is establishing a link to the 
commercial data base run by Bangkok's Trade Point Development 
Center.  The CEPEX Actualites news bulletin has reported that the 
TTP has collected some 1,000 addresses of European, Asian, and Latin 
American exporters and importers in the food, textile and clothing, 
mechanical, electronic, crafts, and chemical sectors.  The data base 
services will enable users to query foreign databases on-line in 
approximately 35 markets.  (Tunis LA PRESSE DE TUNISIE 22 Feb 94) 

   Tourism Statistics Reported 

   Tourism statistics for 1993 show receipts of over 1 billion 
dinars.  The total number of tourists reached over 3.6 million, of 
which 2,158,851 were Europeans (including 711,872 from Germany and 
60,000 from Poland, Hungary, Bulgaria, Czech Republic, Slovakia, and 
Russia combined).  The number of French tourists increased by 
447,830.  An 11.2 percent increase in tourism for 1994 is expected. 
(Tunis LA PRESSE DE TUNISIE 19 Feb 94) 

   Solar Energy Projects in Outlying Areas 

   Several solar energy pilot projects have been completed in rural 
areas, including a number of electrification projects for schools, 
clinics, and national guard centers.  One project involved supplying 
electricity to 150 rural schools, an effort that was jointly 
financed by the Ministry of Education and Science, the Ministry of 
the Interior, and the AME (expansion not given).  Future proposals 
include an evaluation of the country's solar energy potential and 
the construction of a 29-kW solar station in Hamam Biadha.  (Tunis 
LA PRESSE DE TUNISIE 23 Feb 94) 

   Gabes Anti-Pollution Project 

   Minister of Economy Sadok Rabeh visited two fertilizer plants 
that have been equipped with sulfur dioxide scrubbers at a cost of 
32 million dinars.  The project represented the third and final 
stage of a 33.8 million dinar anti-pollution project authorized by 
President Ben Ali.  The project was begun 31 October 1992 and is 
expected to be completed in October 1994.  (Tunis LA PRESSE DE 
TUNISIE 23 Feb 94) 

   Chinese-Tunisian Economic Cooperation 

   Minister of Finance Nouri Zorgati and Chinese Ambassador Wu 
Chuanfu to discuss bilateral cooperation.  Both expressed 
satisfaction with the current level of relations and looked forward 
to expanding business opportunities.  The ambassador affirmed that 
his country "attaches great importance to strengthening Chinese- 
Tunisian cooperation."  Minister Zorgati emphasized the 
opportunities available to businesses from both countries.  (Tunis 
LA PRESSE DE TUNISIE 23 Feb 94) 

   Maghreb Economic Yearbook 

   The 1993-94 edition of the Maghreb Economic Yearbook has been 
issued.  The new edition contains information on Maghreb-Europe 
ties; analyses on Maghreb countries; economic sector studies by 
country for the Maghreb and EU; economic, commercial, and legal 
documents; and 8,000 addresses of commercial firms and public 
institutions in the Maghreb and Europe.  (Tunis LA PRESSE DE TUNISIE 
19 Feb 94) 

   (QUESTION AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, AFRICA/LEVANT 
BRANCH AT (703) 733-6408) 
ENEAG/06 Apr/POLCHF/ECONF/NEASA Division JEG 07/0023Z APR 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-18 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000020994001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   9 April 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-07APR94-YUGOSLAVIA-CROATIA 
<H3> <TI>      Yugoslavia-Croatia:  Milosevic Tells RSK to Shape Up </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Yugoslavia-Croatia:  Milosevic Tells RSK to Shape Up </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
In      an apparent effort to strengthen the claim that the Republic 
of Serbian Krajina (RSK) in Croatia is a sovereign state, Serbian 
President Slobodan Milosevic has called on the Serbs of the RSK 
to put their house in order by ending what he labeled extremist 
politics and lawlessness.  His meeting in Belgrade on 6 April 
with RSK "President" Milan Martic and "Premier-designate" Borisav 
Mikelic was aimed at demonstrating his support for the two 
leaders and putting an end to the infighting that has blocked the 
formation of a new government in the RSK since the December 1993 
elections.  Milosevic sharply attacked "extremists and extremism" 
and denounced "individuals" who are "up to their necks in crime" 
and threaten to "tarnish" the Serbian nation's reputation.  He 
singled out the Serbian Radical Party and "other irresponsible 
groups and individuals," saying they have engaged in 
"destructive" politics in the RSK assembly.  He was likely 
referring to the Radicals and to former RSK president Milan Babic 
and his wing of the Serbian Democratic Party, who have tried to 
block Martic's and Mikelic's efforts to form a new RSK 
"Government" (Tanjug and Belgrade TV, 6 April).  Babic, who had 
been offered the deputy premiership in an effort to form a 
coalition government, recently announced that he had "postponed" 
talks about his participation in the coalition (Tanjug, 30 
March).  Even before Babic's announcement, Martic had complained 
that assembly infighting was leading the "state" into "total 
chaos and anarchy" (Belgrade TV, 23 March).  Suggesting that 
Milosevic's intervention may have had its intended effect, 
Mikelic declared that he would put together a government by 9 
April and that the Krajina Serbs are "on the road of calming down 
passions" (Tanjug, 7 April). 
   Like recent statements of other FRY leaders, Milosevic's 6 April 
remarks gave no hint that he would backtrack on the Serbian 
claims that the RSK has the right to self-determination and that 
Croatia never established its sovereignty over the territory held 
by the Serbs. (See Note 1)  He also continues to steadfastly 
defend the Serbs' right eventually to incorporate all territory 
they inhabit into a Greater Serbia.  Moreover, his statements at 
a press conference during a 5 April visit to Romania suggest that 
he continues to view all Serbs in former Yugoslavia as embodying 
a single political entity for which he has the right to speak. 
Denying that the Serbs are the aggressors, he claimed that the 
United Nations has "punished and attacked those"--i.e., the 
Serbs--"who wanted to preserve and save their country."  He 
called the "fact" that the Serbian "nation was accused of 
aggression against its own country" one of the "absurdities" in 
international politics "at the end of the 20th century" (Belgrade 
TV, 5 April).  However, Milosevic, ever striving to rid his 
country of UN economic sanctions, reiterated his long-standing 
position that he supported "peace talks" as the "only correct 
way" of resolving the crisis (Tanjug and Belgrade TV, 6 April). 
   (Note 1) See the Trends of 6 April 1994, pages 1-3. 
   (AUTHOR:  NASH.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
ELAG ANALYSIS BRANCH, (703) 733-6120.) 
ELAG/GILISON/PF 08/0004z Apr 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-19 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000021094001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   9 April 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
FOREIGN PRESS SURVEY-FBPSP 94-07-ASIA 
<H3> <TI>      PACIFIC RIM ECONOMIC REVIEW -- 7 APRIL 1994 </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       PACIFIC RIM ECONOMIC REVIEW -- 7 APRIL 1994 </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
Table      of Contents 

   JAPAN:  Auto Industry - FEATURE:  Japan Expanding Auto Industry 
Trade With China 

   Economic Trends - FEATURE:  Hatakeyama Writes Article on Japan- 
U.S. Trade Issues; FEATURE:  New MOFA Deputy Minister for Economic 
Affairs; MITI To Simplify Export Controls on Strategic Commodities 

   Financial Issues - FEATURE:  Financial Institutions Expanding 
Asian Operations; MOF Interim Report on Financial Institution 
Disclosure; Taiwan Authorizes Securities Firms To Establish, Upgrade 
Offices 

   Foreign Trade and Investment - CHINA:  Japanese Firms Setting Up 
Operations in Shenzhen; Chisso Engineering, Nichimen Win 
Petrochemical Plant Contract 

   EASTERN EUROPE:  Marubeni To Expand Sales Networks in Poland, 
Hungary, Russia 

   NORTH KOREA:  FEATURE:  Political Figures 'Scheming' To Revive 
Trade With Pyongyang 

   SOUTHEAST ASIA:  Activities of Machine Tool, Industrial Machinery 
Firms 

   VIETNAM:  Firms Expanding Offices, Forming Investment Plans; 
Paper Firm, Nissho Iwai in Joint-Venture Forestry Project; 
Association Studying Private Funding for Agricultural Projects 

   Japan-U.S. Trade Issues -- Reaction of Glass Industry to U.S. 
Super 301 Decision 

   Machine Tools/Robotics - Fanuc, Yamazaki Conclude Agreements With 
Chinese Firms; Star Micronics To Close Eight European Sales 
Companies 

   Telecommunications/Satellites - Mitsubishi Electric Initiates 
Multimedia Equipment Business Activities; MPT To Deliberate on 
Digital Communications Satellite Broadcasting 

   CHINA:  Domestic Developments - Machine-Building Industry 
Formulates Development Plan; Article Examines Regional Disparities 
of Rural Enterprises; Bank of China Registers Increase in Renminbi 
Savings Deposits; Official Says New Tax Laws Discourage Taiwan 
Investment; Guangzhou To Build International Airport, Invites 
Foreign Investment; Guangzhou To Sell State Enterprises to 
Foreigners; Guangdong To Invest 630 Million Yuan To Develop Port 
Projects; Guangdong To Invest 12 Billion Yuan in Transportation; 
Hainan's Yuangpu Port Planning Major Expansion; Fujian Aquatic 
Products Industry Reports Rising Growth; Shandong's Retail Sales 
Grow Rapidly; Shenzhen Invests in Tourist Industry 

   Foreign Trade and Investment - Cross-Strait Computer Industry 
Cooperation Thrives; PRC, Vietnam Planning To Build Joint Border 
Economic Zone; Shanghai To Expand Opportunities for Foreign 
Investment; Tianjin Establishes Foreign-Funded Enterprises; 
Enterprises in Fujian's ROK-Sponsored Industrial Zone Begin 
Operatio; ROK's Samsung Group's China Trade To Increase in 1994; 
PRC, ROK To Jointly Build Large Oil Refinery in Shenzhen; South 
Korean Electronics Firm To Produce TV Parts, VCR's; South Korean 
Company To Build Two Power Plants in Henan Province; South Korea 
Signs Telecommunications Joint Venture in Beijing; Israel To Set Up 
Aircraft Repair Joint Venture; Sino-French Joint Venture Launched in 
Automobile Industry; Italian Banking Group To Provide $75 Million in 
Export Credit Loans; Singapore Joint Venture To Produce Cigarette 
Paper in Hangzhou; CITIC's Plans To Jointly Develop Zhejiang's Daxie 
Island; Asian Investment Group Raises Funds To Invest in Auto Parts 
Industry; Jiangsu's Nantong Port Becomes Major Import-Export Port; 
Liaoning Attracted More Foreign Capital 

   Taiwan:  Planning Council Says Annual Per-Capita Output Value 
Increases; Executive Yuan Says Economy To Grow by 6.32 Percent This 
Year; Trade Board Says Benefits of GATT Entry Would Outweigh Losses; 
Directorate Announces Figures on Imports of Technology; Ministry 
Draws Up Plan To Strengthen Economic Work in Southeast Asia; 
Taipei's Exports to PRC Valued at $12.8 Billion in 1993; Taipei 
Lifts Ban on Textile Investments in PRC; Petroleum Company Plans To 
Build Industrial Zones in Indonesia, SRV; Finance Minister Views 
Taxes, Investment With Indonesian Counterpart; Cabinet Views 
Cooperation With Thailand, Indonesia, the Philippines; Economic 
Minister Holds Forum With Electric Appliance Makers 

   SOUTH KOREA:  FEATURE:  Increased ROK Trade, Investment in 
Vietnam Reported; FEATURE:  ROK Electronics Firms Profit Through 
U.S. High-Tech; FEATURE:  Press Urges Continuous Government Support 
for HDTV; FEATURE:  Recent Semiconductor Developments Reported; New 
Techno-Complex To Merge Industrial, Academic Research; Multipurpose 
Research Reactor Nearing Completion; Samsung 'Gets Serious' About 
Aircraft Engine Development; Patent Office To Set Up Center To 
Promote Patent Commercialization; Tax Audits Based on Foreign Car 
Ownership To Stop; Samsung Wins Order for Gas Platform Off Malaysia; 
LCD Makers Form 'United Front' Against Foreign Patent Offensive; 
Textile Firms' Investment in China Increasing; Kia Sets Up Auto 
Assembly Joint Venture in Indonesia; Samsung-Mitsubishi Consortium 
Wins Shipbuilding Order; MOTIE Reports on Construction Contracts in 
China; Dong-Ah To Build Two Power Plants in China; Goldstar To 
Invest $200 Million in VCR, CRT Plants in China; Yukong Working 
Towards Oil Refinery Agreement With China 

   SOUTHEAST ASIA - BURMA:  FEATURE:  Barter Trade Activities in 
Burma Reported 

   INDONESIA:  Indocement Signs Agreement With Korean, Japanese 
Firms; Official Predicts Growth in Stock Trading; Banking Sector Has 
$12.7 Billion in Bad Debts; 1993 Coal Production Reaches 27 Million 
Metric Tons 

   LAOS: Norwegian, Thai Firms Contract To Design Hydropower Dam 

   MALAYSIA:  Incentives for Eastern Corridor Announced; 
Telecommunications Investment Opportunity Offered; Joint Venture 
Plant To Be Built in Algeria; Joint-Venture Petrochemical Plant in 
Johor Inaugurated; Company Forms Joint Venture With Vietnamese Firm 

   PHILIPPINES:  Government Approves Power Plant Project 

   THAILAND:  Bank Credit Expansion, Inflation Rate Reported; 
Military Bank Grants Loans to Vietnamese Bank; State Petroleum Firm 
Forms Joint Ventures in PRC, Vietnam; Power Plant To Be Established 
With PRC's Wuxi Province; Company Invests in Hotel Construction in 
Burma; Bank Arranges Loan for SRV Central Bank 

   VIETNAM:  FEATURE:  Increased ROK Trade, Investment in Vietnam 
Reported (See SOUTH KOREA); Singapore's Keppel Group To Invest in 
Shipbuilding, Construction; Singapore To Assist in Building New 
Industrial Zone; Daewoo Investments in Vietnam Reported; Effect of 
Devalued Yuan on Trade Reported; Growing Demand for Cars Reported; 
Joint Venture With Hong Kong Firm To Renovate Office Complex; 
Southern Provinces To Build Rice Mill With South Korea; Steel Joint 
Venture Formed With ROK Companies; Oil Services Company Expands 
Operations; Government To Restore Two Riverways; Dong Nai Has 53 
Licensed Investment Projects; Rice Exports Reached 1.7 Million 
Metric Tons in 1993; Swedish Group Looks To Increase Trade; Hong 
Kong Firm, Southern Provinces To Build Rice Mill; Cement Joint- 
Venture Company Inaugurated; Quang Nam-Da Nang Hosting 25 Foreign 
Ventures; Australian Firm Invests $197 Million in 
Telecommunications; Thai Firm To Invest in Fishing Net Factory; 
Japanese Firm Sets Up Wood Chips Joint Venture 

   (Pacific Rim Economic Review FBPSP 94-07) 

   JAPAN:  Auto Industry - FEATURE:  Japan Expanding Auto Industry 
Trade With China -- SUMMARY:  Japan's auto industry trade with China 
is rapidly expanding, according to press reports.  Auto exports to 
China increased substantially in 1993, but recent Chinese 
restrictions will likely decrease exports in 1994.  Consequently, at 
the urging of both the Chinese and Japanese Governments, Japan's 
auto parts firms are moving aggressively to establish joint ventures 
to produce and sell auto parts in China. 

   According to statistics compiled by the Ministry of Finance and 
retrieved from the Nikkei Telecom News and Retrieval Database, 
exports of Japanese four-wheel vehicles to China surged in 1993. 
Passenger vehicle exports on a U.S.-dollar basis expanded 148 
percent compared to 1992.  In 1993 Japan's automakers exported more 
than $3 billion worth of passenger vehicles, trucks, and buses to 
China, including Hong Kong.  These large increases occurred despite 
high tariffs on auto-related imports, which,  according to the 5 
January NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN (NIKKEI), included a 220 percent tariff 
on gasoline-powered automobiles. 

   A breakdown of Ministry of Finance statistics concerning auto 
exports to China and Hong Kong from 1990 through 1993, via the 
Nikkei Telecom News and Retrieval Database, is as follows (figures 
are in millions of dollars): 


             Passenger 
             Vehicles        Trucks         Buses          Total 
China 

1990            $34            $78            $21           $133 
1991            $73           $184            $55           $312 
1992           $246           $328           $133           $707 
1993           $610           $458           $179         $1,247 

Hong Kong 

1990           $331           $126            $44           $501 
1991           $511           $172            $70           $753 
1992         $1,103           $257           $117         $1,477 
1993         $1,445           $288           $114         $1,847 



   Unclear Prospects for Increased Auto Exports to China - On 1 
January 1994 the Chinese Government lowered tariffs on imported 
automobiles, but these reductions are unlikely to lead to 
dramatically higher imports of Japanese vehicles, according to the 5 
January NIKKEI.  Tariffs on cars with gasoline and diesel engines 
still remain at between 110 and 150 percent.  Furthermore, according 
to NIKKEI, while the Chinese Government is lowering these tariffs to 
facilitate its accession into GATT, it will continue to "manage" 
imports to protect domestic production. 

   In fact, according to the 10 March SANKEI SHIMBUN, Japanese 
automakers expect exports of four-wheel vehicles to China in 1994 to 
fall to "about half" the level of 1993--to about 100,000 units, 
including finished cars and knockdown kits.  Japanese manufacturers 
also fear that Chinese policy reforms will lead to new import 
barriers, so they are adopting a "cautious stance," especially with 
regard to passenger vehicles. 

   As an example of the automakers' divergent planning, SANKEI cited 
the case of Isuzu Motors, which primarily makes commercial vehicles. 
The company plans to export "about the same number of vehicles" as 
last year.  In contrast, the main passenger car manufacturers, such 
as Toyota and Nissan, anticipate a reduction in exports by 30 to 80 
percent.  Last year Toyota exported just under 50,000 vehicles, 
including 5,000 knockdown units, but this year it plans to lower 
exports of finished cars to about "20 percent of last year's level" 
while increasing exports of knockdown units.  SANKEI noted that 
Nissan Motor Co., which exported 30,000 finished cars last year, 
will have difficulty exporting "half that amount this year," and 
Honda Motor Co. now plans to export 8,000 units, about 30 percent 
less than last year. 

   Both Governments Encouraging Auto Parts Joint Ventures - To 
protect and promote the development of China's indigenous automobile 
industry, Beijing maintains high tariffs on auto imports as well as 
restrictions on the production of passenger vehicles by foreign 
automakers in China.  At the same time, according to the 27 March 
NIKKEI, the Chinese Government is actively soliciting Japanese 
investment and participation in the development of China's auto 
parts sector.  The Chinese Government has adopted a policy of 
promoting the domestic production of "six critical parts," including 
engines and auto bodies, according to the 4 March NIKKEI.  The 21 
March NIKKEI reported that during Prime Minister Hosokawa's recent 
trip to China, Chinese Vice Premier Zhu Rongji "urged" Japanese 
investment in China's auto part sector, "especially in engines." 

   Japan's Ministry of International Trade and Industry (MITI) 
announced on 17 March that it will sponsor a conference in June 
together with the Chinese Government concerning "cooperation between 
the Japanese and Chinese auto parts industries."  According to the 
17 March NIKKEI, MITI hopes the conference will help Japan's auto 
companies penetrate China's market.  To promote joint ventures, MITI 
has already begun compiling a list of Japanese parts makers that 
want to establish production bases in China.  NIKKEI noted that 
there are about 4,000 auto parts plants operating in China.  The 
conference will be organized by officials of the Japan Auto Parts 
Industries Association (JAPIA) and by Chinese officials in the auto 
parts sector.  JAPIA is a nonprofit association under the 
administrative  authority of MITI's Machinery Information and 
Industries Bureau. 

   Joint-Venture Agreements With Chinese Auto Parts Companies - 
Japanese firms in recent months have signed a number of joint 
venture agreements concerning auto parts production in China.  The 
following are among the more important recent agreements reported in 
the Japanese press: 

   Itochu Corp., one of Japan's largest general trading companies, 
has formed an "inclusive" business agreement with the China National 
Automotive Industry Corp. (CNAIC), a quasi-governmental organization 
that overseas the development of China's auto industry, concerning 
the manufacture and sales of auto parts, according to the 20 January 
NIKKEI.  Itochu will import parts processing technologies from 
Japan, Europe, and the United States and will develop operations in 
cooperation with CNAIC, which is attempting to improve the quality 
of Chinese-made auto parts. 

   Nissan Diesel Motor Co. is forming a joint venture company with 
Dongfeng Automobile Co. (formerly the Second Autoworks) to produce 
trucks in Hangzhou, according to the 4 January NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN. 
Nissan Diesel signed a contract with Dongfeng in August 1985 to 
transfer large truck production technology, after which the scope of 
the agreement expanded.  In May 1993 the two firms began a 
feasibility study on a truck production joint venture company, which 
will be 49 percent owned by Nissan Diesel and 51 percent by 
Dongfeng.  According to NIKKAN KOGYO, the new company will produce 
about 4,000 vehicles annually with a domestic content ratio of 
between 10 to 20 percent.  The company plans to raise this ratio as 
domestic parts makers are developed and more Japanese parts makers 
establish operations in China. 

   Toyota Motor is moving to expand the transfer of automotive 
technology to the Shenyang Jinbei Automobile Manufacturing Co., 
according to the 4 March NIKKEI.  Toyota had signed a series of 
production and technology-sharing agreements with Jinbei, but 
following the Chinese Government's policy of "indigenous" auto parts 
production, Toyota has moved to help Jinbei produce a number of 
"critical" auto parts that have been imported from Japan.  In 1989 
Toyota contracted to provide welding and press processing technology 
to Jinbei, and in 1992 it agreed to provide technology knowhow 
concerning physical distribution, assembly, and painting.  Now 
Toyota will provide Jinbei with drive train production technology. 
NIKKEI reported that Toyota is also considering capital investment 
in Jinbei to strengthen their "cooperative relationship" in 
anticipation of "serious auto production" in China. 

   Kansai Paint Co., Japan's largest paint manufacturer, has 
established a joint-venture company with the Shenyang Paint Factory 
to produce and sell auto paint in China, according to the 16 March 
NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN. Kansai Paint has had a technology-sharing 
agreement with Shenyang Paint since 1985.  The joint-venture 
company, "Shenyang Kansai Paint Co.," will be capitalized at $5 
million, with Kansai providing 40 percent Shenyang 60 percent.  A 
plant will be built in Shenyang City this autumn, and should begin 
operations by January 1995 with an annual capacity of 5,000 tons 
within five years.  In its first year, the company will produce 
about 2,000 tons of both primer and topcoat auto paint for sale in 
China.  NIKKEI SANGYO added that because Nippon Paint, Kansai 
Paint's main rival, is also moving into China, "competition is 
likely to become fierce." 

   Taikisha Ltd., Japan's largest manufacturer of auto painting 
equipment, is establishing a joint venture firm in Beijing with the 
Fifth Planning and Research Institute, a subsidiary of the China 
North Industries Corp. (NORINCO), according to the 17 March NIKKEI 
SANGYO.  The new company, will be capitalized at $600,000 on a 51/49 
percent basis between Taikisha and the institute, will be called the 
"Wuzhou Taikisha Construction Company."  Taikisha has determined 
that the rapid expansion of Japanese auto companies in China is 
heightening demand for painting equipment and facilities.  The 
institute to date has designed vehicles like tanks, "but is now 
switching over to civilian applications." 

   Economic Trends - FEATURE:  Hatakeyama Writes Article on Japan- 
U.S. Trade Issues -- SUMMARY:  Noboru Hatakeyama, former Ministry of 
International Trade and Industry (MITI) vice minister for 
international affairs, writing in EKONOMISUTO, offered his 
assessment of the currently suspended Japan-U.S. framework talks and 
the bilateral trade situation.  He also outlined six 
"recommendations" for Japan in negotiating with the United States. 

   Hatakeyama, who currently works for the MITI-sponsored Japan 
Economic Foundation, in a 15 March EKONOMISUTO article expressed his 
belief that the U.S.-Japan summit meeting in February proceeded in a 
"businesslike manner," with both countries speaking frankly about 
bilateral issues.  He claimed that the somewhat "nationalistic" 
reaction in Japan to Prime Minister Hosokawa's performance is 
"worrisome," because all Hosokawa did was to "passionately reject" 
proposals which were not acceptable--"specifically, items concerning 
numerical targets" --which "no other free market country could 
accept." 

   Hatakeyama rejected the argument that Japan's uncompromising 
stance at the talks was due to the changed security situation 
following the end of the Cold War.  He argued that the significance 
of the U.S.-Japan security relationship has in fact grown since the 
end of the Cold War. 

   According to Hatakeyama, in the past Japan "conceded" in U.S.- 
Japan economic talks "purely for the benefit of the Japanese 
economy."  Japan has agreed to abide by numerous U.S. import 
restrictions, conclude sector-specific agreements such as the 
semiconductor agreement, and hold talks on structural impediments, 
he asserted, so as "to hold on as long as possible" to the economic 
benefits derived from its "export structure." 

   Hatakeyama asserted that in the framework talks, the "first 
mistake" of the U.S. side was to demand numerical targets, because 
the Japanese side was "sufficiently ready to make concessions" 
outside of numerical targets.  He noted that, although President 
Clinton "did not give the impression" of demanding numerical 
targets, American officials in the negotiations "did indeed, demand 
numerical targets" by using such phrases as "comparative market 
share" and "increasing sales volumes."  He stated that in the past 
there have been U.S. demands "which have been somewhat impossible," 
but nothing like numerical targets, which, he said, clearly run 
counter to market principles and deregulation.  This approach, he 
maintained, "destroys the basic human rights of a modern citizenry" 
because failure to achieve the targets set will result in 
"unilateral measures," such as Super 301, and managed trade becomes 
more like "coercive trade." 

   Hatakeyama Argues Japan's Markets Are Not Closed - Hatakeyama 
went on to say that President Clinton's statement after the February 
summit that "Japan is the most closed market of the G-7 countries" 
is a "misinterpretation" of Japan's manufacturing market.  He said 
there are three factors which determine whether a market is open or 
closed--"water's edge" government regulations, which restrict 
imports or authorize import tariffs; domestic regulations, which 
standardize and certify environmental protection and consumer 
safety; and traditional business practices of the private sector. 

   According to Hatakeyama, an examination of the four basic trade 
markets--manufactured goods, petroleum and minerals, agricultural 
products, and services--reveals that Japan is running a deficit 
balance of payments with the United States in each of these markets 
except for the manufactured goods, where it runs a $65 billion 
surplus, resulting in an aggregate Japanese surplus of $50 billion. 
He asserted that no new "water's-edge"-type government regulations 
have been introduced regarding imports since the market was 
liberalized for color TV sets in 1964, automobiles in 1965, 
semiconductors in 1974, computers in 1975, and leather goods in 
1985.  The fact that the United States instituted the multinational 
fiber agreement and allegedly created "import barriers" in the form 
of regulations for passenger cars, steel, and machine tools in the 
1980's offers a "striking comparison," he stated.  He claimed that 
the European Union, which requires monitors for Japanese automobile 
imports, "is more closed than Japan."  In terms of import tariffs, 
the average import tariff rate for manufactured goods imported into 
Japan is 1.9 percent, which is one-third of the 5.5 percent imposed 
in the United States and 5.6 percent in Europe, he added. 

   In Japan's services market, he conceded, there are regulations 
concerning the telecommunications, finance, and distribution 
sectors, but he pointed out that in the United States there are also 
"state-by-state" regulations for financial institutions, while EU 
countries such as France, Italy, and Belgium have several 
distribution-related regulations.  These comparisons, Hatakeyama 
maintained, must be made before stating that Japan's markets are the 
"most closed among the G-7 countries." 

   Finally, there is the issue of Japanese business practices, 
specifically "keiretsu."  The government's basic policy in dealing 
with issues such as "keiretsu," according to Hatakeyama, is that it 
will issue "proper orders" to eliminate any antitrust violations, 
and it will create "appropriate" measures to stop any anti- 
competitive business practices which come to light.  He did not 
specify what such "appropriate" measures might be or how rigorously 
he expected the Japanese Government to enforce them. 

   Hatakeyama noted that U.S. "bureaucrats," scholars, and 
businessmen commonly point out that Japan's business practices have 
led to the closed nature of its markets.  He countered that the 
United States also engages in some "closed" business practices, or 
practices which favor certain U.S. products.  As an example, he 
noted that U.S automakers are manufacturing 70 percent of their auto 
parts within the United States and that this constitutes an unfair 
exclusion of foreign parts, which, he continued, has led Japanese 
steelmakers to avoid tie-ups with U.S. automakers. 

   The U.S. perception that Japan's market is "closed," Hatakeyama 
maintained, stems from Washington's failure to take account of 
global competitiveness.  One example of this, he wrote, is 
manifested in the U.S. argument that the Japanese market is closed 
because the United States holds a 54 percent share of the world 
semiconductor market, excluding Japan, but only a 20 percent of the 
Japanese market.  These numbers are correct, noted Hatakeyama, but 
the U.S. share of Japan's semiconductor market is so small only 
because Japan has strong, highly competitive companies in its own 
domestic market, "not because the Japanese market is closed."  In 
fact, Hatakeyama maintained, the U.S. domestic semiconductor market 
is very similar to Japan's because even though Japan holds a 54 
percent share of the global market, excluding the United States, it 
has only a 20 percent share of the U.S. market precisely because of 
the presence of strong, highly competitive U.S. companies. 
   Hatakeyama also attempted to refute the notion that Japan's weak 
import ratio is a reflection of its structurally closed nature.  He 
claims that Japan's import ratio of manufactured goods to GNP of 3.2 
percent in FY92-- a low figure when compared to the U.S. ratio of 
6.9 percent in FY91--occurred "because Japanese companies and 
products are globally competitive," not because Japanese markets are 
closed.  He pointed out that in 1975, when many U.S. companies 
prided themselves on their global competitiveness, the U.S. import 
ratio was only 3.4 percent, up from a mere 3.0 percent in the early 
1970's. 

   Recommendations for Dealing With United States - Hatakeyama 
concluded his article by offering six "recommendations" for Japan in 
its dealings with the United States: 

   1. Japan must make efforts to persuade the U.S. Government that 
its markets are open and regulation-free.  The Japanese side "must 
specify which market" when referring to "market-opening measures" so 
it does not cause confusion "about opening the manufactured goods 
market, which is already open."  Japan should also implement import- 
expansion measures, such as streamlining import procedures, 
especially in the auto sector. However, it should be prudent and not 
encourage the notion that this is a "cure-all" measure. 

   2. Japan should initiate deregulation measures to spur import- 
expansion efforts. 

   3. A U.S.-Japan comparative study on "keiretsu and other 
traditional Japanese and U.S. business practices" should be 
conducted "immediately" and principles governing the control of 
these practices should be drafted and then enforced by the 
governments. 

   4. Japan must continue to firmly object to "microeconomic 
numerical targets."  Since Japan has "agreed" to objective criteria, 
it must also accept the fact that import expansion efforts hereafter 
will be measured by trade "statistics." 

   5. Japan must firmly object to "macroeconomic numerical targets." 
Since Japan will be working toward "a significant medium-term 
reduction in its current accounts surplus,"--he did not indicate how 
this would be accomplished--it must publicize the fact that it will 
continue this year's income tax reduction "next year and beyond," 
and must decide on a large increase in its 10-year 430 trillion yen 
($4 trillion) public investment program. 

   6. If the United States undertakes unilateral measures based on 
Super 301, the framework talks should be called off and Japan should 
file an appeal to the GATT.  If the United States appeals to GATT 
that Japan's trade policies "invalidate GATT partner-country 
rights," Japan should stress that it has been "playing fair and 
square." 

   FEATURE:  New MOFA Deputy Minister for Economic Affairs - 
SUMMARY:  Sadayuki Hayashi, the newly appointed deputy minister for 
economic affairs in the Ministry of Foreign Affairs (MOFA), 
considers Japan-U.S. relations as part of Japan's global 
relationship and will try to resolve trade problems through the 
General Agreement on Tariff and Trade (GATT) instead of through 
bilateral negotiations, according to press reports.  He does not see 
any prospect for a compromise on numerical targets in trade 
negotiations between Japan and the United States, and is uncertain 
about the future of the Japan-U.S. framework talks. 

   Hayashi, who was appointed MOFA's new deputy minister for 
economic affairs on 11 March, and who will serve as Japan's "sherpa" 
for the Naples G-7 Summit and as co-chairmen of the Japan-U.S. 
framework talks, appears to be a member of MOFA's mainstream group, 
the "multilateralist faction," according to an exclusive interview 
with Hayashi published in the 24 March HOKKAIDO SHIMBUN.  MOFA's 
"multilateralists" consider the Japan-U.S. relationship to be part 
of Japan's larger global relationship and advocate trying to resolve 
Japan-U.S. trade problems at the GATT instead of through bilateral 
negotiations, the paper notes. 

   Replying to an interview question concerning the breakdown of the 
Japan-U.S. framework talks, Hayashi states that what Japan must do 
now is to "ensure transparency of the Japanese market through 
deregulation" and to "harmonize the Japanese market with world 
trade."  He also states that Japan has informed the United States 
that it "will not negotiate under the threat of Super 301," and this 
position of Japan "will not change."  "If the United States takes 
unilateral actions based on Super 301," Hayashi continues, Japan 
will ask the GATT to "judge whether U.S. actions are right" and 
"clarify any Japanese violation that the United States cites as a 
basis for imposing a Super 301 action." 

   In the interview Hayashi comments that he sees "no prospect" for 
a compromise on numerical targets in various industries because the 
United States "has not changed its position" concerning such targets 
and Japan "cannot accept them."  Instead, he states, the government, 
"under the direction of Prime Minister Morihiro Hosokawa, is 
formulating voluntary measures," which will include deregulation and 
market-opening steps in "the three priority areas" of government 
procurement, automobiles and auto parts, and insurance.  Although 
Japan will try to come up with "as many measures as possible," 
Hayashi states, macroeconomic measures "will be difficult to include 
in the package."  He says he understands that microeconomic measures 
alone cannot reduce Japan's current account surplus.  Macroeconomic 
measures are important in reducing Japan's trade surplus, but "the 
United States must understand that there are various limitations" 
which preclude the Japanese Government from including macroeconomic 
measures in its March package of trade measures. 

   Comments on Framework Talks, Numerical Targets - Although he 
hopes Japan's package of deregulation measures and market opening 
steps will lead to reopening the Japan-U.S. framework talks, he is 
"not so certain" of their outcome.  In Hayashi's view, the United 
States has not decided what to do after Japan announces its package 
of measures, and therefore he does not expect to see "where the 
framework talks are heading" until after a meeting between Foreign 
Minister Tsutomu Hata and U.S. Trade Representative Mickey Kantor, 
which is planned for mid-April. 

   Replying to a HOKKAIDO SHIMBUN question concerning government 
guarantees of "numerical targets initiated by the private sector," 
Hayashi comments that he understands the United States considers the 
cellular telephone issue a success because it has established a 
"precedent" for such a process.  "The government can use the 
Telecommunications Law to regulate cellular telephones to a certain 
degree, but automobiles and auto parts are totally different--they 
are free."  Regarding government procurement, an area where the 
United States asserts that the Japanese Government can achieve 
numerical targets, he states that the government's intention is to 
introduce an "open, competitive bidding system" for goods and 
services above a certain value, instead of "ambiguous, 
discretionary" contracts. 

   Hayashi's Earlier Comments on Japan-U.S. Negotiations - Hayashi 
expressed similar views concerning Japan-U.S. trade issues when he 
was a negotiator in the Structural Impediments Initiative (SSI) 
talks as director general of MOFA's Economic Affairs Bureau.  In 
comments published in the 28 August 1989 NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 
(NIKKEI), he stated that trade talks betwen the two countries 
require "two-way efforts"--Japan should do what it must, "but the 
United States also should do its part."  He stated that "the best 
and only answer for the Japan-U.S. trade imbalance is that Japan 
should expand domestic demand, promote structural adjustments, and 
open the Japanese market, while the United States should reduce its 
fiscal deficit and strengthen its manufacturing capabilities." 
Hayashi also said that while Japan needs to increase imports, "at 
the same time the United States needs to make efforts to increase 
its exports." 

   Concerning U.S. complaints over trade matters, Hayashi stated 
that Japan is willing to listen to American complaints, but the 
United States "also has to correct its misunderstandings" of the 
Japanese market, according to the 4 September 1989 NIKKEI.  Also, 
regarding the issue of structural change, in the 28 August 1989 
NIKKEI Hayashi stated that "the economic structure of one country 
will not easily change, because economic structural problems are 
deeply related to a country's society, culture, and sense of 
values."  Further, he asserted it would be "difficult to quantify 
structural change." 

   MITI To Simplify Export Controls on Strategic Commodities - On 1 
April the Ministry of International Trade and Industry (MITI) will 
begin simplifying its export controls on strategic commodities, such 
as machine tools, carbon fibers, super alloys, and materials which 
could be used in the manufacture of missiles and nuclear, 
biological, or chemical weapons.  The new "comprehensive 
authorization system" will provide for granting comprehensive three- 
year authorizations for exports to countries for which there is 
little fear of diversion to third countries, and which participate 
in international export control regimes, such as the the Chemical 
Weapon Commodities Diversion Control Committee, also known as the 
Australia Group.  Authority to handle license applications for 
exports to these countries will be transferred to MITI's regional 
bureaus by this autumn.  Export licenses for exports to subsidiary 
companies of Australia Group member countries outside of Europe and 
the United States will be effective for two years. 

   The new system is expected to reduce the number of export license 
applications by about 60 percent, a number that has grown from under 
20,000 in 1991 to 80,000 in 1993.  It will also lighten the 
administrative burden on exporting companies, which in some cases 
have had to apply for multiple export licenses for a single export 
contract.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 11 Mar 94 p 5) 

   Financial Issues - FEATURE:  Financial Institutions Expanding 
Asian Operations -- SUMMARY:  Japanese financial institutions are 
establishing a stronger presence in Asia's securities and bond 
markets, according to press reports.  Banks and securities firms are 
bolstering their Asian operations through subsidiaries and 
affiliates, particularly in Hong Kong and Singapore, and they are 
aggressively pursuing stock and bond underwriting activities. 

   According to a report released on 4 March 1994 by the Ministry of 
Finance concerning the "disposition of foreign securities 
investments," Japanese investors became net purchasers of Asian 
securities in 1993, according to the 5 March NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 
(NIKKEI).  Net purchases have increased as Japan's securities firms 
have aggressively promoted stock investment in the region, 
particularly in Hong Kong and Singapore.  By establishing 
subsidiaries and enhancing their Asian operations, Japanese 
financial firms have forged a strong presence in Asian markets, the 
paper noted.  According to press reporting, Japanese banks and 
securities have taken the following steps to bolster their Asian 
operations: 

   Daiwa Securities--Daiwa Investment Trust and Management Co. will 
establish a Singapore corporation, Daiwa Investment Advisors 
(Singapore) on 1 April, to enhance its portfolio management 
capability concerning Asian stocks, according to the 8 March NIKKEI 
KINYU SHIMBUN.  Daiwa has a Hong Kong subsidiary, but has decided to 
complement it with a Singapore office so as to respond to the 
expanding demand and diversified needs of investors in Asian stocks. 
The Singapore firm, which will be capitalized at about $1.24 
million, will cover the equity markets in Thailand, Malaysia, 
Indonesia, and India, leaving Daiwa's Hong Kong affiliate to cover 
the Hong Kong, Taiwan, and South Korea markets. 

   Mitsubishi Bank is also enhancing its Asian stock-trading 
operations as part of its plan to become a "major player in Asia's 
stock markets," according to the 25 February NIKKEI KINYU.  It has 
begun a survey of Asia's equity markets, their legal systems, and 
trading volumes to determine whether there is sufficient demand to 
warrant acquiring seats on all Asian stock exchanges in addition to 
Hong Kong, where it already has a seat. 

   NIKKEI KINYU reports that the number of employees at Worldsec, 
Mitsubishi's Hong Kong affiliate, which focuses on Asian equity 
investment and underwriting, recently doubled compared to the number 
of employees in 1991, when Worldsec was established.  Worldsec's 
profits in FY93 "nearly tripled" compared to FY92.  Worldsec already 
has a London-based affiliate and is preparing to establish a 
marketing affiliate in New York sometime in 1994 to sell Asian 
stocks to U.S. investors.  In addition, Mitsubishi this year expects 
to receive Japanese Ministry of Finance authorization to establish a 
domestic securities subsidiary, which will pave the way for 
Mitsubishi to trade stocks "trilaterally" between Asia, Europe, and 
the United States. 

   Nomura Securities--Ace Securities, a comprehensive securities 
firm belonging to the Nomura Group, dispatched a study group of 
young employees to Asia in March 1994 to enhance its understanding 
of Asia's stock markets, according to the 18 March NIKKEI KINYU. 
The group planned to travel to high-growth regions such as Hong 
Kong, Shanghai, and Shenzhen and to gather information from Japanese 
companies operating in China.  Ace believes that the information 
gathered concerning local corporations and economic trends will lead 
to "a stronger Asian investment trust business." 

   Fuji Bank is increasing capital investment in its Hong Kong 
securities affiliate from HK$293 million ($38.05 million) to HK$450 
million ($58.44 million), according to the 23 March NIKKEI.  Like 
Mitsubishi, Fuji is bolstering its Asian securities trading and 
underwriting operations with an eye toward establishing a domestic 
securities subsidiary in November 1994. 

   Firms Placing Special Emphasis on Derivatives Operations - Major 
commercial banks are bolstering their derivatives operations in Asia 
by establishing companies in Hong Kong specializing in currency and 
interest rate swaps and options, according to the 23 March NIKKEI. 
The banks are expanding their Asian derivative operations in 
response to the growing need among Japanese companies operating in 
Asia as well as governments and corporations for currency exchange 
facilities and more stabilized interest rates. 

   DKB Financial Products HK, which was recently established by a 
U.S. affiliate of Dai-Ichi Kangyo Bank, is scheduled to begin 
operations in Hong Kong in late March and will focus on derivative 
products, according to NIKKEI.  Sakura Bank will establish a company 
in Hong Kong sometime in 1994 to specialize in derivatives, 
according to the 29 March NIKKEI KINYU.  A Sakura official explains 
that the bank plans "to move its cutting-edge talent developed in 
the U.S. and European markets to Asia."  Fuji Bank is also 
considering establishing a subsidiary or branch in Hong Kong to 
focus on derivatives, and is presently deciding on the timing and 
amount of capital to be invested in the new operation, according to 
the 23 March NIKKEI.  Sanwa Bank is doubling the number of personnel 
at the Hong Kong branch established by its U.S. affiliate in the 
fall of 1993. 

   Recent Underwriting Activities in Hong Kong - The Bank of Tokyo 
is seeking to capture more bond underwriting positions in Hong Kong, 
anticipating that the "listing boom" for Hong Kong companies that 
began last year will continue in 1994, according to the 9 March 
NIKKEI KINYU.  The bank has underwritten three of the fifteen new 
listings to date this year on the Hong Kong exchange, and on 18 
March its Hong Kong affiliate, Bank of Tokyo International (HK), 
will underwrite a new listing of $HK240 million ($31.2 million) for 
the firm Cheung Tai Hong Holdings. 

   Nomura's Hong Kong subsidiary, Nomura International (HK), will be 
the lead underwriter for the new listing of Daiwa Associates 
scheduled for mid-April, according to the 23 March NIKKEI KINYU. 
Daiwa, which manufactures and markets electronic parts, will raise 
HK$58.5 million ($7.6 million) by issuing 50,000 shares.  This will 
be the sixth new listing for Nomura in 1994, and the second in which 
it has been the lead underwriter. 

   Fuji Bank's Hong Kong subsidiary, Fuji International Finance 
(HK), recently agreed to co-lead a bond underwriting for the Hong 
Kong affiliate of a China's state-run foreign investment firm, China 
International Trust and Investment Corporation, according to the 2 
March NIKKEI KINYU.  The total value of the issue will be HK$500 
million ($64.94 million).  The Hong Kong affiliates of Sanwa, 
Mitsubishi, and Sakura will also be among the lead underwriters. 

   MOF Interim Report on Financial Institution Disclosure - The 
"Working Subcommittee on Financial Institution Disclosure" under the 
Financial System Research Committee, a private advisory panel to the 
Ministry of Finance (MOF), on 25 March published an interim report 
on financial disclosure issues, according to the 25 March NIHON 
KEIZAI SHIMBUN (NIKKEI).  The report proposes that information on 
the performance of bank security and trust subsidiaries and "the 
overall risk management systems of banks" be disclosed through 
improved "disclosure publications." Whether foreign subsidiaries of 
Japanese banks must disclose off-balance sheet transactions, an 
issue the subcommittee had intended to address in March, has been 
deferred for future consideration, NIKKEI noted.  (For an earlier 
article on the disclosure issue, see Pacific Rim Economic Review, 
Vol 3, No 5, 9 March 1994.) 

   Securities and Trust Subsidiaries - Under the financial system 
reforms enacted last year, banks are now allowed to establish trust 
and securities subsidiaries.  The report pointed out that the nature 
and format of subsidiary businesses differ so vastly that a single, 
simplified disclosure vehicle by a bank is necessary for its 
depositors to be "aware of the bank's management and business 
strategy," according to the 26 March NIKKEI. 

   Based on the subcommittee's report, the Federation of Bankers 
Associations of Japan will revise and make specific its standards 
for disclosure.  Under the Banking Act, private banks are required 
to provide annual public disclosures based on the Federation's 
rules.  The disclosure documents are to be readily accessible to 
depositors and those doing business with a bank. 

   The new disclosure policy, which will take effect in March 1994, 
will have an immediate impact on six banks, according to the 26 
March SANKEI SHIMBUN.  The securities subsidiaries of the Industrial 
Bank of Japan, Long-Term Credit Bank of Japan, Mitsubishi Trust, 
Sumitomo Trust, and the Central Bank for Agriculture and Forestry, 
as well as the trust subsidiary of the Bank of Tokyo, will be 
obliged to disclose new information.  Commercial banks planning to 
establish securities subsidiaries in FY94 will have to make such 
disclosures in March 1995. 

   Risk Management Reporting Requirements - The new standards, the 
25 March NIKKEI reported, "go a step further" than existing rules in 
addressing risk management operations at the parent bank.  According 
to the 30 March NIKKEI KINYU SHIMBUN, in the past, banks publicized 
their approaches to asset and liability management "at their 
discretion," but under the new rules "they will be required to do 
so."  In addition, the 25 March NIKKEI reported, a bank's method of 
oversight and supervision of interest rate and credit risk--newly 
identified as among those risks a financial institution holds--must 
be disclosed as well.  However, the SANKEI article pointed out that 
the subcommittee report does not specify what calculation methods 
should be used to determine such risk.  Indices for assessing 
business management, such as ordinary profits and deposit-loan 
balances, will be unchanged, but now banks will be required to make 
such disclosures for five consecutive fiscal years rather than two 
years as in the past. 

   Off-Balance-Sheet Transactions - In April the subcommittee will 
establish a special group devoted to the issue of disclosure of so- 
called "off-balance sheet" transactions, including interest rate 
futures and currency swaps, according to the 26 March NIKKEI. 
Currently no figures appear on a financial institution's balance 
sheet for these transactions, and their true nature "tends to elude 
transparency."  Moreover, these transactions are conducive to large- 
volume trading across national boundaries and have been expanding at 
the overseas affiliates of Japanese financial institutions, 
according to the 24 February NIKKEI KINYU.  The subcommittee met in 
March to consider the issue of disclosing off-balance sheet 
transactions, specifically whether foreign subsidiaries of financial 
institutions will be required to disclose information.  However, the 
29 March NIKKEI reported that the subcommittee is still studying the 
issue and will take the next year to compile a report listing 
disclosure requirements. 

   Taiwan Authorizes Securities Firms To Establish, Upgrade Offices 
- Taiwan's Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) has authorized 
three additional Japanese securities companies to establish 
representative offices in Taipei, according to the 25 March NIKKEI 
KINYU SHIMBUN.  The three companies are Wako Securities, in which 
the Industrial Bank of Japan (IBJ) is the largest shareholder; New 
Japan Securities, the fifth largest securities company in Japan, 
which is also affiliated with the IBJ; and Sanyo Securities, a 
comprehensive securities firm associated with Nomura Securities. 

   The paper notes that the three companies applied to the Taiwan 
SEC in 1992, along with Japan's "big four" securities firms--Nomura, 
Daiwa, Nikko and Yamaichi--but approval of the three smaller 
companies' applications was postponed.  In mid-1993 the "big four" 
firms were granted permission to set up offices under the "principal 
of mutuality," and Taiwan's major securities firms opened offices in 
Tokyo at the same time the "big four" opened their offices in 
Taipei.  In the case of Wako, New Japan, and Sanyo, apparently there 
was no mutuality involved, and the SEC is thought to have granted 
them permission to operate in Taiwan as part of Taipei's efforts to 
enlist Japan's support for its admission to the General Agreement on 
Tariffs and Trade (GATT). 
   Meanwhile, the "big four" securities companies that already have 
representative offices in Taipei are considering upgrading their 
offices to full branch offices, according to the 30 March NIKKEI 
KINYU SHIMBUN.  As part of its overall liberalization of financial 
markets, at the end of January the SEC reduced from two years to one 
the period required for a foreign securities firm to wait before 
upgrading a representative office to a branch office.  The Japanese 
firms are expected to apply to Japan's Ministry of Finance (MOF) for 
permission to upgrade their offices in mid-April and then apply to 
Taiwan's SEC in June or July.  On 31 March the SEC will provide a 
detailed explanation of application procedures to foreign securities 
firms eligible to upgrade their offices.  As in the case with the 
three smaller securities firms, "insiders" say the speedy 
authorization is part of Taiwan's attempt to enlist the Japan's 
support for early GATT admission. 

   Since the issue of Japanese securities firms establishing branch 
offices in Taiwan "complicates" Japan's policy toward China, the 
paper reports, MOF personnel visited Beijing in February 1994 to 
discuss the Taiwan branch office issue.  On 10 March the Japan 
Securities Dealers Association designated China's Shanghai stock 
exchange a "designated foreign securities exchange."  In return, the 
MOF obtained the Chinese authorities' "consent" on upgrading the 
Taipei representative offices. 

   Foreign Trade and Investment - CHINA:  Japanese Firms Setting Up 
Operations in Shenzhen - Marubeni Construction Material Lease 
(MCML), Japan's leading construction equipment leasing company, in 
conjunction with its parent, Marubeni Corp. and Marubeni Hong Kong 
Ltd., in April will establish a joint venture construction equipment 
leasing company in Shenzhen.  The new company, Marubeni Construction 
Material Culin Co. Ltd., will lease temporary construction 
equipment, such as scaffolding and retaining walls, to companies 
working on Hong Kong's new airport and related highway and subway 
construction.  The joint venture company will be capitalized at 300 
million yen ($2.86 million), with MCML investing 60 percent, the 
parent, Marubeni Corp. 30 percent, and Marubeni Hong Kong 10 
percent.  Total investment will be about 700 million yen ($6.67 
million).  Sales are expected to be 550 million yen ($5.2 million) 
in its first fiscal year and 1.3 billion yen ($12.4 million) within 
three years.  The venture's head office and factory will be located 
in the Futian bonded zone in Shenzhen, where MCML has already 
purchased a 13,000 square-meter site. 

   This will be MCML's fourth overseas joint venture, following 
those undertaken with Marubeni Corp. and local companies in 
Singapore, Malaysia, and Thailand. (Tokyo NIKAAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 23 
Feb 94 p 5) 

   Sanyo Seimitsu, a wholly owned subsidiary of Sanyo Electric, will 
begin manufacturing small motors for cameras and office equipment in 
April at a recently completed plant in Shenzhen.  Sanyo Seimitsu has 
invested about 250 million yen ($2.38 million) in the 3,000-square- 
meter plant, which will employ 400 to 500 workers.  The plant will 
boost Sanyo Seimitsu's overseas production of motors to 2.5 million 
per month.  It also produces 1 million motors per month in Japan. 
(Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 2 Mar 94 p 9) 

   Futaba Corp., a major manufacturer of metal molds, has begun 
shifting production of molds out of Hong Kong to Shenzhen because of 
Hong Kong's rising land and labor costs.  A Futaba subsidiary, 
Futaba Hong Kong, will invest HK$20 million ($2.6 million), the 
entire amount of capitalization, in Futaba Precision Mold (Shenzhen) 
Co. Ltd.  The plant will be completed in 1994 and is scheduled to 
begin operations in early 1995.  Futaba Precision Mold (Shenzhen) 
will import metal plates from its South Korean subsidiary, Hanguk 
Futaba Precision Industry, and will assemble finished molds.  Twenty 
percent of the output will be sold in China and 80 percent in Hong 
Kong.  This will be the fifth overseas production and sales base 
involving Futaba's metal mold business. (Tokyo NIKAAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 
9 Mar 94 p 12) 

   Mitsui Hi-tec has bought a factory in Shenzhen to manufacture 
molds and electric motor cores.  Details concerning the factory have 
not been disclosed, but it is estimated that total investment will 
be about 1 billion yen ($9.5 million).  It will begin operations in 
July and its output will be sold to Japanese, European, and American 
electronics and semiconductor manufacturers in China.  Mitsui Hi-tec 
is also searching for a plant site in Shanghai, which will also cost 
about 1 billion yen, to manufacture molds and motor cores.  This is 
a change from the company's original plan, which was to produce 
integrated circuit lead frames. (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 28 Mar 
94 p 9) 

   Olympus Optical Co., has completed construction of a new camera 
plant in Shenzhen, and on 10 March began full-scale operations.  The 
20,000 square-meter plant, which will employ about 950 workers, has 
a monthly production capacity of 100,000 compact cameras.  This is 
Olympus' third, and largest, overseas camera plant, and it will 
double Olympus' overseas production to 3 million cameras next year 
and raise its overseas production ratio to 50 percent. 

   Rather than following the usual practice of beginning production 
with simple assembly operations, Olympus decided to establish a 
"coherent production structure" from the start, included lens 
polishing and plastic parts molding processes.  In 1995 the plant 
will also begin producing microcassette tape recorders.  (Tokyo 
NIKAAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 10 Mar 94 p 11) 

   Mitsubishi Warehouse and Transportation will expand its 
transportation network in China and Southeast Asia by opening a 
representative office in Shenzhen in March, opening an office in 
Vietnam in April, and upgrading its Shanghai representative office 
to a local corporation in FY95 (which begins on 1 April).  The 
Shenzhen representative office will be set up as a branch of the 
Hong Kong transportation company Hong Kong Daia Transportation.  It 
will handle imports to southern China via Hong Kong and will assume 
responsibility for products exported from the region by Japanese 
companies.  The Shanghai representative office will be upgraded to a 
local corporation and will serve Japanese companies in the Shanghai 
area by conducting market surveys on commodities and warehouse site 
surveys. 

   In addition to opening an office in Vietnam, probably in Ho Chi 
Minh City, Mitsubishi Warehouse also plans to establish 
representative offices in Jakarta and in Guangzhou, Shanghai, and 
Beijing, in addition to setting up local corporations in Singapore, 
Hong Kong, Thailand, Taiwan, and Indonesia.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI 
SHIMBUN 17 Mar 94 p 22) 

   Chisso Engineering, Nichimen Win Petrochemical Plant Contract - 
Chisso Engineering, a major plant engineering firm, and Nichimen, a 
general trading company, have won a $45 million contract from the 
China National Chemical Construction Corp. to build a vinyl chloride 
monomer (VCM) and polyvinyl chloride (PVC) manufacturing plant for 
the Tianjin Dagu Chemical Factory.  The plant, which is scheduled to 
be completed by June 1997, will have an annual production capacity 
of 80,000 tons of VCM and 20,000 tons of PVC.  It will incorporate 
Chisso's technology for separating VCM from PVC and will also 
incorporate VCM processing technology from the Belgian firm European 
Vinyl Corp.  Construction of this plant "represents a shift for 
China to ethylene-based VCM."  Production from the plant will 
replace that from an existing Tianjin Dagu acetylene-based VCM 
plant, which will be scrapped. 

   Chisso's plant construction experience in China and Nichimen's 
ability to obtain a dollar-denominated loan from the Japan Export- 
Import Bank were significant factors in winning the contract. 
(Tokyo NIKAAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 12 Mar 94 p 6) 

   EASTERN EUROPE:  Marubeni To Expand Sales Networks in Poland, 
Hungary, Russia - Marubeni, one of Japan's largest general trading 
companies, is establishing marketing firms in the former socialist 
states of Eastern Europe to increase sales of office and electronic 
equipment.  To protect itself against the appreciating yen and 
because Marubeni anticipates future growth despite turbulent 
transitions to market economies in Eastern Europe and Russia, the 
company has decided to establish sales bases there "early on" to 
take advantage of market developments. 

   Marubeni's first move will be in Poland, where it will set up a 
marketing firm for office equipment in April through a joint venture 
with the Polish firm Faxon.  The joint venture company will be 
capitalized at 83 million yen ($790,000), with Marubeni contributing 
42 percent and Faxon 58 percent.  Its sales target for the first 
year of operation is 2 billion yen ($19 million) from sales of 
equipment such as photocopiers, facsimile machines, printers, and 
personal computers. 

   Also in July 1994, Marubeni will establish a wholly-owned 
subsidiary to market electronic equipment in Russia.  Its base of 
operations will be in Moscow, from which the subsidiary will sell 
products wholesale to regional dealers.  It sales goal is 6 billion 
yen ($57 million) for office equipment and electronics for the first 
fiscal year. 

   In Hungary, Marubeni will establish a wholly owned subsidiary by 
the end of 1994 to market advanced medical equipment.  It expects 
sales of 1 billion yen ($9.5 million) during the first fiscal year. 
(Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 15 Mar 94 p 12) 

   NORTH KOREA:  FEATURE:  Political Figures 'Scheming' To Revive 
Trade With Pyongyang -- SUMMARY:  Despite the slowdown in Japanese 
trade with North Korea, some Japanese political figures are 
scheming" to resume trade with North Korea, according to press 
reports.  A political associate of Japan Renewal Party (Shinseito) 
Diet Member Hajime Ishii reportedly will visit Pyongyang in April to 
establish a new company that will resume exports of river sand and 
gravel to Japan that stopped after the fall from power of former LDP 
kingmaker Shin Kanemaru, who backed closer Japan-DPRK ties.  Foreign 
Minister Tsutomu Hata apparently is being "targeted" by North Korea 
to be a "mediator" between Japan and North Korea--the role Kanemaru 
had played earlier. 

   An article in the 14 March NIKKEI BUSINESS reports that despite 
the slowdown in Japanese trade with North Korea due to North Korea's 
accumulated debts to Japan and U.S. criticism of funds sent by 
General Association of Korean Residents in Japan (Chosen Soren) 
members to Pyongyang, supporters of closer economic ties between 
Japan and North Korea are "scheming to resume trade" with North 
Korea.  The article reports that one such supporter of closer DPRK- 
Japan economic ties is Yoshiyuki Oe, who is an associate of Diet 
member Ishii and chairman of the Japan-North Korea Friendship 
Document Center.  The article states that Oe will visit North Korea 
in April to discuss with his North Korean counterparts establishing 
a new company that will "resume" exports of river sand and gravel to 
Japan.  Oe is chairman of the Kanto Region Support Society (Koenkai) 
for Diet member Ishii, who is himself chairman of the Japan-North 
Korea Parliamentary League. 

   In addition to Oe's prospective visit to North Korea, the NIKKEI 
BUSINESS article reports that a "considerable" amount of additional 
activity related to resumption of the sand and gravel trade also 
appears to be going on "below the surface."  Anticipating that 
Japan's domestic supply of river sand and gravel suitable for use in 
cement will be exhausted in the future, and in view of an expected 
increase in public works projects in Japan, "even large trading 
firms which now hesitate to conduct business openly with North 
Korea" are reportedly eager to conclude deals with North Korea to 
import sand and gravel.  As one example of this interest, the NIKKEI 
BUSINESS article reports that a Japanese trading firm has conducted 
a study on the sand and gravel situation in North Korea through a 
"dummy company." 

   By way of background, NIKKEI BUSINESS reports that Japanese 
imports of North Korean river sand and gravel began in 1990 when the 
LDP's Kanemaru, visited Pyongyang.  According to NIKKEI BUSINESS, 
when the imports of North Korean sand and gravel began, Kanemaru 
asked the large general construction firms to buy the North Korean 
materials.  An official of the construction firm that participated 
in building the Akashi Bridge, one of Japan's longest, stated that 
"North Korean sand and gravel was relatively expensive, but we could 
not ignore" Kanemaru's request.  When Kanemaru lost power in the 
summer of 1991, however, construction firms stopped buying the North 
Korean materials. 

   Foreign Minister Hata Targeted as 'Mediator' - According to an 
article in the December 1993 issue of SENTAKU, a monthly magazine, 
North Korea appears to be "targeting" Foreign Minister Tsutomu Hata 
as the "replacement" for Kanemaru as political and economic mediator 
between Japan and North Korea.  The SENTAKU article reports that 
officials of the Ministry of Foreign Affairs (MOFA) assigned to the 
office of Foreign Minister Hata--who is also the head of Shinseito- 
-commented that the number of local assemblymen and officials of 
various organizations coming to petition Hata to promote Japan-North 
Korean relations "has suddenly increased." 

   The SENTAKU article also reports that Shingo Kanemaru, the second 
son of Shin Kanemaru, "is orchestrating from behind the scenes" 
efforts to resume trade with North Korea.  It asserts that Pyongyang 
had instructed Chosen Soren "to promote Japan-North Korean trade." 
Chosen Soren's local branches, in turn, have reportedly asked local 
assemblymen and officials of various local organizations to support 
Chosen Soren's efforts.  With letters of introduction from Shingo 
Kanemaru addressed to the foreign minister, local assemblymen and 
organization officials reportedly went to MOFA, requested to see 
Hata, and "directly petitioned him to promote Japan-North Korean 
trade." 

   According to SENTAKU, Shingo Kanemaru hopes to play a major role 
in the Japan-North Korea trade "after the Japanese general public 
forgets the scandal involving his father."  Until then, "he appears 
to be using Foreign Minister Hata" to promote relations between the 
two countries. 

   SOUTHEAST ASIA:  Activities of Machine Tool, Industrial Machinery 
Firms - Matsuura Machinery, a leading manufacturer of machining 
centers based in Fukui Prefecture, plans to increase its sales 
efforts in Southeast Asia.  To do this, the firm will create a 
position within its International Division responsible for Southeast 
Asia, and in April it will send two or three managers to Southeast 
Asia to begin sales activities.  It will also create a Singapore- 
based network of sales agent offices.  Matsuura is making this move 
because its primary customers, Japan's electrical machinery 
manufacturers, are shifting their production bases to Southeast 
Asia.  Matsuura has exported over 5,500 machining centers to the 
United States, but it has sold less than 30 in Southeast Asia.  It 
plans to increase sales in Southeast Asia to the level of more than 
one machining center per month.  (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 15 Mar 
94 p 11) 

   Aoyagi Seisakujo, a manufacturer of metal working machinery based 
in Fukuoka Prefecture, will export a numerically controlled 
stainless steel V-groove fluting machine to a Malaysian metalworking 
company through the Taiwanese trading company Kuanshi Maoyi.  Aoyagi 
has sold similar kinds of specialized machinery to Taiwanese 
metalworking companies, but this is its first export to Malaysia. 
Aoyagi plans to use Kuanshi Maoyi to increase its sales in Southeast 
Asia and China.  (Tokyo NIKAAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 7 Mar 94 p 23) 

   Maruka Machinery Co., a construction machinery manufacturer 
located in Osaka, will expand its overseas operations by 
establishing local corporations and branch offices in Taiwan, 
Thailand, Malaysia, the Philippines, and Indonesia, and by 
establishing an Asia Office within its Overseas Headquarters. 
Maruka is also studying expansion into China, where it is currently 
negotiating a sale of ten pieces of construction machinery.  (Tokyo 
NIKAAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 11 Mar 94 p 11) 

   VIETNAM:  Firms Expanding Offices, Forming Investment Plans - 
According to figures compiled by the Japan External Trade 
Organization (JETRO), some 80 to 85 Japanese companies have opened 
offices in either Ho Chi Minh City or Hanoi, the 15 March NIHON 
KEIZAI SHIMBUN (NIKKEI) reports.  Among the major firms that have 
recently opened offices in Vietnam are Honda Motor, Yamaha Motor, 
and Mitsubishi Heavy Industries. 

   Honda opened a three-man office in Ho Chi Minh City in early 
March, according to the 15 March NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN.  The manager 
is a branch-level Honda official, who is assisted by two Vietnamese 
employees.  The office will undertake basic market studies with the 
goal of establishing a motorcycle sales network in Vietnam.  In 
1993, 200,000 motorcycles were sold in the country, a total "nearly 
triple" that of 1992.  NIKKEI SANGYO notes that Honda motorcycles 
account for "nearly 90 percent" of all sales. 

   Yamaha Motor, the world's second largest motorcycle manufacturer 
after Honda, opened a Ho Chi Minh City office in January 1994, the 
NIKKEI SANGYO article reports. 

   Mitsubishi Heavy Industries (MHI), Japan's largest manufacturer 
of heavy equipment, has received Vietnamese Government approval to 
open an office in Ho Chi Minh City, according to the 15 March 
NIKKEI.  It will be staffed by one MHI official and three Vietnamese 
employees.  MHI is participating in "extensive business talks" 
concerning construction of power generating plants and petroleum and 
natural gas processing facilities.  NIKKEI notes that MHI also plans 
to develop markets for injection molding equipment, construction 
machinery, and air conditioners.  Another goal is to investigate the 
market for supplying materials. 

   Paper Firm, Nissho Iwai in Joint-Venture Forestry Project - New 
Oji Paper, Japan's largest paper manufacturer, and the general 
trading company Nissho Iwai have formed a joint venture forestry 
development company in Vietnam that will eventually export all the 
wood chips it produces to New Oji's paper manufacturing operations 
in Japan.  The companies established the joint venture in response 
to a request from Vietnam's Forestry Ministry.  The project will be 
the first forestry project in Vietnam to be 100 percent funded by 
Japanese companies. 
   The goal of the two firms is to start up operations of the new 
company--which will probably be named "Dong Phu Plantation Forestry 
Company of Vietnam"--in Ho Chi Minh City in October 1994.  Initial 
investment is planned to be $300,000, but will increase each year 
for 6 years to a total of $1.8 million.  The investment ratio will 
be 51 percent for New Oji and 49 percent for Nissho Iwai. 

   The new company's forestry plantation will be located in Dong Phu 
District of Song Be Province, and steps currently are being taken to 
acquire the necessary land.  Beginning in FY95, 1,500 hectares 
(3,700 acres) of acacia, eucalyptus, and other fast-growing trees 
will be planted each year.  After 6 years the total plantation area, 
including irrigation facilities, will reach 13,000 hectares (32,100 
acres).  Harvesting will be undertaken on a 6-year cycle and will 
begin in the year 2001 at an annual rate of 65,000 tons, with New 
Oji taking all the chip output.  Total plantation costs are 
projected to be 600 million yen ($5.7 million). 

   Since wood chips produced in Japan are no longer price 
competitive, New Oji annually must import about 60 percent, or 2.7 
million tons, of its chips from abroad.  Because of tighter 
restrictions on logging in the United States, New Oji decided to 
proceed with forestry operations in Vietnam to diversify and 
stabilize its sources of raw materials.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 
17 Mar 94 p 14) 

   Association Studying Private Funding for Agricultural Projects - 
The Overseas Agricultural Development Association (OADA), a Japanese 
industry association (shadan hojin), is taking steps to help Vietnam 
develop its agricultural sector through private Japanese investment, 
according to the 8 March NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN.  With the assistance 
of local Vietnamese governmental officials, the OADA has compiled a 
list of 98 projects totaling $380 million that could be funded by 
Japanese companies, some of which involve the modernization of 
facilities and expanding areas of cultivation. 

   According to NIKKEI SANGYO, the OADA sent a survey group to 
assess Vietnam's agriculture and livestock sectors and their future 
growth potential.  The OADA also reportedly plans to assist Japanese 
companies in their "push into Vietnam's agricultural sector" by 
providing advice and "acting as a go-between."  The OADA is 
compiling a report entitled "Potentialities for Private-Sector 
Investment in Vietnam's Agricultural Sector," and is also 
considering providing detailed information on Vietnam's agricultural 
development to Japanese companies. 

   Among the 98 development projects on OADA's list, 16 involve the 
processing of crops such as mangoes, oranges, and coconuts, at a 
total cost of $23 million; 13 are upland farming projects, that 
include the cultivation of sugarcane and tobacco, totaling $34 
million; 11 projects involve coffee cultivation and processing, 
totaling $47 million; and 10 involve the cultivation of eucalyptus 
and other trees and processing the wood into chips, tota1ing $33 
million.  The remaining projects cover a number of areas, from 
banana, pineapple, tea, and rubber production to sericulture and pig 
raising. 

   The NIKKEI SANGYO article did not mention which government 
ministry the OADA is affiliated with.  However, a 26 September 1989 
NIKKEI SANGYO article stated that OADA is "an auxiliary organization 
under the Ministry of Agriculture, Forestry and Fisheries and the 
Foreign Ministry" that operates "jointly" with Japanese companies. 
The 8 March 1994 NIKKEI SANGYO reports that the president of the 
OADA is Eiichi Hashimoto, an advisor to Mitsui and Co.  According to 
the "Nikkei Who's Who" reference feature of the Nikkei Telecom 
database, Hashimoto is also an advisor to Mitsui Construction, a 
Mitsui Group company.  In 1983 he was chairman of Keidanren's 
Indonesia Cooperation Committee, according to the 15 April 1983 
NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN. 

   Japan-U.S. Trade Issues - Reaction of Glass Industry to U.S. 
Super 301 Decision -- In an article in the 16 March NIKKEI SANGYO 
SHIMBUN, reporter Ryoichi Hatta writes that the U.S. Government's 
"strong pressure" on Japan's glass distributors to open the glass 
market could have an "adverse effect" on sales of U.S. glass in 
Japan.  Hatta reports that some glass wholesalers were "angered" 
when the U.S. Government selected glass as one industry to which it 
will apply trade sanctions under the reinstated "Super 301" trade 
provisions.  The U.S. attitude is "totally impolite" to customers, 
Japanese glass wholesalers say.  "The more political pressure that 
is applied, the less we become eager to handle U.S. glass." 

   Hatta maintains that Japan's glass market "is no longer closed," 
and that pressure by Japanese glass manufacturers on their keiretsu 
glass wholesalers to handle only glass products made by specific 
keiretsu manufacturers "is no longer observed."  A wholesaler who 
started handling glass made by the U.S. firm PPG Industries a year 
ago is quoted as saying that there is "no problem for Japanese glass 
wholesalers, even those belonging to the keiretsu of a certain glass 
manufacturer, in handling foreign glass." 

   Hatta also points to efforts by the U.S. glass industry to 
increase sales in Japan.  PPG has been steadily increasing the 
number of Japanese companies that handle its products.  Also, U.S. 
Guardian Industries, which formerly was the "severest critic" of the 
Japanese glass market, now ships glass products on specially 
designed steel pallets that are suitable for distribution in Japan. 

   Hatta reports that recently more U.S. glass manufacturers have 
contacted Japanese glass wholesalers.  Up until this year, however, 
"U.S. glass manufacturers have not tried to sell their products to 
Japanese wholesalers."  He notes that according to a survey 
conducted in December 1993 by the Ministry of International Trade 
and Industry, 70 percent of Japan's 380 glass wholesalers responded 
that they had never been contacted by a foreign glass manufacturer. 
Machine Tools/Robotics - Fanuc, Yamazaki Conclude Agreements With 
Chinese Firms -- Fanuc, a leading machine tools company and 
industrial robot manufacturer, has signed a contract with the 
Nanjing Machine Tool Factory to supply it with Fanuc's wire 
electrical discharge machine technology.  Nanjing Machine Tool will 
both display and begin taking orders for wire electrical discharge 
machines at the upcoming machine tools exhibition in Beijing.  By 
providing wire electrical discharge machine technology to the 
Nanjing firm, Fanuc will be creating a customer for the numerically 
controlled equipment produced by Fanuc's own Beijing joint venture 
company, Beijing Fanuc Electromechanics Co. Ltd.  This joint venture 
was formed in December 1992 with the Beijing Machine Tool Research 
Institute to manufacture numerically controlled equipment for 
China's machine tool market. 

   Fanuc will also begin importing cast parts for industrial robots 
from Nanjing Machine Tool Factory to lower its manufacturing costs. 
Currently, Fanuc uses about 400 tons of cast parts per month, half 
of which are imported from South Korea.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 
25 Mar 94 p 12) 

   Fanuc has also signed a contract to supply carbon dioxide lasers 
on an original equipment manufacture basis to the Hangzhou Forging 
Press Factory based in Hangzhou, Jiangsu Province.  The contract 
calls for Fanuc to supply computer numerically controlled equipment, 
servomotors, and laser oscillators for a 2-kw laser to Hangzhou 
Forging Press, which will use the equipment and lasers to develop a 
laser cutting machine.  Hangzhou Forging Press will display a laser 
cutting machine at the upcoming Beijing machine tool exhibition. 
The first parts have already been shipped and Fanuc technicians are 
installing the equipment.  Fanuc projects that laser sales in China 
will reach a level of about 30 per month.  (Tokyo NIKAAN KOGYO 
SHIMBUN 8 Mar 94 p 12) 

   Yamazaki Giken, a machine tools company, will establish a joint 
venture sales company with the Northwest Light Industrial Institute, 
located in Shaanxi Province, to market its newest computer 
numerically controlled milling machines in China.  Yamazaki chose 
the institute as its joint-venture partner "because it already 
manufactures and sells industrial machinery."  In the joint 
venture's first fiscal year, Yamazaki plans to export about 30 
milling machines. The company will ship to China and display at the 
Beijing machine tools exhibition one of its YZ-8CR milling machines 
which it developed in April 1993.  Currently, Yamazaki has no 
personnel permanently assigned to China, but given the institute's 
own technical expertise, Yamazaki believes it can respond adequately 
to maintenance requests by sending technicians to China for short 
periods.  Previously Yamazaki has not sold any milling machines in 
China.  (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 25 Mar 94 p 11) 

   Star Micronics To Close Eight European Sales Companies - Star 
Micronics, a machine tool and printer manufacturer, will close eight 
of its European sales companies in FY94 because of the prolonged 
recession in Europe.  Star will incur 2 billion yen ($19 million) in 
extraordinary losses with the closure of two machine tool sales 
companies in Switzerland and six printer sales companies in Germany, 
France, the Netherlands, and Belgium. 

   Star will record 1.4 billion yen ($13.3 million) in 
nonconsolidated final losses and 2 billion yen ($19 million) in 
consolidated final losses for FY93, the first time in the company's 
history that it has recorded either consolidated or nonconsolidated 
losses.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 5 Mar 94 p 6) 

   Telecommunications/Satellites - Mitsubishi Electric Initiates 
Multimedia Equipment Business Activities -- Mitsubishi Electric Co. 
(MELCO) will inaugurate a "multimedia promotion project group" on 1 
April and will also soon begin full-fledged multimedia equipment 
business activities, focusing on personal digital assistant 
equipment and two-way cable television (CATV) equipment.  The 
company will establish a 20-member project team, which will create a 
unified business structure for managing the equipment business in 
Japan and the United States and a research and development team of 
about 100, to work on developing the equipment at its research 
centers in Japan.  Yoshito Yamaguchi, director of MELCO's main 
office for overseas business, will be the primary executive officer, 
while Shoichi Iikawa, chairman of the Personal Information Equipment 
Research and Development Center, will be the "group leader."  The 
project team will be staffed by about 12 employees from the 
company's overseas business office and research centers, and about 
six employees from its U.S. affiliate, Mitsubishi Electric America. 

   MELCO will pursue a strategy of linking up with U.S. computer 
manufacturers and CATV companies in developing its personal digital 
assistant and CATV equipment businesses.  The project team will 
manage activities such as designing the cooperative structures, 
customer development, product design, and drafting business proposal 
plans.  The company is aiming for a quick startup by pooling its 
strengths, and will gradually work toward commercialization of its 
products. 

   To date MELCO has taken a cautious approach to developing 
multimedia equipment for the general public because of the 
opaqueness" of the market, and has instead focused its efforts on 
developing specialized equipment and technologies, such as image 
compression.  However, the company decided to begin "full-fledged" 
multimedia efforts because, in the words of MELCO President Takashi 
Kitaoka, "the U.S. market is about five years ahead of the Japanese 
market, and if we get a late start in the U.S. market, we will have 
difficulty starting up in the Japanese market."  (Tokyo NIKKEI 
SANGYO SHIMBUN 28 Mar 94 p 1) 

   MPT To Deliberate on Digital Communications Satellite 
Broadcasting - In April the Ministry of Posts and Telecommunications 
(MPT) will begin deliberations on switching from analog to digital 
systems for communications satellite television broadcasting 
services, such as CNN and MTV.  In considering the switch to digital 
systems, the MPT first is seeking the more effective use of 
satellite transponders.  Currently with analog systems, a 
communications satellite transponder can handle only one channel, 
but it can relay four to eight channels if digital transmission 
systems are used.  Consequently, according to executives of major 
trading companies, communications satellite broadcasting companies 
will be able to reduce their operating costs considerably by 
converting to digital systems, which in turn will lead to a lowering 
of viewer subscription fees "by about 60 to 70 percent." 

   Secondly, the MPT is seeking to enhance the "operational 
foundations" of communications satellite broadcasting companies.  In 
the United States, beginning in April a Hughes Company subsidiary 
will begin offering "Direc TV," a multichannel digital 
communications satellite broadcasting service.  To benefit from 
similar services in Japan, the communications industry must 
establish technical standards to properly equip the communications 
satellite broadcasting stations and develop the appropriate hardware 
for receiving broadcasts.  The MPT plans to turn over discussion of 
the necessary technical standards to its Telecommunications 
Technology Council as early as next year if the switch to digital 
systems receives support from relevant industry circles.  (Tokyo 
SANKEI SHIMBUN 8 Mar 94 p 1) 

   CHINA:  Domestic Developments - Machine-Building Industry 
Formulates Development Plan -- The Ministry of Machine-Building 
Industry has formulated a new program: "A Pillar Industry--National 
Program To Develop the Machine-Building Industry."  The program 
includes long-term objectives, thoughts on reform, planned measures, 
and concrete steps to vigorously develop machine-building into a 
pillar industry. 

   The 19 March issue of Beijing JIDIAN RIBAO provides an outline of 
the plan. 

   Objective:  By the year 2010 to turn machine-building into a 
pillar industry of the national economy.  By 2010 to increase the 
ratio of gross value of industrial output, value-added, and foreign 
exchange earnings from the present 23 percent, 6.8 percent, and 14 
percent of GNP to over 30 percent, 8 percent, and 25 percent 
respectively.  The target for foreign exchange earned from exports 
will be $130 billion. 

   Two Stages: Prior to the year 2000 the first stage will be to 
build a good foundation, improve product quality, and adjust the 
product mix.  The machine-building industry will meet domestic 
demand for electric power equipment and modern farming equipment and 
will supply most of the equipment needs of the metallurgy, mineral, 
petroleum, and coal industries.  The second stage from 2000 to 2010 
will focus on meeting the domestic demands of the energy, 
transportation, raw material, and auto industries.  Product 
performance will reach international standards. 
   Three Features:  The formulation and implementation of this plan 
differs from past plans in three ways: 

   1.  Continued reform of the economic system will promote the 
formation of a market economy.  Micromanagement and direct control 
will weaken.  Enterprise success or failure will depend on their own 
efforts. 

   2.  Reorganization of the international industrial structure, 
division of labor, and joining GATT will accelerate the merger of 
China's machine-building industry with the international market. The 
sharing of markets, resources, and new technical achievements will 
provide the industry with motive and opportunity. 

   3.  The pattern of ownership has changed from the single public 
ownership of the past to the coexistence of state-owned, collective, 
joint ventures, and private economies.  The rapid development of 
rural enterprises and joint ventures has become a major force in 
developing the machine-building industry, and will guide and advance 
management and macroeconomic regulation throughout the industry. 

   Four Focal Points: 1.  To emphasize production of basic 
machinery. In this century, the machine-building industry will meet 
over 90 percent of the heavy equipment manufacturers' demand for 
processing facilities and wi1l meet 60 percent of auto industry's 
demand for processing equipment. 

   2.  To emphasize production of basic parts.  This century the 
machine-building industry will focus on production of hydraulic, 
pneumatic, seals, bearings, low pressure parts, and instrument 
parts. By 2010 the quality, reliability, and durability of these 
parts will be guaranteed. 

   3.  To emphasize production of heavy equipment.  In the area of 
thermal power equipment, the focus will be on developing 300,000 to 
600,000 kilowatt generating units, and developing new technology on 
fluidized beds, combined cycle, and clean combustion.  In the area 
of hydropower equipment, the emphasis will be on developing large 
generating units, pumped storage, and tubular turbines. 

   4.  To focus on the auto industry.  By the year 2000, the 
machine-building industry will set up six or seven enterprise groups 
that have large economies of scale and the ability to compete 
internationally.  Production will meet domestic demand.  By the year 
2010, the machine-building industry will set up a large enterprise 
group capable of producing 1 million vehicles and a enterprise group 
specializing in the production of spare parts. 

   Five Strategies: 1.  To promote development through competition. 
The government will rely on policies, plans, information, and other 
measures to develop, cultivate, and perfect markets, and to create a 
fair competitive environment.  To improve competitiveness, measures 
will be formulated to aid industries and products that fail in the 
market. 

   2.  To help the four focal points succeed.  Allocation of people, 
funds, and material will be made for the production of basic 
machinery, basic parts, heavy equipment, and the auto industry. 

   3.  To rely on scientific and technical progress. The industry 
will accelerate the transfer of scientific results to production, 
use new technology to raise product quality, and pay attention to 
training. 

   4.  To promote economies of scale. To improve efficiency, goods 
that lend themselves to mass production will be produced based on 
market demand and economies of scale.  Enterprise groups will be 
developed to promote specialization. 

   5.  To strengthen external and internal cooperation. The industry 
will accelerate the import of foreign resources, talent and funds to 
raise the domestic technological level.  The industry will support 
lateral associations that are transsectoral, transregional, and 
involve multiple trade areas, and will develop international markets 
to expand exports. 

   Six Measures: 1.  To implement a modern enterprise system.  The 
machine-building industry will gradually transform large and medium 
state-owned enterprises into corporations and stock companies.  The 
government will issue and market stocks and bonds for key 
enterprises.  Large enterprise groups will be set up that are 
transsectoral, transregional, and involve multiple trade areas, and 
that pool production, technology, trade, and finances.  Small state- 
owned enterprises will implement the contracting, leasing, or share 
cooperation systems.  Some will be sold to collectives or 
individuals. 

   2.  Reform plans to improve macroeconomic regulation and control. 
The tradition of distributing money, materials, and projects to 
enterprises will change to providing forecasts, guidance, and 
services.  There will be a comprehensive plan for all trades and key 
projects.  The government will give priority funding to projects 
listed in the plan. 

   3.  Emphasize the development of S and T ability to promote S and 
T progress.  Industry will integrate scientific research and 
production.  Research institutes and enterprises will be encouraged 
to form lateral associations or set up enterprise groups. 
Enterprises will set up R and D centers. 

   4.  Improve policy guidance to promote industry development.  The 
machine-building industry will formulate and implement policies on 
upgrading technical equipment and formulate standards for major 
machine-building products and spare parts.  The industry will be 
involved in decisions on the import of technical equipment. 

   5.  Focus on the cultivation of talent to improve labor quality. 
The industry will improve conditions in technical schools and 
enterprise worker training facilities to foster entrepreneurs with 
initiative who understand business operations and management.  The 
industry will formulate occupational qualification and employment 
standards, publicly advertise for workers, and promote labor 
mobi1ity. 

   6.  Raise funds from many channels to increase investment.  The 
government will develop a bank investment policy to support the 
development of the machine-building industry. The government will 
give priority to the funding of technology imports, and joint 
ventures, and to expanding exports.  All banking and nonbanking 
financial organizations will provide strong support. 

   Article Examines Regional Disparities of Rural Enterprises - 
There are noticeable disparities between rural enterprises in the 
coastal regions and in the central-western regions.  Rural 
enterprises in central-western regions are of a much smaller scale 
than enterprises in the eastern coastal regions, although the total 
number of enterprises are close.  For example, at the end of 1992 in 
the central-western provinces of Hubei, Sichuan, Guizhou, Yunnan, 
and Gansu the average number of enterprises was 977,800 while in the 
eastern coastal regions of Jiangsu, Zhejiang, Fujian, Shandong, and 
Guangdong the average number was 987,600.  However, the average 
total number of employees in the central-western regions was 
3,398,600, while it was 7,447,600 in the coastal regions.  The 
differences are also obvious in terms of fixed assets and value of 
output.  Enterprise fixed assets averaged 6.495 billion yuan in the 
central-western regions, and 25.324 billion yuan in the coastal 
regions.  The gross output value of central-western rural 
enterprises was 176.94 billion yuan, and 852.63 billion yuan in 
coastal regions. 

   Economic efficiency of central-western rural enterprises is also 
lower than that of coastal enterprises.  In 1991 average labor 
productivity was 8,671 yuan with 100 yuan of fixed assets yielding 
200 yuan of output value, and 13 yuan of profit taxes.  In contrast, 
the average labor productivity of coastal rural enterprises was 
15,951 yuan, with 100 yuan of fixed assets yielding 287 yuan of 
output value, and 22 yuan of profit taxes. 

   The reasons for these disparities between the enterprises are: 

   1.  Traditional modes of thinking remain strong in the western- 
central provinces.  The thinking on rural enterprise development 
remains at the stage of using local resources, and processing and 
selling goods locally.  Industrial development is thought to be an 
urban affair beyond the peasants ability to manage.  When selecting 
projects the inhabitants of the central-western provinces tend to 
stick to the old ways, and do things simply with a minimal amount of 
resources.  Leadership and coordination are weak.  Especially in the 
last few years, many cadre who are old, weak, sick, or disabled have 
occupied leading positions in the central-western rural enterprises. 

   2.  The natural environment limits rural enterprise development. 
Central-western regions consist of plateaus, mountains, gullys, and 
basins.  As a result, highway, railroad, aviation, and communication 
construction tends to be slow, and facilities are backward. 

   3.  There is a shortage of talent, and this results in the 
technical content of products being low.  For example, 1,480,000 
employees of rural enterprises in Hubei have only a junior middle 
school education, 480,000 employees have a high school education, 
and just 5,300 employees have a college education, accounting for 
73.19 percent, 23.76 percent, and 0.26 percent respectively of all 
employees.  It is difficult for employees with low educational 
levels to understand advanced technical products.  They can only 
produce low-grade products that have a small market.  In 1992 the 
value of Hubei rural enterprise exports was 1.342 billion yuan, 
Sichuan 1.140 billion yuan, Guizhou 97,830,000 yuan, Yunnan 
159,870,000 yuan, Gansu 106 million yuan, accounting for 2.94 
percent, 1.2 percent, 1.28 percent, 1.49 percent, and 0.96 percent 
respectively of gross output value of rural enterprises.  In 
Shandong rural enterprises the export value accounted for 4.25 
percent of gross output value, Jiangsu 13.32 percent, Zhejiang 10.66 
percent, Fujian 17.02 percent, and Guangdong 7.33 percent. 

   4.  Insufficient funds restrict central-western rural enterprise 
development.  According to 1990 statistics, construction projects in 
the central-western regions totaled just 7,895, while there were 
37,836 in the eastern coastal regions.  Investment in the central- 
western regions was 1,515,210,000 yuan compared to 11,504,360,000 
yuan in the coastal regions. 

   To reduce these disparities, east-west cooperation must be 
improved.  Central-western regions have abundant natural resources, 
minerals, raw materials, energy, and labor.  If combined with the 
technology, talent and funds in the east, the superior central- 
western resources can be transformed into product superiority.  The 
State Council must adapt measures to support development of central- 
western rural enterprises.  Local governments simply lack the 
necessary funds to make substantial changes within three to five 
years. (Chongqing XINAN JINGJI RIBAO 25 Feb 94 p 3) 

   Bank of China Registers Increase in Renminbi Savings Deposits - 
Following an increase of nearly 4 billion yuan in January, the Bank 
of China's renminbi savings deposits increased by 8.32 billion yuan 
in February, 2.3 times higher than the same period last year.  In 
the short span of two months, the net increase of renminbi savings 
deposits at the Bank of China was over 12 billion yuan, 4.66 billion 
yuan higher than the same period last year.  The total balance of 
savings deposits is now more than 120 billion yuan.  (Beijing 
ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 0630 GMT 17 Mar 94) 

   Official Says New Tax Laws Discourage Taiwan Investment - 
According to Ting Chieh-en, president of the Hong Kong-Taiwan Trade 
Promotion Association, most of the new investment projects set up in 
mainland China by Taiwanese businessmen in recent years have been 
affected by the new tax system introduced in the mainland and 
investment enthusiasm has dropped.  He also stated that Taiwanese 
businessmen will take a wait-and-see attitude toward their mainland 
investment projects, at least in the first half of this year.  (Hong 
Kong ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE 1005 GMT 14 Mar 94) 

   Guangzhou To Build International Airport, Invites Foreign 
Investment - Guangzhou has announced plans to build a new 
international airport to replace the outdated and overcrowded Baiyun 
Airport and has said that it will allow heavy foreign participation 
in the project.  The authorities have estimated that 10 billion 
renminbi will be required for the project, of which 60 to 70 percent 
will come from foreign sources.  A company will be set up to build 
the airport and will be listed on either the Shenzhen or Shanghai 
stock markets, which are China's two official stock markets. 
Approximately 10,000 rural residents now occupy the proposed site in 
Huadu, and farmers will be compensated for the land used to build 
the airport and will be given an opportunity to buy shares in the 
airport company.  Construction of the new airport will begin later 
this year and will be completed in 1996.  The airport will have four 
runways and a multi-purpose airport complex zone.  It will be linked 
to the Guangzhou metropolitan area, which lies 28 km to the south, 
by three highways and an electric railway.  Guangzhou Mayor Li Ziliu 
said that the new airport is not intended to compete with Hong 
Kong's Chek Lap Kok Airport, due to be completed in 1997.  After the 
new airport is built, Baiyun Airport will be made into a commercial 
exhibition center.  (Hong Kong EASTERN EXPRESS 25 Mar 94 p 8) 

   Guangzhou To Sell State Enterprises to Foreigners - On 10 March, 
Guangzhou Vice Mayors Chen Kaizhi and Wu Liang announced at a news 
conference that the city will stop giving loans to money-losing 
state enterprises but will "concede the market, profits, and shares" 
to foreign businessmen.  Be it a new enterprise, a profit-making 
enterprise, or an old enterprise in good condition, they said, 
shares must be offered to foreigners, who are even welcome to buy an 
entire factory.  Some tertiary industries, commercial businesses, 
retail shops, food services, tunnels, and bridges must also be sold 
in a planned and controlled manner.  Vice Mayor Wu said that the 
money raised by selling shares will be diverted to urgent 
construction projects in Guangzhou, such as the subway and road 
construction projects.  (Hong Kong TA KUNG PAO 10 Mar 94 p 7) 

   Guangdong To Invest 630 Mi1lion Yuan To Develop Port Projects - 
Guangdong plans to invest 630 million yuan to develop 11 key port 
projects this year, including the new Gongbei Immigration and Custom 
Building in Zhuhai, the Yangjiang port, the Nanao port, the second 
phase of the enlargement project in Wenjindu, Shenzhen, the second 
phase of the Huanggang Port living quarters project, the Meilin and 
Tongle checkpoints, and the immigration and customs facilities of 
Qingyuan, Heyuan, and Huizhou.  (Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 0758 
GMT 12 Mar 94) 

   Guangdong To Invest 12 Billion Yuan in Transportation - Li Peiwu, 
director of the Guangdong Transportation Department, announced on 10 
March that the province will spend 12 billion yuan on transportation 
projects this year.  The money will be used to build 140 km of 
expressways, 1,300 km of second-class roads, 3,000 km of county 
roads, and 27 vehicle stations, as well as the 23 berths which are 
already under construction.  Among the key projects are Humen 
Bridge, Shantou Bay Bridge, Zhuhai's Qiao Bridge, Shenzhen-Shantou 
Expressway, Guangzhou-Zhuhai East Expressway, the Dali-Sanshui 
Section of State Expressway 321, and the navigational channel 
reaching out to sea from Yamen. (Hong Kong TA KUNG PAO 10 Mar 94 p 
7) 

   Hainan's Yuangpu Port Planning Major Expansion - The Hainan 
Provincial Government is planning to invest in Yangpu Port in the 
Yangpu Economic Development Zone to expand its shipping capacity. 
The port currently has two deep-water berths with an annual handling 
capacity of 1 million tons.  The expansion plans call for building 
three more deep-water berths, two with a 200,0O0-ton capacity, and 
adapting the wharf to accommodate containers.  Last year, Yangpu 
Port handled 510,000 tons of cargo, which is expected to increase to 
2.8 mil1ion tons after the expansion project is completed next year 
and reach 6 million by the year 2000.  The project will cost 
approximately 588 million yuan ($68 million).  (Beijing CHINA DAILY 
(BUSINESS WEEKLY) 27 Mar-2 Apr p 5) 

   Fujian Aquatic Products Industry Reports Rising Growth - Since 
1991, the average annual growth of the output of the aquatic 
products industry of Fujian Province has been nearly 20 percent. 
Last year this industry reaped another bumper harvest, with a total 
output volume of more than 1.9 million tons.  Fujian's per-capita 
aquatic products possession volume has reached 60.5 kg.  Fujian has 
a total of 52,000 sea water net cages for breeding more than 10 
kinds of fish, including porgy, garoupa, yellow croaker, perch, 
b1ack porgy, and yellowtail.  The province has more than 20,000 mu 
of breeding bases for bullfrogs, soft-shelled turtle, and hairy 
crabs.  The annual output value of these products exceeds 3 billion 
yuan.  (Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 0630 GMT 17 Mar 94) 

   There are also 330 foreign-funded enterprises in Fujian's aquatic 
products industry, with a total investment of $250 million, of which 
$200 million is foreign capital.  Over one third of all these 
enterprises are funded by Taiwan investors.  Fujian has obtained 
World Bank loans worth more than $100 million for building export 
aquatic products bases.  The province has become China's biggest 
producer of eels and prawns.  The provincial authorities are 
encouraging foreign investors to invest in the province's fisheries, 
especially in the development of shallow waters and tidal areas, 
deep-sea fishing, and large fishery infrastructure projects. 
(Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 1150 GMT 23 Mar 94) 

   Shandong's Retail Sales Grow Rapidly - According to the Shandong 
authorities, as of the end of 1993, there were 30 retail shops with 
sales exceeding 1 billion yuan each and 90 wholesale and open 
markets with transaction volumes exceeding 1 billion yuan each.  The 
30 retail shops' total sales were 5.94 billion yuan, representing 6 
percent of Shandong's total retail sales.  The 90 open markets' 
total transaction volume was 27.75 billion yuan, representing 28 
percent of the province's total retail sales.  (Beijing ZHONGGUO 
XINWEN SHE 0644 GMT 29 Mar 94) 

   Shenzhen Invests in Tourist Industry - In 1979, Shenzhen received 
1,000 overseas tourists; by 1992 the figure had skyrocketed to more 
than 2.2 million, more than any other tourist city in China. 
Tourism earned Shenzhen 2.1 billion yuan ($241 million) in foreign 
currency.  Tourism generated 3.8 billion yuan ($437 million), 17 
percent of the city's service business.  Tourist enterprises have 
fixed assets worth over 7 billion yuan ($805 million) and employ 
over 70,000 people.  The city is planning further investment in 
tourist facilities and new attractions, and, by the turn of the 
century, the city's target figure for overseas tourists will top 6.5 
million, representing an annual increase of 10 percent.  The 
authorities forecast foreign currency earnings from tourism of $1 
billion, an annual growth rate of 15 percent.  The city plans to 
finance its plans with foreign investment, which has accounted for 
25 percent of Shenzhen's total investment in tourism over the past 
12 years.  (Beijing CHINA DAILY (BUSINESS WEEKLY) 27 Mar-2 Apr 94 p 
5) 

   Foreign Trade and Investment - Cross-Strait Computer Industry 
Cooperation Thrives -- The hottest area for cross-Strait commercial 
cooperation so far is the computer field.  Cooperation has now been 
taking place for over two years and lately has garnered the most 
business attention and consumer interest.  In 1994, Taiwan and China 
will jointly develop Chinese language software on a full scale. 
In early January, representatives from the two sides met in 
Beijing to discuss the Chinese DOS operating system's application 
interface.  They reached some common understanding and decided to 
set up a standing committee whose purpose would be to unify the 
cross-Strait Chinese computer industries.  In late January, over a 
hundred people from both sides of the Strait participated in a 
second meeting in Beijing, exchanging information and discussing 
marketing strategies and how best to develop software and its 
applications. 

   Even more Taiwan-China computer programs are in the offing, 
either in the planning stage or in the course of development. 
Taiwan has already approved a new plan in which Acer Computers, 
whose computers are currently selling well in Taiwan, and Tai Ta 
Electronics will invest $510,000 and $4.9 million respectively in 
China.  Taiwan's Ta Chong computers continues to attract attention 
due to its superiority in computer modeling involving the fields of 
education, coal industry, light industry, meteorology, scientific 
research, agriculture, and physical education. 

   Taiwan's computer industry has recently expanded its market by 
investing in Beijing, Shanghai, Guangdong, Jiangsu and other cities. 
The intention is to eventually achieve full-scale cooperation with 
China so that the Chinese market will be dominated by indigenously 
produced computers.  That would change the current landscape in 
which giant foreign computer companies, such as Apple, Compaq, and 
IBM, dominate. 

   The idea of the cross-Strait computer software cooperation is 
reportedly to take advantage of the Chinese character software 
market that offers economies of scale and for China to take the 
leading role in the International Software Organization that 
establishes Chinese software standards.   The task of the moment 
facing both Taiwan and China is to set up cross-Strait information 
exchanges and communication standards, to further develop exchanges 
on the form in which the characters will be written, to standardize 
terminology, and to establish shareware scales and standards.  Both 
sides consider cooperation projects involving electronic financial 
systems, multilingual machine translation systems, multimedia 
technology, and applications as a priority.  (Shenzhen SHENZHEN TEQU 
BAO 1 Feb 94 p 5) 

   PRC, Vietnam Planning To Build Joint Border Economic Zone - Local 
officials recently indicated that China and Vietnam are planning to 
build a cross-border city at Dongxing in Guangxi, China and Mong Cai 
in Quang Ninh, Vietnam.  Most Dongxing residents speak Vietnamese 
and most Mong Cai residents speak Cantonese.  The Vietnamese 
Government will declare Mong Cai a free trade zone by the end of 
this year and will pour a huge amount of money into the zone to 
develop trade, tourism, and processing industries.  The Chinese 
Government declared Dongxing an open border town in 1992 and granted 
it many preferential policies.  The local Dongxing and Mong Cai 
governments are planning to hold a cross-border trade fair from 25 
April to 10 May.  Experts have also been invited to discuss the 
feasibility of building "a city administered by two countries." 
(Hong Kong WEN WEI PO 17 Mar 94 p A5) 

   Shanghai To Expand Opportunities for Foreign Investment - In 
order to attract more foreign investment, Shanghai plans to open ten 
major projects to foreign investors for construction and operation, 
including the Jinshan Power Plant, the Waigaoqiao Power Plant, the 
eighth-phase work on a heat and power plant, a second-phase railway 
project, the second international airport in Pudong, the Hongqiao 
Airport expansion, and the Sanlin Bridge. 

   This year's policy on the use of foreign capital will cover five 
points:  1. The industrial adjustment will take place with some 
major industrial items as the driving force.  Flexible measures will 
be adopted to deal with investment by multinational companies and 
technology in exchange for being allowed into the market and the 
setting up of shareholding companies.  2. The share by foreign 
investment in tertiary industry will be increased.  3. Foreign 
capital will be sought for construction of basic facilities in the 
urban area.  4. Administration of foreign investment will be 
properly handled in order to earn foreign exchange from exports.  5. 
Steps, including holding trade exhibitions will be taken in a bid to 
attract more foreign capital.  (Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 1132 GMT 
23 Mar 94) 

   Tianjin Establishes Foreign-Funded Enterprises - Since the 
beginning of 1994, enterprises under the Tianjin Municipal First 
Commercial Bureau have received investments totalling $112 million 
from both domestic and foreign firms.  Of these investments, $60.64 
million came from foreign firms.  With the foreign capital, these 
enterprises have established 25 foreign-funded enterprises engaging 
in real estate development, the processing industry, the catering 
industry, and the recreation business.  (Tianjin City Radio 1000 GMT 
18 Mar 94) 

   Enterprises in Fujian's ROK-Sponsored Industrial Zone Begin 
Operation - The Jinjiang Donghaian Industrial Development Zone has 
taken shape with 17 enterprises, capable of generating 300 million 
yuan in total annual output value, already operating in the zone. 
The developer, the ROK Jinjiang Jintian Construction Company 
Limited, invested over 80 million yuan in infrastructure 
construction, equipping Donghaian with a major water, drainage, and 
sewage system, a power transmission-transformation station, and a 
program-controlled telephone system.  The 17 enterprises in the area 
are from Hong Kong, Macao, ROK, the Philippines, Australia, Britain, 
and some regions in China, including Heilongjiang and Shandong. 
Total investment is over $170 million.  Two garment companies began 
exporting their products to East Europe and South Africa last year. 
The developer plans to conduct a series of activities in the ROK, 
Australia, and Southeast Asia this year to attract more investment. 
(Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 0805 GMT 25 Mar 94) 

   ROK's Samsung Group's China Trade To Increase in 1994 - The ROK 
electronics giant Samsung's total turnover is expected to reach $60 
billion in 1994, of which 2 percent comes from Hong Kong and Chinese 
markets.  The general manager of Samsung's Hong Kong office has 
predicted that the company's volume of business in the Chinese 
market will increase at an annual rate of 20 percent, at least in 
part thanks to the more stable exchange system that has resulted 
from the unification of the renminbi's exchange rates.  Current 
problems in this trade include obstacles to sales and circulation, 
such as the relatively high cost of transport.  (Hong Kong MING PAO 
16 Mar 94 p B2) 

   PRC, ROK To Jointly Build Large Oil Refinery in Shenzhen - ROK's 
Sunkyong Group will join the China National Petrochemical 
Corporation and the Shenzhen City Government in building an oil 
refinery in Shenzhen with a daily output of 100,000 barrels.  The 
three partners will make a joint investment of $1.5 billion, with 
the Sunkyong Group contributing 40 percent, 30 percent, and its two 
Chinese partners each contributing 30 percent.  (Hong Kong WEN WEI 
PO 13 Mar 94 p A2) 

   South Korean Electronics Firm To Produce TV Parts, VCR's - 
Goldstar, the South Korean electronics giant, signed a $19.5 million 
contract to produce VCR's and video cameras with the Shanghai Tape 
Recording Equipment Factory on 25 March.  The joint venture will 
lease 2,500 square meters of land in the Pudong Jinqiao Foreign 
Trade Processing Zone for the construction of its workshop, which is 
expected to take one and a half years.  Prior to the project's 
completion, the venture will rent workshop space in Pudong.  The 
factory's annual production capacity will be 300,000 VCR's and video 
cameras, of which 70 percent will be exported. 

   Goldstar also signed a contract with the Shuguang Electron 
Corporation in Hunan Province for a $140 million project to produce 
color television picture tubes and electron guns on 24 March in 
Beijing.  Goldstar will supply 51 percent of the capital for the 
joint venture.  The construction of the television parts plant will 
begin in Changsha in May.  When finished in 1996, the plant will 
have an annual production capacity of 8.5 million television picture 
tubes.  Half will be for the domestic market and the rest will be 
exported to southeast Asian countries and South Korea. 

   Goldstar plans to expand its production capacity as demand rises 
among Chinese consumers.  According to Goldstar's Beijing office, 
"The company will be setting up more joint ventures here, lured by 
the country's quality workforce and cheap labor costs."  (Beijing 
CHINA DAILY 26 Mar 94 p 2) 

   South Korean Company To Build Two Power Plants in Henan Province 
- The Dong-Ah Construction Industrial Co. of South Korea has been 
awarded contracts to build two power plants in Henan Province which 
will have a total capacity of over 300 megawatts.  The company will 
provide financing and will handle construction of the power plants 
at two different locations in the city of Xinxiang.  The firm signed 
agreements in Beijing last week with the Alanco Environmental 
Resources Corporation of the United States, the Xinxiang Heating 
Company of Henan, and several other Chinese firms.  Alanco will 
provide equipment and technology to remove particulates and sulphur 
dioxide, two major pollutants in the PRC.  (Beijing CHINA DAILY 29 
Mar 94 p 2)  The first phase of the project will require an 
investment of $25 million.  Construction will begin this summer and 
is scheduled to be completed in 1996.  (Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 
0644 GMT 29 Mar 94) 

   South Korea Signs Telecommunications Joint Venture in Beijing - 
The Beijing Telecommunications Administration and the Kohap Group 
announced the formation of the Beijing-Kohap Integrated 
Telecommunications Equipment Company Limited, a new- and high- 
technology project, at a ceremony in Beijing on 28 March.  Each side 
has a 50 percent stake in the initial investment of $2.1 million. 
The project will introduce digital data over voice technology from 
the U.S. Integrated Network Corporation to produce universal data 
voice multiplexing (UDVM) equipment.  By installing UDVM equipment 
on a public telephone line, phone users will have easy access to 
public or private digital data networks such as Chinapac, the 
national public packet-switching data network.  The ceremony was 
attended by the ROK ministers of telecommunications, commerce and 
industry, and science and technology as well as Tian Jiyun, vice 
chairman of the National People's Congress, Beijing Vice Mayor Zhang 
Baifa, and Telecommunications Vice Minister Yang Xianzu.  (Beijing 
CHINA DAILY 29 Mar 94 p 2) 

   Israel To Set Up Aircraft Repair Joint Venture - The Israel-based 
RADA Electronics Industries Ltd. has signed a $13 million contract 
to set up an aircraft repair joint venture with the Beijing Tianzhu 
Forestry Development Company.  Under the deal, the Beijing TIRA 
Aircraft Components Services Co. Ltd. will supply the venture with 
spare parts, which currently must be ordered from abroad.  The joint 
venture will cover 4,600 square meters near Beijing's Capital 
Airport.  RADA will hold 80 percent of the investment, and the 
Beijing Tianzhu Forestry Development Company will hold the rest. 
The term of cooperation has been set at 30 years, and the venture is 
expected to go into operation next October.  The company is 
expecting a business volume of $10-15 million a year during the 
first three years of operations, after which the volume of sales may 
reach as much as $70-75 million annually.  The company will import 
aircraft components and smart cats automatic testing equipment from 
RADA's U.S. branch, which will be used primarily for testing and 
maintaining plane avionics.  (Beijing CHINA DAILY 21 Mar 94 p 2) 

   Sino-French Joint Venture Launched in Automobile Industry - The 
Sanjiang Renault Automobile Corporation, the largest joint venture 
launched in China's space industry, officially began operations on 
21 March.  The joint venture was established by China's Sanjiang 
Astronautics Industry Group and France's Renault Automobile Company 
with an initial investment of $100 million, of which Sanjiang 
contributed 55 percent.  The joint venture plans to produce 40,000 
luxury eight-seater vans in its first year, and annual output will 
increase to 165,000 by the year 2000.  (Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 
1312 GMT 21 Mar 94) 

   Italian Banking Group To Provide $75 Million in Export Credit 
Loans - The Industrial and Commercial Bank of China has signed an 
agreement with an Italian banking group for $75 million in export 
credit loans.  The three-member syndicate is led by the Crediop Bank 
of Italy and the 13-year loan will be used to support Chinese 
enterprises importing equipment and technology from that country. 
The loan is part of the bank's plan to strengthen cooperation with 
foreign banks in promoting foreign trade between Chinese and 
overseas enterprises in 1994.  The bank is trying to raise more 
foreign currency to finance China's development through medium-and 
long-term loans from foreign governments, overseas commercial banks, 
the World Bank, and the Asian Development Bank.  (Beijing CHINA 
DAILY 25 Mar 94 p 2) 

   Singapore Joint Venture To Produce Cigarette Paper in Hangzhou - 
The Singapore Overseas Development Company Ltd. and the Hangzhou 
Huafeng Paper Mill have established a $53 million joint venture with 
registered capital of $24.5 million.  The Hangzhou firm will provide 
35 percent of the total investment in the form of equipment and 
factory buildings, and the Singapore company will provide the 
balance in cash.  The Huafeng Paper Mill's main product is cigarette 
paper.  The joint venture plans to use French technology and 
equipment to raise annual output from 10,000 tons last year to 
15,000 tons next year, 10 percent of which will be sold overseas. 
(Beijing CHINA DAILY (BUSINESS WEEKLY) 27 Mar-2 Apr 94 p 2) 
   CITIC's Plans To Jointly Develop Zhejiang's Daxie Island - The 
China International Trade Investment Corporation's (CITIC) Daxie 
Development Company, will found the Xinde Company, a joint-venture 
with the United States' Packard Engineering Company in May this 
year.  This company will be responsible for project and investment 
management for Daxie Island, which is situated in Hangzhou Bay, east 
of Ningbo City in Zhejiang Province.  The two parent companies will 
share equally the capital stock.  This year, CITIC will invest 400 
million yuan in the island's development, which includes 
establishing a fixed crossing, a water and power supply systems, and 
a beltway and dismantling the existing facilities. 

   An $80 million project between CITIC and Greece's Athena Company 
is expected to get under way in October this year and will produce a 
bridge, a four-star hotel, and a 20,000- to 50,000-ton capacity 
pier.  CITIC will hold 30 percent of the shares.  CITIC plans to 
invest a total of 20 billion yuan over a 15-year period to develop 
the island into a large international port and foreign-oriented 
economic zone with a 41-berth container terminal, general cargo 
terminal, and oil terminal.  CITIC is now looking for partners in 
high- and new-technology projects, warehousing, transportation, 
processing, and banking and has made initial contacts with America's 
Caltex and Singapore's Esso.  (Hong Kong TA KUNG PAO 22 Mar 94 p 5) 

   Asian Investment Group Raises Funds To Invest in Auto Parts 
Industry - The Asian Strategic Investment Company (ASIMCO), formed 
by the Pacific Associated Group and two American financial 
institutions, Dean Witter and TCW, announced on 20 March that the 
company has raised $160 million for direct investment in China's 
auto parts industry.  So far, ASIMCO has chosen over 40 partners for 
cooperation, some of whom are promising manufacturers of pistons, 
clutches, gears, ignition coils, instruments, and starter motors. 
ASIMCO will invest over $160 million in 12 to 15 of China's auto 
parts factories over the coming six months and plans to invest 
another $1 billion over the next two years.  (Hong Kong TA KUNG PAO 
21 Mar 94 p 7) 

   Jiangsu's Nantong Port Becomes Major Import-Export Port - Last 
year, Nantong Port in Jiangsu handled over 13 million tonnes of 
freight, 15 percent more than the previous year.  A total of 46,500 
standard import and export containers passed through the port, 54.8 
percent higher than the previous year.  The port has become a major 
port for importing and exporting materials for the Changjiang 
valley. 

   In 1993, Nantong Port made great efforts in capital construction. 
The second phase construction project of the Langshan Port Area, 
involving a total investment of 250 million yuan, was completed. 
Three coal wharves with a capacity of over 10,000 tonnes each were 
put into operation, and six 2,000-ton berths were built on the Chang 
Jiang to serve these wharves, increasing their handling capacity by 
8.4 million tons.  In addition, 200 million yuan was invested in the 
construction of a container wharf and a multi-purpose wharf.  At the 
same time, 200 mu of land was allocated for a construction project 
funded by the Chinese side and the Hong Kong Henderson financial 
group to build a container transit center and a bonded warehouse to 
provide import and export services. 

   The Nantong Port currently has complete customs, industrial, and 
commercial offices, a foreign affairs office, a port administration 
authority, and other port management offices.  In the near future, 
the port's computer network, which handles most administrative 
tasks, will be linked with ports in other countries.  (Beijing 
ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 0630 GMT 17 Mar 94) 

   Liaoning Attracted More Foreign Capital - Shenyang city in 
Liaoning Province has made a new breakthrough in utilizing foreign 
capital.  The number of new foreign-funded enterprises in 1993 
increased by 100 percent over the total for the past 10 years.  The 
city approved more than 1,120 projects utilizing foreign capital in 
1993, showing an increase of 60 percent over 1992, and about 60 
percent of the investments came from foreign firms.  Four ROK 
companies have invested more than $5 million in establishing plants 
in Shenyang, three of which have already begun production and have 
exported $5.65 million worth of products.  (Shenyang Liaoning Radio 
1000 GMT 28 Mar 94) 

   Taiwan:  Planning Council Says Annual Per-Capita Output Value 
Increases - The Council for Economic Planning and Development under 
the Ministry of Economic Affairs pointed out on 11 March that the 
annual per-capita output value of Taiwan's manufacturing industry 
has risen to NT$2.197 million ($84,500) from NT$1.416 million 
($54,460) in 1989, indicating that manufacturers have switched from 
the development of labor-intensive industries to technology- 
intensive ones.  (Taipei CHING CHI JIH PA0 12 Mar 94 p 2) 

   Executive Yuan Says Economy To Grow by 6.32 Percent This Year - 
Taiwan's economy is expected to grow 6.32 percent this year, the 
Executive Yuan told lawmakers at a meeting on 10 March.  According 
to the Executive Yuan, Taiwan ranked 20th in the world in 1993 with 
a GNP of $220.2 billion, while per-capita income was $10,566, 
ranking 25th.  Fueled by the upturn in the world economy, Taiwan's 
economic growth rate may reach 6.32 percent this year, higher than 
last year's rate of 5.74 percent.  (Taipei CHING CHI JIH PAO 11 Mar 
94 p 2) 

   Trade Board Says Benefits of GATT Entry Would Outweigh Losses - 
The Board of Foreign Trade has released a report on the effects of 
GATT entry on Taiwan's manufacturing industry.  According to the 
report, if tariffs are lowered by 10 percent, Taiwan's manufacturing 
industry will suffer a loss of NT$3.1 billion ($120 million), but 
the country's consumers will benefit by as much as NT$4.7 billion 
($180 million).  The board said that, with the exception of 
household appliances and automobiles, the economic benefits from 
Taiwan's GATT entry will outweigh economic losses.  (Taipei CHING 
CHI JIH PAO 10 Mar 94 p 2) 

   Directorate Announces Figures on Imports of Technology - The 
Directorate General of Budget, Accounting, and Statistics under the 
Executive Yuan said on 16 March that Taiwan's technological imports 
amounted to only $520 million in 1991, lower than South Korea's 
$1.18 billion, and far below the figures of other countries like the 
United States, Germany, and Japan.  The directorate noted that 
unwillingness by Taiwan manufacturers to import high technology will 
affect the pace of technological upgrading on the island.  (Taipei 
CHING CHI JIH PAO 17 Mar 94 p 2) 

   Ministry Draws Up Plan To Strengthen Economic Work in Southeast 
Asia - The Ministry of Economic Affairs and other relevant units 
have drawn up an outline to strengthen economic work in the 
Southeast Asian countries of the Philippines, Thailand, Malaysia, 
Indonesia, Singapore, Brunei, Vietnam, Laos, Cambodia, and Burma. 
The outline calls for actively expanding two-way trade and 
technological cooperation with Southeast Asian countries, helping 
Taiwan businesses to find production and marketing centers in the 
Southeast Asian region and expand economic activities there in order 
to reduce investment and trade overdependence on the PRC, enhancing 
Taiwan's relations with Southeast Asian countries, and striving to 
participate in the activities of economic organizations in the 
Southeast Asian region.  (Taipei CHING CHI JIH PAO 12 Mar 94 p 2) 

   Taipei's Exports to PRC Valued at $12.8 Billion in 1993 - 
According to statistics released by the Board of Foreign Trade, 
Taiwan's 1993 export value to the PRC totaled $12.8 billion, 
comprising 14.88 percent of the total export value--a sharp increase 
from 7.71-percent share in 1992.  This is the first time that Taiwan 
has included the value of cargo and goods transiting Hong Kong in 
its figures on exports to the PRC; hence the drastic increase in the 
export value to $12.8 billion, which is very close to the $12.9 
billion figure given by the PRC.  Economics Minister Chiang Ping-kun 
said that most exports to the PRC were capital goods such as raw 
materials and machinery.  (Taipei CHING CHI JIH PAO 18 Mar 94 p 2) 

   Taipei Lifts Ban on Textile Investments in PRC - The Industrial 
Development Bureau has initially decided to allow indirect 
investment in restricted textile items in the PRC.  The ban on 325 
textile items--including wool, cotton yarn, and cotton cloth made of 
synthetic fibers--will be lifted.  At the same time, indirect 
imports of most garment items will be allowed.  (Taipei CHING CHI 
JIH PAO 16 Mar 94 p 6) 

   Petroleum Company Plans To Build Industrial Zones in Indonesia, 
SRV - In response to the government's "southbound policy," the China 
Petroleum Corporation is considering moving its facilities overseas 
by building a petrochemical industrial zone in Indonesia and 
Vietnam, thus establishing a trade network there to help Taiwan 
businesses move into Southeast Asia.  Earlier this year, the company 
signed a $1.3 billion contract with Vietnam to build an oil refinery 
there.  (Taipei CHING CHI JIH PAO 21 Mar 94 p 6) 

Finance Minister Views Taxes, Investment With Indonesian Counterpart 
- Finance Minister Lin Chen-kuo held talks with his Indonesian 
counterpart Muhammad in Honolulu on 17 March.  During their talks, 
Indonesia promised to allow the establishment of Taiwan-invested 
banks, while Taiwan pledged to help promote Indonesian goods in 
Taiwan.  Lin Chen-kuo told Muhammad that Taiwanese enterprises had 
invested $4 billion in Indonesia.  Lin also said that if a treaty of 
mutual income tax exemption could be signed, more Taiwanese 
businesses would invest in Indonesia; Muhammad shared the same view. 
The second round of Taiwan-Indonesia negotiations on mutual 
exemption of income tax is slated for 8 April.  (Taipei CHING CHI 
JIH PAO 19 Mar 94 p 1) 

   Cabinet Views Cooperation With Thailand, Indonesia, the 
Philippines - Premier Lien Chan held a meeting on 9 March with Vice 
Premier Hsu Li-teh, Economic Minister Chiang Ping-kun, Foreign 
Minister Chien Fu, and other cabinet members to discuss proposals 
made during President Li Teng-hui's visits to Thailand, Indonesia, 
and the Philippines for cooperation and investment with these 
countries.  Programs considered included land development, 
agricultural cooperation, occupational training, the establishment 
of a Chinese school in Thailand, and investment in the 
petrochemical, sugar refining, and pharmaceutical industries. 
Taiwan will also seek to sign investment guarantee agreements with 
the three countries.  Premier Lien ordered the Research, 
Development, and Evaluation Commission to follow up on the 
implementation of these programs and present their findings to the 
president within three months.  (Taipei CHING CHI JIH PAO 10 Mar 94 
p 1) 

   Economic Minister Holds Forum With Electric Appliance Makers - At 
a forum with members of the Taiwan Electric Appliance Manufacturing 
Association on 16 March, Economic Minister Chiang Ping-kun confirmed 
that the division of work between industries on the two sides of the 
Taiwan Strait is conducive to increasing the competitiveness of 
Taiwanese goods. He promised to allow imports of more semi- 
manufactured goods and component parts from the PRC and to ease 
restrictions on visits by PRC businessmen.  Responding to 
suggestions for allowing direct cross-strait cargo shipments and 
setting up a cross-strait free trade zone, Chiang noted that the 
Ministry of Economic Affairs had drafted a program on shipping 
services between designated points on the two sides, but for 
political reasons it is not likely to be realized in the near 
future.  (Taipei CHING CHI JIH PA0 17 Mar 94 p 12) 

   SOUTH KOREA:  FEATURE:  Increased ROK Trade, Investment in 
Vietnam Reported - SUMMARY:  Recent articles in the Vietnamese and 
South Korean press report on the development of and prospects for 
ROK trade and investment with Vietnam.  The Vietnamese sources point 
out that South Korea has "aggressively" increased its trade and 
investment in Vietnam in the past five years, more than doubling its 
investment there.  The South Korean press comments that the recent 
lifting of the U.S. trade embargo against Vietnam will remove 
barriers that have limited bilateral trade, allowing ROK investment 
to become even more "lively."  Both the Vietnamese and the ROK press 
list some of the current and future ROK projects in Vietnam. 

   Several articles in a special December 1993 issue of the Hanoi 
THOI BAO KINH TE VIETNAM reported an "explosion" of ROK trade and 
investment in Vietnam in recent years.  The paper noted that trade 
between the two countries increased 20-fold between 1988 ($23 
million) and 1992 ($500 million), and reached approximately $800 
million in 1993.  ROK investment increased from 17 licensed projects 
capitalized at $150 million five years ago, to 47 operating projects 
capitalized at $402.7 million in December 1993, making South Korea 
the fourth largest foreign investor in Vietnam.  The paper pointed 
out that 32 projects capitalized at $328 million were licensed in 
the first 11 months of 1993 alone.  The 23 February Seoul CHUGAN 
MAEGYONG cited data showing that in 1993, ROK firms received 
permission to invest in 57 projects in Vietnam worth a total of 
$201.939 million.  (Projects with planned investments of $1 million 
or more are listed below.)  The amount of investment realized in 
1993 totaled $43.563 million and involved 23 projects, according to 
CHUGAN MAEGYONG. 

   CHUGAN MAEGYONG explained that until recently, considerations of 
ROK-U.S. ties and Washington's continued trade embargo against 
Vietnam limited ROK business efforts there.  In addition, a shortage 
of foreign exchange acted as an "immense stumbling block" to foreign 
investment in Vietnam.  The lifting of the trade embargo removed 
these barriers and CHUGAN MAEGYONG surmised that ROK investment in 
the SRV will now begin in earnest. 

   In addition, South Korea's Ministry of Trade, Industry, and 
Energy (MOTIE) expects developmental financial aid to Vietnam from 
advanced countries and international financial institutions to 
increase now that the embargo has ended.  CHUGAN MAEGYONG noted that 
the International Monetary Fund has granted Vietnam $1.86 billion in 
loans, while the International Bank for Reconstruction and 
Development has granted $1.7 billion, the Asia Development Bank $1.5 
billion, and Japan $500 million.  THOI BAO KINH TE VIETNAM reported 
that South Korea has given Vietnam $2 million in aid, and recently 
awarded $50 million in low interest loans from its Economic 
Development Cooperation Fund.  CHUGAN MAEGYONG quoted a MOTIE source 
who sees great potential for ROK firms to participate in large-scale 
infrastructure projects or resource development in Vietnam and for 
special procurement projects.  It also pointed out that, if the 
United States extends most-favored nation treatment to Vietnam, ROK 
light industry could invest locally and use Vietnam for "roundabout 
exports" to the United States.  To facilitate trade and investment, 
the ROK Government intends to sign a double taxation avoidance 
agreement with Vietnam in April.  The government will also begin 
executing the initial stage of its promised $50-million loan. 

   ROK firms have already been actively investing in Vietnam, 
according to both Vietnamese and ROK press reports.  THOI BAO KINH 
TE VIETNAM commented that more than 40 ROK firms have established 
offices in Vietnam.  The four leading ROK conglomerates--Hyundai, 
Samsung, Goldstar, and Daewoo--are "strongly active" in industries 
such as metallurgy, engineering, electronics, and construction.  The 
top six ROK investors are Daewoo, with six projects capitalized at 
$247.6 million; Seyoung International, with three projects 
capitalized at $42 million; Posco (Pohang Iron and Steel Co. Ltd.), 
with two projects capitalized at $13.3 million; Pangrim Ltd., with 
projects capitalized at $12.6 million; Hyosan Development, with a 
project capitalized at $12 million; and the Korea First Bank, whose 
Vietnam operations are capitalized at $10 million.  The paper noted 
that ROK investment projects include 35 in industry, four in heavy 
industry, three in tourism and hotel services, and the remainder in 
the services, marine products, agriculture, banking, communications, 
transportation, and postal services sectors. 

   ROK firms also have big plans for the future.  CHUGAN MAEGYONG 
reported that Hyundai plans to build a $100-million container 
factory and a $300-million power plant, and participate in 
infrastructure projects.  Samsung plans to set up four industrial 
complexes near Hanoi and Haiphong; is building plants to produce 
petrochemicals, textiles, and daily necessities; and will 
participate in infrastructure projects.  THOI BAO KINH TE VIETNAM 
further reported that Samsung's planned four industrial groups will 
be capitalized at $10 billion over the next 10 years.  They will 
include an electronics project in Hanoi, shipbuilding in Haiphong, 
and an industrial complex in Dong Nai in cooperation with Japan, 
Taiwan, and the United States.  The firm plans to build "Samsung 
Maintenance Centers" in Hanoi and Ho Chi Minh City and future 
"Samsung Towns" in both north and south Vietnam.  The 19 February 
Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN reported that Goldstar will set up a 
joint-venture television plant and a countrywide service network, 
and that Daewoo plans to build a general home appliances factory in 
1995.  CHUGAN MAEGYONG added that Daewoo is considering building an 
agricultural chemical plant and a hotel.  Lucky-Goldstar is building 
an office building in Hanoi and a water supply and drainage system 
in Ho Chi Minh City.  Sunkyong plans to use Vietnam as a base from 
which to move into Southeast Asia and its leading petrochemical and 
textile subsidiaries are setting up plants there.  Meanwhile, 
Ssangyong and Korea Heavy Industries are cooperating on a $300- 
million cement factory.  Posco is building a steel plant, and also 
plans to build a highway between Hanoi and Haiphong. 

   CHUGAN MAEGYONG pointed out that it is not only ROK conglomerates 
who are interested in Vietnam.  Small and medium ROK businesses are 
also watching Vietnam with rising interest.  THOI BAO KINH TE 
VIETNAM noted that small ROK textile, toy, and shoe manufacturers 
are in the process of investing in Vietnam.  Foreign firms are also 
interested, CHUGAN MAEGYONG reported.  Indeed, South Korea's 
Economic Planning Board estimates that competition to invest in the 
Vietnamese market will become "severe" in the second half of this 
year.  CHUGAN MAEGYONG noted that some foreign firms continued their 
economic cooperation with Vietnam during the embargo, and that some 
Japanese and U.S. firms want to regain their former positions in the 
Vietnamese market.  The question of how ROK firms will be able to 
compete against these firms in Vietnam is becoming a pivotal issue, 
CHUGAN MAEGYONG said. 


                           ROK Investment in Vietnam 
                         (Unit:  $1 million) 

                        Planned                             Planned 
                        (Actual)                            (Actual) 
Investor                Investment    Investor 
Investment 

                         Textiles, Clothing 
Korea Mega Sports       13.24(12.62)  Hanil Co. 
1.39(0.60) 
Daewoo                  1.34(0)       Shin-cho Trading Co.  1.04(0) 
Pacific Co.             1.20(0)       Taehan Mobang         2.30(0) 
Dong-sung Trading  Co.  1.10(0)       New Korea Silk     4.21(0.07) 
Korea Moolsan                         Choongnam Spinning 
 (non-woven   fabrics)  1.98(1.98)     (cotton products)  1.40(1.40) 
Sambu  (shoes/leather)  1.0(0) 

                         Coarse Grain Metal 
Daewoo Electronics      2.13(2.13)    Daewoo Electronics    3.30(0) 
Orion                   50.22(11.0)   Kumhwa Industries  1.01(0.91) 
Goldstar Information    2.0(0)        Goldstar Cable        4.05(0) 

                            Petrochemicals 
Samyang                 3.50(1.05)    Upyong                1.29(0) 
Tonga Construction      3.98(0) 

                                Primary Metals 
Pusan Pipe              1.20(1.20)    POSCO                 8.42(0) 

                              Paper and Printing 
Tongyang CKY            1.0(0.65)     Hansol Paper Co.      2.38(0) 

                                Sporting Goods 
Korea Mega Sports       1.1(1.1)      Korea Sports          1.26(0) 

                                     Other 
POSCO (steel plate)     1.95(1.95)    Daewoo(food, hotels)60.25(2.0) 
Daesung Electric Wire   1.99(1.99)    Hyosan Development    3.0(0) 
Yijo (agricultural                    Tongsong Plant 
 products               7.0(0)        (machinery 
                                       outfitters)          1.05(0) 

(Note: Data listed in table was drawn from the 23 February CHUGAN 
MAEGYONG) 



   FEATURE:  ROK Electronics Firms Profit Through U.S. High-Tech - 
SUMMARY:  Samsung and Hyundai, two of South Korea's top electronics 
manufacturers, in recent months were able to solve technical 
problems blocking their development of advanced equipment by buying 
out U.S. firms, according to ROK press reports.  Samsung 
Electronics' acquisition of Harris Microwave Semiconductor gave the 
ROK firm next-generation chip technology, which it is now producing 
for the commercial market.  Hyundai's buyout of Maxtor provided a 
window to a host of high-tech products that Hyundai reportedly could 
not have developed on its own.  Both South Korean companies continue 
to benefit from subsidiaries established in the United States to 
obtain technology through "cooperative" links with American firms. 

   ROK press reports describe how two major South Korean electronics 
firms overcame their technological shortcomings and moved on to 
world leadership in their fields through U.S. technology.  In both 
cases, the "glorious deed" was accomplished through "strategic 
buyouts" of high-tech Silicon Valley manufacturers facing financial 
difficulties from the decline in U.S. defense spending and "intense" 
foreign competition. 

   MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN reported on 4 May 1993 Samsung Electronics' 
buyout of Harris Microwave Semiconductor, a San Jose company that 
built products for the U.S. defense industry.  According to MAEIL 
KYONGJE SINMUN, Samsung acquired the company to "secure a world- 
standard technological capability" in the field of non-memory 
semiconductors, which the ROK conglomerate had lacked.  Samsung was 
able to acquire at one stroke technology that would allow the 
company to move into such lucrative fields as mobile and satellite 
communications, the newspaper noted. 

   The 24 February HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN reported that Samsung 
Electronics has begun mass producing gallium arsenide (GaAs) chips 
at its new Silicon Valley subsidiary Samsung Microwave 
Semiconductor.  According to the newspaper, Samsung succeeded in 
converting the chips from their former military applications to 
general use in mobile communications and high-speed computers--two 
areas for which Samsung's silicon-based chips are not suited.  The 
new semiconductors will also be used in 0.25-micron metal field 
effect transistors (FET) soon to be mass produced.  According to the 
paper, GaAs chips, though harder to engineer, perform better than 
silicon semiconductors, and will form a $6-billion market by 1995. 
Samsung expects to save $7 million annually in import costs ($2 
million more than it paid for Harris) and increase its 
competitiveness in communications equipment at a time when South 
Korea is opening its market to foreign sales. 

   Similarly, on 21 August 1993, MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN reported 
Hyundai Electronics' purchase of controlling stock and management 
rights in the U.S. firm Maxtor, the world's fifth largest 
manufacturer of computer hard disk drives (HDD) with 12 percent of 
the world market.  According to the newspaper, the sale enabled 
Hyundai to obtain "accumulated technology and various patents on HDD 
main components without paying royalties."  The move also gave 
Hyundai application-specific integrated circuit technology (ASIC's), 
in which South Korean firms are weak, other semiconductor products 
used with'HDD's, and technology for an optical-magnetic disk drive 
Hyundai wants to develop. 

   In a follow-up article on 9 March, CHUGAN MAEGYONG, a weekly 
magazine published by MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN, stated that Hyundai's 
buyout of Maxtor is being called "the most glorious deed since the 
company was established 10 years ago."  Previously, Samsung had been 
the only ROK manufacturer of HDD's; other South Korean companies had 
abandoned their projects because of technical difficulties.  Maxtor, 
which has R and D facilities at its headquarters in San Jose and in 
Colorado, production lines in Singapore and Hong Kong, and a 
distribution base in Ireland, had been in the red for two years 
before the takeover.  The magazine said that Hyundai Electronics is 
now developing ASIC's, disk media for HDD's, and a laser disk data 
retrieval mechanism, which would have been "difficult" for Hyundai 
to develop alone. 

   CHUGAN MAEGYONG reported that Hyundai personal computers have 
been losing their competitiveness as other countries' products 
improve technologically.  To regain its edge, Hyundai reportedly is 
strengthening its links with U.S. companies and its own U.S.-based 
subsidiaries.  Accord4ng to the magazine, Hyundai will market a 
central processing unit (CPU) for computer workstations in the first 
half of 1994 which it acquired through a U.S. subsidiary set up two 
years ago.  Another U.S. subsidiary called Magnetics Co. was 
established to "cooperate" with the U.S. firm Tandon in developing 
auxiliary memory.  Yet another Hyundai subsidiary (NFI) has been set 
up in the United States to work on laser disk drive technology. 
CHUGAN MAEGYONG pointed out, "The time when companies did all things 
by themselves is passing." 

   FEATURE:  Press Urges Continuous Government Support for HDTV - 
SUMMARY:  South Korean efforts to develop high-definition television 
(HDTV) through a government-sponsored consortium have not yielded 
the wellspring technology needed to market a commercial product by 
1996, according to a Seoul business newspaper.  The enormous expense 
of developing HDTV technology and the difficulty manufacturers are 
having obtaining it abroad lead the newspaper to call for government 
support beyond the scheduled July cutoff. 

     South Korea's efforts to develop HDTV have not lived up to 
expectations, and the industry may not achieve its goal of marketing 
a product by 1996 without more government support, the 2 March MAEIL 
KYONGJE SINMUN claimed.  The newspaper reported that the ROK's four 
major electronics companies--Samsung, Goldstar, Hyundai, and Daewoo- 
-have been working jointly with the Ministry of Trade, Industry, and 
Energy's (MOTIE) Industrial Technology Research Institute and other 
government agencies, such as the Electronics and Telecommunications 
Research Institute, since 1990 to develop HDTV technology.  Total 
research outlays, public and private, reportedly have exceeded 100 
billion won ($125 million).  In July this year, government support 
for the program is scheduled to end, and the four companies are to 
engage in independent development, according to the present 
arrangement. 

   MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN reported that Samsung Electronics will 
increase its HDTV research staff by 100 and divide the project into 
three areas:  HDTV equipment, application-specific integrated 
circuits (ASIC's), and cathode ray tubes.  Goldstar will pursue 
joint cooperation with a U.S. firm through its North American 
research institute in Chicago.  Daewoo and Hyundai will also move 
"full scale" into technological development.  According to the 9 
March CHUGAN MAEGYONG, the four companies under the direction of the 
ROK Government had been developing both digital and analog systems, 
but switched over to the U.S. digital standard this year.  All four 
firms plan to mass produce their own HDTV sets by 1996, the magazine 
said. 

   After nearly four years of development, however, South Korean 
"HDTV technology is only at the beginning stage by comparison with 
the advanced countries," MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN complained.  ROK firms 
reportedly "have not been able to get beyond the basic level in 
developing technologies for digital signal processing and core 
integrated circuits."  The paper quoted "an industry expert" to the 
effect that HDTV equipment shown at the Taejon Expo was a prototype 
and cannot be readily commercialized.  The same source claimed that 
South Korea lacks design technology for the necessary ASIC's, and 
that "it would not be easy to develop it independently."  The 
newspaper adds that foreign firms are "stingy" about transferring 
HDTV technology, and the money needed for development is "enormous." 

   With the July cutoff approaching, MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN cautioned, 
"it would be extremely dangerous for each company to develop HDTV 
without government support."  In the newspaper's estimate, continued 
involvement by the government is needed to insure cooperation 
between the industrial and research sectors, and to promote 
indigenization of HDTV core technology, which the country allegedly 
lacks. 

   FEATURE:  Recent Semiconductor Developments Reported - SUMMARY: 
ROK semiconductor manufacturers made headlines in recent weeks with 
several technological advances that will enhance the industry's 
competitiveness while cutting down on imports and royalty fees. 
This move toward greater self-sufficiency will be accelerated by new 
government subsidies to ROK firms working to indigenize 
manufacturing equipment.  According to press accounts, South Korea's 
emergence as a world leader in semiconductors is further evidenced 
by Samsung's ability to form a cooperative agreement with the 
Japanese firm NEC on next-generation 256M DRAM's 

   Articles in South Korean business newspapers highlight several 
recent advances in that country's semiconductor industry. 

   Kukje Corporation has developed a heterojuncture bipolar 
transistor (HBT) for use in mobile and wireless telecommunications, 
according to the 15 March MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN.  The device, a 
gallium arsenide (GaAs) compound semiconductor used for signal 
amplification, reportedly is more efficient than a silicon bipolar 
chip or GaAs field effect transistor.  When used with existing 
equipment, the HBT allows the power module to be reduced to a 
quarter of its original size and the battery by two-thirds, and 
triples the calling time, Kukje claims.  It will reduce South 
Korea's import costs by more than $10 million annually, while making 
it possible to build smaller and lighter communications equipment. 
Kukje invested 50 billion won ($62.5 million) in R and D and 
equipment.  Although the U.S. firm TRW has developed HBT's for 
military use, Kukje was the first ROK company to commercialize the 
product, the paper stated. 

   Samsung Electronics successfully "indigenized" an application- 
specific integrated circuit (ASIC) used to correct errors in 
wireless communications equipment, the 4 March MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 
reported.  The chip, which contains 89,000 gates (the basic units 
making up a logic circuit), reportedly took Samsung 17 months and 1 
billion won ($1.25 million) to develop.  The paper said the company 
will save 20 billion won ($25 million) annually in imports and be 
able to expedite development of semiconductors used in satellite 
communications. 

   Six South Korean companies working jointly under the direction of 
the Korean Printed Circuit Board Research Association have produced 
the ROK's first 42-layer printed circuit board, according to the 8 
March MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN.  The product, which occupied 60 
researchers for a year at a cost of 1 billion won ($1.25 million), 
will have applications in "electronic equipment such as 
supercomputers used in the defense and aerospace industries," as 
well as time-division exchange (TDX) switching equipment and 
workstations.  South Korea had totally depended on U.S. and Japanese 
imports for the product, whose development is expected to shave $30 
million from import costs over the next six months.  Technical spin- 
off is reported to be "considerable."  The six companies involved in 
the project are: Dae-duck Electronics, Saehan Electronics, Korea 
Circuit Co., Hanil Circuit Corp., Woojin Electronics, and Goldstar 
Telecommunication Co. 

   Meanwhile, the 3 March MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN reported that work 
has begun on Anam Semiconductor Technology's second Chonan plant. 
When completed in August, the plant will produce 3,000 photo masks 
and 6 million lead frames per month, enabling South Korea to reduce 
Japanese imports of these items and manufacture some quantity for 
export.  Production reportedly is supported by technology agreements 
with U.S. and Japanese firms. 

   According to HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN on 24 February, South Korea's 
government will spend 20 billion won ($25 million) between now and 
1997 to indigenize semiconductor manufacturing equipment.  The plan, 
announced by the Ministry of Trade, Industry, and Energy (MOTIE) on 
23 February, calls for industry to supplement the funds with 30 
billion won ($37.5 million) aimed at raising the level of indigenous 
semiconductor equipment from the present 12 percent to 50 percent. 
MOTIE will lead technical development, encourage information sharing 
between companies, and take active measures through direct aid or 
tax relief to support companies facing dumping charges for exporting 
indigenous products.  The paper noted that ROK-built semiconductor 
equipment had a value of $145 million in 1993, from a total domestic 
demand of $1.2 billion. 

   Finally, the 2 March issue of MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN reported that 
Samsung Electronics and Japan's NEC will exchange technology for the 
development of 256M DRAM's.  Cooperation reportedly will focus on a 
new type of cell architecture which could hasten commercialization 
of the product considerably.  Talks are under way to expand the 
scope of the agreement to include production.  Some "industry 
experts" believe the two companies may also cooperate on non-memory 
semiconductor products.  MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN noted that Samsung is 
particularly interested in working with NEC on 0.25 micron 
processing technology for logic circuits. 

   New Techno-Complex To Merge Industrial, Academic Research - 
Construction began 23 February on Korea University's Techno-Complex, 
a unique facility that will bring researchers from ROK companies and 
other institutions into contact with leading university scientists 
and engineers.  Located on a 5-acre site in Seoul's Tongdaemun area, 
the complex will host some 30 companies and laboratories by the end 
of 1996, whose personnel will conduct joint research with the 
university's faculty.  Most fields of natural science will be 
represented, including information science, communications, 
automation, semiconductors, computers, environment, bioengineering, 
new materials, precision machinery, medicine, and construction. 

   Companies moving into the complex will pay a fee based on the 
space they occupy and receive free use of the facilities for 20 
years.  Samsung Electronics, Pohang Steel, Lucky-Goldstar, Dacom, 
Samyang, and seven others have already signed agreements.  The Korea 
Research Institute of Standards and Science (a government R and D 
institute under the Ministry of Science and Technology) will be 
involved through the Seoul office of its Basic Science Support 
Center.  Scientific equipment worth $35 million will be brought into 
the complex over the next three years. 

   South Korean companies are facing "enormous challenges" brought 
about by the opening of domestic markets, technological 
protectionism, and increased concern with intellectual property 
rights, necessitating close alliances between ROK businesses, 
universities, and research labs.  Although industry accounts for 70 
percent of the country's total R and D expenditures, it employs only 
4.5 percent of its PhD's.  Conversely, universities have 80 percent 
of the doctorates and less than 10 percent of the research funds. 
Korea University's new facility will help eliminate this imbalance 
by bringing together scientists and technicians from industry, 
academia, and research institutes.  Other South Korean universities 
planning similar facilities are Seoul National, Yonsei, and Hanyang. 
(Seoul CHUGAN MAEGYONG 9 March 94 pp 78-79) 

   Multipurpose Research Reactor Nearing Completion - The ROK's 
Korea Atomic Energy Research Institute (KAERI) has designated 1994 
as "Year One to Leap Forward and Internationalize Development of the 
Country's Nuclear Power Technology."  This year, the institute will 
expand its efforts to link advanced technologies such as lasers, 
robotics, superconductors, and new materials with nuclear power.  It 
will also "support the development of nuclear technology needed to 
secure the country's public safety and to respond effectively to 
changing conditions and nuclear incidents in countries on the 
periphery, such as Russia's recent dumping of radioactive waste 
materials in the East Sea, China's nuclear testing, and North-South 
nuclear inspections. 

   The institute will continue to develop technology used with 
research reactors.  At the end of the year, South Korea's 30-mw 
research reactor will be completed and go into operation. 
Associated facilites, such as hydraulic transfer equipment for 
neutron-irradiated test samples and equipment to produce radioactive 
isotopes, will also be ready.  When the reactor goes on line, 
research can proceed in such areas as advanced materials and nuclear 
fuel development.  Production of medical and industrial-use 
radioactive isotopes will increase significantly. 

   "In order to obtain advanced nuclear technology at an early date, 
South Korea will actively pursue joint international research with 
advanced countries and strengthen technical exchanges with leading 
nations to be able to respond spontaneously to rapid changes in the 
political situation."  (Seoul WONJARYOK Jan 94 pp 19-21) 

   Samsung 'Gets Serious' About Aircraft Engine Development - 
Samsung Aerospace Industries, Ltd. is "getting serious" about 
developing an aircraft engine.  It has set up medium- and long-term 
development plans, which include working toward producing a 
prototype aircraft engine by the year 2000.  By 1996, it expects to 
complete development of a 1.2-mw small-size industrial use gas 
turbine engine.  It also plans to accumulate gas turbine technology 
and link it to development of an aircraft engine.  Currently Samsung 
has an "indigenization rate" of 40 percent for its small aircraft 
engines.  It hopes to raise this rate to 80 percent by 1996. 

   The company is participating in developing the PW40O0 engine 
(used in large passenger aircraft) with the U.S. firm Pratt and 
Whitney, and is planning international joint enterprises geared 
toward new engine development.  In addition, Samsung has hired 30 
Russian gas turbine technicians to work in South Korea on designing 
and developing engines.  The company will also send a delegation to 
Russia in June to bring in Russian technology for manufacturing 
aircraft engines.  As a preliminary to developing aircraft engines, 
it is moving into producing engine components.  It recently 
developed parts for the air intake apparatus on the F1O0 engine and 
will supply 5.1-billion won ($6.375 million) worth of the parts to 
Pratt and Whitney until 1995.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 22 Feb 94 
p 22) 

   Patent Office To Set Up Center To Promote Patent 
Commercialization - The Office of Patent Administration (OPA) will 
set up a so-called "patent real estate office" in the second half of 
this year to help commercialize new technologies.  According to OPA, 
about 30 percent of all patent or utility model applications are 
filed by small businesses or individual inventors, and most new 
technologies are never commercialized.  The new patent mediation 
center will promote the commercialization of superior patented 
technologies that have business applications.  The center will set 
up a committee to examine superior patented technologies and 
evaluate newly invented technologies.  It can also establish 
rational royalty fees that businesses pay when using a new 
technology.  This will prevent patent disputes before they arise. 
OPA also plans to set up a fund to promote inventions so that small 
businesses can commercialize their technologies earlier.  (Seoul 
MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 23 Feb 94 p 2) 

   Tax Audits Based on Foreign Car Ownership To Stop - On 7 
February, the National Tax Administration instructed South Korea's 
137 tax offices not to conduct tax audits based solely on a person's 
ownership of a foreign-made automobile.  The Ministry of Trade, 
Industry, and Energy noted that the United States and the European 
Union view such audits as a disadvantage to those who purchase 
foreign-made cars.  (Seoul HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN 18 Feb 94 p 1) 
(Note:  This article appeared at the bottom of page 1, under a small 
headline.) 

   Samsung Wins Order for Gas Platform Off Malaysia - Samsung Heavy 
Industries has won an order for an offshore gas platform from 
Petronas, the state-owned Malaysian oil company.  Samsung competed 
against other foreign firms for the $55-million project, which will 
involve setting up an offshore gas production facility about 250 km 
northeast of the state of Sarawak.  The platform will weigh 10,000 
tons and will be 84 meters long, 32 meters wide, and 26.7 meters 
high.  The project is scheduled to be completed in November 1995. 
(Seoul HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN 24 Feb 94 p 10) 

   LCD Makers Form 'United Front' Against Foreign Patent Offensive - 
On 17 February, six ROK liquid crystal display (LCD) producers 
formed an LCD patent investigation committee that will serve as a 
"united front" against foreign companies' "patent offensives."  The 
committee will enable the ROK firms to share information on domestic 
and foreign LCD patents and jointly analyze foreign companies' 
patented technology.  In order to prevent patent disputes, the South 
Korean firms will document their own development of patented LCD 
technologies and then share these technologies with one another. 
The foreign "patent offensive" first appeared last year, when the 
Swiss company ABB asked a ROK firm to pay patent fees equal to 2.7 
percent of its total sales.  Last year, many of the patents 
registered by foreign companies were related to LCD production, and 
a surge in patent offensives is expected in 1995, when ROK firms 
begin mass production of thin-film transistor (TFT) LCD units. 
South Korean firms believe that, if foreign companies were to demand 
all of their patent fees, they would have to pay out as much as 30 
percent of their sales receipts to cover the cost.  (Seoul HANGUK 
KYONGJE SINMUN 18 Feb 94 p 10) 

   Textile Firms' Investment in China Increasing - ROK textile 
companies are rapidly increasing their investment in the Chinese 
market.  As of the end of 1993, 260 South Korean textile firms had 
moved into into the Chinese market.  This equals 43.1 percent of the 
603 ROK textile companies that have invested in overseas markets. 
The approved investment amount for these 260 firms totaled $195 
million.  The firms include 156 garment makers, 32 fabric makers, 
and five fabric dyeing companies.  With regard to investment 
location, 69 companies have gone into Shandong Province, 31 into 
Tianjin, 23 into Jilin Province, 18 into Liaoning Province, and 12 
into Beijing.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 28 Mar 94 p 10) 

   Kia Sets Up Auto Assembly Joint Venture in Indonesia - Kia is 
establishing an auto assembly joint venture in Indonesia.   Kia will 
own 30 percent of the company, with Indauda Putra National Motors 
owning the rest.  The venture will be capitalized at $100 million, 
in partnership with Indonesian Humpuss and Udatinda business groups. 
Initial annual production is expected to total 50,000 subcompact 
cars.  Kia will also build a new plant near Jakarta by 1997.  That 
plant will be able to assemble 100,000 cars by the year 2000. 
(Seoul CHOSON ILBO 25 Mar 94 p 11) 

   Samsung-Mitsubishi Consortium Wins Shipbuilding Order - A 
consortium formed by Samsung Heavy Industries and Japan's Mitsubishi 
Heavy Industries has received an order from Hong Kong's Orient 
Overseas Container Line for the world's biggest container ships. 
This is the first time that ROK and Japanese companies have formed a 
consortium in the shipbuilding industry, which is famous for its 
"fierce" international competition.  Samsung will build two of the 
six ships, which can carry up to 4,950 containers of 20-foot 
equivalent units.  Mitsubishi will build the remaining vessels.  The 
ships are to be delivered to Hong Kong between late 1995 and late 
March 1996.  (Seoul YONHAP 0633 GMT 17 Mar 94) 

   MOTIE Reports on Construction Contracts in China - Sino-ROK 
cooperation in the construction field is picking up, according to 
the Ministry of Trade, Industry, and Energy (MOTIE).  As of the end 
of January, Hyundai Heavy Industries had received orders for a 
$32.38-million WEI 11-4 offshore installation, a $17.57-million 
Yacheng 13-1 gas platform, and a $14.5-million Yacheng process 
platform.  Samsung Construction had received a $31.21-million order 
to build a ring road in Shanghai, and Yigong had received a design 
and construction order worth $3.99 million.  Other pending 
construction projects by ROK firms include the $65-million Tangshan 
Port docks project by Halla; the $400-million Xiaolangdi multi- 
purpose dam project by Hyundai; the $600-million Hebei provincial 
expressway project by Lucky Development, Samhwan Enterprise, Hanbo 
Steel, and Hyundai Construction Co; the $35-million Henan provincial 
expressway project by Samhwan, Hanbo Steel, and Lucky Development; 
and the Guangzhou subway project by Dongbu Construction.  In 
addition, Daewoo plans to bid on the $4.8-billion Changjiang dam 
project.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 28 Mar 94 p 4) 

   Dong-Ah To Build Two Power Plants in China - Dong-Ah Construction 
Industrial Co. has won orders worth $315 million to construct two 
thermal-power co-generation plants in China.  Each plant will be 
able to generate 150,000 kw annually.  The first phase of 
construction of the Xinxiang plant, to be located in Henan Province, 
will run from June 1995 to June 1996, and the second phase from 
January 1996 to December 1997.  The first phase for the Huamei 
plant, to be located in Beijing, will run from June 1995 to December 
1997, and the second phase from January 1996 to December 1998. 
(Seoul THE KOREA TIMES 31 Mar 94 p 8) 

   Goldstar To Invest $200 Million in VCR, CRT Plants in China - 
Goldstar will invest $200 million to build VCR and color CRT 
(cathode-ray tube) plants in Shanghai and Changsha, Hunan Province. 
The firm has a joint-venture agreement with the Xiguang Electronics 
Group of Hunan to build the Changsha plant by January 1996.  The 
plant will produce 1 million 21- and 25-inch CRT's annually for 
domestic consumption.  On 25 March, Goldstar will sign an agreement 
with Shanghai Recording Plant to produce VCR's starting in March 
1995.  The VCR plant will produce 300,000 Goldstar-brand units 
annually and mainly supply the Chinese market, although some of its 
production will be exported.  (Seoul CHOSON ILBO 25 Mar 94 p 10) 

   Yukong Working Towards Oil Refinery Agreement With China - Yukong 
Ltd., a major affiliate of the Sunkyong group, has agreed in 
principle to build an oil refinery facility in Shenzhen through a 
joint venture with Chinese companies.  Construction costs are 
expected to reach $1.5 billion, with completion set for early 1998. 
The plant's processing capacity is expected to be 110,000 barrels of 
oil daily.  If realized, the project will be the largest ever 
between South Korea and China.  By the end of this year, Yukong and 
its Chinese counterparts will establish a joint venture company, 
capitalized at $375 million.  Yukong will contribute some 40 percent 
of the needed capital, with SINOPEC (China's state oil company) and 
the Shenzhen government supplying the remaining 35 and 25 percent. 
The crude oil used in plant operations will be imported from the 
Middle East, and the plant's petroleum products will be sold in Hong 
Kong, Shenzhen, and in foreign countries.  (Seoul THE KOREA TIMES 31 
Mar 94 p 8) 

   SOUTHEAST ASIA - BURMA:  FEATURE:  Barter Trade Activities in 
Burma Reported - SUMMARY:  According to an Indonesian economic 
weekly, although doing business with Burma through barter or counter 
trade is "challenging and risky," it may still be the best way to 
bypass "cumbersome foreign exchange regulations."  The weekly 
reported that in the last two years, barter trade  has played a 
significant part in Burma's economic revival. 

   The 7 March Jakarta WARTA EKONOMI described Burma as a country 
that is  short of foreign exchange, receives no foreign aid from 
western countries because of its poor record on human rights, has $1 
billion in arrears, and offers an official exchange rate that is 20 
times the black market rate.  However, the magazine said, in spite 
of these problems, Burma's economy has grown 5 to 6  percent 
annually for the past two years, largely thanks to barter or counter 
trade. 

   According to WARTA EKONOMI, in recent years, the Burmese 
Government has "cautiously liberalized" its economy, encouraged 
border trade with China, and courted investors from Thailand and 
Singapore.  The magazine noted that many Burmese and foreign import- 
export companies have "reluctantly" committed themselves to barter 
transactions, "challenging and risky" though they may be, because 
this was a way to avoid dealing with many "cumbersome foreign 
exchange regulations."  The magazine reported that a multimillion- 
dollar project involving the Burmese Ministry of Foreign Affairs and 
Turnkey Contracts and Consultancy of Singapore was completed 
recently:  under an "exchange-of-products" agreement, a modern, 
international business center was built in Rangoon, in which 
companies such as Sumimoto and Texoca have reserved space, and was 
paid for in logs. 

   WARTA EKONOMI stated that private companies must pay for their 
imports with earnings from exports.  These companies are also 
required to spend 25 percent of their export earnings on imports 
that the government deems essential (such as palm oil) or else, 
convert 20 percent of their hard currency into kyat at the official 
exchange rate, the magazine said. 

   WARTA EKONOMI revealed that most of Burma's 5,000 small import- 
export companies, which have not been in business long enough to 
build up foreign exchange reserves to pay for their imports, 
participate in barter trade.  Consequently, foreign companies owned 
by the importers' Sino-Burmese relatives living in Hong Kong, 
Singapore, or Bangkok, have become involved in barter trade.  These 
foreign companies send electronic goods, cement, machinery, or 
pharmaceuticals to Burma on consignment or credit.  The importers 
then sell the goods for kyat, use the money to buy local products 
(rice, beans, teak, or fish) for export through the foreign 
companies, and, in that way, obtain dollars to pay for the original 
imports.  However, the magazine added, "fierce competition" to buy 
the limited quantities of Burmese commodities available for export 
has pushed up prices, cutting into the profits of both parties. 

   WARTA EKONOMI also highlighted other problems in connection with 
barter trade.  It pointed out that different imports to Burma 
command different exchange rates depending on the scarcity of or 
demand for the product.  For instance, a dollar's worth of palm oil 
sells for about 90 kyat, whereas a dollar's worth of medicines can 
earn up to 180 kyat.  The magazine stressed that traders must know 
what products are smuggled in from China and what products are 
bought and paid for in kyat by state enterprises at the official 
exchange rate, as these products will undercut the price of goods 
brought in legally by private companies for barter deals. 

   Meanwhile, Burmese businessmen are complaining that barter trade 
allows foreigners to make money at both ends, WARTA EKONOMI 
reported.  They claim, for instance, that a Taiwanese company can 
sell trucks at a profit to Burma, receive payment in logs, and in 
turn, sell the logs in Taiwan at a profit.  In conclusion, the 
magazine cited the example of a Scottish trader who has done 
business with Burma since 1988 and can testify that foreigners risk 
losing money as well.  This trader, according to WARTA EKONOMI, has 
not been paid for a milk powder and palm oil shipment worth 
$209,000.  His only recourse has been to send a letter of complaint 
to the Burmese Trade Ministry, which has brought no results to date. 
   INDONESIA:  Indocement Signs Agreement With Korean, Japanese 
Firms - P.T. Indocement, Indonesia's largest cement manufacturer, 
recently signed an agreement with Korea Development Company, Ltd. 
(Kodeco) and Marubeni Company of Japan to build a $420-million 
cement plant in South Kalimantan Province.  The plant, scheduled to 
begin operations in 1997, will have an annual production capacity of 
2.3 million tons.  Indocement owns 51 percent of the joint venture, 
Kodeco 46 percent, and Marubeni 3 percent.  (Jakarta BISNIS 
INDONESIA 3 Mar 94 p 7) 

   Official Predicts Growth in Stock Trading - Barcelius Ruru, 
chairman of the Capital Market Supervisory Board, recently stated 
that Indonesia's stock market could rise 10-fold to $100 billion in 
a few years.  He said there is "substantial room for growth" because 
the trading volume in Indonesia is still below 8 percent of GDP. 
Ruru noted that to encourage growth, the government has removed 
regulatory and fiscal barriers, and enforced financial disclosure 
and fair market practices.  (Jakarta BISNIS INDONESIA 21 Feb 94 p 5) 

   Banking Sector Has $12.7 Billion in Bad Debts - The banking 
sector has accumulated $12.7 billion in bad debts and non-performing 
loans, of which $9.17 billion is accounted for by the seven state 
banks--Export-Import Bank of Indonesia, BNI, the National Trade 
Bank, Bank Bumi Daya, the People's Bank of Indonesia, the State 
Savings Bank, and the National Development Bank of Indonesia 
(Bapindo).  An investigation of a recent "banking scam" revealed 
that in one transaction, Bapindo suffered a $630-million loss 
(including interest) when a $430-million letter of credit--extended 
two years ago to businessman Eddy Tansil of the Golden Key group- 
-was not paid up.  (Jakarta KOMPAS 2 Mar 94 p 5) 

   1993 Coal Production Reaches 27 Million Metric Tons - Ambyo 
Mangunwijaya, president director of the coal company Bukit Asam Co. 
Ltd, recently said that Indonesia ranks fourth in the world in coal 
exports after Australia, South Africa, and Colombia.  He also stated 
that coal output reached 27 million metric tons in 1993, an increase 
of more than 300 percent compared with 1989's production.  (Jakarta 
ANTARA 1036 GMT 31 Mar 94) 

   LAOS:  Norwegian, Thai Firms Contract To Design Hydropower Dam - 
Electricite du Laos and the Nor-Consul Company of Norway recently 
signed an agreement on the engineering design for the Nam Theun-Hin 
Boun or Nam Theun 1-2 hydropower dam.  The cost of the design comes 
to about $4.6 million and will be paid for by a grant from the 
Norwegian Government to the Lao Government.  The 210-mw hydropower 
station is scheduled to be completed at the end of 1997.  It will 
generate 1,530 million kwh a year, all of which will be sold to 
Thailand.  Construction costs will reach $280 million, of which $110 
million will come from the Lao Government (55 percent), the Nordic 
Group (25 percent), and the MDX Group of Thailand (20 percent). 
(Vientiane KPL 0911 GMT 30 Mar 94) 

   MALAYSIA:  Incentives for Eastern Corridor Announced - 
International Trade and Industry Minister Rafidah Aziz recently 
announced the following new incentives for investors interested in 
developing the Eastern Corridor, Sabah, and Sarawak:  1) Full import 
duty exemption on raw material, components, and parts not available 
locally; 2) One-hundred percent tax allowance on infrastructure 
expenditures, such as construction of bridges and roads; and 3) 
Second round of "pioneer status" for existing and new companies. 
(Kuala Lumpur BERITA HARlAN 23 Feb 94 p 7) 

   Telecommunications Investment Opportunity Offered - Energy, 
Telecommunications, and Post Minister Samy Vellu recently stated 
that Malaysia is offering interested parties a "big opportunity" to 
invest in telecommunications.  The country plans to develop its 
telecommunications industry in the next five years to the tune of 
$6.48 billion.  Malaysia Telekom, the national telecommunications 
carrier, intends to spend $268 million on its local network and $64 
million on its international network.  The minister said that 
Malaysia wants to become an exporter of telecommunications equipment 
and the "center of telecommunications activities" in the region. 
(Kuala Lumpur UTUSAN MALAYSIA 1 Mar 94 p 4) 

   Joint Venture Plant To Be Built in Algeria - Josina, a local palm 
oil trader, and Arome d'Algerie recently signed a $30-million joint- 
venture agreement to establish a plant in Algeria to process and 
manufacture vegetable oil and fats.  Both sides said that the 
project, which will be completed in June 1995, marks the beginning 
of future business collaborations and stronger bilateral relations. 
Algeria has imported 200,000 tons of processed palm oil worth $20 
million from Malaysia in the past.  This year, it expects to import 
about $40 million worth of palm oil.  (Kuala Lumpur BERITA HARIAN 2 
Mar 94 p 7) 

   Joint-Venture Petrochemical Plant in Johor Inaugurated - On 24 
March, International Trade and Industry Minister Sri Rafidah Aziz 
inaugurated the $570-million Titan Petrochemical Complex in Pasir 
Gudang, Johor.  The plant is a joint venture between Taiwan's Titan 
Group, Malaysia's PNB (National Investment Board) Equity Resource 
Corporation, Australia's BTR Nylex Ltd., the United States' Himont, 
Inc., and China's Sinochem.  It has an annual production capacity of 
230,000 metric tons of ethylene and 115,000 metric tons of 
propylene, to be used in plastic manufacturing.  (Kuala Lumpur NEW 
STRAITS TIMES 25 Mar 94 p 16) 

   Company Forms Joint Venture With Vietnamese Firm - Asia Pacific 
Land Bhd (AP Land Limited) has teamed up with Vietnam's Tamexco Ltd. 
to form an investment joint venture by acquiring a Vietnamese 
incorporated bank, Tancom Bank.  The new venture, in which AP Land 
holds a 70-percent stake, will invest $19 million in the bank and in 
property development.  The memorandum of understanding for the 
venture was signed by AP Land Managing Director Jeffrey T.L. Ng and 
Tamexco Director Pham Huy Phuoc, who is also chairman of the 
administration board of Tancom Bank.  (Kuala Lumpur NEW STRAITS 
TIMES 25 Mar 94 p 17) 

   PHILIPPINES:  Government Approves Power Plant Project - The Board 
of Investments has approved the $115-million power project of the 
East Asia Power Corporation.  The power plant is one of five 
projects to be built by the National Power Corporation to ensure 
sufficient supplies of electricity for this summer.  (Quezon City 
PTV-4 Television 0500 GMT 25 Mar 94) 

   THAILAND:  Bank Credit Expansion, Inflation Rate Reported - Bank 
of Thailand spokesman Phisit Li-atham recently reported that the 
annual bank credit expansion rate at the end of February was 21.6 
percent, still within the bank's target ceiling of about 24 percent. 
However, deposits rose by only 17 percent to $95.2 billion.  With 
outstanding credit at $107.2 billion, this meant a ratio of credit 
to deposits of 112 percent, a record in Thai financial history 
because the ratio had never been higher than 110 percent.  Phisit 
also said that the inflation rate in February rose to 3.6 percent, 
compared to 3.3 percent for the same month last year.  Foreign 
reserves were recorded at $26.25 billion at the end of February. 
(Bangkok MATICHON 18 Mar 94 p 9) 

   Military Bank Grants Loans to Vietnamese Bank - Wirasak Apharak, 
deputy general manager of the Thai Military Bank, disclosed on 16 
March that his bank has granted a $5-million loan to Vietnam's 
Agricultural Bank.  The loan carries a 2.75-percent interest rate 
under a 6-month repayment period, with the State Bank of Vietnam 
acting as the guarantor.  In January, the Thai Military Bank loaned 
the same amount to the Vietcom Bank of Vietnam.  Last year, the 
branch office in Ho Chi Minh City granted $10 million in loans to 
Vietnamese government agencies and $3.5 million to Thai animal feed 
producers in that country.   The Thai Military Bank is planning to 
open a second branch office in Hanoi.  (Bangkok PHUCHATKAN 18 Mar 94 
p 4) 

   State Petroleum Firm Forms Joint Ventures in PRC, Vietnam - The 
Council of Economic Ministers has given permission to the state-run 
Petroleum Authority of Thailand (PTT) to form a partnership with the 
Charoen Phokphan Group, and petrochemicals firms in China and 
Vietnam to run oil businesses in the three countries involved.  The 
approval is in line with policy guidelines allowing state 
enterprises to move into international trade.  The joint ventures 
involve a total investment of $249.6 million, $25.44 million of 
which is PTT's share.  The ventures will be located in several 
cities in China and Vietnam, with PTT and Charoen Phokphan as the 
main shareholders.  In China, the PTT will finance service stations 
in Guangdong, Maoming, Shanghai, Tianjin, and Dalian.  In Vietnam, 
PTT will open service stations and an oil terminal wharf, and it 
will run a liquefied petroleum gas business in Ho Chi Minh City. 
(Bangkok BANGKOK POST 22 Mar 94 p 24) 

   Power Plant To Be Established With PRC's Wuxi Province - Saha 
Union Corp. has signed a joint-venture agreement with Wuxi High-Tech 
Industrial Development to invest $30 million in a 30-mw power plant 
in Wuxi Province, China.  The project is one of three power schemes 
recently endorsed by Chinese and Thai partners.  Union Energy Co, 
wholly owned by Saha Union, owns 40 percent of the project, while 
Wuxi High-Tech Industrial Development and a Hong Kong company hold 
50 and 10 percent, respectively.  According to their earlier 
memorandum of understanding, Saha Union will carry out six ventures, 
all of which involve power plants with capacities ranging from 10 to 
30 mw, requiring a combined investment of $100 million.  (Bangkok 
THE NATION 22 Mar 94 p B4) 

   Company Invests in Hotel Construction in Burma - The Kuok Group 
has committed to investing $150 million in two hotel construction 
projects in Burma.  The group recently signed an agreement with 
Burma's Directorate of Hotels and Tourism in Rangoon.  One hotel 
will be a 400-room first-class business hotel and is targeted to 
open in early 1997.  The second will be a deluxe property with 450 
rooms.  (Bangkok THE NATION 31 Mar 94 p B2) 

   Bank Arranges Loan for SRV Central Bank - The State Bank of 
Vietnam has mandated the Export-Import (Exim) Bank of Thailand and 
Krung Thai Bank to arrange for $100 million in internationally 
syndicated loans.  Exim Bank President Pridiyathon Thewakun and 
Krung Thai Bank Executive President Suwit Udomsap met recently in 
Hanoi with Deputy State Bank Governor Le Van Chau, and the two sides 
hope to conclude an agreement soon, after further talks on interest 
rates.  The "untied" loan, destined for general economic development 
purposes, was initiated by the Bank of Thailand at the request of 
the State Bank of Vietnam.  Exim Bank will seek participation by 
foreign banks operating through the Bangkok International Banking 
Facilities in Thailand, while Krung Thai Bank will coordinate with 
interested Thai banks, including Bangkok Bank and the Thai Military 
Bank, which have full commercial branches in Ho Chi Minh City. 
Krung Thai has representative offices in Hanoi and Ho Chi Minh City, 
and is applying for a branch license.  Suwit said the term of the 
syndicated loan is five years, with interest rates floating with the 
world market rate, and no guarantees. 

   Vietnam's experience in the private market so far has been with 
short-term credit of less than one year.  "We have encouraged 
Vietnam to step into the international lending market, establishing 
its credibility in the place that will become another major source 
of capital as Vietnam's development speeds up," Pridiyathon said, 
adding that Vietnam has controlled inflation well, stabilized its 
currency, and maintained a sound economy, all of which qualify it as 
a "credible borrower" in the private market.  (Bangkok BANGKOK P0ST 
28 Mar 94 p 21) 

   VIETNAM:  FEATURE:  Increased ROK Trade, Investment in Vietnam 
Reported (See SOUTH KOREA) 

   Singapore's Keppel Group To Invest in Shipbuilding, Construction 
- Keppel Group, a large Singapore-based conglomerate with extensive 
shipbuilding interests, will undertake large investment projects in 
Vietnam in the shipbuilding, construction, and communications 
sectors.  In shipbuilding, Keppel has reached agreement with the 
state-owned Ba Son Shipbuilding Co. to establish a joint-venture 
company, Keppel-Ba Son Shipyard and Engineering, in Ho Chi Minh 
City.  Keppel will contribute 60 percent of the $44 million in 
capital and will lease facilities from Ba Son to build and repair 
foreign ships. 

   According to Keppel Chairman Sim Kee Boon, the two companies have 
also signed an agreement to build a new shipyard in Vung Tau, near 
Vietnam's offshore oil drilling areas, "which will make Vietnam an 
important foreign shipbuilding base second only to the Philippines" 
in the region. 

   In addition, Straits Steamship Land, a Keppel subsidiary, will 
develop a real estate complex in Hanoi involving residential 
housing, office buildings, and a "communications center."  The 
project will be developed "jointly with Vietnamese capital." 

   In the telecommunications sector, Steamers Maritime Holdings, 
another Keppel subsidiary, in a project undertaken together with Ho 
Chi Minh City's Posts and Communications Office, has just put into 
operation a $3.7-million "two-way CT2 Citynet telecommunications 
system."  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 10 Mar 94 p 12) 

   Singapore To Assist in Building New Industrial Zone - The 
Singaporean Government will assist in the construction of an 
industrial zone 8 to 10 square km in size, either in Hanoi or Ho Chi 
Minh City.  Do Muoi, General Secretary of the Communist Party of 
Vietnam, made the request for assistance to Singapore Prime Minister 
Goh Chok Tong during his visit to Vietnam, and Goh responded 
positively.  Do Muoi also requested Singapore's cooperation in 
providing industrial technology assistance, and construction and 
management assistance. 

   The Singapore Government is in the process of setting up a 
meeting with the Vietnamese side to decide whether there is a 
suitable site near an airport, what is an acceptable price for the 
land required for the zone, and "what kind of incentives can be 
expected from the Vietnamese authorities."  (Tokyo NIKi?I SANGYO 
                                                      ? 
SHIMBUN 11 Mar 94 p 3) 

   Daewoo Investments in Vietnam Reported - The director general of 
Daewoo's representative office in Hanoi recently said that, to date, 
his company has eight investment projects in Vietnam, capitalized at 
$421 million, and is planning 12 more projects capitalized at about 
$1 billion.  The upcoming projects include a $6-million joint 
venture with the Bach Tuyet Paint Company in Ho Chi Minh City and a 
$224-million electronic goods assembly venture in Hanoi.  (Ho Chi 
Minh City THOI BAO KINH TE SAIGON (24 Feb-2 Mar 94 p 7) 

   Daewoo reportedly wants to "push forward" and increase its 
investment in northern Vietnam to $1 billion in 1995.  With two 
major projects capitalized at nearly $300 million--the Orion joint 
venture to produce TV tubes and the Dai Ha Commercial Center near 
Cau Giay in Hanoi--the ROK conglomerate is now the top investor in 
northern Vietnam.  According to the director general of Daewoo's 
representative office in Hanoi, the firm is presently operating 
and/or negotiating 23 investment projects in Vietnam.  Seven of them 
have been licensed, including the two projects mentioned above, a 
$10-million joint venture with Vietcombank in banking services, a 
$3-million joint venture with Viettronics Dong Da to produce 
electronic parts, a $2-million garment manufacturing joint venture, 
a $4-million joint venture (Viglacera) with the Dap Cau glass 
factory, and an $8.1-million joint venture (Vipesco) to produce 
insecticide. 

   Among other Daewoo projects waiting to be licensed are:  a joint 
venture with the Vietnamese Defense Ministry to assemble buses, 
vans, and cars, capitalized at $40 million; a joint venture with the 
Railways General Department to build railroad cars; and a project to 
upgrade Route 18 between Hanoi and Quang Ninh Province.  (Hanoi THOI 
BAO KINH TE VIETNAM Dec 93 p 12) 

   Effect of Devalued Yuan on Trade Reported - Early this year, 
China devalued its currency by 51 percent, down to 8.7 yuan to the 
dollar; consequently, the value of the yuan on the China-Vietnam 
border dropped from 1,290 dong at the end of 1993 to 1,250 dong two 
weeks later, and is expected to continue to go down.  The weaker 
yuan has reportedly dealt a "crucial blow" to the Vietnamese 
economy. 

   In 1990, exports to China totaled $7.8 million and imports from 
China $4.6 million.  In 1992, they surged to $95 million and $73.4 
million, respectively.  Chinese statistics show that the value of 
cross-border trade rose from 400 million yuan (about $80 million) in 
1989 to 3 billion yuan (about $500 million) in 1992. 

   As a result of the devaluation of the yuan, it will be more 
difficult to export Vietnamese goods to China.  Currently, petroleum 
and rubber are the top export goods for the Chinese market, followed 
by handicraf ts.  If the export volume of these goods destined for 
China were to decrease, it will also mean a drop in foreign exchange 
earnings for Vietnam.  (Hanoi TUAN BAO QUOC TE 2 Feb 94 p 10) 

   Growing Demand for Cars Reported - According to the Ministry of 
Communications and Transportation, Vietnam has imported an average 
of 20,000 cars annually in the past four years.  In 1990, the 
country had about 170,000 cars in circulation.  The figure for 1993 
rose to 270,000, of which half are said to be "very old."  Ho Chi 
Minh City alone reportedly has about 70,000 vehicles of all types. 

   Currently, the demand for the Vietnamese market comes to about 
20,000 to 25,000 vehicles annually.  By the year 2000, it is 
expected that demand will increase to 60,000 vehicles, of which 60 
percent will be passenger cars, 20 percent trucks and 20 percent 
vans. 

   Toyota models and the South Korean "Kia" are reportedly selling 
well in Vietnam.  Toyota sold some 2,500 new cars to Vietnam in four 
months in 1993.  According to Ho Chi Minh City car dealers, in the 
past few years, nearly half of the vehicles imported by Vietnam have 
been Toyota's.  Kia's are said to be "easy to sell" in Vietnam 
because they are less expensive than other cars, however, Kia sales 
are said to be still "very limited."  (Ho Chi Minh City THOI BAO 
KINH TE SAIGON 26 Jan 94 pp 10, 11) 

   Joint Venture With Hong Kong Firm To Renovate Office Complex - 
Hanoi's Ho Tay Production Services Company (HSC) and Hong Kong's 
South Sea Development Company Ltd. have formed a 20-year joint 
venture to renovate a business office complex in Trang Tien, Hanoi. 
The new venture, Trang Tien Company Ltd., was licensed in late 
January, with $12.5 million in capital.  Its prescribed capital 
totals $10 million, with equal shares for the two sides.  (Hanoi 
NHAN DAN 4 Mar 94 p 2) 

   Southern Provinces To Build Rice Mill With South Korea - South 
Korea and the provinces of An Giang, Dong Thap, and Long An have 
formed a 50-year joint venture to build a rice mill that will 
produce a "special variety" of rice this year.  The mill will be 
located in Long An and will have an annual production capacity of 
9,000 metric tons.  Investment capital in the project totals $10 
million, of which the Vietnamese side is contributing 40 percent. 
(Hanoi NHAN DAN 7 Mar 94 p 1) 

   Steel Joint Venture Formed With ROK Companies - South Korea's 
Posco Ltd. and KYC Ltd. (Keoyang), the Vietnam Steel General Company 
(VSC), and the Hai Phong Engineering, Construction Enterprise (HPC) 
have formed a 25-year joint venture in Hanoi to produce rolled steel 
and steel bars.  The venture was licensed in January, with a total 
investment of $56.12 million.  Prescribed capital is $16.9 million, 
of which VSC is contributing 34 percent, HPC 16 percent, Posco 45 
percent, and KYC 5 percent.  (Hanoi NHAN DAN 8 Mar 94 p 2) 

   Oil Services Company Expands Operations - Increased oil-drilling 
operations in the South China Sea have enabled the Vietnam Petroleum 
Technical Service Company (PTSC) to expand services.  These include 
providing technical workers, escort ships, and logistical bases for 
foreign oil companies.  PTSC has provided these companies with 200 
technical workers for foreign ships and oil rigs.  In 1993, the 
company had sales of almost $20 million.  It plans to extend its 
operations this year through joint ventures with foreign partners 
and by increasing its fleet of technical service ships.  It is 
prepared to take part in a pipeline contruction project to bring 
natural gas from offshore oil platforms.  (Hanoi VNA 1246 GMT 20 Mar 
94) 

   Government To Restore Two Riverways - The Vietnamese Government 
will give priority to restoring two important riverways linking Ho 
Chi Minh City with the Mekong River Delta provinces.  Total 
investment for this project is estimated at about $47 million. 
(Hanoi Voice of Vietnam 1000 GMT 17 Mar 94) 

   Dong Nai Has 53 Licensed Investment Projects - Dong Nai Province 
has 53 investment projects with a total capital of over $520 
million, that have been licensed by the State Committee for 
Cooperation and Investment.  Many enterprises with foreign capital 
are operating profitably, and to date, their industrial output value 
total over $60 million, or 18 percent of the province's total 
industrial output value. (Hanoi Voice of Vietnam Network 2300 GMT 16 
Mar 94) 

   Rice Exports Reached 1.7 Million Metric Tons in 1993 - Vietnam 
exported 1.7 million metric tons of rice in 1993, an increase of 10 
percent over the previous year.  The government has asked the 
Ministry of Finance, the State Bank, the State Planning Commission, 
and the Ministry of Agriculture and Food Industry to ensure that 
there will be enough cash to buy up all surplus rice from farmers. 
Vietnam plans to export 2 million metric tons of rice this year. 
(Hanoi Voice of Vietnam Netowrk 0500 GMT 17 Mar 94) 

   Swedish Group Looks To Increase Trade - Two-way trade between 
Sweden and Vietnam stood at about $35 million in 1993, more than 3.5 
times the 1992 figure.  The Elof Hansson group of Sweden recently 
expressed interest in buying textiles, garments, and sports wares 
from Vietnam for the Swedish and north European markets.  At the 
same time, the group expects to sell paper-manufacturing equipment 
to Vietnam.    (Hanoi VNA 0639 GMT 23 Mar 94) 

   Hong Kong Firm, Southern Provinces To Build Rice Mill - The 
provinces of Long An, Tien Giang, Dong Thap, and An Giang have 
entered into a joint venture with Hong Kong's Viet Nguyen Company to 
build a rice mill that will produce 90,000 tons of rice annually for 
export.  The mill will be located in Long An's Ben Luc District. 
Initial capital in the joint venture is $10 million.  (Hanoi Voice 
of Vietnam 1100 GMT 19 Mar 94) 

   Cement Joint-Venture Company Inaugurated - The Sao Mai Cement 
Company, a joint venture between the Ha Tien Cement Company No. 1 
and Switzerland's Holderbank Financiere Glaris, Ltd., has been 
officially inaugurated in Hanoi.  It has a total capital of $233.8 
million, including a legal capital of $112.4 million for a maturity 
period of 50 years.  Thirty-five percent of the legal capital comes 
from the Vietnamese side.  The company will build a factory in Hon 
Chong District, Kien Giang Province, with a designed capacity of 1.7 
million metric tons per year, and a cement receiving station in Thu 
Duc, Ho Chi Minh City.  (Hanoi VNA 0630 GMT 18 Mar 94) 

   Quang Nam-Da Nang Hosting 25 Foreign Ventures - To date, the 
central province of Quang Nam-Da Nang has 25 joint-venture projects 
with foreign partners, with a total capital of $163.3 million, 
including $67.4 million in authorized capital.  Most of the ventures 
in agriculture, forest and sea products processing, chemicals, and 
tourism are with investors from Taiwan, Japan, Hong Kong, Malaysia, 
France, Australia, Thailand, and Russia.  The provincial External 
Economic Office is currently  evaluating 15 projects in heavy 
industry, mineral exploitation, and building materials production. 
The work is expected to be completed this year.  (Hanoi VNA 0605 GMT 
29 Mar 94) 

   Australian Firm Invests $197 Million in Telecommunications - The 
Australian Tells tar Company is investing in a project to assist the 
Vietnamese Posts and Telecommunication Department in expanding and 
modernizing its international telecommunication services.  Under a 
10-year   agreement, Tellstar will contribute $197 million and 
Vietnam $90 million to the project.  Tellstar is also engaged in 
installing two earth satellites in Hanoi and Ho Chi Minh City and in 
upgrading the international telecom network.  Tells tar recently 
invested $60 million to build an international optical fiber line 
under the sea bed from Vung Tau in southern Vietnam, via Thailand, 
to Hong Kong.  The line is scheduled to be in operation by December 
1995.  (Hanoi Voice of Vietnam 1000 GMT 29 Mar 94) 

   Thai Firm To Invest in Fishing Net Factory - The first request 
for space in the Can Tho Export Processing Zone (EPZ) was filed on 
17 March by a Thai fishing gear production group to the Can Tho EPZ 
Construction and Development Company.  It is reported that the Thai 
group plans to invest $8 million in a fishing net factory that will 
generate 1,000 local jobs.  (Hanoi Voice of Vietnam 1000 GMT 21 Mar 
94) 

   Japanese Firm Sets Up Wood Chips Joint Venture - Japan Nisho Iwai 
Corporation and five state-owned Vietnamese firms have set up a 
joint venture in Da Nang to produce wood chips for paper and pulp. 
The new venture, named Vija Chip, is capitalized at over $1.6 
million, with the Japanese firm holding a 60-percent share and the 
local partners the remaining 40 percent.  It will begin exporting 
wood chips to Japan as early as June.  (Hanoi Voice of Vietnam 1000 
GMT 26 Mar 94) 
EAG/7APR94/ECONF/TECHTF/EAST ASIA GROUP/PF 08/0038z Apr 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000021194001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   9 April 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
FOREIGN MEDIA NOTE--FB PN 94-048--RUSSIA 
<H3> <TI>      RUSSIA:  TRIAL OF CHEMICAL WEAPONS SCIENTIST RAISES SECRECY </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       RUSSIA:  TRIAL OF CHEMICAL WEAPONS SCIENTIST RAISES SECRECY </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
ISSUES 

     The controversial decision of the Moscow City Court to try Vil 
Mirzayanov for blowing the whistle on possible chemical weapons 
violations in 1992 played into a much wider debate in the Russian 
media over providing necessary protection for state secrets while 
avoiding old-style censorship.  Although the charges against 
Mirzayanov were finally dropped, recent actions by the Russian 
Government to define state secrets continue to prompt concerns over 
freedom of the press. 

   MIRZAYANOV ARTICLE 

   In September 1992 an article by Professor Vil Mirzayanov, 
published in MOSKOVSKIYE NOVOSTI (MOSCOW NEWS), claimed that the 
Ministry of Defense was continuing to develop and produce chemical 
weapons in violation of international agreements made by Russia and 
in violation of orders from both former President Mikhail Gorbachev 
and President Yeltsin.  The article created a major scandal at the 
time, not only over the alleged violations, but because it was 
originally seized prior to publication from the weekly newspaper 
ARGUMENTY I FAKTY by Ministry of Security officials, thus raising 
serious constitutional questions about freedom of the press.  The 
article, "Poisoned Politics", was later acquired and published by 
MOSKOVSKIYE NOVOSTI (MOSCOW NEWS).  Mirzayanov and coauthor Dr. L. 
Fedorov were arrested, held briefly for questioning, and charged 
with violating Article 75 of the RSFSR Criminal Code "revealing 
state secrets."  Then they were released on their own recognizance 
until an investigation could be completed and a determination made 
whether the case should be brought to trial.  (For complete details 
of the case see FBIS Foreign Press Note:  "Russia: Chemist Involved 
in Development of Chemical Weapons Arrested, Released;" FB PN 93- 
019, 13 Jan 93.) 

   ARREST AND TRIAL 

   On 25 December 1993, investigation of she case was completed and 
submitted to Moscow City Court No. 30 for trial.  A subpoena ordered 
Mirzayanov to appear for a hearing on 6 January.  Because of the 
illness of Mirzayanov's lawyer, the session was postponed until 24 
January (MOSCOW NEWS, 4-10 Feb 94).  Meanwhile, the issuance of the 
subpoena was made public, and it immediately provoked protest 
actions and a highly critical press campaign. 

   Mirzayanov initially refused to cooperate with the court, 
claiming that the trial was illegal because the charges against him 
were based on a secret list of state secrets that had never been 
published.  According to Article 15, Point 3 of the constitution, 
"no legal acts concerning the rights, freedoms, and obligations of 
individuals can be applied if they have not been officially 
published.  The court rejected Mirzayanov's arguments and ordered 
him to return the following day, 25 January.  Mirzayanov said he 
would not return (INTERFAX 24 Jan 94). 

   When Mirzayanov did not appear for the next session as ordered, 
the Moscow City Court issued a warrant for his arrest and scheduled 
a hearing for 3 February.  Mirzayanov was detained at his Moscow 
apartment and later taken to Matrosskaya Tishina Prison (Radio 
Rossii 27 Jan 94).  The 3 February hearing was also postponed, 
however, this time because the guards accompanying Mirzayanov to the 
Moscow City Court Building were unable to get through a crowd of 
picketers and reporters with television cameras.  They returned 
Mirzayanov to prison. (INTERFAX 3 Feb 93) 

   The court met again on 7 February.  At that session three 
"experts" testified that Mirzayanov "did not reveal information that 
constituted a state secret" (Radio Rossii 9 Feb 94).  On 11 
February, Prosecutor Leonid Pankratov asked the court not to render 
a verdict, but to return the case for additional investigation.  The 
court acceded, and on 22 February Mirzayanov was released from 
prison "on the condition that he would not leave Moscow while his 
case was being reexamined."  Commenting on the prosecution's 
decision and the "unsatisfactory conclusion" of the case, IZVESTIYA 
writer Valeriy Rudnev noted that "cases like Mirzayanov's do not go 
to court a second time--they are buried in the procuracy forever" 
(Russian Television 23 Feb 94; IZVESTIYA, 16 Feb 94). 

   Dissatisfied with the court's failure to render a decision, the 
press began lobbying to have the trial brought to a conclusion. 
Finally, pressure was brought to bear from the highest levels. 
Foreign Minister Andrey Kozyrev said that President Yeltsin wished 
to see the "unfortunate episode closed on lawful foundations and 
without further delays" (INTERFAX 3 Mar 94).  On 11 March, the 
Prosecutor General's Office announced that it had decided to drop 
the case altogether because Acting General Prosecutor General 
Aleksey Ilyushenko "was unable to find a corpus delecti in the 
chemist Mirzayanov's actions" (IZVESTIYA, 12 Mar 94). 

   PRESS, PUBLIC REACTION 

   Protests about the Mirzayanov case began as early as 4 January, 
when a group of well-known Russian public figures published a 
statement in MOSKOVSKIYE NOVOSTI criticizing the Moscow City Court's 
secret hearings and demanding that they be stopped.  "The far- 
fetched nature of the accusations and the secrecy of the trial are 
symbols of a bygone era.  Silence in this situation means solidarity 
with lawlessness."  Organizations protesting the trial included the 
Russia's Choice voters association, the Russia's Choice faction in 
the State Duma, (SEGODNYA 2 Feb 94), the Democratic Union of Russia 
(INTERFAX 10 Feb 94), and the Human Rights Committee of the Russian 
Federation Union of Lawyers (INTERFAX 2 Feb 94).  Civil rights 
activists held several news conferences, claiming that the trial was 
"purely political" and that it represented the most serious attempt 
by the Russian special services and military-industrial complex in 
recent years to suppress dissidence" (IZVESTIYA 28 Jan 94). 

   The Russian press also gave the trial much publicity and 
criticized it severely.  IZVESTIYA, in its lead editorial, called 
the case absurd, noting that the charges were leveled by the 
Ministry of Security, which no longer exists.  No one seemed to know 
who was insisting on the prosecution of the case.  IZVESTIYA said 
the failure to find a "specific addressee" is clear evidence of a 
"slide toward despotism" (IZVESTIYA 29 Jan 94). 

   ITAR-TASS reported that according to President Yeltsin's national 
security advisor, Yuriy Baturin, Yeltsin too was displeased, because 
he believed the case to be unconstitutional.  Baturin said Article 6 
of the criminal code states that charges may be dropped if 
circumstances change.  The new circumstance is the new constitution 
which guarantees everyone the right to "look for, receive, transmit, 
produce and distribute information by any legal means.  The list of 
information comprising state secrets is determined by federal law. 
The list of state secrets has not been published yet.  Therefore 
criminal charges can be dropped." (ITAR-TASS 4 Feb 94) 

   PRESSURE FOR INCREASED SECRECY 

   The Mirzayanov investigation and trial took place against a 
background of pressure on the government to take action to protect 
state secrets and prevent what is perceived as the detrimental 
transfer of secret technology to the West and Japan.  Over the past 
two years, numerous articles have appeared in Russian newspapers 
criticizing the "cheap sale" of Russian technology and warning of 
the dangers of Western S&amp;T aid programs.  In 1992, for example, 
several articles appeared criticizing the U.S. Department of 
Energy's nuclear research contract with the Kurchatov Institute, 
because the United States was "getting Russia's best nuclear 
scientists" for a "very insignificant amount" (RADIKAL, Aug 92). 
Similar criticism was doled out over a 1992 high-power laser deal 
made with Lawrence Livermore Laboratory (IZVESTIYA, 3 Nov 92). 

   Russia's space program has also received an enormous amount of 
criticism for not getting an adequate return on its technology and 
services.  For example, the $7.5-million sale of Russia's Topaz-2 
nuclear reactor is regularly cited as a "technology giveaway," 
which, because of its alleged SDI applicability, is also a threat to 
Russian security (ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA, 9 Nov 93).  In 1992,  Russian 
Space Agency Director Yuriy Koptev claimed that Russia was losing 
over a billion rubles a year due to the leakage of information or 
technology sales (RABOCHAYA TRIBUNA, 13 Nov 92). 

   Although most articles stress the economic aspect of technology 
transfer, the problem is also seen as a national security issue. 
According to an article by two analysts at the Russian Academy of 
Sciences Institute of International Economic and Political Research, 
"national technological security is an integral part of national 
security," and the "undermining" of national technological security" 
is becoming uncontrollable.  The two scholars warned that "detailed 
knowledge regarding our potential enables the West to identify the 
most promising lines of research and the most qualified and 
productively working scientific personnel for their later use in the 
interests of the development of Western science and technology and 
the Western economy as a whole."  The article went on to say that 
aid given to Russian scientific institutions "provides the West with 
the possibility of destroying a substan- tial portion of Russia's 
scientific-technical potential."  It claimed that many scientists 
and whole collectives are ready to sell S&amp;T achievements for 
practically nothing, warning that this is "especially dangerous in 
the sphere of the military-industrial complex, since it is directly 
related to the weakening of the country's defense potential" 
(ROSSIYSKIYE VESTI, 20 Oct 93). 

   SECRECY ACT, OTHER MEASURES 

   Several measures undertaken by the Russian Federation Government 
over the past year suggest that it is aware of these concerns and is 
acting upon them.  In September, the text of a state secrecy act was 
published which President Yeltsin had signed into law on 21 July 
1993.  The law, which was passed by the Supreme Soviet shortly 
before its dissolution in October 1993, defines what is and what is 
not a state secret.  It also creates procedural and administrative 
mechanisms for protecting state secrets, specifies 
classification/declassification authority, provides for the 
declassification of state secrets, and assigns penalties both for 
unauthorized disclosure of classified information and other security 
violations (ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA, 21 Sep 93; full translation appears 
in JPRS Report: CENTRAL EURASIA, FBIS-USR-93-127, 1 Oct 93). 

   On 10 March, the Interdepartmental Commission of the Security 
Council of the Russian Federation on Information Security met to 
discuss "realization of the Law on State Secrets adopted in 1993 and 
creation of up-to-date mechanisms to protect state secrets."  The 
commission approved "recommendations for speeding up the state 
program for the comprehensive modernization of the state secret 
protection system."  Representatives of the Russian Government, the 
Russian Academy of Sciences, and ministry and department leaders 
participated in the session (ITAR-TASS 10 Mar 94). 

   President Yeltsin also abolished the Information Resources 
Administration (IRA), an organization tasked with "rapidly providing 
all Russian territories down to the rayon level with information on 
events in the country and abroad."  The IRA installed high 
technology information systems, which it acquired from Western 
companies, in order to transmit news agency reports, official 
information from federal authorities, and Foreign Intelligence 
Service analytical materials to chiefs of administration at all 
levels.  Officials in the Security and Communications ministries 
were concerned that Western special services had enlisted the aid of 
these companies to install special equipment making it possible for 
them to secretly monitor Russian Government communications.  With 
the abolishment of the IRA, the system was dismantled and all of the 
IRA's functions were transferred to the Federal Government 
Communications Agency, alleged to be the former telecommunications 
service of the KGB (SEGODNYA, 30 Jul 93; MOSKOVSKIY KOMSOMOLETS, 5 
Feb 94; KOMMERSANT-DAILY, 23 Feb 94; IZVESTIYA, 24 Feb 94). 

   According to General Nikolay Golushko, former director of the 
Federal Counterintelligence Service, Yeltsin issued an edict 
reorganizing the service on 5 January 1994.  The document detailing 
the structure and functions of the reorganized service have remained 
classified.  Golushko said that although he recommended that 
responsibility for the protection of state secrets be devolved to 
the organizations directly concerned with them, his recommend- ation 
was apparently not accepted.  Ultimate responsibility continues to 
reside with the Counterintelligence Service (IZVESTIYA, 2 Mar 94). 

   On 11 February, President Yeltsin signed a directive which 
invested officials of 38 ministries, state committees and federal 
services with the authority to classify information as a "state 
secret".  The directive was severely criticized in a long IZVESTIYA 
editorial.  IZVESTIYA  was willing to concede the necessity of 
giving this authority to defense organizations and organiza- tions 
dealing with sensitive technologies, such as the Ministry of Atomic 
Power, but questioned why it was needed by the ministries of 
agriculture, health, and environmental protection.  Only seven 
ministries out of 23 were not given classification authority--the 
ministries of justice, labor, the social protection of the 
population, cooperation with the CIS states, educa- tion, culture, 
and affairs of nationalities and regional policy.  IZVESTIYA said 
that, in addition to abuses which could occur with such a widespread 
distribution of classification authority, the nation would suffer 
enormous financial costs as well.  IZVESTIYA said that it was unable 
"to understand the logic of the president's document."  Contrary to 
those who have com- plained about the revelations of "state 
secrets," IZVESTIYA warned that "by 'closing' and 'making secret' 
our scientific research institutes and 'hush-hush' institutions, by 
fencing ourselves off from each other with a barrier of departmental 
instructions and special sections, we drastically delayed the 
development of our own science and technology" (IZVESTIYA, 26 Feb 
94). 

   Similar sentiments were expressed by Viktor Loshak, chief editor 
of MOSCOW NEWS, the paper which originally published Mirzayanov's 
article in 1992.  "The bureaucratic stratum between the men of power 
on one hand and readers and television viewers on the other is 
becoming wider and wider." "When such things are happening, secrecy 
is paramount.  One wants to avoid public attention, but at the same 
time to be in a position to define the dosage and truthfulness of 
information and to shape public opinion."  "Secrets must be guarded 
closely.  It takes more than just Lubyanka (KGB prison) to do this. 
Where are you masters of Glavlit [Main Administration for 
Safeguarding State Secrets in the Press]?  A censorship order has 
come in" (MOSKOVSKIYE NOVOSTI, 20-27 Feb 94). 

   According to ITAR-TASS correspondent Tamara Ivanova, journalists 
are already complaining about infringements of their right to 
information in contraven- tion of the law on the press.  The 
Judicial Chamber on Information, a new office of the president, 
discussed the issue at its first meeting on 17 February.  According 
to the Judicial Chamber's president, Professor Anatoliy Vengerov, 
the "refusal to supply journalists with information that does not 
contain state secrets may be the reason for legal proceedings (ITAR- 
TASS, 17 Feb 94). 
   (AUTHOR: TYSON.  FOR QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL 
CHIEF, COMMONWEALTH OF INDEPENDENT STATES BRANCH AT (703) 733-6332). 
GIG/7APR94/POLCHF/TECHTF/TID/taa 08/1516z apr 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-21 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000021294001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   9 April 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
FOUO -- DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRITIONS, THE 
FOLLOWING ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS 
FOREIGN PRESS SURVEY--WEST EUROPE 
<H3> <TI>      FOREIGN PRESS SURVEY--FB PSE 94-014--WEST EUROPE </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       FOREIGN PRESS SURVEY--FB PSE 94-014--WEST EUROPE </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
Europe      Economic Review:  WESTERN EUROPE Vol. III, No. 14, 07 
April 1994 

   Notice To Readers:  FOREIGN MEDIA SURVEY is a series published by 
FBIS Europe/Latin America Group featuring brief summaries of foreign 
media reports on topical issues, compiled from the most recent 
sources available to FBIS. 

   Europe Economic Review (EER) is a subseries of FOREIGN MEDIA 
SURVEY published by the West and East European Divisions of 
Europe/Latin America Group with contributions from FBIS overseas 
bureaus.  The EER is intended to supplement coverage of European 
economic issues by the FBIS Daily Report for West and East Europe, 
and other FBIS publications.  Foreign news, feature, and editorial 
reports selected for summary in this publication normally do not 
appear in other FBIS publications. 

   The EER is published in two editions, one for Western Europe 
(also including media coverage of Canada and Turkey), and the other 
for Eastern Europe.  Drawing primarily from domestic media sources 
of these countries but also using other foreign media where 
appropriate, the EER focuses on national and regional economic 
issues, such as economic competitiveness, regional economic 
integration, economic reforms and other changes in economic 
policies, and foreign trade and investment. 

   FOREIGN MEDIA SURVEY is a U.S. Government publication.  Its 
contents in no way represent the policies, views, or attitudes of 
the U.S. Government.  All comment or analysis contained herein is 
attributable to the cited media source, unless otherwise indicated. 

   TABLE OF CONTENTS 

   FEATURES:  France--Controversy Over Work Benefits Continues 

   EU 

   Most New Jobs in Public Sector 

   FRANCE 

   Reaction to U.S. Unfair Trade List; editorial on Bentsen, Change 
in International Goals; Balladur Support for Swedish Matra Sale 
Reported; Socialist Party Details Economic Platform; Fears of Losing 
Bosnia Contracts Expressed; Coface To Go Private; Business Confident 
in Recovery 

   GERMANY 

   G-7 Jobs Summit Viewed as Ineffective; Russia Presses For Special 
Export Credit Terms; Belarus Business Potential, Problems Probed; 
Czech Skoda Firm Buys Thuringian Company; Privatization of Heavy 
Machinery Complex Near Completion 

   GREECE 

   Greece-Cyprus Defense Cooperation; Investments for 1994 Seen 
'Meager' 

   ITALY 

   Treasury Minister Insists on Lower Interest Rates; New Japanese 
Auto Import Quota Criticized; Businessmen Say Single Market Brings 
No Benefit 11 

   ECONOMIC BRIEFS 

   France, Greece, Sweden 

   FEATURE 

   France: Controversy Over Work Benefits Continues 

   Despite Prime Minister Edouard Balladur's withdrawal of the Job 
Training Contract (CIP) provision of his Five-Year Employment law, 
which allowed lower minimum wages (SMIC) for soffle youth categories 
and provoked student demonstrations throughout the country, French 
social unrest over other provisions in the law is likely to 
continue, according to French media reporting.  The media lays the 
blame for much of this unrest on the national education system and 
entrenched French adherence to "fixed and outdated ideas" of social 
fairness. 

   Economic journalist Delphine Gerard comments in the Paris 
business daily LA TRIBUNE DESFOSSES on 30 March that following the 
turmoil over the CIP (which some opponents dubbed a Youth SMIC), the 
government again faces controversy over implementing provisions of 
Prime Minister Edouard Balladur's Five-Year Employment law.  A 
government decree proposal currently being reviewed on changing the 
rules for the 40-hour work week has been rejected by the labor 
unions and may provoke more social unrest in the weeks to come. 
This rejection, combined with the reservations of employers, is a 
new "hard blow" for the government, Gerard maintains, and the 
government may have to again do an "about face" as it did in the CIP 
controversy.  In fact, Labor Minister Michel Giraud has already 
indicated that he could not pass the law "by force."  According to 
Gerard, labor unions and employers are reticent to support such an 
ambitious" bill, which provides companies flexibility in managing 
work schedules, for various reasons.  Workers Force (FO) indicated 
that "it will fight against the law since it flies in the face of 50 
years of the Labor Code."  The General Confederation of Labor (CGT) 
denounced the bill for its "destruction and aggravation" of working 
and living conditions. 

   The proposed decree states that companies which work in 
"successive teams" will be exempt from current work week rules.  The 
exemption will allow service industries such as banking, retail, and 
insurance to maintain flexibility in managing work hours.  The law 
would allow these companies to remain open six days a week and at 
night.  Moreover, the decree stipulates a number of individual 
guarantees: 

   * A minimal daily rest period of 11 consecutive hours. 

   * A weekly rest period of 35 consecutive hours. 

   * Maintenance of two consecutive days off, one of which would be 
Sunday, in industries where this already exists. 

   * A 48-hour rest period per week for all workers, replacing the 
initial formula of two nonconsecutive days off. 

   According to the decree, the new guarantees will partially enact 
into domestic law the Community directive of 23 November 1993 on the 
management of work time. 

   Editor-in-chief Philippe Labarde, writing in LA TRIBUNE DESFOSSES 
on 23 March, blames the strong reactions against the CIP on problems 
in the national education system, the government's failure to 
address them, and French society's refusing to give up its ideas of 
social fairness.  The CIP, Labarde states, was simply the "final 
straw" which highlighted the unemployment problem French youth face 
today.  While it has been largely accepted that unskilled youth must 
submit to free market labor laws, it has suddenly become evident to 
those with diplomas--those who have completed the national education 
courses--that their "good conduct" has led them to an impasse. 
Labarde describes this as a rude awakening for this group which 
points out the inequities of the national education system.  While 
the goals of this system come from laudable sentiments??raising the 
                                                     ?? 
level of education in France--the system itself failed to verify 
whether there were jobs available which corresponded to the 
education received. 

   For not having done this elementary analysis, France now finds 
itself in crisis and its youth suffering and saying so.  Labarde 
argues it is useless to point fingers at the guilty, since the guilt 
is collective.  In any event, for France to get out of this 
profound" economic crisis will be difficult, Labarde concludes.  He 
warns that for anyone to use the crisis politically would be 
demagoguery or to use it economically in the name of "who knows what 
free-market philosophy" would be dangerous. 

   Labarde continues discussing the crisis over youth unemployment 
in the 24 March LA TRIBUNE DESFOSSES, claiming that French society 
is grid-locked over the issue.  He notes that conservative Prime 
Minister Edouard Balladur and Socialist former Prime Minister Michel 
Rocard have both said so.  The two also agree with Labarde that the 
guilt is collective.  The French, besides believing themselves more 
intelligent than others, have a "deranged egoism" which leads them, 
in the worst of cases, to always demand more, and in the best of 
cases to ferociously defend what they have acquired, whether it is 
social or other benefits.  Labarde characterizes the French as "sad 
people who merit being condemned for being piggish over their 
archaic SMIC (minimum wage), their luxurious lodgings, their 
scandalous paid vacations, not to mention their decidedly too 
generous social welfare benefits."  He adds that what is worse is 
that the moral and economic lessons which "the French do not know 
how to discuss" do not change their behavior.  They hunker down on 
what they have, even more so in periods of crisis. 

   Despite this "detestable gridlock," Labarde points out that the 
French are an "elite" which the world envies.  The nation may not be 
hunkering down over social benefits but over the fixed and out-dated 
ideas of social fairness behind them.  It is these same ideas which 
have formed policies that had hitherto been successful.  Labarde 
concludes that it would be hard to imagine how to explain that the 
policies which brought success are now bringing about the opposite. 
(DiI)  (Paris LA TRIBUNE DESFOSSES in French 30 Mar 94 p 4; 
Paris LA TRIBUNE DESFOSSES in French 23 Mar 94 p 40; 24 Mar 94 p 36) 

   EU 

   BUSINESSMEN SAY SINGLE MARKET BRINGS NO BENEFIT--A recent poll 
conducted by the Harris Research Center among 507 European 
businessmen showed that 51 percent of those interviewed do not 
believe the Single Market has brought them any benefits.  On the 
other hand, 68 percent believe that Europe can maintain its 
competitiveness.  Those who are pessimistic on competitiveness say 
the greatest challenge comes from the emerging economies such as 
Taiwan, Korea, Malaysia, and Indonesia, with their surplus underpaid 
workforce and dynamic growth.  The United States and Japan are not 
perceived as a threat to European competitiveness.  The poll was 
conducted in January-February 1994 among British, French, German, 
Italian, Spanish, Dutch, and Belgian businessmen and managers.  (AB) 

   "Has the Single Market brought any benefits?"  (Replies are in 
percentages) 


                   Yes     No         No Change           Don't Know 

   Great Britain    23     76             1                    -- 
   France            9     34            56                    1 
   Germany          12     64            24                    1 
   Italy            21     42            33                    4 
   Spain            42     44            14                    -- 
   Holland          26     62            12                    -- 
   Belgium          17     36            45                    2 

           (Milan IL MONDO in Italian 7-14 Mar 94 p 7) 



   MOST NEW JOBS IN PUBLIC SECTOR--In the countries now comprising 
the European Union (EU), almost all of the new jobs created between 
1976 and 1990 were in the public sector, according to a report by 
the European Round Table of Industrialists (ERT).  The private 
sector was "hardly capable" of creating new jobs in most of the 
countries during the same period.  Although employment increased by 
a good 10 million workers, or 8 percent, during the years covered by 
the report, nearly 97 percent of that increase was accounted for by 
public-sector employment.  Germany, for example, created 2.5 million 
jobs but two-thirds of these were in the public sector.  In France, 
Belgium, Italy, and especially Spain, the number of public-sector 
jobs actually increased more than net overall employment.  These 
figures present a sharp contrast to employment developments during 
the same period in the United States and Japan, where proportionally 
more new jobs were created, most of which were in the private 
sector.  The ERT report cautions that "many of these not very 
productive jobs in the (EU's) public sector could be lost again in 
the medium term under the pressure of empty coffers and high public 
debts."  (JS)  (Berlin DIE WELT in German 19 Mar 94 p 16) 

   FRANCE 

   REACTION TO U.S. UNFAIR TRADE LIST--According to Georges 
Potriquet, writing in the economic section of LE FIGARO, France is 
unlikely to refute its inclusion in the list published by U.S. Trade 
Representative Mickey Kantor naming those countries which do not 
have open markets.  While Potriquet notes that the importance of the 
list should not be ignored, he points out that since France is 
currently a partner with the United States in trying to include a 
social clause in the final version of the GATT agreement, the 
government will most likely allow any counter charges to be handled 
at the EU Community level.  Potriquet reports that the EU has 
already announced that by the end of the month it will publish "a 
report on trade barriers erected by the United States against EU 
products." (DiI)  (Paris LE FIGARO Le Fig-Eco supplement in French 
2, 3 Apr 94 p I) 

   EDITORIAL ON BENTSEN, CHANGE IN INTERNATIONAL GOALS--Washington 
correspondent Jacqueline Grapin, writing in LE FIGARO, points to 
recent speeches by U.S. Treasury Secretary Lloyd Bentsen as proof 
that the United States no longer uses its presence in international 
financial organizations as a "means of philanthropy, hiding its 
entrepreneurial spirit behind humanitarian rhetoric," but now openly 
uses its membership in them to increase its economic influence in 
the world.  Members of Congress demand that the administration be 
accountable to the electorate, Grapin notes,  and in their view the 
future unit of account will be the creation of employment in the 
United States.  To respond to this pressure, the U.S. administration 
has taken numerous steps to make the most of its large influence in 
international financial organizations, such as at the World Bank 
where the United States has increased the size of its commercial 
section in the office of the Bank's U.S. administrator.  Grapin 
notes that it is well known that U.S. companies often are told of 
new bids for large projects linked to World Bank programs before the 
projects are even reviewed by the Bank's administrative council. 
Evidently, Grapin writes, the new goals of the current U.S. 
administration are to act for the good of "America Inc." and should 
make Europeans "stop and think" and should prod them into 
"mobilizing." 

   Grapin argues that final proof of such a change in U.S. goals can 
be found in recent speeches by Bentsen and she quotes these speeches 
extensively.  In particular, while she points out that Bentsen is 
not responsible for U.S. diplomacy but for defending the financial 
interests of the United States, she contends that Bentsen "spoke the 
truth" when he requested funds from Congress for multilateral 
financial institutions.  Grapin cites Bentsen as saying before the 
foreign affairs section of the House budget committee that the 
"clear lesson" for the United States is that the money the United 
States sends abroad through international financial organizations 
comes back to the United States in multiples through exports and new 
jobs for Americans.  Furthermore, Grapin quoted Bentsen as stating 
that U.S. goals for multilateral banks in 1994 were to increase U.S. 
exports, reduce U.S. budgetary costs, and to reinforce U.S. 
interests in strategic regions.  Grapin adds that in Honolulu before 
the Asia Pacific Economic Cooperation (APEC) conference, Bentsen 
gave further warning to Europeans when he said, "Our most important 
trading partners are those in the Pacific region." (DiI)  (Paris LE 
FIGARO Le Fig-Eco supplement in French 30 Mar 94 p XI) 

   BALLADUR SUPPORT FOR SWEDISH MATRA SALE REPORTED--According to a 
report in Sweden's daily SVENSKA DAGBLADET cited by Paris daily LA 
TRIBUNE DESFOSSES, Prime Minister Edouard Balladur sent a letter on 
2 March to Sweden's Prime Minister Carl Bildt in which he "pleaded 
in favor" of a Swedish purchase of the French Mica missiles 
manufactured by Matra.  The Swedish response was reportedly "cold" 
and "gloomy."  The Swedish daily, generally well informed according 
to LA TRIBUNE DESFOSSES, said that the letter pointed out the 
industrial advantages of a Mica order, which would allow Matra to 
collaborate with two Swedish companies--Saab Missiles and Ericsson 
Radar Electronics--to supply the Mica electronic guidance systems. 
However, some unnamed Swedish military sources stated that the U.S. 
and British Aerospace missiles, competitors for the order, have the 
advantage of being "tested" in the Persian Gulf War. (DiI)  (Paris 
LA TRIBUNE DESFOSSES in French 28 Mar 94 p 10) 

   SOCIALIST PARTY DETAILS ECONOMIC PLATFORM--The national council 
of the Socialist Party (PS) met on 30 March and from that meeting 
came details of its economic platform for the European Parliament 
elections this summer.  The following are the planks of the 
platform: 

   * Make unemployment a priority.  The PS wants a large EU loan of 
1,300 billion francs (Fr) over five years to finance large public 
works projects and neighborhood renovations. 

   * Establish job stimulation policies in industries protected from 
competition.  EU member states should collectively reduce work weeks 
to avoid competition. 

   * Review taxes in terms of their effects on employment.  The PS 
contends that taxes "should burden capital and not only labor."  The 
PS wants minimum tax rates on company and real estate revenues to 
avoid the tax competition practiced in the EU.  The PS would like 
the principle of Community preference to be maintained for countries 
or zones which practice national preference.  The party also wants 
aide to EU industry to be encouraged. 

   * Additionally, the PS wants a large public service sector, 
guaranteed norms on minimum wages and maximum work hours, and the 
creation of a statute on European rights assuring real participation 
of wage earners in decisionmaking. (DiI)  (Paris LES ECHOS in French 
31 Mar 94 p 2) 

   FEARS OF LOSING BOSNIA CONTRACTS EXPRESSED--Marie-France Calle 
reports in LES ECHOS that the French Government, which wants to 
improve chances for French companies to garner reconstruction 
contracts after the war ends in Bosnia, are sending specialists from 
French industry--under uniform--as part of the military reservists 
called up to manage the transition from military to civilian 
business in Sarajevo.  Three have already departed for Sarajevo: an 
engineer from the construction company Spie Batignolles, an official 
from the National Railroad Company (SNCF), and another from the 
General Directorate of Civilian Aviation.  Additionally, the French 
ambassador to Sarajevo is asking for a French economic expansion 
office to be quickly established in that city.  These actions are in 
response to French fears that they will be at a disadvantage in 
relation to Britain and the United States--seen as poised to win 
again the lion's share of postwar reconstruction contracts as they 
did in the Persian  Gulf War--when it comes time to rebuild 
Saraj evo. 

   Noting the importance of Sarajevo as a starting point for 
developing the rest of the country, Calle contends that while the 
French were the main UN force in Sarajevo and "have paid with their 
blood," it is the "Anglo-Saxons who are the more pragmatic."  The 
United States--not content with distributing humanitarian aid--has 
sent gas, water, and electricity specialists to the area.  The 
French view these specialists as clearing a path for U.S. companies 
in the postwar reconstruction.  Despite reassurances from Rob Rowe, 
director of projects for the International Rescue Committee, that 
"everyone will have their chance" to bid on contracts, the French 
believe there is worse Anglo-Saxon influence to come, according to 
Calle.  On 4 March, the Security Council of the United Nations 
passed a resolution to send a joint committee, made up of U.S. and 
British experts, to Sarajevo.  The committee is to evaluate the 
financial needs for the reconstruction of that city.  Calle point 
out that seeing this joint committee leave for Sarajevo "made French 
blood curdle."  However, nobody could explain why France had voted 
for the resolution without thinking of calling on its own experts. 
"The Americans and the English are evaluating the needs and when 
money comes, they will be well placed" to pursue contracts, stated 
an unnamed French source in Sarajevo.  Calle adds that although the 
French Government is trying to improve France's position in postwar 
civilian management, French experience in this field comes from 
Algeria and Vietnam and is tarnished by overtones of colonialism. 
(DiI)  (Paris LES ECHOS in French 24 Mar 94 p 6) 

   COFACE TO GO PRIVATE--Jean-Pierre Robin, writing in the economic 
supplement of LE FIGARO, reports that the government-owned export 
credit insurer Coface will automatically become privatized when the 
majority of its stockholders are sold to the private sector.  This 
"derivative" type of privatization will take place when the large 
government-owned insurance company UAP, which owns 20 percent of 
Coface, is sold in May.  Besides UAP, Coface has some of France's 
largest companies as shareholders, including the French Foreign 
Trade Bank (BFCE) which owns 20 percent and the Societe Generale, 
Credit Lyonnais, and BNP banks.  The Council of State, consulted to 
see if the 1993 privatization law applied to Coface, has responded 
favorably.  However, Robin claims that despite the privatization of 
Coface, the company will still have problems because of its 
relationship to the government. 

   Coface President Yves Cosse details three possible problems which 
may plague the company.  First, because of its function as guarantor 
for government-backed foreign credit, there will always have to be 
"transparency" between the government and the company, which will 
justify government oversight.  Secondly, government officials will 
always be concerned about changes in Co face ownership and may want 
to keep a "golden share" of the company to retain some influence. 
Finally, the directors of Coface will have the double obligation to 
gain the confidence of the shareholders and of the Economy Ministry. 
(DiI)  (Paris LE FIGARO Le Fig-Eco supplement in French 31 Mar 94 p 
IV) 

   BUSINESS CONFIDENT IN RECOVERY--According to a report published 
by the National Institute of Economic Statistics (INSEE) on 29 
March, business leaders in most industries are "resolutely 
optimistic" about the prospects of increased industrial activity. 
Queried at the beginning of March, these business leaders' positive 
responses were sharply in the majority when asked how they viewed 
industrial activity in the months to come.  As for their own 
prospects, on which businessmen are traditionally cautious, they too 
were more positive.  For the first time in months there was a five- 
point positive response compared with the four-point negative 
response during the two preceding months.  In times of economic 
prosperity there is usually a 20-point positive response. 

   However, other than the automobile industry, the only industries 
right now that are benefitting from a real recovery are intermediate 
goods such as steel, chemicals, and plastics.  Other industries are 
still having a hard time improving their businesses, especially the 
equipment manufacturing industry, which Jean-Louis de Fommervault of 
the Mechanical Engineering Industry Federation sees as in a state of 
stabilization with investment near zero and production delays of at 
least six months per machine.  Fommervault predicts that a recovery 
for this industry is "not guaranteed for 1994." (Dil) 

   (In hardcopy version of the Economic Review, there is a graph of 
the above monthly industrial poll.) 

   GERMANY 

   G-7 JOBS SUMMIT VIEWED AS INEFFECTIVE--A commentary by Erwin 
Single in the Berlin TAGESZEITUNG criticizes the March G-7 Jobs 
Summit in Detroit as unproductive.  According to Single, the 
measures discussed at the summit--lower wages, technology promotion, 
lower interest rates, social welfare cutbacks, training, 
flexibility, and deregulation--are ridiculed by labor market 
experts.  Single refutes the U.S. claim to have created five times 
more jobs than the Europeans over the last two decades, arguing that 
many of these jobs involve unstable, low-paying, part-time work.  He 
asserts that the only result of the summit was the confirmation that 
"in the future, there will be no common strategy by the industrial 
nations against mass unemployment."  (WS)  (Berlin DIE TAGESZEITUNG 
in German 17 Mar 94 p 10) 

   RUSSIA PRESSES FOR SPECIAL EXPORT CREDIT TERMS--A 555-million- 
German-mark (DM) sale of railway cars to Russia in 1994 faces 
cancellation if the German Government does not approve special terms 
for the accompanying Hermes export credit guarantees.  Russia wants 
to be excused from the required 15-percent down payment and wants to 
receive the first three years of credit interest-free.  However, 
these same terms applied to business with CIS countries prior to 1 
January 1994 and consequently Hermes deficits on business with the 
CIS grew to DM4.5 billion.  Berlin-based Deutsche Waggonbau (DWA), 
the potential railcar manufacturer, stands to lose some 50 percent 
of its sales volume if the contract falls through.  There would also 
be severe ramifications for the company's suppliers in Saxony- 
Anhalt, which employ some 8,000 workers.  DWA managers, along with 
land and regional politicians, are attempting to persuade the 
Federal Government to grant the requested exemption.  (CW) 
(Duesseldorf HANDELSBLATT in German 24 Mar 94 p 17) 

   BELARUS BUSINESS POTENTIAL, PROBLEMS PROBED--A trade mission from 
North Rhine-Westphalia negotiating in Minsk cited numerous 
hindrances to potentially profitable business operations in Belarus. 
The Belarus Government has blocked access to foreign currency 
accounts--possibly even for firms with partial foreign ownership- 
-and has banned foreign ownership of land.  It has also launched a 
hotel and convention center project which would compete with a 
proposed German-backed trade center in Minsk.  According to the 
German delegation, the shaky financial status of Belarus's companies 
has further impeded trade, necessitating DM30O million in Hermes 
export credit insurance in 1994, in addition to barter arrangements. 
Belarus's political instability, its lack of natural resources, and 
the nuclear contamination of its agricultural products were cited as 
additional disincentives to investment.  On the other hand, the high 
skill level of the Belarus workforce has preserved modern optical, 
precision measuring, and laser industries while German entrepreneurs 
have reported successes in retail trade and the machine tool 
industry. (CW)  (Duesseldorf HANDELSBLATT in German 24 Mar 94 p 12) 

   CZECH SKODA FIRM BUYS THURINGIAN COMPANY--The Pilsen-based Skoda 
company, a machine tool and assembly line maker, has bought the 
Trust Agency's largest holding in Thuringia, the metal stamping 
press maker Umformtechnik Erfurt.  Skoda, with annual sales of DM8O0 
million, is among the Czech Republic's largest companies, and is the 
first Czech firm to establish activity in eastern Germany.  Upon 
Czech Government approval of the purchase, project financing will be 
provided by a bank consortium, by investment money, and credit 
guarantees from the Thuringian Land government, and through a 5- 
percent holding by the newly formed Thuringian Industrial 
Participation Company.  Negotiations are under way to bring in 
additional investors from the CIS, North America, and the Far East. 
(CW)  (Duesseldorf HANDELSBLATT in German 28 Mar 94 p 13) 

   PRIVATIZATION OF HEAVY MACHINERY COMPLEX NEAR COMPLETION--The 
Leipzig-based Takraf company, the successor to the former GDR's 
heavy machinery production combine, will complete privatization by 
mid-year, according to Klaus von Dohnanyi, chairman of the firm's 
board of supervisors.  The combine's 61 production sites, which 
produce harbor cranes, elevators, factory assembly lines, open-cast 
mining equipment, and general machinery, presented the Trust Agency 
with one of its most difficult privatization problems.  Agency Vice 
President Hero Brahms asserts that Takraf "is also a model case of 
how a number of competitive, mid-sized units have been created from 
the break-up and restructuring of a former GDR combine."  Of the 33 
firms belonging to the combine, only three are left without new 
owners, and only three had to be shut down.  New owners have 
guaranteed investment of about DM256 million, supplementing the 
roughly DM100 million raised by the Trust Agency.  In contrast to 
other combines, Takraf was essentially solvent and was able to meet 
preexisting obligations.  (CW)  (Frankfurt/Main FRANKFURTER 
ALLGEMEINE in German 25 Mar 94 p 20) 

   GREECE 

   FIRMS TO PROFIT FROM GREECE-CYPRUS DEFENSE COOPERATION--Following 
the conclusion of a defense agreement between Greece and Cyprus, 
Greek companies will cooperate in building defense infrastructures- 
-such as port and airport facilities--in Cyprus.  In the talks 
between Greek Minister of Defense Yerasimos Arsenis and the Cypriot 
leadership it was decided that Greek defense industry experience and 
know-how will be fully taken advantage of.  A large number of heavy- 
load trucks are being ordered from the Greek Vehicle Industry 
(ELVO), which is also interested in selling Cyprus more of its 
acclaimed Leonidhas tanks.  Since the new defense agreement 
emphasizes air defenses, Greek companies may be able to sell medium- 
range missiles in Cyprus as well as being able to convert some 
stationary units to mobile units.  They also envision jointly 
developing in Greece and in Cyprus the integrated Artemis-30 weapons 
system.  Finally, the agreement may allow the Greek Weapons Industry 
(EVO) to sell portable weapons there.  The joint defense agreement 
forecasts expenditures of 170 million Cypriot liras in the next two 
to three years in addition to the 227 million liras in regular 1994 
budget defense allocations. (RM)  (Athens TA NEA in Greek 21 Mar 94 
p 8) 

   INVESTMENTS FOR 1994 SEEN 'MEAGER' --According to a survey 
conducted by the polling group ICAP among 250 representative 
companies, the continued economic crisis in Greece is affecting 
investment programs, which are expected to be "meager" this year. 
Some 44.9 percent of the companies surveyed do not plan to make any 
investments while 32 percent will, 19.8 percent did not know, and 
3.3 percent did not answer.  Reduced investments and rates of return 
that generally do not exceed the inflation rate will affect 
employment.  Of the 250 firms surveyed, only 15 percent expected to 
hire more workers, while 64.6 percent said they would maintain the 
present number of workers, 13.3 percent envisioned a reduction of 
their work force, 3.8 percent did not know, and 3.3 percent did not 
answer.  (RM)  (Athens I KATHIMERINI in Greek 27 Mar 94) 

   ITALY 

   TREASURY MINISTER INSISTS ON LOWER INTEREST RATES--During side 
discussions with his foreign counterparts at the Detroit Job Summit, 
Treasury Minister Piero Barucci said more courage is needed in 
continuing the current policy of lowering European interest rates. 
Barucci particularly called for the German Bundesbank to continue to 
do so, saying that its monetary policy, which is crucial for Europe, 
has up to now been conducted in a flexible way.  Barucci said that 
the Bundesbank should not be too concerned about the effects of 
lower rates on inflation and exchange rates, especially since 
inflation seems to be under control, and added that a limited 
devaluation of European currencies should not cause much of a 
problem.  He also said that Italy strongly opposes "protectionist 
trends," pointing out that they would not solve structural 
unemployment in Europe and would instead provoke trade retaliation. 
(AB)  (Milan CORRIERE DELLA SERA in Italian 15 Mar 94 p 19) 

   NEW JAPANESE AUTO IMPORT QUOTA CRITICIZED--An article in LA 
STAMPA characterizes the Italians as particularly critical of the 
new Japanese automobile import quota established during the last 
round of negotiations between the EU Commission and the Japanese 
Foreign Trade Ministry.  The article notes that Italy will have to 
increase its share of Japanese auto imports by 21 percent in 1994- 
-from 38,000 to 47,000 automobiles.  Although the total increase for 
the whole EU is only 0.4 percent--from 980,000 to 984,000--countries 
with lower quotas for automobile imports such as Italy, Spain, 
France, and Portugal will have to absorb larger percentages of 
overall imports to bring them closer to the 10-percent average for 
the EU.  An unnamed EU Commission spokesman explained that Italy's 
quota of Japanese imports is currently fixed at a low 4.5 percent, 
therefore it must absorb the largest increase.  The article adds 
that in February Foreign Trade Minister Paolo Baratta wrote to the 
EU Commission asking that Italy's quota remain the same and he is 
still waiting for a final decision. (AB)  (Turin LA STAMPA in 
Italian 20 Mar 94 p 27) 

   ECONOMIC BRIEFS 

   France 

   --Giat Industries' weapons group announced it will reduce its 
work force by 242 positions during 1994 as part of overall plan to 
downsize by 1,525 in two years. . .other Giat businesses, Defense 
Ministry, civil service to offer retraining, placement to surplus 
employees (Paris LE FIGARO 31 Mar 94 p VI). 

   Greece 

   --Opposition New Democracy (ND) urging government to levy taxes, 
adopt measures to head off economic collapse with offer to share 
political cost...however, Finance Ministry under strong trade union, 
government, and Panhellenic Socialist Movement (PASOK) pressure to 
ease criteria for determining professionals' income...doing so would 
increase votes in upcoming Euroelections.  (I KATHIMERINI 22 Mar 94 
p 21) 

   --Two newly-discovered Prinos oil deposits reported as  rather 
"poor"...first deposit produced 320 barrels per day, second 3,000 
barrels per day with oil of fair quality although high in sulfur 
content...nonetheless, deposits seen expanding oil development in 
area. (ELEVTHEROTIPIA 12 Mar 94 p 44) 

   --According to Union of Greek Banks, deposits in foreign banks by 
private individuals, commercial companies have risen from $5.12 
billion in 1982 to $7.29 billion in 1988, $10.90 billion in 
1992...rise due to fears of drachma devaluation, large size of 
underground economy.  (I KATHIMERINI 16 Mar 94 p 21) 

   --Inquiry conducted among 250 firms found almost one in four 
industrial companies with sales over 1 billion drachmas out 
performed inflation in 1993 with increased profits, fewer 
losses.  companies expected to invest more because of lower interest 
rates. (TO VIMA TIS KIRIAKIS 20 Mar 94 p D1) 

   Sweden 

   --Svedala, one of world's leading manufacturers of mineral 
processing products, systems, material handling expanding in 
Asia...next largest market after U.S. with 1.5 billion kronor in 
sales.  particularly active in China, India.  (SVENSKA DAGBLADET 20 
Mar 94 p 23) 

   Anilla B. (703-733-6283), Roger B. (703-733-6508), Robert H. 
(703-733-6504), Dian I. (703-733-6286), Rosa M. (703-733-6287), Joel 
S. (703-733-6503), Wendy S. (703-733-6506), and Charles W. (703-733- 
6473) contributed to this Foreign Media Survey. 
ELAG/07APR/ECONF/WED/ta 08/1627z apr 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-22 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000021394001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   9 April 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U. S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-08APR94-BALKANS 
<H3> <TI>      Iliescu Calls for an End to Yugoslav Sanctions </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Iliescu Calls for an End to Yugoslav Sanctions </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY 
                               Suggesting that Romanian willingness to enforce United Nations 
economic sanctions against Belgrade is waning, Romanian President 
Ion Iliescu, during a visit to Bucharest by Serbian President 
Slobodan Milosevic, criticized the sanctions as counterproductive 
to the search for peace in former Yugoslavia.  Although Romanian 
authorities had indicated their weakening support for the 
sanctions since early this year, Iliescu's criticism was the 
strongest authoritative statement to emerge so far from the 
Romanian Government.  Despite Romania's wavering, other bordering 
states are apparently holding the line on supporting sanctions. 
                        END SUMMARY 
   Breaking ranks with other neighbors of former Yugoslavia, Romania 
has called for an end to the UN sanctions against Belgrade. 
Speaking at a press conference during Milosevic's 5 April visit 
to Bucharest, Iliescu declared the UN embargo a "forceful 
measure" akin to military action that does not contribute to 
"finding a solution to the problem" in former Yugoslavia.  As an 
alternative, he argued, lifting the sanctions would be "an 
important element" in "creating premises for finding peaceful 
solutions" to the conflict.  While Iliescu did not go so far as 
to declare that Romania would not continue to enforce the 
sanctions, he and Milosevic did agree that Romania and the 
Federal Republic of Yugoslavia (FRY--Serbia and Montenegro) make 
preparations for immediate resumption of trade pending the 
lifting of the embargo (Bucharest radio, 5 April). 
   Recent statements from the Romanians, who have long complained of 
the adverse effects on their economy of the UN sanctions against 
the FRY, foreshadowed Iliescu's 5 April remarks.  Foreign 
Minister Teodor Melanescu recently expressed support for the 
"slackening or complete lifting of the sanctions" as progress is 
made "during negotiations" toward a peaceful settlement of the 
conflict (Rompres, 1 April).  In a January interview, Iliescu 
expressed his displeasure with continuation of the sanctions. 
Criticizing unnamed "international bodies" for not treating the 
crisis in former Yugoslavia with "adequate understanding," he 
charged that they were taking an "approach" that "has been quite 
dangerous'' for Yugoslavia and ''for the stability'' of the the 
entire region."  The UN sanctions have caused "suffering to all 
innocent people'' and ''nobody stands to gain'' from the 
continuation of this abnormal situation" (Dimineata, 29-30 
January).  At about the same time, Bucharest radio quoted FRY 
Foreign Minister Vladislav Jovanovic's claims that, during 
Jovanovic's January visit to Bucharest, Iliescu said Romania had 
never advocated and never supported" the "inhuman and very 
harmful sanctions" (Bucharest radio, 25 January).  Iliescu has 
not been observed to deny the accuracy of Jovanovic's 
recollection. 
   Other States Claim Firm Stand 
   At least for now, the other states bordering the FRY continue to 
declare their intentions to do their best to enforce the 
sanctions: 
   -- Foreign Ministers Stanislav Daskalov of Bulgaria and Alfred 
Serreqi of Albania recently met in Tirana and, according to the 
Albanian media, declared that the "embargo against Serbia must 
not be lifted" (ATA, 29 March). 
   -- Following a visit to Belgrade, Hungarian Foreign Minister Geza 
Jeszensky reiterated his country's stance that Hungary "supports 
the lifting of sanctions" only if "Belgrade meets international 
expectations" (Budapest radio, 7 February).  Moreover, he denied 
that Hungary would "ease sanctions" enforcement "in return for a 
more tolerant policy" in the FRY toward Serbia's Hungarian 
minority population (MTI, 7 February). 
   -- While the Former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia has sought 
relief from the UN for the severe impact of the sanctions on its 
economy, President Kiro Gligorov has insisted that his country 
has "consistently" done its "part in the implementation" of the 
sanctions (Nova Makedonija, l October 1993). 
   Implications 
   While Iliescu did not threaten to end enforcement of sanctions in 
Romania as long as they are still legally in force, his 
statements suggest that Romanian officials are unlikely to take 
vigorous enforcement.  Indeed, Romanian border guards and customs 
officials may well take Iliescu's  remarks as a signal that they 
should look the other way at sanctions violators.  Moreover, 
other frontline states may question the wisdom of taking strong 
enforcement action if Romania begins to gain economically by 
allowing the sanctions regime to deteriorate on its borders. 
   (AUTHOR.  NASH.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF 
ANALYST, EUROPE/LATIN AMERICA GROUP, (703) 733-6120.) 
ELAG/GILISON/ta 08/1931z apr 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-23 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000021494001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   9 April 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-08APR94-NORTH KOREA 
<H3> <TI>      North Korea: Signs of Shortages Emerge </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       North Korea: Signs of Shortages Emerge </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Fresh      signs of consumer goods shortages have recently emerged in 
North Korean media.  Seeking to ease what seems like a desperate 
fuel situation, a 20 January article in the government paper 
Minju Choson urged the use of a heretofore untapped fuel 
resource: soot.  Soot, the article said, should be combined with 
unburned coal gleaned from ashes produced at industrial plants to 
make briquettes.  Putting the best face on a bad situation, the 
article claimed that briquettes made of soot and ash are odorless 
and can be used indoors for heating and cooking "like kerosene," 
because the sulfur compounds in them have already been burned 
off.  Since both soot and ash are abundant byproducts at the 
numerous boilers at thermal power plants and other industrial 
enterprises, the article went on, they should be "inexhaustible." 
The article conceded that the challenge now confronting the 
proponents of the scheme is learning how to separate "unburned 
coal" from ash for use in making briquettes and called on 
guidance functionaries'' to dedicate themselves to this task. 
   Pyongyang has also applied a similar recycling approach to the 
food sector.  A 28 January Minju Choson article touted North 
Korean scientific prowess that has created "artificial meat" out 
of soy bean dregs resulting from oil extraction.  This "tasty and 
nutritious" substance, the article claimed, is also easy to 
digest, keeps well, and is "very inexpensive." 
   (AUTHOR:  CHANG.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
ASIA DIVISION ANALYSIS TEAM, (703)-733-6534.) 
EAG/HEBBEL/ta 08/2007z apr 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-24 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000021594001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   12 April 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-11APR94-EGYPT 
<H3> <TI>      Cairo Ends Elections of Village Mayors to Boost Security </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Cairo Ends Elections of Village Mayors to Boost Security </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
SUMMARY 

                               In an evident effort to strengthen Cairo's control over the 
countryside--particularly in areas affected by Islamic militant 
violence--the government has pushed through parliament 
legislation abolishing the election of village leaders in favor 
of their appointment by the Interior Ministry.  Supporters of the 
change argued that many elected officials were unwilling to 
cooperate with the Ministry in maintaining security in the 
villages.  Roundly opposed by opposition officials and even by a 
number of ruling party deputies, the move continues Cairo's 
retreat in recent years from the democratization of local 
government--a trend probably inspired in large part by the 
current Islamic unrest. 
                                     END SUMMARY 
   Egypt's People's Assembly on 10 April approved a controversial 
bill abolishing the current system for choosing the "'umdah," or 
village mayor, and the assistant to the 'umdah known as "shaykh 
al-balad" (Al-Ahram international edition, 11 April).  Under the 
new law, the country's 3500 'umdahs and more than 20,000 shaykhs- 
-posts filled by election in one form or another since 1957--will 
be appointed by the Interior Ministry (See Note 1).  In a 
statement later repeated by Interior Minister Hasan al-Alfi, 
Minister of State for People's Assembly and Consultative Council 
Affairs Kamal al-Shadhili explained the change to the People's 
Assembly by asserting that more than 3O percent of the 'umdah 
posts have long been vacant "because the security situation is 
not stable" enough for elections to be held or because of 
disputes between village clans over election results (Al-Akhbar, 
29 March, Al-Ahram international edition, 1 April).  In defending 
the bill, Ahmad Abu-Zayd, representing the parliamentary majority 
bloc of the ruling National Democratic Party (NDP), asserted that 
the election system has "led to corruption of the administrative 
process" (Al-Ahram international edition, 29 April)--presumably 
because of the strong financial and political power concentrated 
in the hands of some village families. 
   (Note 1) Interior Minister Hasan al-Alfi has said that the 
'umdahs will be appointed by the Ministry on the basis of 
recommendations by several committees, probably comprising, inter 
alia, security officials, judges, and officials from his 
ministry, which will review nominations from each village (Al- 
Ahram international edition, 1 April). 
   Reaction to "Terrorism"     Proponents mostly refrained from 
directly referring to Islamic extremists when defending the bill, 
but they clearly alluded to them.  For example: 
   --According to the daily paper of the liberal centrist Al-Wafd 
party, Abu-Zayd asserted during the parliamentary debate that 
"the importance of the law flows from the circumstances that the 
country is currently undergoing" (Al-Wafd, 29 March). 
   --In a similar vein, Kamal Henri Badir, chairman of the 
assembly's Defense and National Security Committee, reportedly 
said he could find "no excuse for the uproar against this bill 
because whoever is familiar with the country's interest knows 
that security is the most important thing right now."  Implying 
that 'umdahs often conspire with villagers to cover up terrorist 
and other criminal activity, he lamented that "village gangs have 
made it impossible for the elected 'umdah to inform [the security 
authorities] of any abnormal activity among those who elected 
him" (Al-Akhbar, 29 March).  According to Al-Ahram, Badir claimed 
that even though the 'umdahs are a part of the central authority 
and receive their instructions from the Interior Ministry," a 
fear of losing votes has prompted them to "close their eyes to 
the crimes that take place in the villages" (29 March). 
   --Interior Minister al-Alfi told Al-Ahram that the 'umdah is 
responsible for "informing [the security authorities] promptly of 
any strangers entering the village or living in it, and working 
to prevent crime before it happens" (Al-Ahram international 
edition, 1 April).  An article in Al-Ahram's international 
edition said al-Alfi explained that the law "aims to tighten the 
fist of the security [organs] over the villages and choke off the 
sources of extremism and terrorism" (23 March). 
   --Muhammad Juwayli, a deputy of the ruling National Democratic 
Party (NDP), asserted during the debate that opponents of the 
bill are attempting to "outdo each other" in criticizing the 
legislation as a "retreat from democracy" and are "ignoring 
today's priority of confronting terrorism which threatens 
everyone--the majority [party] and the opposition" (Al-Ahram 
international edition, 29 March). 
   Opposition to the Bill 
   As Juwayli pointed out, opposition party leaders and others have 
strongly protested that the bill is a retreat from democracy. 
Nu'man Jum'ah, deputy head of the opposition al-Wafd party, was 
cited as asking rhetorically why all deputies of the People's 
Assembly should not be appointed for the same reasons used to 
justify the bill on appointing 'umdahs (Al-Akhbar Al-Yawm, 13 
March).  Even before the bill was submitted to the People's 
Assembly, Muslim Brotherhood official Mukhtar Nuh, treasurer of 
the Lawyers Syndicate, protested that the bill is part of a trend 
in recent years to replace elections with appointments, citing a 
February 1993 law that provides for the appointment of temporary 
boards to govern professional syndicates that fail to draw a 
third of their eligible voters to internal elections. 
   A number of NDP deputies have also expressed strong opposition to 
the bill.  Following the bill's approval by the National Defense 
and Security Committee, Al-Ahram's regular party politics page 
claimed  that "a majority of NDP deputies" still opposed the bill 
(Al-Ahram international edition, 16 March).  An Al-Wafd account 
of the committee's debate on the bill reported that some NDP 
representatives strongly attacked the bill.  One reportedly 
accused the committee chairman of attempting to ram the 
legislation through "dictatorially," leaving insufficient time 
for review.  The deputy suggested sarcastically that the 'umdah 
position should be renamed "Interior Ministry informer" (23 
February). 
   Despite dissent among ruling party representatives, the People's 
Assembly approved the bill on 1O April with only 26 of the body's 
454 members voting no and one abstaining--underscoring the 
government's determination to see the legislation enacted.  One 
Al-Ahram commentator observed during the bill's passage through 
the People's Assembly that "for the first time in a long period, 
strict party discipline has returned to the majority deputies" so 
as to allow for the "liberation" of the law on 'umdahs and 
shaykhs by the parliament (Al-Ahram international edition, 29 
March). 
   Retreat From Decentralization 
   The government's move to appoint 'umdahs and shaykhs marks 
another step back from political decentralization and 
liberalization, a retreat that began prior to the November 1992 
local council elections.  Before those elections Cairo considered 
but rejected a plan to make the local council electoral system 
less biased in favor of the ruling NDP and give opposition and 
independent candidates a fairer chance.  However, the government 
ultimately changed its mind, evidently prompted in large part by 
concern over the wave of Islamic violence that had begun the 
previous spring (See Note 2). 
   (Note 2) See the Trends of 28 October 1992, pages 24-3O. 
   Implications 
   As with the 1992 decision on preserving the old local council 
elections system, the recent move to appoint 'umdahs and shaykhs 
appears largely a reaction to the current Islamic unrest.  The 
parliament's debate of the issue underscores not only the 
contentiousness of the new law but also the independence being 
displayed by some NDP deputies since the last parliamentary 
elections in 199O.  Opposition party officials, for their part, 
will probably use the government's passage of this legislation to 
question the government's good faith as the latter proceeds with 
plans for a "national dialogue" of Egyptians representing diverse 
political orientations, called for by President Mubarak last 
November. 
   (AUTHOR:  BROWN.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
NEAR EAST ANALYSIS BRANCH (7O3) 733-6O94.) 
AG/Brown/Blough/SM 11/2312Z APR 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-25 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000021694001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   12 April 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RE-STRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-11APR94-NORTH KOREA 
<H3> <TI>      SPA Reaffirms Reformist Economic Agenda </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       SPA Reaffirms Reformist Economic Agenda </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
SUMMARY 

                                      In an apparent at tempt to repair some of the economic damage done 
during the conservative backlash that followed the collapse of 
East Europe, Pyongyang has again affirmed a reformist economic 
agenda.  Pyongyang's renewed stress on this agenda, combined with 
the regime's failure so far to place the economy on a war 
footing, suggest that it has not ruled out a peaceful settlement 
of the nuclear issue. 
                                     END SUMMARY 
   Pyongyang's reaffirmation of its reformist economic agenda came 
at the 6-8 April session of North Korea's parliament, the Supreme 
People's Assembly (SPA).  The session was devoted mainly to 
mapping out economic policy for the next three years.  In 
reiterating the economic policy of giving priorities to 
agriculture, light industry, and foreign trade, the SPA session 
continued Pyongyang's shift away from its traditional--and 
classically communist--emphasis on heavy industry.  This shift, 
which has been proceeding with fits and starts in recent years, 
received a major boost at the December party plenum and in Kim 
Il-song's New Year's address(SEE NOTE).  Justifying this shift, 
the keynote speaker at the SPA session, Premier Kang Song-san, 
claimed that Pyongyang's earlier policy of emphasizing heavy 
industry had been intended mainly as a way to rapidly develop 
light industry and agriculture and that the policy was never 
meant to develop heavy industry for its own sake. 
   (NOTE: As usual for spring SPA sessions, whose main agendas are 
the state budget, the latest SPA session was not immediately 
preceded by a party plenum.) 
   Kang's equivocation on the role of heavy industrial development 
amplified President Kim Il-song's call in his New Year's speech 
to invest "efforts" into the coal, power, and metal sectors "in a 
bid to develop" light industry and agriculture (New Year address, 
Pyongyang radio, 1 January 1994).  Since the mid-1950's, 
Pyongyang had given priority to basic and heavy industry at the 
expense of the consumer goods sector.  In the mid-198O's, the 
sagging economy and reforms in other socialist economies 
encouraged North Koreans advocating economic reform to start 
chipping away at the heavy industry-first approach, an effort 
which was rebuffed in the aftermath of the fall of communism. 
   Other Reform Issues     In addition to claiming that Pyongyang 
has always sought to develop light industry rapidly, Kang 
reaffirmed Pyongyang's commitment to a number of reform agenda 
items that had suffered setbacks in the conservative backlash of 
the past five years, among them: 
   + Separation of powers.  Kang seemed to echo the sentiments of 
reformers in trying to limit the party's domination of economic 
affairs.  Laying out separate areas of responsibility for the 
party and the government, he said the government should serve as 
"the center" responsible for carrying out "economic works," while 
the party should be responsible for formulating those economic 
works.  Like other officials before him, he claimed that 
separating areas of responsibility between the party and the 
government is the way to ensure that the party's leadership is 
"firmly established." 
   + Material incentives.  Indicating the sensitive nature of this 
topic in the current atmosphere of ideological rigidity, Kang 
made only a brief reference to the issue of promoting industrial 
efficiency by means other than political exhortation, another 
perennial item on the reformist agenda.  Without mentioning the 
term material incentives, Kang endorsed reformers' assertions 
that industrial productivity can only be enhanced by rewarding 
performance.  He said that plants and enterprises should enforce 
a strict cost accounting system, should be allowed to keep part 
of the profits they make, and by the same token, should be held 
accountable for any losses incurred. 
   + Free trade zone.  Supporting another putative reformist agenda 
item, Kang urged that additional "efforts" be put into the "free 
economic and trade zone" now being developed in the Tumen River 
basin so as to "fully ensure" conditions for foreign investment. 
However, suggesting Pyongyang's continuing uneasiness over the 
potential domestic impact, Pyongyang radio's coverage of Kang's 
speech left out his remarks on the trade zone.  Only the shorter 
KCNA version for overseas audiences carried a summarized version 
of his remarks on the zone. 
   Resource Allocation     Finance Minister Yun Ki-chong's annual 
budget message, also delivered at the SPA session (Pyongyang 
radio, 7 April), similarly appeared to reflect a reform agenda. 
(As usual, Yun gave no actual figures for individual budget items 
and expressed the projected expenditures for some items in 
percentages, while using vague expressions such as "a huge 
amount" to describe other items of lesser priority.) 
   + Foreign trade.  Reflecting the regime's renewed interest in 
international commerce, Yun pledged to boost state investments in 
the foreign trade sector by 4.2 percent over the last year and 
called for building "more plants and shops" and organizing more 
"work teams" dedicated to producing exports goods.  Furthermore, 
defying conservatives' pronounced misgivings about the 
processing trade,"  Yun vowed to build more bases for combining 
foreign capital, technology, and materials with North Korean 
labor to earn foreign exchange. 
   + Light industry.  In her speech, Yun projected an increase of 
5.4 percent in state investment in light industry over last year. 
   At the same time, Yun's speech also seemed designed to avoid 
raising popular expectations too much.  Although the 5.4 percent 
increase in investment in light industry was a larger than usual 
proportionate increase, it still fell far short of the 13 percent 
figure used in 1989 to dramatize the Pyongyang regime's professed 
commitment to improving the consumer goods sector during what was 
touted as "the year of light industry."  Moreover, in this year's 
speech she failed to announce construction of new light 
industrial plants, promising only to "modernize" existing 
facilities.  In addition, she placed more than usual emphasis on 
increasing production of "3 August people's consumer goods." 
Named after the day in 1984 when Kim Chong-il visited a Pyongyang 
exposition of consumer goods made of scrap materials, these goods 
have been used to ostensibly relieve shortages over the years. 
Yun pledged to "expand and develop" production facilities and 
labor force for these goods, indicating that Pyongyang will be 
relying heavily on what had started as a stop-gap measure to meet 
an increased portion of consumer needs. 
   Party Cell Meeting     In contrast to the SPA's renewed emphasis 
on a more reformist approach to the economy, the SPA session 
coincided with  signs that the regime intends to impose tighter 
social discipline, ostensibly to forestall any inflow of foreign 
influences.  To this end, an unprecedented national conference of 
party cell secretaries was held from 31 March to 2 April.  Touted 
as "the first of its kind ever" since the party's founding 
(Pyongyang radio, 25 March), the meeting pledged "infinite 
loyalty" to the party and promised to lead the masses in carrying 
out revolution (Pyongyang radio, 31 March-2 April).  In a message 
to the cell secretaries, Kim Il-song called on them to prevent 
infiltration of any "alien ideologies or unwholesome life-styles" 
(Pyongyang radio, 31 March). 
   Military Aspect     Despite the crisis atmosphere Pyongyang has 
created in recent weeks over the nuclear issue, both Finance 
Minister Yun's SPA address and the keynote speech at the party 
cell conference seemed designed to avoid alarming the population: 
   +  In her speech Yun projected a only a modest increase in 
defense spending proportionate to the total national budget, 
claiming that 11.6 percent of state expenditure will be devoted 
to defense.  Yun claimed that Pyongyang had actually spent 11.5 
percent of last year's total national expenditure for defense. 
Although the publicized figures for defense spending may bear 
little resemblance to the actual outlays, Pyongyang has over the 
years used the proportion of defense expenditure to the total 
budget to signal the degree of tension on the peninsula.  For 
instance, the announced figures for defense spending for the late 
1960's were around 30 percent of the total state budget. 
   +  Similarly, the party cell keynote speaker, party secretary Pak 
Ki-nam, appeared remarkably restrained in his war rhetoric. 
Instead of the alarmist warnings issued routinely at mass 
meetings, Pak portrayed the army and people as united and ready 
to cope with any eventuality.  He praised the army for having 
"honorably defended" the fatherland under the leadership of Kim 
Chong-il during last year's staging of Team Spirit military 
exercise in the South (Pyongyang radio, 31 March).  He went on to 
promise that "the army and people" will do the same "if the 
United States and South Korean puppet clique" provoke a new war. 
   Implications     Pyongyang media treatment of the SPA session and 
the cell meeting indicate that, despite the heightened war 
rhetoric over the nuclear issue, the North Korean leadership does 
not wish to place the nation on a war footing at this point and 
risk disruption of the already bad economy.  Pyongyang's current 
stance is consistent with its recent signals that the regime has 
not ruled out a negotiated settlement of the nuclear issue. 
   (AUTHOR:  YIM.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
ASIA DIVSION ANALYSIS TEAM, (7O3) 733-6534.) 
EAG/HEBBEL/SM 11/2327Z APR 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000021894001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   13 April 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
FOREIGN MEDIA NOTE--FB PN 94-049--JAPAN 
<H3> <TI>      JAPAN:  Changing Views of Bureaucrats on Japan-U.S. Relations </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       JAPAN:  Changing Views of Bureaucrats on Japan-U.S. Relations </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
SUMMARY:       In a number of recent press articles, several Japanese 
academics and journalists offered assessments of the changing views 
of the Japan-U.S. relationship within the Japanese bureaucracy.  All 
of those surveyed agreed that Japan's new generation of bureaucrats 
view the United States differently from their elders.  Several 
writers asserted that the new generation of bureaucrats believes it 
is time for Japan to move away from its close association with the 
United States and toward closer ties with Asia. 

   Focusing on how negotiators from the ranks of Japan's bureaucracy 
took the unprecedented step of saying "no" to the United States in 
the recently-broken off U.S.-Japan framework talks, several 
academics and journalists analyzed the changing views of these 
bureaucrats toward Japan-U.S. relations.  None of the writers 
expressed surprise over the reaction to the breakdown of the 
framework talks by Japan's negotiators who, according to the 13 
February MAINICHI SHIMBUN, showed "pride, confidence, and delight 
that they had defeated [sic] the United States for the first time in 
trade negotiations." 

   Bureaucrats' Reliance on Economic Theory - Writing in the 9 
February ASAHI SHIMBUN, Motoshige Ito, a Tokyo University economics 
professor, asserted that Japan's bureaucrats based their negative 
response to U.S. demands on what he referred to as the 
"internationally recognized economic theory" that numerical targets 
will lead to managed rather than free trade.  He said that "the 
contemporary mid-level bureaucrats who are responsible for working- 
level negotiations" no longer ignore economic theory in trade 
negotiations.  Unlike their predecessors, who, he claimed, believed 
in strong government economic intervention, contemporary bureaucrats 
understand and apply in their arguments "internationally recognized 
economic theory, which they learned while studying in U.S. graduate 
schools."  This change in the thinking of bureaucrats "will be an 
important factor in Japan's trade negotiations over the long run," 
Ito observed. 

   Ito criticized the U.S. Government for allegedly not following 
economic theory "that is prevalent in American universities." 
Contrary to the above trend among Japanese Government officials, he 
wrote, the U.S. Government "appears to be moving away from arguments 
based on economic theory."  Ito cited numerical targets as one 
example, claiming that "no authoritative economists" in the United 
States support numerical targets. 

   Generational Change, Emergence of Multilateralism - Former 
Ministry of Foreign Affairs (MOFA) official Yukio Okamoto, writing 
in the 11 February NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN, pointed to a "generational 
change" among Japanese negotiators as one reason they could say "no" 
to the United States.  He observed that the present generation of 
bureaucrats "do not feel a debt to the United States" for its 
postwar assistance to Japan.  This "diminished appreciation of past 
favors," combined with "accumulated frustrations from many years of 
dealing with what, in their view, has been an excessively demanding 
United States," is a factor that is "small but impossible to 
overlook" in the politics of negotiations. 

   Alongside younger bureaucrats "diminished appreciation" of the 
United States, there is also reportedly a trend toward a more global 
Japanese approach to diplomacy.  According to an article by Tokyo 
University political science professor Takashi Inoguchi in the 22 
February MAINICHI SHIMBUN, Japanese MOFA bureaucrats have been 
steadily "globalizing" Japan's diplomacy since the collapse of the 
Liberal Democratic Party government last year.  According to 
Inoguchi, they are beginning to treat the Japan-U.S. relationship as 
just "one element" in the overall "formation of global economic and 
security rules."  Although the Japanese-U.S. relationship is still 
"preeminent," Inoguchi observed, the relationship has "changed in 
quality" and is likely to be handled from a "multilateral 
perspective." 

   In a similar vein, ASAHI SHIMBUN economic reporter Kenji Takeuchi 
in a 9 February article pointed to the emergence within the Japanese 
bureaucracy of a "multilateralist faction," which maintains that 
Japan should shift the focus of its trade policy from Japan-U.S. 
bilateral trade to trade with other countries.  According to 
Takeuchi, contemporary Japanese bureaucrats prefer multilateral 
negotiations to bilateral talks with the United States because 
multilateral talks are more "open" and based on "universal rules." 

   Younger Bureaucrats Influenced by Pan-Asianist Arguments - 
Writing in the 15 March issue of EKONOMISUTO, Kenji Suzuki, a 
MAINICHI SHIMBUN editorial staff writer, contended that the 
breakdown of the framework talks was a "logical consequence" of the 
views of young Japanese bureaucrats, who are "cool" toward the 
United States and "inclined" toward Asia.  Suzuki went on to say 
that the views of Kazuo Ogura, former director general of MOFA's 
Economic Affairs Bureau, who is now ambassador-designate to Vietnam, 
have provided the theoretical grounds for the emergence of "Pan- 
Asianism, or nationalism under the name of Pan-Asianism," among 
young bureaucrats.  He noted that, while Ogura carefully avoids the 
term "kenbei" (dislike of the United States) and "openly emphasizes" 
the desirability of cooperation with the United States, his writings 
have "provoked nationalism" among young bureaucrats, "even though 
they are not the mainstream views in MOFA." 

   Suzuki claimed that Ogura's articles have attracted young MOFA 
bureaucrats chiefly because he focuses on the "cultural" aspects of 
Japan's foreign relations rather than "technical" aspects of 
security and economic relations, as many bureaucrats allegedly did 
in the past.  He noted in particular that two of Ogura's articles- 
-"Crack Between the Empire of Ideas and the Lost People" published 
in the June 1991 GAIKO FORUM, and "For Restoration of the Rights of 
Asia" published in the July 1993 CHUO KORON -- have influenced young 
bureaucrats.  In the GAIKO FORUM article, Suzuki observed, Ogura 
termed U.S. demands put forth in trade negotiations as an attempt to 
make Japan its "mental colony" by forcing the Japanese to "have the 
same sense of values as Americans."  In the CHUO KORON article, 
Suzuki wrote, Ogura called for restoring the "tradition and spirit 
of Asia," since "Western civilization--an endless pursuit of greed 
and self-assertion--cannot resolve the world's problems."  Suzuki 
also claimed that the best-selling book written by Ichiro Ozawa, co- 
leader of the Japan Renewal Party (Shinseito), Blueprint For 
Building a New Japan--"which has been enthusiastically read" by many 
young bureaucrats--has been used by them as a source of "Pan-Asian" 
inspiration.  To support his conclusion about the thrust of Ozawa's 
book, Suzuki cited the passage in the book, in which Ozawa calls for 
a shift from "Western to Oriental values." 
   Suzuki asserted that "most" young diplomats are "fed up with 
negotiations with the United States, which give working-level 
bureaucrats nothing but many troubles and pain" and are influenced 
by the idea of "returning to Asia."  He noted that young diplomats 
now want to be assigned to Asia, where they feel "much more 
comfortable," rather than serve in the United States.  According to 
Suzuki, this "inclination" is spreading to other ministries, such as 
the Ministry of Finance and the Ministry of International Trade and 
Industry.  He claimed that the young diplomats often say:  "If 
things do not work with the United States, there is always Asia." 
(Author:  Innes.  Questions and/or comments, please call Chief, 
Japan Branch at (703) 733-6534) 
EAG/12Apr94/POLCHF/ECONF/ASIA DIVISION/CL 12/1920Z APR 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000021994001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   13 April 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-12APR94-SLOVAKIA 
<H3> <TI>      SLOVAKIA: Anti-Meciar Parties To Form United Front </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       SLOVAKIA: Anti-Meciar Parties To Form United Front </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
With      fall parliamentary elections looming and former Prime 
Minister Vladimir Meciar's Movement for a Democratic Slovakia 
(HZDS)  continuing to top the opinion polls, two splinter parties 
in the governing coalition have announced plans to merge into a 
single party forming a united front against Meciar.  Former 
Foreign Minister Milan Knazko said that during a 23 April 
founding "congress," the newly created "Slovak Democratic Union" 
(DUS) will unite his Alliance of Slovak Democrats (AD SR), whose 
eight deputies in the 150-seat parliament split from the HZDS 
last year, with the Alternative of Political Realism (APR), a 
group of ten deputies who were expelled from the HZDS in February 
(CTK, 7 April).  Distinguishing the new party's platform from 
Meciar's emphasis on the state's role in the economy, Knazko 
added that the DUS will "push for a liberal policy" and "for 
changes to support the private sector" (SME, 29 March).  Prime 
Minister and APR leader Jozef Moravcik also suggested the 
possibility of coalescing with other parties in the governing 
coalition, saying that the DUS "already has an agreement" to form 
a "joint preelection front" with "all the other centrist parties" 
(Warsaw, Rzeczpospolita, 8 April).  Similarly, former Prime 
Minister Jan Carnogursky called for "loose cooperation" during 
the election campaign between the DUS and his Christian 
Democratic Movement (KDH) (CTK, 7 April). 

   Perhaps limiting the electoral success of this "centrist," anti- 
Meciar coalition, Peter Weiss, the leader of the strongest party 
in the governing coalition, the former communist Party of the 
Democratic Left (SDL), has suggested that his party will not join 
or agree to electoral cooperation with it.  During an interview 
published in the 30 March Denni Telegraf, Weiss said that there 
is a "realistic chance" of the SDL and a number of labor and 
farmer parties not currently in parliament forming a "social 
democratic grouping."  Separating the political spectrum into 
three groups, Weiss said that this group would offer an 
"alternative" to Meciar and to a coalition centered around the 
KDH, adding that he did "not think the majority of voters" would 
favor the KDH group. 
(AUTHOR:  MIHAILOVICH.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL 
CHIEF ANALYST/ELAG, (703) 733-6120.) 
ELAG/GILISON/CL 12/2010Z APR 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-28 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000022094001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   13 April 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-12APR94-CHINA 
<H3> <TI>      Beijing Signals Flexibility on Tax Reform </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Beijing Signals Flexibility on Tax Reform </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
Statements   by China's finance minister at the National People's 
Congress (NPC) session held in Beijing from 10 to 22 March 
reinforced recent media signals that local leaders have won 
concessions in their resistance to provisional tax reform 
policies imposed by the central government late last year.  While 
continuing to state firmly that localities must follow new tax 
rules formulated by Beijing, many of which appear to be inimical 
to provincial interests, Minister of Finance Liu Zhongli hinted 
in his 11 March budget address that the rules themselves are 
subject to interpretation based on the needs of local areas.  Liu 
said that the "design" of the tax reform plan "will necessarily 
differ" from "the actual situation" and that "readjustments" and 
"improvements" will be required "in the course of implementation" 
(Xinhua, 23 March). 
   Initial signs that central authorities might compromise on some 
reforms approved by a party plenum last November had appeared in 
a speech delivered by Politburo Standing Committee member Zhu 
Rongji at a national conference on propaganda and ideological 
work in January.  At the conference Zhu stated that "no pre- 
designed reform program" is "perfect" and quoted paramount leader 
Deng Xiaoping as exhorting the leadership to "make readjustments 
as problems arise" and "adapt according to the actual conditions" 
(Xinhua, 28 January).  In particular, PRC media have indicated 
that Beijing may lower the tax rate on capital gains from real 
estate transactions because of pressure from local leaders 
concerned about the impact of the tax on foreign investment.  A 
24 March report in the PRC-affiliated, Hong Kong-based wire 
service Zhongguo Tongxun She speculated that the regulations for 
implementation of the land tax, which have not yet appeared in 
PRC media, will be "more liberal" than the "interim" regulations 
of the tax publicized by Xinhua late last year (14 December 
1993).  Specifically, the report stated that the tax cap on 
capital gains will be reduced from 60 percent to 50 percent. 
   (AUTHOR:  VOSS.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
CHINA ANALYSIS TEAM, (703) 733-6097.) 
EAG/HEBBEL JEG 12/2326Z APR 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-29 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000021794001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   13 April 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
FOUO -- DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS, THE 
FOLLOWING ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS 
FOREIGN PRESS SURVEY--EAST EUROPE 
<H3> <TI>      FOREIGN PRESS SURVEY--FB PSE 94-015--EAST EUROPE </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       FOREIGN PRESS SURVEY--FB PSE 94-015--EAST EUROPE </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
Foreign      Economic Review:  EASTERN EUROPE Vol. III, No. 015, Date 
12 April, 1994 

   Notice To Readers:  FOREIGN MEDIA SURVEY is a subtitled series 
published by FBIS Europe/Latin America Group.  The Survey series 
features brief summaries of foreign media reports on topical issues 
compiled from the most recent sources available to FBIS.  Any and 
all comment or analysis contained herein is attributable to the 
cited media source. 

   Europe Economic Review is a subseries of FOREIGN MEDIA SURVEY 
published by the East and West Europe Divisions of Europe/Latin 
America Group with contributions from FBIS overseas bureaus.  Europe 
Economic Review is intended to supplement coverage of European 
economic issues by the FBIS Daily Reports for West and East Europe 
and other FBIS publications.  Foreign news, feature, and editorial 
reports selected for summary in this publication normally do not 
appear as full-text translations in other FBIS publications. 

   The contents of Europe Economic Review consist of abstracts of 
foreign media coverage of European economic developments under two 
main geographic headings: 

   -- Western Europe:  Drawing on West European, Canadian, and 
Turkish media, this section reports on national and regional 
economic issues, focusing on economic competitiveness, key 
industries, regional economic integration, internal economic 
policies and performance, and foreign trade and investment. 

   -- Eastern Europe:  Citing East European and, where appropriate, 
other foreign media sources, this section highlights East European 
efforts to rebuild national economies and achieve integration into 
the European Community and the global economy, focusing on policy 
debates and practical action geared toward the implementation of 
internal economic reforms and industrial restructuring and on 
developments in foreign trade, cooperation, and investment from 
national and regional perspectives. 

   Under these two main headings, summaries of foreign media reports 
on all categories of economic issues generally are grouped under 
subheadings by subject, country, or region. 

   FOREIGN MEDIA SURVEY is a U.S. Government publication.  Its 
contents in no way represent the policies, views, or attitudes of 
the U.S. Government. 

   ALBANIA 

   SCOTTISH GROUP FUNDS RESTORATION OF TIRANA CLINIC:  The work for 
the restoration of the Tirana Outpatient Clinic No. 1 will start 
soon.  The project will be financed by the Albanian Humanitarian 
Society in Edinburgh, Scotland.  Reconstruction and facilities for 
this medical center, expected to be completed on 2O April, will meet 
European contemporary standards.  (Tirana ATA in English 1135 GMT 17 
Mar 94 AU) 

   ASSEMBLY APPROVES PROPERTY TAX BILL:  On 16 March, the People's 
Assembly approved the bill on property tax in the Republic of 
Albania.  The bill anticipates taxes over agricultural land and 
buildings.  The incomes levied by the taxes on agricultural lands 
will be divided in acceptable proportions between central and local 
governments.  The bill anticipates that 70 percent of these incomes 
will be available to the local government, implying that local 
governments will have all the opportunities to have a local budget 
as well as enough funds to finance their expenses.  The tax on 
agricultural lands is also considered as a measure that will make 
the peasants work their land because the tax will be on the land and 
not on the production.  The tax on buildings is annual and different 
according to the kind of the building.  Two chapters of former bill 
were omitted, the tax on cattle and on unoccupied sites, which both 
can be subject to other bills. (Tirana ATA in English 0924 GMT 17 
Mar 94 AU) 

   OCCIDENTAL PETROLEUM STARTS DRILLING IN ADRIATIC:  An Occidental 
Petroleum affiliate recently started drilling operations for oil and 
natural gas research in the No. 3 block of the Adriatic Sea.  The 
"Drill Mar 1" sea platform is installed 35 kilometers off the 
Albanian seacoast.  Some 75 workers and specialists from the U.S., 
Britain, Italy, Spain, and Albania will work 90 days running two 
shifts 12 hours each.  Seismical, geological and geophysical 
research has been carried out before the drilling in 4,500 meters, 
which will cost $12 million.  According to company's experts, the 
research work has been of a good level but the result is expected 
after drilling in the sea will be over.  This is the third drilling 
in the No. 3 block after the first two previous drilling by the Agip 
Company.  (Tirana ATA in English 1112 GMT 18 Mar 94 AU) 

   ELBASAN ELECTRIC NETWORK OVERLOADED:  Some 28 new electric cabins 
were commissioned and two new station-feeders were set up during 
this winter in Elbasan District.  However, the electric network is 
still operating under an average of 110-115 percent of the installed 
power, which technically speaking should not exceed 90 percent. 
Leakage in the electric network due to abuse with electricity are 
worth great amounts of money.  Losses account for about 60 percent 
in January, although the electric police have imposed fines of 
700,000 leks on several citizens and private subjects.  Demir Hoxha, 
the Electric Enterprise director, told ATA that although winter is 
going, consequences in the electric network are numerous.  Thus, 17 
transformers and two electric cabins are out of use and there are 
damages in 3.1 km of high tension cables, 2.2 km of electric lines, 
and in 1.6 electric poles.  (Tirana ATA in English 1129 GMT 18 Mar 
94 AU) 

   CHAMBER OF COMMERCE JOINS WORLD BODY:  The Chamber of Commerce 
and Industry of Albania became a member of the World Chamber of 
Commerce with headquarters in Paris.  Mr. Zhan Charles Ruhe, general 
secretary of this organization, declared this decision in an 
executive board meeting held in Brussels on 19 March.  The World 
Chamber of Commerce will provide support to the Albanian businessmen 
and the Chamber of Commerce and Industry, thus influencing in fully 
structuring the market economy in Albania.  (Tirana ATA in English 
1106 GMT 19 Mar 94 AU) 
   ITALIAN FIRM TO BUILD TOURIST FACILITY IN KAVAJE:  The Territory 
Adjustment Council in Kavaje District recently approved the creation 
of the first tourist village that will be located in Golemi beach. 
The Italian "Babin Canton SPA" company will carry out the project, 
providing 600 beds, cultural and sport equipment, and other tourist 
facilities for the village, worth $1.2 million.  The construction of 
the village will be carried out in two stages.  The first stage will 
be over in 1995.  (Tirana ATA in English 1107 GMT 19 Mar 94 AU) 

   SELENICE BITUMEN MINE TO BE CLOSED:  Regarding some concerns by 
the Independent Trade Union of the Selenice Bitumen Mine, the State 
Control Service carried out a check-up and reported that the mine 
will soon be closed.  Out of six sectors that functioned three years 
ago, only one sector is presently operating in the mine.  The 
investigation results confirmed that many things had been stolen and 
the mine had continued to pay workers who were employed in Greece. 
The mine's trade union blamed the enterprise administration that had 
remained the same since 1990.  Under the pretext of the reform, the 
administration had appointed incapable persons as chiefs of sectors 
and shifts.  The small town of Selenice has been economically 
connected with the Bitumen Mine, which has been exploited since 
ancient times for the high quality of the bitumen.  The mine was 
being exploited during '20s and '30s by foreign firms.  A lot of 
European roads have been laid with the Selenice bitumen.  (Tirana 
ATA in English 1303 GMT 19 Mar 94 AU) 

   ITALIAN-ALBANIAN JOINT VENTURE TO BUILD HIGHWAY:  The Italo- 
Albanian joint venture "Infro-Projekt-Konsultim" had taken the 
responsibility of constructing the first Albanian highway that will 
pass through Durres-Elbasan-Qafe Thane.  According to the project, 
this highway will be part of the Pan-European Network.  Veip Guri, 
president of this joint venture, informed ATA that some potential 
banks and enterprises will finance the implementation of this 
project.  (Tirana ATA in English 1112 GMT 20 Mar 94 AU) 

   NEW ANALYSIS LABORATORY IN TIRANA:  A new contemporary analysis 
laboratory will soon start activity in Tirana. The well known "DY 
PO" enterprise headed by Greek investor Fotis Sarantopolos will 
invest in the laboratory.  In a TV interview, he said that the goal 
of coming to Albania was twofold.  First, as an investment 
enterprise we would like to have relations with a neighboring 
country like Albania, and second, we heartily would like to help the 
Albanian people to better solve their health problems.  We sincerely 
want to help hospitals in Albania, and for this we have put the most 
contemporary equipments at their disposal.  He also stated that 
besides this laboratory in Tirana, he hopes to set up others in 
various parts of Albania.  (Tirana ATA in English 1115 GMT 20 Mar 94 
AU) 

   ASSEMBLY APPROVES 1994 STATE BUDGET BILL:  In a 19 March session, 
the People's Assembly discussed the bill on state budget draft for 
1994 presented by the Meksi cabinet.  The deputies mentioned two 
essential elements of the state budget for 1994: first the fact that 
the expenses for social support will be increased by 45 percent, 
covering 30 percent of the total expenses out of 25 percent last 
year.  The second was the increase of public investments.  Their 
program raises by 15 percent for 1994, covering about 8.5 percent of 
the total expenses.  The deputies stressed that the budget draft is 
a program indicating all good efforts to build a market economy and 
a legal state.  After remarks and proposals by parliamentary 
commissions and deputies, the bill on state budget for 1994 was 
approved in principle, article by article, and by a majority of 
votes.  (Tirana ATA in English 0933 GMT 20 Mar 94 AU) 

   CASH REGISTERS TO BE INSTALLED IN SHOPS:  Luan Pustina, head of 
the Tax Branch at Tirana Municipality, confirms that cash registers 
are being installed in retail sale shops, bars, food stores, and 
restaurants in Tirana.  Pustina said that from now on, 50 cash 
registers will be installed each day in Tirana.  Some 4,000 cash 
registers are foreseen to be installed in Tirana so as to have an 
evidence of sale figures registered in the shops, which should be 
subject to taxes.  The cash registers are expected to be paid in two 
months by private companies.  The cash registers will be soon 
installed in other cities of Albania. (Tirana ATA in English 0911 
GMT 21 Mar 94 AU) 

   INCREASE IN PRICES OF CONSUMER GOODS:  Recent statistics from the 
Statistics Institute confirm that the index of the prices of 
consumer goods during January 1994 increased by 2.02 percent as 
compared with December 1993.  In February, this index had an 
increase of 1.70 percent as against January.  (Tirana ATA in English 
1119 GMT 21 Mar 94 AU) 

   IMPORTED FOODSTUFFS DECLARED 'INADEQUATE':  Recently the Quality 
and Standards Branch in Sarande declared inadequate a considerable 
amount of flour provided by a Greek private company and 8 tons of 
cooking oil containing acetic acid.  The branch is more and more 
conducting chemical and physical tests for food items either 
produced in Albania or imported.  Kristaq Idrizi, head of the 
branch, told ATA that as of January this year, the branch has 
carried out 60 tests for products, such as flour for private 
bakeries, oil, beer, alcoholic drinks, etc.  (Tirana ATA in English 
1120 GMT 22 Mar 94 AU) 

   CABINET ADOPTS BILLS, AMENDMENTS TO LAWS, AGREEMENTS: At its 
meeting, the Albanian Government approved a bill on construction, 
maintenance, administration, and exploitation of the irrigation and 
drainage structures, as well as a bill on pastures. Both bills will 
soon be presented to the People's Assembly for approval.  The 
government also discussed and approved supplements and amendments to 
the Law on Privatization of State House Units.  At the same time, 
the government approved an amendment to the Law on Customs Tariffs, 
which is related to the export taxes.  The Albanian Government 
approved in principle the draft agreements for promotion and 
protection of investments between the Governments of the Republic of 
Albania and the United Kingdom and between Governments of the 
Republics of Albania and Romania.  The government also approved a 
trade agreement with Malaysia and an agreement for scientific and 
technological cooperation with the Government of the former Yugoslav 
Republic of Macedonia (FYROM).  At today's meeting, the Albanian 
Government approved some amendments to its previous decisions. 
(Tirana ATA in English 0913 GMT 22 Mar 94 AU) 

   GOVERNMENT FIXES SUGAR, OIL PRICES:  The Albanian Government has 
established a fixed retail price for sugar at 60 leks per kilogram. 
All tradesmen will be required to sell sugar at this price, 
effective immediately.  The government has also decided to revise 
its position on prices of oil and oil-based products.  Based on the 
new decision, prices for 70-85 octane gasoline will be fixed and 
will take effect on 1 June this year.  New prices will also be 
established for all other petroleum products.  (Tirana ATA in 
English 1156 GMT 10 Mar 94 AU) 

   ALBANIAN-ITALIAN CLOTHING JOINT VENTURE:  A new Albanian-Italian 
joint venture for the production of ready-made clothes was recently 
established in Lushnje.  The Albanian party will contribute 30 
percent of the capital, the Italians 70 percent.  The initial number 
of workers is 40, but in the near future 50 female employees will be 
added to the staff.  To start with, the enterprise will produce 
shirts for all ages, later on it will make parkas, trousers, and 
other clothes.  The venture's owners and workers are confident that 
their fashions will be successful both in local and foreign markets. 
(Tirana ATA in English 1310 GMT 11 Mar 94 AU) 

   LACK OF DATA ON FOREIGN INVESTMENT:  Mr. Selami Xhepa, director 
of the Foreign Investment Encouragement Center, states that "foreign 
investment in all sectors of the Albanian economy is higher than is 
generally thought, but the exact amount cannot be verified for lack 
of data."  Mr. Xhepa stressed that some 150 joint ventures are in 
business in Albania.  The foreign capital share of total investment 
amounts to approximately $150 million.  Some 49 private enterprises 
began operations in 1993.  Foreign investment is focused mainly on 
construction and light industry, agriculture, fishing, and 
transportation.  Mr. Xhepa says that the most profitable sectors for 
foreign investors in Albania are tourism, light industry, and 
agriculture.  The recent Law on Foreign Investment is designed to 
eliminate bureaucratic impediments to the investment process. 
(Tirana ATA in English 1142 GMT 11 Mar 94 AU) 

   ASSEMBLY APPROVES LAW ON CHAMBER OF COMMERCE, INDUSTRY: 
Parliament has approved a new law on the Chamber of Commerce and 
Industry, which was introduced several months ago and amended prior 
to being passed.  The new law aims to improve the way the chamber 
works and expand its territorial coverage and membership.  The main 
goal of the Chamber of Commerce and Industry will be to accelerate 
commercial activity through continuous training of new Albanian 
businessmen, familiarizing them with commercial legislation, customs 
taxes and tariffs, international trade regulations, purchase prices, 
and other business matters.  (Tirana ATA in English 1125 GMT 11 Mar 
94 AU) 

   BANK GOVERNOR BRIEFS ASSEMBLY ON FOREIGN DEBT NEGOTIATIONS:  On 
10 March, Dylber Vrioni, governor of the Bank of Albania, testified 
to the People's Assembly about the work of the Foreign Debt State 
Commission and the future strategy to be followed in resolving debt 
problems.  Mr. Vrioni said that in April 1992 Albania's foreign debt 
was about $405 million.  This debt was created by communist 
governments during 1988-1991.  The debts incurred during this period 
were not used to finance investment but to buy consumer goods so as 
to create the impression that everything was going well.  In 
February this year, the debt amounted to $480 million.  The 
difference reflects the interest charges.  About one-fifth of the 
debt is to foreign governments and is in the process of being 
resolved.  The final agreements with the countries concerned are 
under way.  Last Monday, the debt with Austria was resolved, and 
agreements will soon be signed with the Netherlands, Germany, 
France, and Italy. 

   Vrioni stated that the debt to private lenders appears to be more 
complicated.  Besides the Paris Club, we have held talks with 10 
main foreign private banks, discussing their claims and the forms of 
negotiation to be followed in finding a solution.  Mr. Vrioni said 
that we would like to give a signal to the international community 
that we need their financial support, promising at the same time 
that we shall observe all obligations stemming from this support. 
Since 1992, Albania has systematically paid off its debts resulting 
from the international community's support for the economic reforms. 
Deputies expressed their concern over the increase in the foreign 
debt and urged the devising of a strategy to help with its 
negotiation.  (Tirana ATA in English 1136 GMT 11 Mar 94 AU) 

   TIRANA BEER FACTORY RESUMES PRODUCTION:  After a pause of nearly 
three years, the Beer Factory in Tirana, with the longest tradition 
in country, resumed its production.  The European Union provided 1 
million ECU for the ingredients.  In 1993, the Albanian Government 
provided 4.2 million leks to repair the equipment and a further 7 
million this year.  Bashkim Bregu, the factory's director, stated 
that during the first 10 days of April, it will produce large 
quantities of beer.  The wholesale price for one bottle of beer will 
be 2.2 leks, while the retail price will be 26-27 leks.  What 
worries the specialists and managers of the Beer Factory whether 
Albanian beer will be able to compete with the imported variety.  At 
present the Albanian market is dominated by well known brands such 
as Kronenburg, Kruna, Moretti, and others because of the highly 
effective advertising in the press, and on radio and television. 
(Tirana ATA in English 1122 GMT 13 Mar 94 AU) 

   JOINT VENTURE WITH ITALIAN FIRM ESTABLISHED IN ELBASAN:  A joint 
venture established by the Oil-Soap Enterprise in Elbasan and IDI of 
Pisa in Italy started work in January this year.  Besides cooking 
oil and soap, the joint venture will also produce detergents.  On 
the basis of the agreement, the Albanian side has provided the plant 
and machinery and 116 workers, while the Italian side has projected 
an investment of $145,000 mainly for new equipment.  The Albanian 
director, Muhamet Avllazagai, told ATA that the production of 
detergents both for the domestic and foreign markets will start in 
April.  The production capacity will be 2.3 tons in eight hours. 
Assembly lines for the production of plastic bottles anmd oil 
bottling is expected to be set up in the future.  With investment to 
be in two stages, continuous work will be guaranteed to the workers, 
whose average monthly salary ranges from 7,000-9,000 leks.  They 
will also receive extra payments for additional production in a six- 
month period.  (Tirana ATA in English 1111 GMT 16 Mar 94 AU) 

   HIGHER SALARIES FOR JUDICIARY EMPLOYEES:  The People's Assembly 
adopted a new law providing significantly higher salaries for 
judicial officials.  Members of the Constitutional Court and the 
Court of Appeals, judges, assistant judges, and investigators will 
profit from this law.  Considering the difficult nature of their 
work, such as pressure from delicate criminal cases, work in 
isolation, and overtime hours including weekends, the attorneys and 
investigators will be paid higher salaries than employees in 
legislative and executive branches.  The salaries of civil attorneys 
and investigators will be equal to those in the military.  The bill 
envisages an extra clothing allowance for district attorneys and 
investigators.  (Tirana ATA in English 1115 GMT 3 Mar 94 AU) 

   GERMAN FINANCING FOR ALBANIAN PROJECTS:  The Albanian Embassy in 
Bonn reports that an agreement to finance projects in the dispatch 
of goods and the construction of aqueducts in Albania was signed in 
Frankfurt on 3 March 1994.  The agreement was signed between the 
German Bank Kreditanstalt Fuer Wiederaufbau (KfW) (Reconstruction 
Loan Association) represented by Manfred Mueller, former state 
secretary and Kreditanstalt Presidency member, and the Albanian 
Bank, represented by Dylber Vrioni, Albanian Bank governor.  Mr. 
Mueller expressed his pleasure for the developments so far in the 
field of delivery of financial means by the German side.  He said 
that the bank he represents will support the Albanian Government's 
commitment for an efficient use of the German aid.  Mr. Mueller said 
he will further help to perfect the banking system in Albania. 
(Tirana ATA in English 1114 GMT 4 Mar 94 AU) 

   PUBLIC MANAGEMENT, ADMINISTRATION INSTITUTE:  The Public 
Management and Administration Institute was inaugurated in the 
presence of Prime Minister Meksi in Tirana on 4 March.  The 
institute will train management specialists for private and state 
sectors and help them stay abreast of contemporary methods and 
practices.  The institution is financed by the UNDP (United Nations 
Development Program) with an initial contribution of $600,000. 
These funds will be used to train new private sector managers with 
contemporary concepts.  Prime Minister Aleksander Meksi voiced the 
government's support to this important institution.  The first 
courses at the institute will begin during the second week of March. 
(Tirana ATA in English 1347 GMT 5 Mar 94 AU) 
   SHKODER URBAN DEVELOPMENT PROJECT:  The Rural Development 
Foundation this month will begin to implement the project on urban 
development of Shkoder City in the framework of a new initiative by 
the World Bank.  The Rural Development Foundation Director Genc Juka 
and Shkoder Mayor Filip Guraziu signed an agreement on 5 March.  Mr. 
Juka told ATA that after the completion of the Shkoder project, the 
foundation will continue its work for the rural development of this 
district.  This is the second year that this foundation has been 
carrying out its activity in Albania.  During the past year, it 
realised a pilot project, while this year the foundation will carry 
out its normal activity.  Among the foundation projects, we can 
mention the assistance to other districts in northeastern Albania. 
This year, the World Bank will put approximately $8 million at the 
foundation's disposal.  The World Bank's new initiative is expected 
to amount to $200,000.  According to the agreement, the tender will 
be over by 15 March.  The private firm that will win the tender is 
expected to start work on the project in March.  (Tirana ATA in 
English 0924 GMT 6 Mar 94) 

   PROTOCOL ON MILITARY MEDICAL COOPERATION WITH TURKEY:  The 
Albanian Embassy in Ankara reports that a protocol between the 
Republics of Albania and Turkey on the qualification of military 
medical staff was signed in Ankara on 8 March.  The protocol was 
signed in the context of the agreement for military cooperation and 
qualification signed on 19 November 1992.  The agreement will 
establish cooperation in the field of military medicine.  For the 
Turkish side, the protocol was signed by General Sherif Sabunju 
(name as received), while for the Albanian side by the ambassador in 
Ankara, Skender Shkupi.  (Tirana ATA in English 1108 GMT 9 Mar 94 
AU) 

   BULGARIA 

   JOINT VENTURE TO BUILD TOBACCO FACTORY IN UKRAINE:  A Bulgarian- 
Ukrainian joint venture was registered in Poltava, Ukraine, to 
construct a tobacco plant there.  The Blagoevgrad Tobacco Processing 
Works holds a 70-percent stake in the joint venture.  Construction 
work has already started, and the plant equipment will be delivered 
within the next few weeks.  Bulgartabak hopes to regain a firm 
position in its traditional markets in the former Soviet republics 
by the export of cigarette production to the CIS countries.  (Sofia 
BTA in English 1826 GMT 20 Mar 94 AU) 

   BREWERY MANAGERS URGE MASS PRIVATIZATION:  A letter from the 
chief executive officers of 19 breweries to parliament, the Council 
of Ministers, and the Ministries of Industry and Finance calls for 
the urgent mass privatization of breweries across the country. 
According to the brewery chiefs, upgrading of the breweries' 
equipment will cost about $150 million, which can only be secured 
through a speedy privatization, in which the units in this sector 
will compete for attracting foreign investments.  The breweries in 
Stara Zagora, Khaskovo, Burgas, Ruse, Sofia, and Pazardzhik have 
already been put up for privatization.  (Sofia BTA in English 1826 
GMT 20 Mar 94 AU) 

   NEW ELECTRIC POWER LINE TO FYROM COMPLETED:  Construction has 
been completed of a 110-kilovolt electric power line connecting the 
Republic of Bulgaria with the Former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia 
(FYROM) under an the agreement signed between the National 
Electricity Company of Bulgaria and the Macedonian Ministry of 
Economics.  The power line is 60 km long.  Its construction, which 
began last year, was facilitated by a $20 million credit granted by 
Bulgaria to the Macedonian Government.  At present, negotiations are 
under way on constructing a 400-kilovolt power line that will also 
extend to other Balkan states.  (Sofia DUMA in Bulgarian 16 Mar 94 p 
1 AU) 
   SOFIA FACES WATER SHORTAGE:  Sofia's water supply is in a 
critical condition, the Public Committee for Improving Sofia's Water 
Supply announced at a news conference on 21 March.  The content of 
the Iskur Dam (Sofia's main water source) is 95 million cubic meters 
(cu.m) and its critical volume is 90 million cu.m.  Its designed 
volume is 670 million cu.m, but the dam has rarely been full since 
it was built.  The water level of the dam has been on decline ever 
since 1982.  Early in January the Sofia City Council introduced 
water rationing in some areas of the capital.  There was some talk 
of rationing Sofia's water supply as a whole, but the government 
decided to restrict water consumption by industrial users only. 

   Sofia's water supply problem is not a new one.  Some four years 
ago a project was proposed to construct a water supply pipeline 
system from the Rila mountain catchment area.  However, in 1989 and 
1990 leaders and followers of various environmental parties and 
movements staged mass protests against the project, claiming its 
effect on the Mount Rila eco-system would be disastrous, and a 
parliamentary commission decided to suspend the project.  Sofia's 
water supply problem was resolved by rechanneling water from the 
Belmeken-Sestrimo cascade chain to it.  A new water supply project 
for catching the waters of Mount Rila has been developed, the new 
conference was told by Gancho Khitrov, chairman of the Public 
Committee for Improving Sofia's Water Supply.  It meets all 
ecological requirements, Khitrov said.  (Sofia BTA in English 1913 
GMT 21 Mar 94 AU) 

   TRANSPORT MINISTRY ORDERS AIRCRAFT SAFETY CHECKS:  At a Transport 
Ministry meeting on 21 March, Deputy Minister of Transport Pencho 
Penchev reported that accidents with Bulgarian aircraft operated by 
various Bulgarian airlines had become more frequent of late, though 
luckily involving no casualties.  The Ministry's leadership decided 
to carry out an urgent technical inspection of the aircraft fleet, 
its airworthiness, and operation.  Similar checkups will be 
conducted on the railways and road transport.  Transport Minister 
Kiril Ermenkov assigned the Railway Transport Department to check, 
jointly with the Bulgarian State Railways, reports the concentration 
of tank cars carrying fuel in different places in the country and in 
Somovit on the Danube in particular, where 40 tank cars are now 
standing whose owners have not been identified.  (Sofia BTA in 
English 1946 GMT 21 Mar 94 AU) 

   RUSSIAN, BULGARIAN BANKERS AGREE ON PAYMENTS:  The Sofia press 
reported on 17 March that bankers had agreed in Moscow to effect 
payments between Bulgaria and Russia in national currencies.  The 
agreement will take force after approval by the two countries' 
national banks.  Russian companies will be able to open lev accounts 
in Bulgarian banks and Bulgarian companies -- ruble accounts in 
Russian banks.  The two sides will pay one another at market rates 
set by the commercial banks.  This would allow Bulgarian firms to 
buy and export strategic raw materials such as oil, which has so far 
been done in dollars, STANDART NEWS reported. (Sofia BTA in English 
1027 GMT 17 Mar 94 AU) 

   LEV CONTINUES FALL AGAINST DOLLAR:  The dollar gained a further 
two leva on 16 March, shaking the interbank market.  Dollars sold at 
46.80 leva during most of the day, topping 47 leva in late day 
trading, which was attributed to big demand from power importers 
such as the National Electricity Company and Neftokhim, dealers were 
quoted as saying.  The Bulgarian National Bank (BNB) had agreed to 
sell them dollars from its foreign currency reserves but failed to 
meet its commitment, forcing them out on the market.  Despite the 
dollar gain, the BNB bank did not intervene in the market.  Dealers 
predict that unless the BNB acts urgently, the dollar will hit 50 
leva. (Sofia BTA in English 1027 GMT 17 Mar 94 AU) 

   VIETNAM TO REPAY LOANS WITH COMMODITIES:  In 1994 Vietnam plans 
to export to Bulgaria coffee, rubber, and rice to partly repay loans 
arrears for work completed on coffee and rubber plantations, TRUD 
reported on 17 March, citing Trade Ministry sources.  Vietnam will 
also export bamboo articles and furniture, art objects and ceramics, 
sports equipment, and tea.  (Sofia BTA in English 1027 GMT 17 Mar 94 
AU) 

   MORE TRAINING CHANCES FOR UNEMPLOYED:  Many unemployed will be 
given an opportunity for training and retraining, Deputy Minister of 
Labor And Social Affairs Yordan Khristoskov, head of the National 
Employment Office, announced on 17 March at a national conference in 
Varna of directors of regional employment centers on retraining 
problems.  At the end of last year, it was said, the Training and 
Unemployment Fund had accumulated reserves of 3.2 billion leva and 
is now expecting 6.5 billion in receipts.  The fund will help 
finance the retraining of personnel for companies about to be 
restructured.  It can also finance nationwide and regional training 
programs for the unemployed and offers information and professional 
advice on starting private business.  According to the National 
Employment Office's bulletin, there were 623,980 jobless in Bulgaria 
in February, 8,007 less than in January.  Of these, 203,924 have 
received unemployment and welfare benefits.  (Sofia BTA in English 
1854 GMT 17 Mar 94 AU) 

   PRIVATIZATION AGENCY PUBLISHES ANNUAL REPORT:  The press on 18 
March carries figures from the annual report of the Privatization 
Agency.  The proceeds from privatization deals completed in 1993 
were 1.227 billion leva.  Sales totalled 1,203,655,250 leva and 
privatized establishments' settled debts amounted to 23.029 million 
leva.  Employees of the privatized establishments bought shares 
valued at 51.927 million leva.  (Sofia BTA in English 1036 GMT 18 
Mar 94 AU) 

   ENERGY PRICES TO INCREASE:  On 10 March the National Council for 
Trilateral Cooperation held a session at which it decided on 
increases in energy prices for domestic and industrial consumers as 
of 1 April.  Electricity prices will rise by 29 percent for domestic 
consumers, while thermal energy will cost 90 percent more.  For 
industrial uses, the costs of electric power are increased by 39 
percent as of 15 March, and thermal power will rise in price by 43 
percent as of 1 April.  From the same date, fuel briquettes will be 
on average 40 percent more expensive.  The council also approved 
measures for periodically updating energy prices in line with 
inflation, together with compensation for persons with low incomes. 
The proposed new prices will probably be submitted to the Council of 
Ministers next week.  (Sofia Khorizont Radio Network in Bulgarian 
1700 GMT 10 Mar 94 AU) 

   CIS NATURAL GAS MORE EXPENSIVE:  The price of natural gas 
imported from Russia and Ukraine has gone up by 70 percent since the 
beginning of this year, the BTA Vratsa correspondent reported.  The 
rise in the price of natural gas, which is the main raw material at 
Khimco Inc., increases production costs.  Khimco managers are 
insisting on changes in the price formation of their output to 
preserve its competitiveness and their export potentials.  (Sofia 
BTA in English 1945 GMT 10 Mar 94 AU) 

   BALKANAIR MAY DISCONTINUE DOMESTIC SERVICES:  If the 
privatization of Balkan Bulgarian Airlines (Balkanair) is delayed, 
it will have to discontinue its domestic services, the company's 
boss, Kostadin Botev, said, quoted by 24 CHASA on 11 March.  In 
addition, Balkanair will have to cancel its 70 charter flights. 
Botev says this drastic measure is prompted by the carrier's 
snowballing losses.  A private airline and a private bank are ready 
to share in Balkanair's privatization, the daily writes.  So far 62 
foreign airlines and 43 investors have declined to participate. 
Bulgarian banks, however, are showing interest in Balkanair's 
denationalization, 24 CHASA specifies.  The European Bank for 
Reconstruction and Development declared that it will finance the 
deal only on condition that the investment stay in the 
denationalized unit, which is inadmissible under Bulgaria's 
Privatization Act, the daily writes.  In late March the National 
Assembly Transport and Economic Committees will decide whether to 
sell Balkanair to the buyers who have stepped forward so far or 
whether to seek new ones.  (Sofia BTA in English 1735 GMT 11 Mar 94 
AU) 

   BUSINESS PROMOTION IN GERMANY:  Bulgarian-German economy days 
will be held in Duisburg from 15-18 March under an agreement with 
the Association of German Chambers of Commerce and Industry, a news 
conference was told on 11 March by Bozhidar Bozhinov, president of 
the Bulgarian Chamber of Commerce and Industry.  Bulgaria will be 
represented by 44 companies, and Germany by 86, including a 
Bulgarian-German joint venture.  In 1993, trade turnover between 
Germany and Bulgaria exceeded 20 billion leva, with Bulgaria 
exporting goods worth 6.8 billion leva against imports from Germany 
valued at 13.4 billion leva.  (Sofia BTA in English 1952 GMT 11 Mar 
94 AU) 

   EXPORT OPPORTUNITIES IN KAZAKHSTAN:  Kazakhstan is interested in 
buying tobacco from Bulgaria, but the tobacco goods production there 
is not on a very high level.  It is good for Bulgaria to develop 
investment projects for the improvement of tobacco goods production 
in the form of technology and equipment and offer them to 
Kazakhstan, Zakhari Zakhariev, chairman of the Federation for 
Friendship with CIS Countries, told a news conference on 11 March. 
Bulgaria can also supply to Kazakhstan foods, wine, strong drinks 
and light industry products; there are opportunities for cooperation 
in metallurgy and the petroleum industry, he said.  Days of Bulgaria 
are planned to be held in that country in April.  (Sofia BTA in 
English 1952 GMT 11 Mar 94 AU) 

   CONSUMER PRICES INDEX RISES:  The February consumer price index 
stood at 104.6, the National Statistical Institute reported on 14 
March.  The price rises in February were as follows:  foods 5.79 
percent, non-foods 3.98 percent, and services 1.14 percent.  (Sofia 
BTA in English 1914 GMT 14 Mar 94 AU) 

   NATURAL GAS FOUND OFFSHORE NEAR VARNA:  Natural gas has been 
discovered close to Cape Emine near Varna by the Ocean Liberator 
drilling rig, 24 CHASA reported on 15 March.  This was announced by 
an independent expert monitoring the drill.  According to him, it is 
as yet unknown whether the deposit is of any commercial value.  The 
rig drilled to a depth of 4,000 meters.  (Sofia BTA in English 0906 
GMT 15 Mar 94 AU) 

   KREMIKOVTSI PLANT STARTS UP THIRD BLAST FURNACE:  Following a 
major overhaul, today the Kremikovtsi Metallurgical Plant near Sofia 
commissioned its third blast furnace.  The installation has been 
fitted with new mechanical equipment and an electronic system for 
controlling the technological process.  The furnace is also fitted 
with apparatus for cleaning the gases discharged into the 
atmosphere.  The reconstruction work cost about 1 billion leva. 
(Sofia Khorizont Radio Network in Bulgarian 1300 GMT 15 Mar 94 AU) 

   NO PLANS TO LIFT GRAIN EXPORTS BAN:  There are no plans to lift 
the ban on cereals exports any time soon, Radko Petrunov, head of 
the Processing Industry, Balances, Standardization and Metrology 
Department of the Agriculture Ministry, told reporters on 15 March. 
Wheat is barred from export until 30 June, and maize until 30 
September 1994.  The export of surplus flour may be allowed.  This 
surplus amounted to some 30,000 tons at the start of the year and is 
expected to be the same at the end of April, Petrunov said.  The 
Grain State Fund will regulate the grain production and market 
according to a grain production concept adopted by the Ministry's 
collegium on 15 March.  (Sofia BTA in English 2026 GMT 15 Mar 94 AU) 

   CONSULTANTS BEING SELECTED FOR SOFIA AIRPORT CONSTRUCTION:  On 15 
March a board of experts of the Transport Ministry today shortlisted 
five companies, three of which will be awarded consultancy contracts 
for the Sofia Airport project.  The project was developed by the 
British firm of Halcrow.  Sofia Airport Director General Khristo 
Danchev will study the opportunities for financing the consultancy 
through the Airport Operators Council International (AOCI).  (Sofia 
BTA in English 2026 GMT 15 Mar 94 AU) 

   AGREEMENT ON VAT EXEMPTION FOR NEWSPAPERS:  At a meeting on 15 
March six editors in chief of major dailies, representatives of four 
parliamentary forces, Parliament Chairman Aleksandur Yordanov, and 
Finance Minister Stoyan Aleksandrov came to an agreement that 
newspapers, magazines, and books would be exempted from value-added 
tax (VAT).  Aleksandrov pointed out that VAT will still be collected 
on advertisements in newspapers, magazines and books.  This week the 
parliamentary Economic Committee and Budgetary Committee are to 
discuss two bills of amendments to the Value Added Tax Act, which 
was passed on October 1, 1993 and comes into force on April 1, 1994. 
The proposed amendments provide for the exemption of newspapers from 
VAT.  (Sofia BTA in English 1852 GMT 15 Mar 94 AU) 

   REOPENING OF GOLD MINE URGED:  The Madzharovo mine can produce at 
least one ton of gold and 10 tons of silver per year for the state 
if ore extraction and processing starts immediately, that is, if the 
Ministry of Industry allows the establishment of a Bulgarian- 
Australian joint venture, 24 CHASA and TRUD report on 16 March, 
quoting Yordan Yordanov, the manager of the Madzharov Company.  Only 
six of the 150 lodes have been studied, but that is enough to start 
work, TRUD writes.  If things go well, the planned initial 
investment of $2.4 million for evaluation projects will rise to $30 
million.  A modern hydrometallurgical plant will be built if the 
mine proves profitable.  The Bulgarian state will hold 49 percent of 
the shares in the joint venture, Eurost Mineral Development NL 
(Australia) -- 31 percent, and Balkan Mining Consulting Ltd.  (Great 
Britain) -- 20 percent. 

   Industrial gold mining might be the only solution for at least 
100,000 Bulgarian miners, it is claimed in an article published in 
24 CHASA on precious metal deposits.  "The rest is all too clear: 
Uranium and lead equal suicide, coal mining is poorly paid, and 
copper and zinc production are close to extinction," the article 
points out.  There are gold and silver deposits in the eastern 
Rhodopes (southern Bulgaria) and near Khaskovo, Kurdzhali, 
Topolovgrad, and Momchilgrad.  (Sofia BTA in English 1157 GMT 16 Mar 
94 AU) 

   BALKAN TRADE CHAMBER PLANNED:  The Bulgarian Chamber of Commerce 
and Industry is expected to draw up a project for an Association of 
the Balkan Chambers of Commerce and Industry within a month, 
national radio reported.  At the first meeting on 2 March, the 
chairmen of the chambers of the Balkan countries decided to approve 
the project at the next meeting in Romania in September.  To 
facilitate Balkan business contacts, the chambers will link up their 
information systems.  Meetings will be held semi-annually and the 
hosts will be rotated.  The first meeting, organized at the 
initiative of the Bulgarian Chamber, was attended by representatives 
of Greece, Turkey, Albania, Macedonia, Serbia, Slovenia, and 
Romania.  (Sofia BTA in English 1517 GMT 6 Mar 94 AU) 

   'MULTIGROUP' HOLDING COMPANY:  Multigroup Inc. comprises between 
80 and 100 companies, Chief Secretary Boyko Draganov said.  Over 50 
enterprises form the group's production and trade division. 
Multigroup prefers processing industries that need heavy financing. 
The holding company has set up enterprises to produce dried fruit, 
contact lenses, rubber seals, and alcohol from molasses.  Its first 
large investment in this country is the purchase of the sugar 
refinery in Kameno (Southeastern Bulgaria).  In 1993 Multigroup 
invested $50 million in Bulgaria.  It has subsidiaries and offices 
in Vienna, the state of Virginia, Moscow, Almaty (Kazakhstan), 
Ukraine, China, South Africa, and Paraguay.  (Sofia BTA in English 
1517 GMT 6 Mar 94 AU) 

   FINANCING FOR SILISTRA-CALARASI FERRY SECURED:  A contract has 
been approved for the financing, building, and operation of a ferry 
between the Danubian cities of Silistra (in Bulgaria) and Calarasi 
(Romania).  (Sofia BTA in English 1517 GMT 6 Mar 94 AU) 

   MILITARY PLANT CONVERTS TO CIVILIAN PRODUCTION:  Shumel Ltd., a 
manufacturer of electronic equipment in Shumen (Northeastern 
Bulgaria), which until recently formed part of the military- 
industrial complex, has completed an almost 100-percent conversion 
to civilian production in the areas of telecommunications, 
medicines, and cosmetics.  (Sofia BTA in English 1517 GMT 6 Mar 94 
AU) 

   CONSTRUCTION PROJECTS IN RUSSIA:  "As many as 1,700 Bulgarian 
builders begin construction in Rostov-on-Don (Russia) of 1,600 
flats, a school, two kindergartens, a polyclinic, a shopping center, 
and entertainment facilities," the DUMA daily reports on 8 March, 
following the return from Russia of Iliya Radev, deputy minister of 
territorial development and construction, who had attended a 
ceremony to mark the start of construction.  The project, 
implemented jointly with Hochtief of Germany, will employ 4,000 
Bulgarian builders in all, DUMA reports.  The paper recalls that in 
1992 Bulgarian workers built 1,282 flats, a school, a polyclinic, 
two kindergartens, and a shopping center in Starokonstantinov in 
Ukraine.  This year Bulgarian workers will also complete a project 
in Kamenka, Russia.  (Sofia BTA in English 1133 GMT 8 Mar 94 AU) 

   CZECH REPUBLIC 

   TWO METHODS TO BE USED TO CALCULATE UNEMPLOYMENT:  Czech Prime 
Minister Vaclav Klaus said 15 March that the Czech Republic would 
continue to use two methods of calculating the unemployment rate, 
one based on jobless figures registered by employment offices and 
the other based on answers from members of 23,000 selected 
households.  Klaus told reporters that the advantages of the first 
method, used by the Ministry of Labor and Social Affairs, is that 
the unemployment rate in individual districts can be compared and 
data published at monthly intervals.  He said the second method, 
used by the Czech Statistics Office and more common throughout the 
world, does not offer a cross-section view of the jobless rate in 
the individual districts, and results are published once every three 
months.  Klaus said that differing data were therefore to be 
expected and that this was no "trick or deception on the 
government's part." (Prague CTK in English 0641 GMT 16 Mar 94 AU) 

  FEBRUARY PRICE INCREASES:  Prices for industrial products rose by 
1 percent in February against January.  Compared with December 1993, 
they rose by 1.8 percent, and in the year-to-year comparison, they 
rose by 5.3 percent.  Prices for construction works rose by 2.1 
percent in February, and 3 percent against December 1993.  In the 
year-to-year comparison they rose 16.1 percent.  Prices for 
agricultural products stagnated in February.  Against the same month 
last year, they rose by 1 percent, and remained unchanged compared 
with December 1993. (Prague LIDOVE NOVINY in Czech 17 Mar 94 p 9 AU) 

   ECONOMIC AGREEMENTS WITH UKRAINE:  Ukrainian Minister for 
External Economic Relations Oleg Slepichev and Czech Trade and 
Industry Minister Vladimir Dlouhy signed an agreement 17 March on 
economic cooperation between their two countries.  An agreement on 
the support and mutual protection of investments was also signed 
with Czech Finance Minister Ivan Kocarnik.  Dlouhy told reporters 
that he considered important the fact that the Czech Republic should 
sign treaties adjusting mutual business relations with all successor 
states to the Soviet Union, treaties that would correspond to the 
regulations of the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade. 

   A Finance Ministry spokeswoman said that the Czech Republic was 
bound by 16 accords signed before the Czechoslovak Federation split 
(on 1 January 1993) and it automatically assumed all the 
responsibilities resulting from them.  Since the split, the Czech 
Republic has signed some 10 treaties, which are not yet in force. 
The countries concerned are Hungary, Poland, Romania, Slovenia, 
Ukraine, Tadjikistan, Thailand, Australia, Portugal and Egypt. 
Slepichev is a member of the Ukrainian delegation led by Foreign 
Minister Anatoliy Zlenko.  (Prague CTK in English 1800 GMT 17 Mar 94 
AU) 

   KLAUS ASKS FRANCE TO SUPPORT REPUBLIC'S ENTRY INTO OECD:  Prime 
Minister Vaclav Klaus in a meeting 17 March with French Minister of 
Industry Gerard Longuet asked for France's support to the Czech 
Republic's application to join the Organization for Economic 
Cooperation and Development (OECD) at the OECD session in May. 
According to Petr Stepanek from the Government Office, Klaus told 
Longuet that in spite of its good relations with Poland, Hungary and 
Slovakia, the Czech Republic does not feel the need to approach 
Western Europe together with these countries as one entity. 
According to Klaus, this is what the Czech Republic is often 
reproached for by Western countries.  Klaus noted that Norway, for 
instance, had not been reproached for laying down its own conditions 
and for not acting in coordination with other states when it 
negotiated to join the European Union.  Klaus discussed with Longuet 
possible French participation in SPT Telecom.  (Prague CTK in 
English 2111 GMT 17 Mar 94 AU) 

   RIETER HOLDING TO BUY 90 PERCENT OF ELITEX:  The Swiss 
manufacturer of textile machines, Rieter Holding Ltd., based in 
Winterthur, has bought majority stock in Rieter Elitex.  The Swiss 
company paid 100 million korunas (Kc) for its share and acquired 90 
percent of the company.  (Prague CESKY DENIK in Czech 18 Mar 94 p 8 
AU) 

   COMMERCIAL BANK TO INCREASE STAKE IN PRAGER HANDELSBANK:  The 
only bank with Czech capital, Prager Handelsbank, established 
according to the German legal system and based in Frankfurt, reached 
a balance of 320 million German marks last year.  The bank's 
customers are mainly German entities interested in commercial 
activity in the Czech Republic and Slovakia.  Ceska Obchodni Banka 
(Czech Commercial Bank) wants to buy, over the month to come, the 
shares of two major shareholders and to increase thereby its own 
share.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 18 Mar 94 p 2 AU) 

   ECONOMIC AGREEMENTS WITH LITHUANIA:  Lithuania and the Czech 
Republic are to sign agreements on the prevention of dual taxation 
and on the support and protection of investments, according to an 18 
March statement by finance ministry spokeswoman Ludmila Nutilova. 
That decision is a result of Lithuanian Finance Minister Eduard 
Vilkelis's visit to the Czech Republic.  The former contract is to 
be signed this May, but the date for signing the latter has not yet 
been set, Nutilova said.  The main subjects discussed by Vilkelis 
and representatives of the finance and trade and industry ministries 
were the tax systems of both countries, tax reform in the Czech 
Republic, and the ADIS system, computer technology used by the Czech 
government.  Other subjects discussed were state fiscal and 
information systems, health and social insurance, and foreign trade. 
(Prague CTK in English 1209 GMT 18 Mar 94 AU) 

   SKODA CARS TO BE ASSEMBLED IN POLAND:  The Skoda carmaker based 
in Mlada Boleslav, central Bohemia, is to transfer, for the first 
time in its history, a part of its production away from the Czech 
territory, 19 March Czech dailies quote Skoda spokesman Jiri 
Hrabovsky as saying.  Skoda Managing Board decided on Friday, 18 
March, that a part of the joint venture's production, designated for 
the Polish market, is to be assembled by FSR Polmo Tarnap enterprise 
based in the Polish town of Poznan as of July 1 1994.  The Board 
Chairman Ludvik Kalma finds the decision to be the only way for 
Skoda to return to the Polish market, according to Hrabovsky. 

   The high customs barriers make Skoda cars 41 percent more 
expensive in Poland, due to customs fees of 35 percent and a 6- 
percent surcharge imposed on car imports.  This has led to the 
decline in the sales of Skoda cars in Poland from 40,000 in 1991 to 
2,891 in 1993, the press reports.  Like Skoda, FSR Polmo Tarnap has 
also established a joint venture along with Germany's Volkswagen. 
It has already been completing Volkswagen Transporter cars, and the 
assembling of Skodas is to contribute to better use of this plant's 
capacity. 

   This year, up to 5,000 Skodas are to be completed in FSR Polmo 
Tarnap.  However, in the future the capacity could considerably 
increase.  The cars will be transported to Poland partially 
dismantled.  The main part of the car will be produced in the Czech 
Republic, while the completion of remaining parts will take place in 
Poland.  The Polish company will make an investment into a new 
assembly line.  The completion itself will be paid for by Skoda, 
Hrabovsky is quoted as saying.  He declined to specify the financial 
amounts involved.  The press also quotes unofficial sources as 
saying that the price of a new model of the Skoda Favorit, which is 
likely to appear on the market at the beginning of September, is to 
be about Kc230,000 (almost $8,000), which is 20 percent more than 
the present model. 

   With the serial production of the new type of Favorit launched, 
the old (present) type will be terminated.  The production of the 
Formans and pick-ups is to continue.  In the first two months of 
this year, Skoda registered a 13- percent decline of its world sales 
in comparison with the same period in 1993.  In the Czech Republic 
the sales dropped to half, while a decline of 70 percent, the sale 
of a mere 833 cars, was registered in Slovakia.  (Prague CTK in 
English 1500 GMT 19 Mar 94 AU) 

   CONSTRUCTION BUSINESS INCREASES 13.3 PERCENT:  According to 
preliminary results, domestic construction firms carried out work 
worth Kc6.62 billion, which is 13.3 percent more than in January 
last year.  (MLADA FRONTA DNES in Czech 21 Mar 94 p 14 AU) 

   DANISH FIRM BUILDS WIND-POWERED ELECTRIC POWER STATION:  A wind- 
powered electric power station with an output of 225 kilowatts -- 
the first of its kind in the countries of Central and Eastern Europe 
-- will be put into operation on the Hostyn Hill near Bystrice pod 
Hostynem in the Kromeriz region.  The power station was built by the 
Danish firm Vestas for the price of about Kc9 million.  (Prague 
HOSPODARSKE NOVINY 21 Mar 94 p 2 AU) 

   CSA-AIR FRANCE VENTURE ENDED:  Three agreements ending the 
Czechoslovak Airlines (CSA)-Air France joint venture were initialed 
at 03:00 (02:00 GMT) on 22 March, Czech Transport Minister Jan 
Strasky announced.  The five parties to the agreements -- CSA, Air 
France, the National Property Fund, Konsolidacni Banka, and the 
European Bank for Reconstruction and Development (EBRD) -- only 
initialed the agreements because the EBRD management must approve 
them before they are signed.  (Prague CTK in English 1011 GMT 22 Mar 
94 AU) 

   AIR FRANCE REPRESENTATIVES RESIGN FROM CSA:  All five members of 
the board of directors and the one member of the supervisory council 
of Czechoslovak Airlines (CSA) representing Air France submitted 
their letters of resignation yesterday at CSA's extraordinary 
general meeting, Deputy Transport Minister Ivan Foltyn said 22 
March.  Their resignation is valid, he said, but it is still being 
discussed at the general meeting. 

   Within 35 days a regular general meeting is to be called, at 
which the issue of the new shareholder composition of CSA is to be 
addressed, Foltyn said.  The airlines' Articles of Association are 
to be modified and the position of the EBRD is to be changed.  The 
EBRD is to keep its 19-percent share in the company, but it will no 
longer have super-majority rights, nor will it have representatives 
on the board of directors, though it will apparently have 
representatives on the supervisory council, he added. 

   It is hoped that CSA will continue to develop as a commercial, 
profit-making company.  Its restructuring plan is to be approved at 
the general meeting, said Foltyn.  The plan, discussed at the 
January 6 general meeting, was not approved then because the Czech 
and French representatives could not reach an agreement, he added. 
The transport, finance, and privatization ministries should find a 
new partner for CSA by the end of this year, he continued.  The 
offers of potential partners are to be assessed in the near future. 

   Konsolidacni Banka (Consolidation Bank) will pay $27 million for 
Air France's shares and for options requirements, Transport Minister 
Jan Strasky said 22 Mar.  That is part of the agreement ending the 
CSA-Air France joint venture, which was initialed that morning by 
Air France, CSA, the National Property Fund, EBRD, and Konsolidacni 
Banka.  (Prague CTK in English 1611 GMT 22 Mar 94 AU) 

   CSA TO RETURN AIR FRANCE'S INVESTMENT:  Air France's $30 million 
investment in Czechoslovak Airlines (CSA) will be returned to the 
French airline in the near future, Air France chairman Christian 
Blanc said today.  Both airlines will suffer from Air France's 
withdrawal from the 1992 contract, he believes.  "It is sad for us, 
and maybe in the future it will be sad for them as well," he said. 
The main issue discussed at the negotiations in Paris was the 
purchase price of Air France's 19 percent share.  Transport Minister 
Jan Strasky requested that Air France withdraw from the contract at 
the beginning of this year, as the Czech Government last year had 
repeatedly accused Air France of being in part responsible for the 
poor management of the Czech company.  (Prague CTK in English 1855 
GMT 10 Mar 94 AU) 

   GREEN LIGHT FOR AVIATION INDUSTRY RESTRUCTURING:  Yesterday, the 
Council of Ministers confirmed the plan of restructuring the 
aviation industry.  According to the approved proposal, Aero Prague 
Co. is to eliminate all its bank loans and thereby also the risk of 
bankruptcy.  In the final stage, only four subsidiaries will remain 
in the Holding -- Aero Vodochody, Letov Praha, Technometra Radotin, 
and the Research and Testing Aviation Institute.  The National 
Property Fund will keep 64.8 percent of the holding shares.  Aero 
will hold a 53 percent stake in the subsidiaries.  The debt clearing 
will result from the capitalization of the main creditors' claims. 
The Investicni a Postovni Banka and CSOB (Czechoslovak Foreign Trade 
Bank) will each purchase 10 percent shares of the holding 
subsidiaries at 70 percent of the nominal value, and the 
Konsolidacni banka 27 percent. 

   The tender for the purchase of majority stakes in Moravan 
Otrokovice and Motorlet Jinonice is to be evaluated in the near 
future.  The Czech Frut Ovo Co. has offered $45 million for 
Motorlet, and the Canadian firm Pratt &amp; Whitney has offered $1 
million cash, $10 million in the form of know-how, and $14 million 
in investments.  The same Frut Ovo has offered $800 million for 
Moravan, while Bata offered only know-how.  If the tender for 
Motorlet is not successful, a competition will be announced.  If the 
talks with the bidders for Moravan are not successful either, the 
Investment and Postal Bank will purchase the company, and the 
proceeds will be used to pay the Aero debts.  A competition is also 
being considered for Let Kunovice if a suitable foreign partner is 
not found. 

   Yesterday, the ministers also discussed the conditions for the 
purchase of Czechoslovak Airlines shares from Air France Co. by the 
Consolidation Bank.  Minister Karel Dyba observed that the purchase 
of the French company's stake will also be discussed by the 
government later today, but he refused to release any additional 
information.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 9 Mar 94 p 1 AU) 

   DUTCH FUNDS SUPPORT SOCIAL PROJECTS:  Over the last three years, 
the Cooperating Dutch Funds subsided social projects in the Czech 
Republic with 56 million korunas (almost $2 million).  According to 
available information, subsidies helped to realize projects carried 
out by non-state organizations in social, charitable, health care 
and educational areas.  Since 1991, the Dutch Funds have been 
supporting the building and reconstruction of social and church 
structures in the Czech and Slovak republics, focusing mainly on 
social activities, initiatives and foundations aimed at children and 
youth, handicapped and elderly people.  The Cooperating Dutch Funds 
are the Queen Juliana Foundation, Catholic Needs Foundation, 
Maagdenhuis Foundation and Children's Stamps Foundation.  According 
to their Prague representatives, they are far from being the only 
Dutch foundations to aid the Czech and Slovak republics.  (Prague 
CTK in English 1028 GMT 22 Mar 94 AU) 

   INFLATION DROPS BELOW 10 PERCENT:  The Czech Republic has got 
below the 10-percent inflation mark, comparing prices of February 
1994 with those of February 1993, Czech National Bank governor Josef 
Tosovsky said 22 March.  During the opening of the third 
international financial and banking trade fair -- Fibex -- Tosovsky 
said he hoped this state of affairs would last some time.  "This 
data separates us somewhat from other central and east European 
countries and brings us closer to the more developed world," said 
Tosovsky.  He said this year will become a touchstone of the 
behavior of Czech banks, which are still very young and experiencing 
childhood illnesses and various excesses that the banking family 
cannot tolerate. 

   Tosovsky also said the Prague Stock Exchange as well as the RM 
System have found their place in society and after the second wave 
of coupon privatization may grow "not into some small local stock 
exchange, but into an exchange of regional significance".  A total 
of 382 exhibitors from 10 countries are participating in Fibex, a 
major exhibition in the field of finance in Europe.  Along with 
Fibex, an exhibition of marketing and advertising services and an 
exhibition of technology, products and services for developing towns 
and villages is taking place in Brno.  (Prague CTK in English 1140 
GMT 22 Mar 94 AU) 

   INFORMATION ON WEAPONS TO IRAN NOT PRECISE, RDP GROUP SAYS: 
Information on the export of Czech arms to Iran is not precise, 
director general of the RDP Group joint stock company Jan Vlcek told 
journalists today.  The company was just mapping out the market, he 
added.  Vlcek was reacting to an article published in February in 
the weekly RESPEKT, according to which director general of the 
Plzen-based Skoda company Lubomir Soudek was discussing in Tehran 
with Iranian authorities possible supplies of ground-to-ground 
missiles and the modernization of T-72 tanks last December. 

   The weekly said that the RDP asked in a letter from Vlcek Trade 
and Industry Minister Vladimir Dlouhy for help in granting a license 
for arms exports to Iran.  The export of the technology was for the 
Czech Republic an advantageous bid in terms of financial and 
technical parameters, the letter read.  The contract consisted of 
technological equipment for the existing Iranian factory, know-how 
documents and the training of Iranian workers by Czech experts, the 
paper quoted from the letter.  Vlcek stated that the "mapping out" 
of the Arabic market was conducted by the RDP with the consent of 
the government and called the reports published in RESPEKT 
"disinformation" and groundless.  (Prague CTK in English 1714 GMT 2 
Mar 94 AU) 

   BAN EXPECTED ON SALE OF ARMS TECHNOLOGY TO IRAN:  The possibility 
that the RDP Group of Czech arms manufacturers could negotiate 
exports to Iran of repair technology for the T-72 tank is apparently 
not very likely.  RDP Group Director General Jan Vlcek asked 
Industry and Trade Minister Vladimir Dlouhy to make a political 
decision whether his company may enter the Iranian market.  Minister 
Dlouhy, according to his spokesman Kamil Cermak, is awaiting, 
however, the stance of the Foreign Minister Josef Zieleniec and 
Defense Minister Antonin Baudys. 

   A source from diplomatic circles, who does not wish to be 
identified, told MLADA FRONTA DNES yesterday that the Foreign 
Ministry intends to honor international obligations and, on 
principle, not export arms to high-risk regions.  Although Iran is 
not among the countries to which the sale of arms is banned, many 
countries consider Iran a very high-risk region.  "After all, the 
situation in Iran is not calm and clear.  It is in the interest of 
the Czech Republic not to support armament in this region," the 
diplomat added. 

   "The RDP Group does not want to export tanks to Iran, it has 
never even considered it.  The consortium discussed the possibility 
of supplying repairs technology for these tanks," RDP Group press 
spokesman Jiri Vich specified.  The planned deal with Iran should 
revive some stagnating enterprises.  The expected financial volume 
of this order, which should be filled over five years, allegedly 
amounts to $0.5 billion.  The RDP Group even founded its own bank, 
TOPFIN.  By means of this consortium of small and medium-sized 
banks, the arms manufacturing company should finance its production 
and business transactions.  (Prague MLADA FRONTA DNES in Czech 4 Mar 
94 p 2 AU) 

   AMMUNITION COMPANY PRODUCES NATO-COMPATIBLE ROUND:  The Czech 
ammunition company Sellier &amp; Bellot has begun producing a new type 
of 5.56 by 45 millimeter cartridge with NATO specifications 
designated for military use, which it developed and financed from 
its own sources.  "We have become one of the companies capable of 
manufacturing ammunition according to NATO standards, the first 
Eastern European country to do so," chairman of the company board, 
Jiri Hanak, told a news conference Tuesday (8 March). 

   The production program of Sellier &amp; Bellot focuses on the 
traditional production of sports and hunting ammunition and special 
bomb-disposal devices.  "Production for military purposes, which was 
valued at 300 million korunas before 1989, is now almost at zero 
point," said Hanak.  The company also produces packaging machinery, 
automatic machines for the food industry and products of precision 
engineering. 

   Sellier &amp; Bellot, set up in 1992, was privatized in the first 
wave of coupon privatization.  "The company management wants the 
shares (20 percent) reserved for a possible foreign partner to be 
sold in the second wave," Hanak said.  While the company's profit 
between May and December 1992 was 31 million korunas, last year it 
was 2.5 times as high.  The Sellier &amp; Bellot trademark has been used 

on the territory of the Czech Republic since 1825.  (Prague CTK in 
English 0924 GMT 9 Mar 94 AU) 

   PRAGUE POLICE GETS ELECTRIC-POWERED PICK-UP TRUCK:  An electric- 
powered Skoda pickup has joined the Prague Police's fleet of 
automobiles, Police Director Rudolf Blazek announced today.  The 
exhaust-free electric pick-up, manufactured by Skoda Engineering 
Ejpovice, will be used primarily by police officers placing "the 
clamp" on cars parked illegally in the city center.  The vehicle is 
recharged directly from the city's electric power network and can 
travel 60-70 kilometers on one charge.  Its maximum speed is 80 
kilometers per hour (48 miles per hour).  It costs 360,000 Czech 
korunas ($12,000).  Blazek said the Prague Police had received a 
donation from the city's ecological fund for the purchase of the 
vehicle, adding that the police hoped to purchase more of them if 
more money from the fund can be received.  (Prague CTK in English 
1613 GMT 9 Mar 94 AU) 

   AGRICULTURE POLICY TO BE LIBERAL BUT PROTECTIVE:  The Czech 
Government intends to base its agricultural policy on domestic 
production while at the same time exposing Czech producers to world 
market pressures, Agriculture Minister Josef Lux said on TV Nova 
Wednesday night.  He added that agricultural subsidies would be 
lower than in Western Europe because the Czech Republic did not have 
much money, but that the government would not lower them all at 
once.  "We want to be liberal, but we definitely cannot let 
ourselves be flooded by cheap, price-supported agricultural products 
from the West," he said, adding that in no case would the Czech 
Republic copy the European Union's current protective policies. 

   "We want this pressure to exist and to compel farmers to alter 
their patterns of behavior, but under no circumstances may this 
pressure put our producers out of business.  It must create room for 
the good ones to have a chance to realize at least a minimal amount 
of profit," Lux said.  He said it was currently impossible for Czech 
farmers to manage without subsidies.  Life without subsidies is 
still "way ahead of us." 

   "Our goal is unambiguous -- to exert pressure, together with the 
United States, Canada, and other countries, to force the EU to lower 
its level of protection...  and to talk with our neighbors about 
creating comparable conditions."  He added that the government 
wanted comparable levels of market protection but would not lower 
Czech protective measures all at once and release a flood of foreign 
goods onto the domestic market.  The current highly protectionist 
policies of the EU are primarily a political problem, he said. 
(Prague CTK in English 0713 GMT 10 Mar 94 AU) 

   STATE OF ECONOMIC REFORM IN 1993:  The dominant feature of in the 
economy development was stabilization -- maintaining balance and the 
trend to dynamically reinforce it on the macroeconomic level.  The 
partition of the CSFR did not manifest itself in the Czech Republic 
by any obvious economic problems.  Monetary policy caught the impact 
of the currency division in the first quarter and maintained the 
stability of the currency, including its rate of exchange. 
Favorable foreign currency reserves have been established.  The 
volume of exports grew significantly.  The economic standard 
measured by the volume of GNP remained basically at the 1992 level. 
The economic structure changed only through the influence of private 
enterprise.  Because of the needs of the open economy of the Czech 
state, the structure of large industry has not changed favorably. 

   The trend of the GNP development was stimulated by aggregate 
demand, indicating a recovery of economic activity.  In comparison 
with 1992, retail sales grew in 1993 by 1 percent in constant 
prices, services soared by 15 percent, investment demand rose 17 
percent (in the first to third quarters of 1993 in comparison with 
the same period a year earlier, it will decline in the fourth 
quarter because of the huge increase in the fourth quarter of 1992) 
and exports grew by 20 percent (by approximately 11 percent 
including Slovakia).  Part of the increased demand was covered by a 
stock reduction.  The aggregate supply from the main production 
sectors remained below the 1992 level:  Industrial output declined 
by 5.3 percent, construction output by 7.5 percent, and agricultural 
output by 0.8 percent.  So far, the changes in the general structure 
of industrial production have not manifested themselves 
significantly, which is demonstrated in the large setbacks in 
several industrial sectors with a high degree of labor input.  The 
exceptions, like the manufacture of cars and some other products, 
could not, overall, reverse the still low competitiveness of 
engineering production and the consumer industry. 

   The manufacture of goods declined in comparison with 1992 in all 
sectors of industry (in organizations with 25 or more employees). 
The production of goods declined on a year-to-year basis more than 
10 percent in mining non-energy raw materials, the textile and 
clothing industries, wooden goods manufacture, the production and 
processing of stone and ceramics, and particularly in the 
manufacture of machines and instruments.  Among the other sectors of 
industry, the lowest production decline was registered in the 
manufacture of leather and leather goods, the manufacture of rubber 
goods, and plastic goods production -- less that 2 percent each. 

   The decisive, and still-growing share in industrial production 
belongs to food and condiments manufacture (16.5 percent), power, 
gas, and water production (10.8 percent), metal and metal goods 
production (14.3 percent) and vehicle manufacture (8.4 percent).  In 
addition to the aforementioned sectors with a low pace of 
production, the share of the manufacture of electrical and optical 
instruments also declined (4.1 percent), so that, together with the 
manufacture of machines and instruments (7.7 percent share) and 
vehicle production, the share of the former engineering and 
electrical engineering industries amounts to approximately 20 
percent. 

   Small enterprises (with staffs of fewer than 25) and natural 
persons, registered or not registered in the enterprise register, 
demonstrated much greater economic activity.  According to a Czech 
Statistical Office estimate, the production of small enterprises and 
individuals increased by 20 percent on a year-to-year basis, while 
the production in organizations with more than 25 employees declined 
by 7.4 percent.  Small business managed to increase the volume of 
output in construction by 1.5 percent, while production in large 
enterprises declined 10.1 percent. 

   The relationship between the growth of labor productivity and 
average wages did not develop favorably.  While the GDP declined 1 
percent, the average nominal wages in the economy increased by 25 
percent and real wages by 3.5 percent; the productivity of labor in 
industry declined 1.3 percent, while nominal wages rose 23.8 percent 
and real wages 2.5 percent; and in construction, the 12.2 percent 
decline in productivity compares with a 28.6 percent increase in 
nominal wages and 6.5 percent in real wages (all in comparison of 
1993 with 1992). 

   The rate of inflation reached 20.8 percent in comparison with 
1992.  It has been affected, from the very beginning of the year, by 
the transfer to the value-added tax that was reflected in an 8 
percent price increase.  If we adjust the rate of inflation, taking 
away this effect, the inflation trend would reach less than 1 
percent per month.  While overall consumer prices rose 18.2 percent 
between December 1992 and December 1993, the prices of food products 
rose 13.2 percent and non-food products by 18 percent, catering by 
21.9 percent, and services by 25.3 percent.  Manufacturing prices in 
industry rose 11.4 percent, in construction 26.9 percent, in 
railroad, river, and air-cargo transport by 29.5 percent, in 
communications by 28.9 percent, and in farm products on average for 
the year by 6.2 percent. 

   Political stability, continuing the favorable acceptance of the 
economic reform and the economic development by a majority of the 
population, and a relatively very low rate of unemployment were the 
main reasons for social accord.  The overall unemployment rate of 
3.5 percent indicates that the fundamental material restructuring 
has not yet begun.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 10 Mar 94 p 
7 AU) 

   MORE ON STATE OF ECONOMIC REFORM IN 1993:  Foreign demand was 
boosted by undervaluing the rate of exchange of the koruna, which is 
almost triple the purchase parity.  Exports, excluding exports to 
Slovakia, rose 20 percent in comparison with 1992; including 
Slovakia, they grew, according to the estimate, by more than 11 
percent.  Because of the high volume of imports in 1992 prior to the 
currency division, imports increased 2.7 percent, excluding imports 
from Slovakia; including the estimate for Slovakia, imports were 
between 1 and 3 percent lower than in 1992.  The 1993 trade balance 
ended with a surplus of 5.9 billion korunas; without Slovakia with a 
deficit of 3.7 billion korunas. 

   The favorable development of the trade balance, which reached the 
value of 104.1 percent, was achieved by a 2 percent increase of 
export prices and a 1.7 percent reduction in the prices of imported 
goods.  Projected into the volumes of exports and imports (without 
Slovakia) the price changes in 1993 brought 12 billion korunas to 
the Czech economy in comparison with the price levels of 1992.  The 
largest trading partner was Germany -- its share of imports was 25.1 
percent and of exports 26.9 percent. 

   The surplus on the current account of the balance of payments in 
convertible currency reached $620 million (approximately 18 billion 
korunas).  The convertible currency trade deficit was made up, and 
the source of the surplus was the surplus of services and transfers 
of private and enterprise foreign currency funds.  In services, 
tourism (foreign currency income from foreigners reached $1.3 
billion) and gas transit were the sectors most responsible for the 
surplus. 

   Foreign currency reserves in the entire banking system rose at 
the end of the year to $6.2 billion, of which the Czech National 
Bank's foreign currency reserves amounted to 3.8 billion korunas. 
The Czech National Bank's reserves cover a 4-month volume of imports 
of goods and services in convertible currency.  A large part of the 
increase of foreign currency reserves reflects foreign currency 
funds drawn from abroad, which, however, also appear on the other 
side as an increase in gross indebtedness.  In addition to the 
aforementioned surplus on the current account of the balance of 
payments, it was also the inflow of capital -- above all, portfolio 
investments -- that contributed to the increase in foreign currency 
reserves.  Two issues of Czech National Bank bonds, with a volume of 
$0.7 billion, should be mentioned first.  Foreign investments in 
securities on the domestic capital market also increased 
significantly.  Foreign currency credits obtained by domestic firms 
directly from abroad were also among the sources of long-term 
capital.  The inflow of direct investments from abroad declined in 
comparison with 1992 to reach $561 million (direct investments from 
abroad for 1992 to 1993 amount to $2.053 billion). 

   Macroeconomic stability was actively affected in 1993 by the 
state budget.  As opposed to the countries of the former Eastern 
bloc and most Western European countries, the state budget had a 
surplus of 1.1 billion korunas, with planned revenues surpassed by 
4.6 percent and expenditures by 4.3 percent.  The basis of budget 
revenues was taxes, specifically income tax (71.9 billion korunas), 
value-added tax and consumer tax (107.5 billion korunas), and social 
security premiums (106.0 billion korunas). 

   While the monetary policy of the Czech National Bank was 
moderately restrictive and careful in early 1993, it relaxed in the 
second half of the year.  The stability of the purchasing power of 
the koruna prevailed.  The rate of exchange against the dollar did 
not substantially change in the course of the year and hovered at 
about 29.15 korunas per dollar.  The money supply rose by 17.5 
percent in the course of the year, i.e. it moved more slowly than 
inflation. 

   The main reason for the growth of the money supply is the credits 
provided to the enterprise sector.  The credits increased overall by 
107 billion korunas to reach 678 billion korunas at the end of the 
year.  The decline of the share of long-term credits and the 
concurrent increase in short-term credits were affected by the 
unclear nature of the development programs, uncertainty in the area 
of management stability, and the worsening financial situation of 
the enterprises together with fear on the part of the banks of the 
growing volume of risk credits, estimated at more than one-fifth of 
total credits.  The credit policy was marked by high security for 
the credits and relatively high credits.  The interest rate began to 
decline after the June reduction of the discount rate from 9.5 
percent to 8.0 percent, but it is still higher than the interest 
rates charged on credit abroad.  Therefore, in late 1993, the inflow 
of foreign capital in the form of credit became more significant. 
The volume of deposits increased in 1993 by 117 billion korunas to 
reach 636 billion korunas. 

   The trend in living standards was characterized in 1993 by a high 
growth of nominal wages, i.e. 28 percent in comparison with the 
previous year.  Even with the 20.8 percent growth of consumer 
prices, the real income of the population rose by 6 percent.  Real 
wages rose by 3.5 percent.  The real income of the population was 
still 15 percent lower than it was in 1989. 

   With the aforementioned average data, the living standard of 
individual groups and strata of the population began to differ 
significantly according to the per capita income in the applicable 
household groups.  The demographic development of the Czech Republic 
was marked, as in the previous several years, by a low natural 
increase in the population.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 11 
Mar 94 p 3 ) 

   COST OF LIVING INCREASES 1.2 PERCENT IN JANUARY:  According to 
statistics from the Czech Statistical Office, the cost of living in 
the Czech Republic increased by 1.2 percent in January this year 
compared with December 1993.  (Prague DENNI TELEGRAF 12 Mar 94 p 6 
AU) 
   CONSUMER PRICE INDEX ROSE 0.2 PERCENT IN FEBRUARY:  The consumer 
price index rose only 0.2 percent in February over its January 
level.  Food prices declined 0.2 percent, and prices for other types 
of goods and for services rose 0.4 percent.  According to the Czech 
Statistical Office, the consumer price index rose 9.7 percent in 
comparison with February 1993.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY 11 Mar 94 
p 1 AU) 

   JANUARY INDUSTRIAL OUTPUT:  The volume of industrial production 
in January 1994 reached 103.3 percent (in current prices) of the 
January 1993 level.  This folows from most recent data provided by 
the Czech Statistical Office.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY 11 Mar 94 
p 2 AU) 

   KLAUS, BANK GOVERNOR STRESS NEED FOR KORUNA STABILITY:  The heads 
of both the Czech Government and Czech National Bank (CNB) consider 
the stable exchange rate of the Czech koruna to be the principal 
tenet of the national economy, Prime Minister Vaclav Klaus and CNB 
Governor Josef Tosovsky told reporters today after a meeting between 
the prime minister and the CNB Council.  The prime minister 
emphasized that all economic and price factors should be based on 
this exchange rate, and not the other way around.  He refused to 
speculate on the prospective reduction of the rate.  Bank Governor 
Tosovsky explained the government's position with details concerning 
foreign currency reserves.  Since January 1st, the CNB has purchased 
hard currency for more than 600 million dollars, augmenting its 
reserves by half a billion dollars.  Tosovsky said the entire 
banking system currently holds $6.7 billion in hard currency, with 
the Central Bank controlling 4.3 billion of that total.  He 
considers these reserves allow for an adequate amount of 
maneuverability and help maintain the exchange rate at its current 
level. 

   The Czech National Bank, together with the Finance Ministry, is 
preparing material for a meeting of economic ministers in mid-April 
where further steps to expand the convertibility of the Czech koruna 
will be discussed.  The first step is expected to complete the 
internal convertibility of the currency, that is, the termination of 
the exchange limit for citizens, and the liberalization of the ebb 
and flow of capital (in direct investments) to and from the 
republic.  The second step includes the freeing of restrictions 
regarding the capital accounts balance:  the flow of capital abroad 
in portfolio investments and deposits in foreign banks.  Klaus said 
the government and the CNB had "identical or nearly identical" 
opinions on the basic developing trends of the Czech and world 
economies, and were "immensely similar" in their basic opinions on 
further financial procedures.  (Prague CTK in English 2112 GMT 11 
Mar 94 AU) 

   OFFICE SUPPLY COMPANY TO BE PRIVATIZED:  The capital stock of the 
Koh-i-noor office supplie company in Prague is worth Kc188 million, 
according to company director Pavel Bohuminsky.  Of this, 86 percent 
will be offered in the second wave of coupon privatization, while 10 
percent will remain in the National Property Fund and the rest in 
the Restitution Fund.  The amount of Koh-i-noor claims is Kc25 
millions; obligations amount to Kc20 million.  (Prague LIDOVE NOVINY 
11 Mar 94, FINANCNI NOVNINY Supplement, p 1 AU) 

   LUX PRAISES QUALITY OF DOMESTIC FOOD PRODUCTS:  The quality of 
domestic foodstuffs is comparable with that of foreign producers and 
in many cases is even higher, Czech Agriculture Minister Josef Lux 
said today on Czech Television.  Lux said that there has been 
considerable improvement in this area, adding that only in packaging 
techniques was the Czech food industry behind in some places. 
Unlike in the past when foreigners were afraid to buy food here, 
now, especially in border regions, they buy quality Czech food 
products cheaply and in large amounts, Lux said. 

   The government expects foodstuffs prices to increase by 8 to 9 
percent this year, Lux said, adding that spending on food products 
has been decreasing since 1991.  This is caused partly by the fact 
that the prices of other consumer goods have been increasing faster 
and people have to spend more on them.  Foodstuffs prices are not 
therefore a factor causing inflation, Lux said.  Chairman of the 
Union of Landowners and Private Farmers Vlastimil Tlusty, also on 
the Czech television program, said that specific means of 
eliminating the large difference between the costs at which farmers 
produce their products and' the price at which processing factories 
buy the products are missing in the agricultural program approved by 
the government.  He welcomed the program as a big help for 
agriculture but said it needed further work. 

   Referring to the government agricultural program Lux said that 
its short-time goal was to ensure farmers access to capital through 
the Guarantee Fund.  Banks are currently refusing loans to farmers 
and the Guarantee Fund will provide guarantees to banks and farmers 
and also cover part of the interest.  The second goal is the change 
in the structure of agriculture, Lux said.  He said that the long- 
term objective of the program is to stabilize the prices of food 
products through the Market Regulation Fund.  Pressure on the 
European Union countries to reduce the protection of their markets 
should help achieve this goal, Lux said.  (Prague CTK in English 
1911 GMT 13 Mar 94 AU) 

   HIGHER PROFITS FOR BANKS, INSURANCE COMPANIES IN 1993:  The 
overall profit of banks and insurance companies in 1993 reached 
Kc2O.555 billion before taxes, which is 54.7 percent more than in 
1992.  The capital stock of banks increased by Kc38.356 billion, 
reaching Kc105.410 billion.  (Prague DENNI TELEGRAF 15 March 94 p 6 
AU) 

   ECONOMIC RELATIONS WITH ITALY:  Trade between the Czech Republic 
and Italy increased by some 35 percent in 1993.  Italian 
entrepreneurs consider the Czech Republic as a completely stable 
European country.  Italian investment funds are showing interest in 
shares of Czech enterprises.  This is what Dr. Roberto Luongo, 
director of the Prague office of the Italian Foreign Trade Office 
said in an interview for RUDE PRAVO.  Italy is the fifth most 
important trading partner of the Czech Republic.  Machines are the 
main item in Italian exports.  Exports of consumer goods and food 
products to our markets are also increasing.  The Czech Republic 
exports steel products, plastic material products, and paper to 
Italy.  (Prague RUDE PRAVO 15 Mar 94 p 10 AU) 

   CZECH KORUNA DEVALUED IN RESPONSE TO SLOVAK SURCHARGE:  In 
reaction to the Slovak-introduced import surcharge the Czech 
Republic will this afternoon devalue the Czech koruna 3 percent 
within the clearing ECU, which is used in payments between the two 
countries, Prime Minister Vaclav Klaus announced.   Speaking after 
an emergency meeting of economic ministers, Klaus said the Czech 
Republic expected the 10 percent surcharge introduced as from 
Thursday to be in force only until July 1.  (Prague CTK in English 
1214 GMT 3 Mar 94 AU) 

   SYNOPSIS OF CZECH-SLOVAK CUSTOMS UNION:  Sixteen months ago, on 
29 October 1993, the Czech Republic and Slovakia signed a customs 
union agreement, which contained the following principles: 

   - the creation of a single customs area, comprising the customs 
areas of the two contracting countries; 

   - securing freedom of movement for goods and services within this 
single customs area, avoiding customs and non-tariff measures; 

   - a common customs tariff between contracting states and a common 
customs and trade policy toward a third country; 

   - common customs legislation, agreed tariff measures and the same 
customs practice in using the same customs certificates; 

   - the coordination of duties will be conducted by the equally 
represented Customs Union Council and its Permanent Secretariat. 
Disputes between contracting sides are to be resolved through 
agreement within the framework of the Arbitration Commission.  The 
Customs Union Council will represent the contracting states in 
matters concerning the customs union abroad, including the 
Commission of the European Union. 

   Council sessions are held at least once every three months.  The 
chairman calls a session whenever one of the contracting states so 
requests.  The statutes of the Customs Union Council and the 
establishment of the Permanent Secretariat were decided at the 
session in Bratislava on 18 January 1993.  Czech Trade and Industry 
Minister was the first elected Council Chairman; the position is 
honorary and is held by representatives of alternate states every 
six months.  The executive body is the Permanent Secretariat, based 
in Bratislava.  Its director general is Rudolf Besik. 

   The budget for the operation of the customs union for 1993 should 
be 15 million crowns ($515,000).  Slovak economy minister Jaroslav 
Kubecka was elected council chairman on 23 August 1993, and since 17 
January 1994 it has been chaired by the new Slovak Economy Minister, 
Jan Ducky.  (Prague CTK in English 1141 GMT 3 Mar 94 AU) 

   MEETING SET ON CZECH-GERMAN OIL PIPELINE:  Industry and Trade 
Minister Vladimir Dlouhy leaves on March 4 for Weidhaus, Germany, to 
discuss the construction of the Ingolstadt oil pipeline with 
Bavarian Economics Minister Otto Wiesheu.  The ministers will 
discuss in particular the unresolved issue of who will take over 
guarantees for uninsurable and unpredictable damage to the pipeline, 
ministry spokesman Kamil Cermak said today.  Last week Dlouhy said 
that the February 1 ministerial meeting had recommended that the 
agreement on guarantees be concluded by a Czech organization, with a 
guarantee from the National Property Fund (FNM).  Wiesheu told 
Dlouhy that Bavaria would welcome it if the guarantees were given by 
the FNM. 

   Premier Vaclav Klaus said after the ministerial meeting that it 
was impossible for the Czech Republic to conclude an international 
agreement with Bavaria, an entity that is not at its legal level. 
The demand for guarantees has been raised by the Bavarian farmers' 
union, which is concerned that the construction of the oil pipeline 
might infringe the ownership rights of persons owning land through 
which the oil pipeline is to lead.  Head of the Bavarian Economics 
Ministry power department Robert Dehner told CTK that the variant 
favoring guarantees on the part of the FNM is acceptable for Germany 
but he indicated that Munich wanted to add "a new proposal". 

   According to information from other well-informed Bavarian 
sources, the Bavarian government has not yet completely accepted 
Prague's offer for guarantees of the Czech side to be taken over 
solely by the FNM and for the Prague government not to participate 
at all.  Bavaria's proposal may therefore include a demand for some 
form of guarantees from the Czech government.  (Prague CTK in 
English 2010 GMT 3 Mar 94 AU) 

   NATIONAL PROPERTY FUND TO PROVIDE PIPELINE GUARANTEE:  Trade and 
Industry Minister Vladimir Dlouhy agreed here today with the 
Bavarian Economy minister Otto Wiesheuem that the National Property 
Fund (FNM) would provide a guarantee for uninsurable damages to the 
oil pipeline that will run from Ingolstadt, Bavaria to Nelahozeves, 
central Bohemia.  The FNM will deposit the guarantee of 80 million 
German marks with the Czech national Bank for the whole period of 
existence of the pipeline, stated Wiesheuem.  Dlouhy said that the 
FNM was happy to do so because of the significant amount of interest 
that it would receive from the deposit.  He added that if the FNM 
ceased to exist while the pipeline was still in operation, the state 
would take over the guarantee.  The pipeline is expected to operate 
for 20 to 25 years. 

   Dlouhy expects the guarantee from the Bavarian side to come from 
the Bavarian government or a state organization.  "In the case of 
terrorist attack, each side would cover half the damage.  If there 
is war or revolution, both sides have the right to withdraw from the 
agreement", stressed Dlouhy.  Details of the agreement will be 
worked out by a group of experts on March 14, according to 
Wiesheuem.  The agreement should be ready for signing by the end of 
March. 

   The Bavarian Government has prepared legislation enabling 
construction of the pipeline to go ahead, which the Bavarian 
parliament is expected to approve in April.  It was necessary to 
resolve the issue of the guarantee against damages resulting from 
acts of God before the legislation could be passed.  Construction of 
the pipeline began on the Czech side last September and will begin 
in Germany this spring.  The project should be completed in 1995. 
(Prague CTK in English 2019 GMT 4 Mar 94 AU) 

   'STEADY' GAS SUPPLIES FROM CIS TO CZECH REPUBLIC, SLOVAKIA: 
Natural gas supplies from the territory of the Commonwealth of 
Independent States (CIS) to the Czech Republic and Slovakia are 
steady, head of the Velke Kapusany international pumping station, 
Vaclav Vasil, said 7 March.  The limiting of supplies only concerns 
Russian gas supplies to Ukraine but not Russian supplies to the 
Czech Republic and Slovakia, Vasil said, adding that according to an 
employee of the Russian company Gazprom there are no grounds for 
anxiety over the possibility of reduced supplies in the foreseeable 
future.  (Prague CTK in English 1122 GMT 7 Mar 94 AU) 

   MINISTERS TO DISCUSS KORUNA'S CONVERTIBILITY:  Government 
ministers today discussed coordination between the Czech National 
Bank and the Finance Ministry in drawing up further documents on the 
move to full convertibility of the Czech koruna.  Economics Minister 
Karel Dyba said after the  8 March meeting that the central bank is 
expected to submit the document to ministers at the end of April. 
Dyba said the ministers did not discuss a specific term for the 
move.  Premier Vaclav Klaus said after a ministerial meeting on 
January 20 that the ministers gave "a green light" to gradual 
deregulation and liberalization steps leading to full convertibility 
of the koruna.  (Prague CTK in English 2044 GMT 8 Mar 94 AU) 

   CZECH, HUNGARIAN AGRICULTURE MINISTERS SIGN AGREEMENTS:  The 
Czech and Hungarian governments today signed an agreement on 
cooperation in the veterinary sector and crop protection, and an 
inter-ministry agreement on cooperation in agriculture, the food 
industry, and forest management.  The two agriculture ministers, 
Josef Lux and Janos Szabo, signed for the two governments.  Szabo is 
presently visiting the Czech Republic to exchange information on 
agricultural problems and to discuss bilateral relations and the 
international agriculture situation.  The ministers agreed they 
would like to lower tariffs by half on agricultural products even 
before 1998, the year specified by the Central European Free Trade 
Agreement (CEFTA), although they did not discuss specific goods. 
Eventually they would like to eliminate all tariffs.  Szabo 
expressed interest in the progress of restitution and privatization 
of agricultural property, and familiarized Lux with the Hungarian 
system of state support for agriculture.  (Prague CTK in English 
1655 GMT 8 Mar 94 AU) 

   HUNGARY 

   OPEL RACE CARS PRODUCED IN HUNGARY:  The Hungarian Opel factory 
of General Motors is producing racing cars this month.  The unit, 
located in Szentgotthard (western Hungary), specializes in Opel 
Astras, but now they have an extra commission to make 43 specially 
formed and equipped racing cars for use in speed and mountain races 
to be held by the Hungarian Federation for Automobile and Motor 
Sports Federation.  The racing Astras will have 1600-cc, 100-HP 
engines with separately injected cylinders, and they are expected to 
reach a maximum of 190 km/hour.  (Budapest MTI in English 0859 GMT 
23 Mar 94 AU) 

   SAMSUNG DISPLAY CENTER:  The Samsung Electronics Hungarian Rt. is 
planning to raise its annual turnover by 50 percent in 1994.  Of its 
total production, worth 5.5 billion forints (HUF), Samsung plans to 
distribute HUF3.5 billion in Hungary, and sell the rest abroad ($1 
equals HUF103), the head of the Hungarian Samsung branch, Yeak Park 
said at the inauguration of a new Samsung show center in Budapest. 
The Korean firm has been present on the Hungarian market since 1989. 
Its television factory in Jaszfenyszaru (central Hungary) employs 
over 200 people.  Last year the firm sold TV sets worth HUF1 
billion, and the value of exports corresponded to HUF3 billion.  For 
this year 150,000 color TV sets have been scheduled, with 90,000 
going to export.  The three-storey building, the first show center 
of Samsung in Europe, has 360 square meters of space, including 
several offices, showrooms, and conference rooms.  The center was 
constructed for $1.5 million.  Hungary was the first of the one-time 
Comecon countries to open a representation office in South Korea 
seven years ago.  The two countries established diplomatic ties five 
years ago. Commercial turnover, at zero seven years ago, almost 
reached $87 million last year.  Samsung has so far invested $4.6 
million in Hungary, corresponding to one-tenth of all Korean 
investments in this country.  (Budapest MTI in English 1334 GMT 17 
Mar 94 AU) 

   MALEV SET TO APPROVE CAYMAN ISLANDS SUBSIDIARY:  The founding of 
the Aircraft Leasing Company (MALCO) in the Cayman Islands by MALEV 
Air Transport Company is to be approved by MALEV's shareholders at 
the March 26 general meeting, a director of MALCO, Gabor Cseti said. 
MALCO was registered in the Cayman Islands on 22 December last year. 
MALEV transferred the ownership of the two Boeing 767-200s, which it 
purchased last year, to MALCO for $1 apiece.  Malev is now leasing 
them back.  The leasing agreement has been approved by the American 
Eximbank, which guarantees the loan of $123 million financing the 
purchase of the two aircraft.  The agreement is also expected to be 
approved by MALEV shareholders. 

   The leasing agreement to be set up does not include any terms 
regarding the purchase option, a very advantageous arrangement for 
MALEV in terms of taxation and customs duty.  This method -- unusual 
in Hungary -- was deemed necessary because the $123 million 12-year 
loan for the purchase of the aircraft is to appear in MALEV's 
balance sheet in forints, which has a negative impact on the balance 
sheet, although it does not influence MALEV's liquidity.  As a 
result, the HUF1.7 billion, which -- due to the depreciation of the 
forint -- should have been introduced as a loss, need not actually 
be represented in last year's balance sheet.  Of MALEV's HUF7.69 
billion registered capital, 30 percent is held by the Italian 
airline Alitalia, 5 percent by the Italian Simest, and 4.5 percent 
by employees.  The remaining shares are held by the Hungarian State 
Property Management Corporation.  According to current law, 50 
percent plus one vote of MALEV should permanently remain in the 
hands of the state.  (Budapest MTI in English 0739 GMT 17 Mar 94 AU) 

   FRENCH FIRM TO BE 'ACTIVE PARTICIPANT' IN HUNGARIAN ECONOMY:  The 
French Sanofi, holding a majority share in Budapest's Chinoin 
pharmaceutical factory, has come to Hungary not to export its 
products but to be an active participant in Hungary's economy, 
offering genuine partnership, said Sanof i director Jean-Francois 
Dehecq in Budapest.  He said that due to its strategy, also adjusted 
to Hungarian conditions, Sanofi has become an integral part of 
Hungary's pharmaceutical industry ahead of its rivals.  Preliminary 
balance-sheet figures show profits and better results than last 
year, Dehecq said.  Sanofi-Winthrop presently has a 51-percent stake 
in Chinoin, and is ready to buy more if it gets a reasonable offer. 
They plan no new large-scale privatization in Hungary, but are open 
to investing in medicines, as well as in the cosmetics and bio 
industries.  Sanofi and Winthrop have invested $100 million in 
Chinoin so far, and they are planning further investments in 
research equipment.  Chinoin's excellent research team, in 
cooperation with the Toulouse Research Center, is expected to come 
out with major results in the near future, research manager Pierre 
Simon said.  Dehecq said Eastern Europe figures prominently in their 
long-term strategy.  They plan further expansion and privatization 
in Poland, Bulgaria, and possibly in the former Soviet republics. 
(Budapest MTI in English 1807 GMT 19 Mar 94 AU) 

   REVERSE REPO RATE INCREASED TO 21 PERCENT: The Hungarian National 
Bank (MNB) has increased its interest rate for one-week reverse repo 
deals from 15 percent to 21 percent.  The change is effective from 
March 17.  Other repo conditions remained unchanged.  The change is 
the first in the repo system since February 14, when the MNB stopped 
offering two-week, six-month, and 12-month repo facilities and 
introduced one-week reverse repo deals. The rise in the shortest- 
term reverse repo rate follows a 1-percent cut in the mandatory 
reserve rate to 13 percent on March 1.  The MNB still pays an annual 
2 percent on banks' mandatory reserves on forint deposits and the 
rate on forint reserves against forex deposits was raised from 11 to 
18 percent also on March 1.  A further 1-percent reduction in the 
mandatory reserve rate to 12 percent will come into force on May 1. 
In line with its announced tight monetary policies for 1994, the MNB 
earlier said that it planned to drain excess liquidity released by 
the reduction in the mandatory reserve rate.  As banks have to meet 
mandatory reserve requirements based on their average level of 
deposits in the preceding two weeks, the effects of the March 1 cut 
only began to work through on March 15.  It is estimated that the 
March move released liquidity in excess of HUF10 billi6n.  (Budapest 
MTI in English 1321 GMT 18 Mar 94 AU) 

   FREE TRADE AGREEMENT WITH SLOVENIA:  The creation of a free trade 
agreement between Hungary and Slovenia will provide impetus to the 
development of bilateral economic cooperation.  The expert-level 
preparation of such an agreement was completed recently.  Hungarian- 
Slovenian trade relations showed a dynamic expansion over the past 
two years.  In 1993, the value of bilateral trade was more than $200 
million.  Hungarian exports to Slovenia were worth $140 million. 
Turnover is expected to further expand in 1994, mainly because the 
legal conditions of inter-state trade have considerably improved for 
entrepreneurs of both countries.  (Budapest MTI in English 2118 GMT 
21 Mar 94 AU) 

   HUNGARIAN-SLOVENIAN INDUSTRIAL COOPERATION AGREEMENT:  Minister 
of Industry and Trade Janos Latorcai held talks with Slovenian 
Minister of Economy Maks Tajnikar on the creation of a Hungarian- 
Slovenian industrial cooperation agreement.  The agreement under 
preparation will improve conditions for industrial cooperation and 
tourism relations. Direct expert talks are to be organized later in 
the energy field.  The two countries are to hold talks on 
implementation of the Adria LNG project, the liquefied natural gas 
siphoning station.  The ministers also reviewed the draft of the 
Hungarian-Slovenian free trade agreement, which is to be signed by 
the ministers of foreign trade of the two countries in Ljubljana on 
April 6. (Budapest MTI in English 1855 GMT 22 Mar 94 AU) 

   AVERAGE EARNINGS UP IN JANUARY:  According to the latest Central 
Statistical Office figures on companies with more than 10 employees, 
the average monthly net earnings were HUF19,540 in January 1994, 
26.7 percent up in nominal terms on the same month last year.  The 
average gross monthly wage rose by 24.8 percent to HUF27,117.  The 
higher increase in average net earnings as against gross earnings 
was a result of changes in income tax rules at the beginning of the 
year, which favored lower incomes.  The gross average earnings of 
full-time manual workers were 22.7 percent higher and their net 
earnings 24.7 percent higher than in January last year.  In the same 
period, the HUF39,579 average gross monthly earnings of white-collar 
workers rose by 25.4 percent, resulting a 27.8-percent net increase. 
(Budapest MTI in English 1610 GMT 16 Mar 94 AU) 

   CONSUMER PRICE INFLATION IN FEBRUARY:  Central Statistical Office 
figures for February consumer price increases: 
BOT 
Change (Percent) 

Item                                in  1 Month  in  12 Months 

Foodstuffs                                   +1.6    +16.4 
Alcoholic Beverages, Tobacco                 +1.4    +13.5 
Clothing                                     +0.0    +14.9 
Consumer durables                            +0.8    +10.6 
Household energy                             +0.6    +12.6 
Other industrial articles, fuels             +1.3    +18.5 
Services                                     +2.1    +20.8 
TOTAL                                        +1.4    +16.6 
EOT 
Source:  Central Statistical Office (Budapest MTI in English 1400 
GMT 16 Mar 94 AU) 

   INFLATION 16.2 PERCENT IN 12 MONTHS:  In February the consumer 
price level rose by 1.4 percent against January's level, bringing 
inflation over the past 12 months up by only 16.2 percent -- the 
lowest value in four years.  On the basis of positive price trends 
earlier this year, a good chance is seen for this year's inflation 
to remain below 20 percent.  (Budapest MTI in English 1816 GMT 18 
Mar 94 AU) 

   AV RT TO TAKE OUT REFINANCING LOAN:   The State Property Holding 
Corporation (AV Rt) is to take out a HUF100 billion loan on 
international capital markets in order to restructure loans 
previously taken out on disadvantageous terms with a view to making 
the companies involved more attractive to potential buyers.  These 
loans now represent an interest burden of at least 25 percent per 
annum.  Managing director Lajos Csepi said that the plan is subject 
to approval of AV Rt's board of directors, which is expected by the 
middle of April.  No state guarantees will be needed since AV Rt's 
property stock is large enough in itself.  AV Rt invited eight 
foreign financial institutions in a closed tender and will choose a 
bank that has an office in Budapest.  Companies will be selected for 
the loan scheme on very strict conditions.  The most important 
criterion will be that the company's export turnover should cover 
the amount of the actual repayment.  (Budapest MTI in English 0732 
GMT 17 Mar 94 AU) 

   CURRENT ACCOUNT DEFICIT $3.455 BILLION FOR 1993:  Hungary's 
current account deficit was $3,455 million in 1993, according to the 
most recent report from the Hungarian National Bank (MNB).  The 
trade deficit in the current account stood at $3,247 million and 
tourism showed a net $442 million surplus.  Hungary's current 
account closed with a $324 million surplus in 1992, when the trade 
balance deficit was only $49 million.  The net surplus from tourism 
was $590 million in 1992.  The overall balance of payments showed a 
$2,635 million surplus due to total direct foreign capital inflow of 
$2,339 million, while long-term external borrowing last year 
amounted to $6,388 million, including loans taken out by companies. 
Principal and interest payments totalled $3,322 million. 
International reserves stood at $6,736.2 million at the end of 1993, 
compared to $4,380.1 million at the end of 1992.  Gross foreign debt 
amounted to $24,560.2 million at the end of last year, as against 
$21,437.7 million at the end of the previous year.  Direct foreign 
cash investment totalled $5,575.9 million at the end of last year, 
compared to $3,423.8 million the previous year.  (Budapest MTI in 
English 1416 GMT 21 Mar 94 AU) 

   HUNGARY TO JOIN NEW INTERNATIONAL EXPORT-CONTROL SYSTEM: Hungary 
is willing to join -- hopefully as a founding member -- the 
successor organization to COCOM, the Hungarian Government decided 
this week.  COCOM will cease to exist in its present form on March 
31.  Hungary's interests in national security and international 
trade demand participation in any new organization set up to control 
or restrict exports of sensitive or high-technology products to 
countries regarded as unstable, undemocratic, or hostile.  Therefore 
the cabinet has authorized the minister of international economic 
relations to negotiate with COCOM's successor on the register of 
products to be controlled, and submit it to the government after an 
international consensus has been reached.  (Budapest MTI in English 
1238 GMT 18 Mar 94 AU) 

   MULTINATIONALS SPEND MOST ON ADVERTISING:  According to the 
Mahir-Observer press service that surveys national radio and 
television channels and 240 major newspapers, multinational 
companies spent most on advertising in 1993, giving preference to 
Television Channel 1.  Unilever leads the list with $9 million -- 
paid in forints -- and Procter &amp; Gamble follows with $4.6 million. 
A domestic company, TV Shop, is third on the list.  The State 
property agency spent $1.5 million, which puts it in 13th place, 
ahead of the Coca-Cola Company or Tchibo.  The above amounts only 
contain the broadcasting and publishing costs.  Television's Channel 
1 received $67.1 million, the largest amount, for advertising, 
followed by Channel 2 with $22.7 million.  Danubius Radio was third 
with $8.9 million.  (Budapest NEPSZABADSAG in Hungarian 16 Mar 94 p 
13 AU) 

   CENTRAL BANK REAFFIRMS STRICT MONETARY POLICY FOR 1994:  The 
Hungarian National Bank (MNB) has recently added a supplement to its 
report on the 1994 monetary policy guidelines.  The central bank 
said that while some of the changes in the economy had not been 
foreseen when the report was prepared, the basic objective of the 
monetary policy -- to avoid a deterioration in the country's 
external balance -- would not need to be modified.  The MNB also 
reaffirmed that a strict monetary policy was needed to achieve that 
goal.  The central bank said the financing requirements of the state 
budget and the corporate sector should be adjusted to the increase 
in domestic savings and to the predicted level of foreign direct 
capital inflow over the long term.  The central bank is going to 
pursue an interest rate policy that stimulates savings, so that 
domestic loans can be financed from domestic savings.  At the same 
time, the bank will also take steps to encourage banks to narrow the 
margin between deposit and lending rates. 

   The supplement to the report states that the 1994 current account 
deficit should not exceed the 1993 level of around 3 billion forints 
(HUF) and should not be higher than the amount of direct foreign 
investment expected this year.  This differs from the original 
report in which the bank foresaw direct foreign investment of $1.3- 
1.5 billion, and said that the current account deficit should not be 
more than $1.5-2 billion.  In 1993, foreign investment totalled 
$2.1-2.2 billion, including the $875 million from the privatization 
of the Hungarian Telecommunications Company (MATAV Rt), which came 
through in the last days of 1993.  The supplement emphasizes that 
while some high-value privatization deals and other projects may 
have a considerable influence on 1994 foreign capital inflow, the 
financing of the current account deficit should not be based on 
privatization revenue in the long term.  The net indebtedness of 
companies was higher than expected in the last months of 1993.  It 
is still unclear whether this was the result of companies investing 
more or covering losses.  There may be a danger that if personal 
savings do not increase as required, the external indebtedness of 
the country will be higher than expected, no matter how tight the 
monetary policy.  The central bank said that any increase in the 
state's revenue resulting from a possible expansion in the economy 
should not lead to increased budget expenditure so as to make room 
for the business sector to expand. 

   In a development not foreseen at the time the report was drawn 
up, the 1994 budget law stipulates that the central bank must 
guarantee the purchase of HUF80 billion worth of state securities. 
This means the central bank may be forced to decrease financing to 
the banking sector, instead of increasing it as originally planned. 
The MNB estimates that it is able to grant total refinancing both to 
the budget and to the banking system of up to the increase in its 
own resources, estimated at HUF80-90 billion.  The central bank said 
it was particularly important that state securities should be issued 
in accordance with demand and at market interest rates so that the 
MNB could grant resources to others than the state budget.  If 
direct foreign loans and the indebtedness of enterprises and the 
state grows faster than targeted, the MNB's objective of preventing 
a deterioration in the external balance could be achieved only by 
reducing the foreign indebtedness of the banking system.  Hence, the 
central bank could have to cut domestic financing. 

   In another new development, foreign investors may soon be able to 
purchase Hungarian state bonds making Hungarian interest rate and 
exchange rate policies more dependent on developments on 
international markets.  The tight monetary policy could be relaxed 
only if some of the favorable changes that occurred in the fourth 
quarter of last year persisted over the long term.  If not, the 
central bank will request the government to make adjustments to 
economic policy, particularly to fiscal policy, in addition to the 
MNB's own monetary measures.  (Budapest MTI in English 1733 GMT 9 
Mar 94 AU) 

   NATIONAL BANK ISSUES STATE BONDS IN LUXEMBOURG:  The Hungarian 
National Bank (MNB) issued bonds to a face value of 2 billion 
Luxembourg francs (LUF) (100 million German marks) in Luxembourg on 
8 March.  The bonds, which have a maturity of seven years, were 
issued at 101.9 percent and the bonds bear fixed interest of 8 7/8 
percent.  The issue was lead-managed by Banque et Caisse d'Epargne 
d'Etat and Dresdner Bank Luxembourg.  Further issues of bonds will 
be decided on the basis of conditions on foreign capital markets. 

   The central bank targeted the Luxembourg capital market because 
it is still relatively new, having been liberalized two years ago, 
and is relatively easy to approach.  The LUF2-billion issue is a 
large issue for that market, with the highest previous issue 
amounting to LUF3 billion.  The issue of "global" bonds planned by 
the MNB is not expected to take place for some time, as interest 
rates on the U.S. dollar market have become unfavorable.  The MNB 
collected a total of $4.5 billion through bond issues last year. 
There were two issues of bonds to a total value of $1.1 billion at 
the end of last year, with the revenue to be collected in 1994.  The 
MNB has not set a level for bond issues for this year, but bond 
issues could amount to as much as $2 billion, depending on the 
conditions on international capital markets.  Hungary's external 
financing requirements will be covered by the amounts which will 
flow in this year and by foreign exchange reserves of $7 billion. 
(Budapest MTI in English 1358 GMT 9 Mar 94 AU) 

   IMF STAND-BY LOAN NOT DRAWN UPON IN 1993:  Hungary has not drawn 
upon the stand-by loan that the IMF granted it last year because it 
did not need the money and it could not have met the IMF's 
requirements concerning limits on its balance of payments and 
central budget deficits, Hungarian National Bank Chairman Peter Akos 
Bod said.  From negotiations with senior IMF and World Bank 
officials, Bod concluded that Budapest has a good chance of taking 
over Vienna's role as East-Central Europe's financial center. 
(Budapest MTI in English 1943 GMT 9 Mar 94 AU) 

   INCREASE IN PERSONAL FOREIGN CURRENCY ALLOWANCE:  Effective April 
1, Hungarians going abroad can now buy $800 worth of foreign 
currency a year from the Hungarian National Bank (MNB) -- up from 
$350, as Finance Minister Ivan Szabo said.  However, unused 
allowances can no longer be carried over from one year to the next, 
even in part.  According to the MNB, the decision was another step 
toward the full convertibility of the forint.  He added that, so 
far, Hungarians are only purchasing about two-thirds of the foreign 
currency available to them.  The allocation will be $300 for under- 
14s.  Travellers will be allowed to book hotel accommodation, meals, 
transport, and other services for forints without any time limit 
rather than for stays of only up to 14 days as before.  They will 
also be able to buy more than one air ticket to non-European 
destinations a year.  The annual foreign currency limit for 
Hungarians was $50 in the 1970's -- $100 later.  The idea of raising 
it in line with the national balance of payments came up in the late 
1980's.  (Budapest MTI in English 1858 GMT 10 Mar 94 AU) 

   ECONOMIC TALKS WITH JAPAN:  Minister of International Economic 
Relations Bela Kadar was in Tokyo for talks on bilateral trade and 
Hungary's admission to the Organization for Economic Cooperation and 
Development (OECD) with Japanese Deputy Foreign Minister Koichiro 
Matsura and State Secretary of International Trade and Industry 
Sozaburo Okamatsu.  Hungary can meet the requirements of OECD 
membership, Kadar said, arguing that Hungary's level of economic and 
cultural development matches that of South Korea and Mexico, and the 
process of establishing a market economy here has become 
irreversible.  To date, Japan has qualified the idea of Hungary's 
admission to the OECD as premature and untimely.  Kadar called OECD 
membership an important prerequisite for Hungary's integration into 
Europe and the world economy.  Over the past few years, Japanese 
sales to Hungary have doubled, while Hungarian exports to Japan 
decreased, Kadar said.  Last year, Hungary's import of Japanese 
products increased by 30 percent, while Hungarian sales to Japan 
dropped by 13 percent.  In 1992, Hungary's trade deficit with Japan 
amounted to $165 million; in 1993 it rose to $259 million.  "This 
huge deficit cannot be maintained in the long run," the minister 
said.  Kadar criticized Japan for applying the Generalized System of 
Preferences (GSP) to only one-third of Hungarian deliveries and 
keeping the restrictions on Hungarian food exports in force. 
(Budapest MTI in English 1909 GMT 9 Mar 94 AU) 

   FARM SALES TO CZECH REPUBLIC MAY INCREASE:  Agricultural 
producers face no obstacles to increased sales to the Czech market, 
Agriculture Minister Janos Szabo said.  Hungary and the Czech 
Republic signed inter-governmental agreements on crop protection and 
veterinary cooperation.  (Budapest MTI in English 1605 GMT 9 Mar 94 
AU) 

   IKARUS BUSES TO THAILAND:  The Ikarus factory is to deliver 
chasses equipped with Mercedes engines and automatic transmissions 
for 50 articulated urban buses to Thailand this year.  The buses 
will be assembled in Thailand.  The Ikarus factory hopes to conclude 
further deals with Thailand, and a contract for the delivery of an 
addition 400 buses is expected.  The factory will also submit a bid, 
through a firm representing the Ikarus share company, for the 
delivery of 2,000 finished buses to be purchased in the framework of 
a Thai governmental program.  (Budapest MTI in English 1844 GMT 12 
Mar 94 AU) 

   PRIVATIZATION OF PHARMACEUTICAL INDUSTRY:  Although privatization 
of the pharmaceutical industry and trade began some years ago, the 
process has been hampered by legal disputes that will probably delay 
its completion until mid-1994.  The scheme involves six 
pharmaceutical companies, 20 wholesalers, and 1,300 pharmacies.  The 
pharmaceutical industry has always been an economic success story in 
Hungary.  Its privatization started back in 1989.  To date, the 
Chinoin, EGIS, Alkaloida, and Biogal companies have passed into 
private hands.  The government would prefer that small investors 
could also buy into these four firms, as well as into the Gedeon 
Richter Pharmaceutical Company and the Reanal Fine Chemicals 
Factory.  For this reason, investors have been allowed to buy shares 
for compensation coupons. 

   Shares of EGIS are currently the most sought after because the 
European Bank for Reconstruction and Development has become one of 
the company's owners.  Shares of Alkaloida and Chinoin are also in 
keen demand.  (The French Sanofic company owns 91 percent of the 
latter firm.)  The transformation of the pharmaceutical marketplace 
started last autumn, with the assets at stake amounting to 30-40 
billion forints.  To date, 300 pharmacies have been privatized. 
Twenty wholesale firms and 1,300 or so pharmacies are still in state 
ownership.  Privatization of these should have started three years 
ago, but the question of who owns them is still unsettled.  The 
legal dispute stems from the fact that, although most of the 
wholesale and retail units were founded by local councils, the law 
on state assets put them under State Property Agency (AVU) control. 
Clarifying ownership rights is all the more important because it 
will determine whether revenues from privatization will go to the 
local authorities or the central budget. 

   AVU and Welfare Ministry experts prefer pharmaceutical 
wholesalers to be privatized by the AVU, which they say would 
provide standard principles for the privatization of retail units 
all over the country.  They argue that this option would increase 
the chances for the country's 4,500 pharmacists to buy pharmacies, 
thus giving professional considerations priority in the selection of 
future owners.  This option is also backed by the parmacists' 
interest associations.  In the meantime, pharmacists have been 
allowed to buy pharmacies for preferential state loans and 
compensation coupons.  While the legal dispute is still under way, 
the state monopoly on pharmaceutical trade has become a thing of the 
past.  There are currently 46 pharmaceutical wholesalers with 
nationwide networks in Hungary, including some of the world's 
biggest pharmaceutical manufacturers, such as the British Glaxo and 
U.S. Pfizer corporations.  (Budapest MTI in English 1107 GMT 10 Mar 
94 AU) 

   HUNGEXPO RT TO BE PRIVATIZED:  The State Property Management 
Corporation (AV Rt) is planning to reduce its present 84 percent 
stake in Hungexpo Rt to a single golden share.  Hungexpo, organizing 
trade fairs and publicity campaigns, has registered capital of 3.133 
billion forints, including a 38-hectare exhibition site valued at 
HUF2.8 billion.  The government earlier decided that the state would 
retain a long-term stake of 25 percent plus one vote in Hungexpo. 
Local councils currently hold the remaining 16 percent of the 
company.  A 51 percent stake is planned to be offered to 
professional investors and 49 percent will be privately offered to 
various Hungarian representative organizations, including the 
National Association of Hungarian Manufacturers, the Hungarian 
Chamber of Commerce, and the National Association of Entrepreneurs. 
The AV Rt propose the ownership of the exhibition site to be 
transferred to the local council with Hungexpo having a long-term 
lease on the site.  This proposal, however, has yet to be approved 
by the Ministry of International Economic Relations, the Ministry of 
Industry and Trade, and the main organizer of the 1996 Expo. 
Preliminary figures show that Hungexpo Rt had a net turnover of HUF2 
billion last year and the company's business activities showed a 
profit which had to be spent on covering its losses on financial 
transactions.  (Budapest MTI in English 1222 GMT 11 Mar 94 AU) 

   UNEMPLOYMENT DECLINES IN FEBRUARY:  According to figures 
published by the National Labor Center, the registered number of 
unemployed declined by 11,000 in February, following a rise in 
January of 8,800, for a total of 630,600.  The unemployment rate was 
12.6 percent in February, as compared to January's 12.8 percent. 
The registered manpower demand rose again in February, and 4,000 
more vacancies were reported by employers than in January.  Most of 
the new job openings were in agriculture and construction. 
Nationwide vacancies stood at 64,600 in February.  (Budapest MTI in 
English 0816 GMT 9 Mar 94 ) 

   AUSTRIAN EU MEMBERSHIP SEEN AS FAVORABLE FOR HUNGARY:  According 
to the Ministry of International Economic Relations, Austria's 
membership of the EU, expected in January 1995, would be a favorable 
development for Hungary, as it would mean that Hungary had a 
neighboring EU country.  Following the expansion of the EU to 
include Austria and the Scandinavian EFTA (European Free Trade 
Association) countries, some 60 percent of Hungary's exports will go 
to the EU, as compared to 46.5 percent in 1993.  Hungary is 
Austria's fifth largest export market and accounts for more Austrian 
exports than the UK or the United States.  According to Austrian 
figures, exports to Hungary amounted to 16.5 billion Austrian 
shillings (ATS) last year, 6.4 percent up on 1992, while imports 
from Hungary, at ATS 10.8 billion, were 9.4 percent down.  Hungary 
has received 60 percent of all Austrian capital investment in 
Central and Eastern Europe.  Austria's EU membership will benefit 
Hungarian agricultural exports as the market regulations contained 
in Hungary's Association Agreement with the EU are more favorable 
than those in Hungary's trade agreement with the EFTA countries. 
(Budapest MTI in English 2143 GMT 4 Mar 94 AU) 

   NATIONAL BANK PREPARES FOR BOND SALES TO FOREIGNERS:  The 
Hungarian National Bank (MNB) will prepare the conditions for the 
start of issuing state bonds available to foreigners.  The draft 
will contain the required amendments to the foreign exchange law. 
The MNB draft differs in certain aspects from the proposal on the 
system of foreign issues prepared by the Girocredit Befektetesi 
(Budapest) Rt (Girocredit Investment Rt), which was ordered by the 
Securities office of the Finance Ministry.  The Finance Ministry 
supposedly did not have any objections, as it announced two weeks 
ago that as soon as the necessary foreign exchange authority license 
is received from the MNB, it will commission Girocredit to arrange 
the first issue for foreigners, planned for March 28. 

   The details of the MNB draft have not been disclosed.  Although 
such issues may also be solved among current regulations, with 
bridging techniques, the MNB considers it rational to carry out the 
most important amendments in order to have an operable system that 
might be refined later.  After the amendments of legal regulations 
the first such issue may be in April, or May at the latest.  The 
majority of the amendments will probably affect decrees, which means 
that there is no need for lengthy parliamentary debate.  The issues 
may only be permitted by the MNB, as the foreign exchange authority. 
As the holder of such an authorization, the Finance Ministry decides 
on the commissioning of a manager for the issue.  (Budapest MTI in 
English 1652 GMT 8 Mar 94 AU) 

   BUILDING INDUSTRY GREW SLIGHTLY IN 1993:  Output of the building 
industry sector rose by 62 billion forints (HUF) in 1993 to exceed 
HUF 241 billion, although growth in real terms was only 1.7 percent. 
Nonetheless, this compares to a drop of 0.2 percent in 1992, the 
most recent report of the Central Statistical Office (KSH) shows. 
1993 figures show that fewer -- but higher-value -- new buildings 
were constructed, and building renovation work fell by 8 percent, 
compared to 1992.  In the third quarter of 1993, output was 20 
percent higher than in the same period of 1992.  Installation work 
(including painting and decorating) accounts for 40 percent of the 
industry's production, construction for 28 percent, and civil 
engineering for 24 percent.  The share of building maintenance is a 
mere 7 percent.  The number of contracts fell slightly at the end of 
last year, though the value remained unchanged, another indication 
that demand for high-value buildings has begun to increase. 
(Budapest MTI in English 1640 GMT 3 Mar 94 AU) 

   DECLINE IN HOUSING STOCK:  Although 40,000 new flats should be 
built annually in order merely to maintain the existing housing 
stock, only half this number were built last year, according to a 
report by the AB Construction Information and Marketing Office.  In 
the building industry journal EPITESI PIAC, Denes Varga points out 
that the decline in house construction since 1990 has been steeper 
than expected.  The reason for this, he argues, is that people 
rushed to complete their houses as soon as possible because they 
felt that the economic situation would get even worse if they 
waited.  Another factor is the fact that potential house builders 
feared that VAT refunds on building materials would be abolished, a 
step eventually taken at the start of this year.  In the absence of 
a state housing program, the AB Office forecasts only a slight 
increase in housing starts in the next two years. 

BOT 
                Flats                       Cumulative Fall 
Year            Built    Forecast           in Housing Stock 
1990           43,771                            -1,229 
1991           33,164                           -13,065 
1992           25,807                           -32,258 
1993           20,913     22,000                -56,345 
1994                      23,000                -78,345 
1995                      28,000                -95,345 
Source:  EPITESI PIAC 

EOT 
(Budapest MTI in English 2147 GMT 4 Mar 94 AU) 

   BRITISH KNOW-HOW FUND'S AID DESCRIBED:  The Know-How Fund (KHF), 
set up by the British Government to help East-Central European 
reform, has contributed 6 million pounds sterling a year to the 
development of Hungary's market economy since 1990.  This year, two- 
thirds of the contribution will go to privatization, primarily to 
the Small Investors' Share Purchase (SISP) scheme.  In cooperation 
with the World Bank, the IMF, and other international organizations, 
the London-based KHF assists Hungary's transition to a market 
economy by transferring expertise.  Also, it has sent advisers to 
Hungary to survey the support required.  Unlike other aid 
organizations, the KHF does not provide direct financial assistance, 
but gives technical support up to 10 percent of the project costs. 
Given its limited resources, the fund focuses on the financial 
sphere, employment, small and medium-sized businesses, accounting, 
agricultural training, local authorities, and state administration, 
with courses and lectures held on banking, privatization, and book 
publishing and marketing. 

   The KHF helps the State Property Agency (AVU) in charge of 
privatization in selecting consultants for SISP, and is directly 
involved in privatization consultancy.  For instance, it advised an 
electricity company and a meat-processing firm in southern Hungary 
on implementing energy-saving schemes.  KHF support is available 
only for schemes backed by the government or its agencies.  The fund 
is expected to stay in Hungary for several years after completion of 
the privatization drive, aiding businesses in PR and marketing work. 
(Budapest MTI in English 1044 GMT 8 Mar 94 AU) 

   POLAND 

   POMERANIAN CREDIT BANK AGREEMENT WITH SCHONNER CAPITAL:  The 
Pomorski Bank Kredytowy SA (Pomeranian Credit Bank PBK) has signed 
an agreement on cooperation with the U.S. finance company Schonner 
Capital Corporation of Boston, PBK deputy president Jan Adamczyk 
announced on 17 March.  The agreement foresees that if the PBK or 
Boston company succeed in gaining management rights over one of the 
national investment funds, they will set up a joint venture.  "We 
also envisage help from Schonner in restructuring the companies 
financed by the PBK, plus exchanges of experience and cooperation in 
the organization of training," said Adamczyk.  (Warsaw PAP in 
English 1221 GMT 17 Mar 94 AU) 

   $200 MILLION DOLLAR TRADE DEFICIT IN JANUARY:  In January Poland 
recorded a foreign trade deficit of $200 million and a slightly 
smaller deficit in its current account in the balance of payments 
($191 million), according to data released by a Polish National Bank 
official.  Wlodzimierz Kicinski, head of the Bank's foreign 
department, told reporters that export earnings in January reached 
$1.054 trillion, up 21.6 percent on January 1993, while payments for 
imports reached $1.25 trillion, up 10 percent on January last year. 
Poland's leading trade partners both in exports and imports were 
Germany, the United States, Britain, France and Austria.   Gross 
official reserves of foreign exchange reached $4.3 trillion in 
January, recording a slight increase on December 1993.  The 
president of the State Foreign Investment Agency said he expected an 
inflow of foreign investment and loan capital to Poland as a result 
of the agreement signed by Poland with the creditor banks associated 
in the London Club.  He put the expected inflow at $1 trillion 
dollars annually.  In the last five years foreign investments in 
Poland have totalled $3.5 trillion dollars.  (Warsaw PAP in English 
1518 GMT 17 Mar 94 AU) 

   PRIME MINISTERIAL COUNCIL DISCUSSES PRIVATIZATION:  The prime 
minister's Council for Privatization discussed a report on - 
privatization in the years 1990-1992 drafted by the Privatization 
Ministry. The report says that of 8,453 state firms existing at the 
end of 1990, 1,015 or 12.5 percent were privatized by the end of 
1992. Another 1,037 firms are in various stages of the privatization 
process.  In June last year there were still 6,037 state firms in 
Poland.  The report emphasizes the need for changing the 1990 law on 
privatization of state enterprises to encourage potential buyers and 
allow for employee representation on supervisory boards.  (Warsaw 
PAP in English 1907 GMT 17 Mar 94 AU) 

   BANKERS TRUST COMPANY OPENS OFFICE IN WARSAW:  The Bankers Trust 
Company, one of the world's major financial institutions servicing 
international corporations, private and public organisations and 
governmental institutions, opened its representation in Warsaw on 17 
March.  The company has been present in Poland since 1991 and 
received a license to open its office here from the Polish National 
Bank last November.  According to the director of the Warsaw office 
Stanislaw Popow, Bankers Trust will render consulting services in 
restructuring Polish enterprises and their merger with foreign 
firms.  It will help foreign investors finance projects in Poland 
through Polish or foreign banks operating in this country.  It will 
also help Polish firms in financing their investments in Poland and 
abroad.  It also plans to enter the Polish securities market.  For 
instance, as the owner of 16 percent of shares of the Amer-Bank. it 
intends to have it listed on the Warsaw stock exchange.  (Warsaw PAP 
in English 2020 GMT 17 Mar 94 AU) 

   POLAND TO RECEIVE 30 MILLION ECU TO AID AGRICULTURE:  Poland will 
receive 30 million ECU in technical aid for the agricultural sector 
under a financial memorandum signed on 18 March by minister of 
agriculture and food economy Andrzej Smietanko and head of the 
mission of the European Commission in Warsaw Ambassador Alexander 
Dijckmeester.  The means will be earmarked to bring Polish 
agricultural policy into line with that of the European Union and 
create a capital guarantee fund.  Part of the aid will be directed 
to a fund supporting the restructuring of state farms.  Ambassador 
Dijckmeester said Western Europe is interested in the successful end 
of transformations in Poland's agriculture.  He added that Western 
Europe realizes that Polish agriculture will have to face a number 
of problems experienced by western countries in past decades. 
Minister Smietanko hoped that the Polish experts preparing new 
projects will be able to take greater advantage of their experience 
regarding market economy which they have gained while cooperating 
with western experts.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1435 GMT 18 Mar 94 AU) 

   POLISH-RUSSIAN BUSINESS CENTER TO BE SET UP IN SOPOT:  The first 
Baltic economic forum ended its debates in Sopot on 19 March with 
the signing of a declaration calling for the creation of a Polish- 
Russian business center in that town.  The Center, to be set up this 
year, will include a bank, goods exchange and Russian business 
agencies.  A branch of the Centre is to be established in 
Kaliningrad.  The declaration was signed by Russian Ambassador Yuri 
Kashlev and Deputy Minister for Foreign Economic Relations Zbigniew 
Okonski, which attests to the fact that the initiative does not 
merely cover cooperation between Gdansk and Kaliningrad, but is of a 
broader character.  Gdansk provincial governor Maciej Plazynski told 
a press conference that the Centre was established to intensify the 
whole of Polish-Russian relations.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1841 GMT 
19 Mar 94 AU) 

   FEBRUARY ECONOMIC STATISTICS: Industrial production in February 
1994 stayed at the level of the previous month, but it was 12.2 
percent higher than in February 1993, according to data of the 
Central Statistical Office (GUS) released on 21 March.  A certain 
slow-down was recorded in the rate of inflation and unemployment 
grew only slightly in February, GUS deputy chairman Roman Sawinski 
told a press conference in Warsaw.  These positive trends enable one 
to consider February a "good month for the economy," he said. 
However, the budget deficit amounted to 8.9 trillion zlotys (some 
$410 million after the first two months of the present year.  The 
prices of consumer goods and services grew by 1.1 percent in 
February while in the first two months of 1994 they grew by 2.9 
percent.  These are very optimistic results compared to last year's 
figures of 7.6 percent and 9.4 percent respectively, Sawinski said. 

   This inconspicuous growth of prices is first of all the effect of 
stabilization on the food market.  The prices of foodstuffs went up 
by a mere 0.2 percent in February.  The highest rises were 
introduced in the prices of postal services (20 percent), 
pharmaceuticals (2.9 percent) and clothes (2.6 percent).  Real wages 
were higher in February by 0.8 percent than in the preceding month 
and by 0.3 higher than in February 1993.  The average net wage in 
the industrial sector amounted to 3.8 million zlotys.  A growth of 
production was recorded in February in 26 of the 29 industrial 
sectors.  The mining industry had the poorest results with 
production slumping by 6.4 percent.  Unsatisfactory results were 
also recorded in housing construction and especially in its 
cooperative and communal sector, where 28 percent less flats were 
handed over for use than in February 1993. 

   The unemployment rate amounted to 16.1 percent in February.  The 
number of newly registered unemployed amounted to 13,700, compared 
to 69,500 in January of this year.  In February, state budget 
revenue amounted to 43.7 trillion zlotys and expenditures to 52.1 
trillion zlotys.  The budget deficit after the first two months of 
the present year amounted to 10.7 percent of the figure envisaged in 
the budget law for 1994.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1458 GMT 21 Mar 94 
AU) 

   FIRST SKODA CARS TO BE ASSEMBLED IN POLAND IN MAY:  The assembly 
of the Favorit and Forman models of Skoda cars, to be carried out by 
the Volkswagen-Poznan Ltd. company, will start at Antoninek near 
Poznan this May, company chairman Eberhard Klaus said on 21 March. A 
total of 5,000 cars are to be assembled this year.  He added that 
the Skoda-Volkswagen factory in Mlada Boleslav in the Czech Republic 
would cover the expenses of assembling cars at Antoninek and that 
some parts would be produced in Poland.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1546 
GMT 21 Mar 94 AU) 

   FINANCIAL EXPERTS DISCUSS LOCAL GUARANTEE FUNDS:  Hubert 
Szlaszewski, general director of the Cooperation Fund, said that the 
setting up of a system of local guarantee funds is the best way to 
take advantage of the money offered by the PHARE (Economic and 
reconstruction aid for Poland and Hungary) program of the European 
Union as well funds from Polish banks earmarked to support Polish 
small businesses.  Opening a two-day international seminar in 
Madralin outside Warsaw, Szlaszewski said that such funds would 
guarantee banks the repayment of credits granted by them to small 
Polish enterprises possessing economic development prospects.  The 
conference is attended by representatives of the Union of Polish 
Banks and 15 agencies dealing with local and regional development, 
including 9 agencies linked with the PHARE program of local 
initiatives and foreign guests.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1858 GMT 21 
Mar 94 AU) 

   POLISH-FRENCH CONFERENCE ON UNEMPLOYMENT:  Unemployment lasting 
longer than 12 months poses the biggest threat to the Polish economy 
as it affects some 3 million people in Poland and might push them in 
the direction of the margin of society, it was said at the 
inauguration of the Polish-French conference on unemployment in 
Krakow on 21 March.  The conference was organized by the Foundation 
of Christian Culture, the Krakow-based Club of Catholic 
Intelligentsia, and the French Catholic Committee for Combating 
Starvation.  It is a most urgent task for trade unions, employers, 
non- government organizations and local government bodies to provide 
possibilities of employment for people, stressed a Polish delegate. 
(Warsaw PAP in English 2007 GMT 21 Mar 94 AU) 

   WESTERN INVESTORS SEEK TO BUILD HOTELS, SUPERMARKETS:  Western 
investors were interested in the possibilities of participation in 
the construction of hotels, car parks and supermarkets in Poland, at 
the international real estate and investments fair Mipim 94 in 
Cannes.  They were surprised at Polish banks' lack of interest in 
these remunerative undertakings, Poznan deputy mayor Jacek May said 
on 21 March.  According to Jacek May, the investors stressed the 
importance of a feeling of legal and economic stability in the 
countries of future investments.  They agreed, however, that the 
transaction procedures in western countries take as much time as in 
Poland.  Jacek May said that the participation of our cities in such 
events might help to reach potential serious investors and capital 
groups directly, without middlemen.  Other big polish cities like 
Bydgoszcz, Gdansk, Warsaw, Szczecin and Wroclaw were also 
represented at the fair.  (Warsaw PAP in English 2045 GMT 21 Mar 94 
AU) 

   ZLOTY DENOMINATION TO BEGIN AS SCHEDULED:  The denomination of 
the zloty is to begin in January 1995 in accordance with earlier 
adopted plans, president of the Polish National Bank Hanna 
Gronkiewicz-Waltz said.  She added that the recent unfortunate 
statement by Deputy Finance Minister Witold Modzelewski whereby it 
was too early to denominate the zloty, had neither been agreed with 
her nor with the prime minister.  Ms Gronkiewicz-Waltz declared that 
the denomination meant that four zeros would be slashed so that 
10,000 present zlotys would be equal to one new zloty.  She also 
explained that both the old and new banknotes would be used during 
the two years following the introduction of denomination.  (Warsaw 
PAP in English 1214 GMT 22 Mar 94 AU) 

   TELECOMMUNICATIONS FAIR OPENS IN LODZ:  Some 170 exhibitors from 
Poland, Germany, Britain, the United States and Austria are taking 
part in the Intertelecom 94 international communications fair that 
opened in Lodz on 22 March.  The offer by such renowned firms as 
AT&amp;T, Kapsch, Alcatel, Siemens and Mikrotel features various kinds 
of faxes, monitors, cellular telephones, computer-controlled 
automatic telephone exchanges, laser printers, the latest generation 
of video-telephones, control-measuring equipment, and other devices. 
Journalists learned at a press conference that the number of 
telephones in Poland, a country with the population close to 40 
million, has increased by 25 percent over the past three years and 
amounts to 4.5 million now, but about two million Poles are still on 
the waiting list for a telephone.  The modernization of domestic 
telecommunications to meet European standards will take about five 
years.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1610 GMT 22 Mar 94 AU) 

   POLISH, ITALIAN REGIONS AGREE ON COOPERATION:  Representatives of 
Lower Silesia and the Italian region of Emilia-Romagna have agreed 
to sign a cooperation agreement in Wroclaw this fall, Wroclaw 
Province Governor Janusz Zaleski, visiting the Italian city of 
Modena to promote Wroclaw Province, said on 22 March. Members of the 
Polish delegation took part in a seminar in Modena during which they 
outlined regulations concerning foreign investments in Poland.  A 
series of lectures was followed by a round-table meeting of 
representatives of some 20 firms and economic organizations from 
Lower Silesia and representatives of almost 150 Italian firms. 
Tomasz Bartoszewicz, commercial counselor at the Polish Embassy in 
Rome, said that the meeting was a success as it was the first time 
that such an event had been attended by so many Italian businessmen. 
(Warsaw PAP in English 1828 GMT 22 Mar 94 AU) 

   SZCZECIN TO RECEIVE NEW AIRPORT:  Representatives of the Szczecin 
provincial and municipal authorities and the local flying club 
signed an agreement opening the way for the setting up of the West 
Pomerania Aviation Corporation, director of the Szczecin Flying Club 
Janusz Tatarczuk said.  The company plans to open a new airport by 
modernizing the existing sports airfield in Szczecin-Dabie which 
would be able to receive small passenger and cargo planes.  Szczecin 
already has an airport for regular domestic flights in Goleniow, 
about 60 km north-east of the city center.  (Warsaw PAP in English 
2019 GMT 22 Mar 94 AU) 

   BRITISH BUSINESSMEN INTERESTED IN COOPERATION:  Representatives 
of nine firms from Somerset in southwest England paid a visit to 
Poland on March 19.  They are interested in exporting their products 
to Poland and establishing joint ventures with Polish businessmen, 
the British Embassy in Warsaw said on 24 March.  The businessmen 
represent firms carrying out language training, construction 
enterprises specializing in producing steel roof systems, and 
factories manufacturing printers, computers, and tunnelling 
equipment.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1427 GMT 24 Mar 94 AU) 

   POLISH-BRITISH TRADE UP 22 PERCENT:  Polish-British trade 
turnover went up by 22 percent last year compared to 1992, reaching 
a value of some 1.2 billion British pounds.  Non-ferrous metals and 
coal head the list of Polish top products exported to Britain last 
year.  Poland also exported steel, iron and textiles.  The total 
value of Polish exports to Britain reached 449 million pounds in 
1993, going up by 26.2 percent compared to the previous year.  Apart 
from crude oil and petroleum products, all other products imported 
by Poland from Britain are highly processed products. Their imports 
to Poland went up 80 percent last year.  The total value of Poland's 
1993 imports from Britain reached 717 million pounds, increasing 
18.5 percent against 1993.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1534 GMT 25 Mar 
94 AU) 

   AIRCRAFT EXPORTED TO ITALY NO LONGER NEED CERTIFICATES: Twenty 
"Dromader" planes, to be exported by the Polish aviation industry to 
Italy this year, will no longer need certificates necessary to fly 
in that' country.  The aviation industry no longer has any export 
limits, Minister of Transport and Maritime Economy Boguslaw 
Liberadzki said on 24 March.  Main civil aviation inspector Adam 
Berezowski and director of the aviation department at the Italian 
Transport Ministry Marco Benvenuti signed a Polish-Italian agreement 
at the Ministry of Transport and Maritime Economy in Warsaw to 
mutually recognize aviation certificates.  So far, Poland has signed 
similar agreements with the United States, Canada and Colombia, and 
talks are under way on signing similar accords with Russia and CIS. 
(Warsaw PAP in English 1556 GMT 24 Mar 94 AU) 

   SEJM COMMITTEE APPROVES PHARE PROGRAM IMPLEMENTATION:  The Sejm 
Social Policy Committee positively assessed the implementation so 
far of the EC Commission's PHARE (Economic Restruction Aid for 
Poland and Hungary) 90 and PHARE 91.  The deputies considered as 
particularly significant the programme of social and economic 
development set up to promote local initiatives for employment and 
development of rural areas.  Nine selected areas will receive grants 
amounting to 6 million ECUs.  The Committee agreed that the Labor 
Ministry should continue negotiations with the EC Commission on the 
continuation of the projects so far on a broader scale.  (Warsaw PAP 
in English 1758 GMT 24 Mar 94 AU) 

   JAPANESE GOVERNMENT SUPPLIES TV TRAINING CENTER: The Polish 
Television Training Center, furnished with modern Japanese equipment 
opened in Warsaw on 25 March.  The center is to train some 300 
people annually.  Equipment for the production of studio programs 
and an editing set, worth some $350,000, was a gift of the Japanese 
Government for the center.  The Japanese side declared further 
technical aid, including a visit of Japanese experts to Poland and 
the training of Polish experts in Japan.  (Warsaw PAP in English 
1342 GMT 25 Mar 94 AU) 

   THREE-TIER STRUCTURE PROPOSED FOR COOPERATIVE BANKS:  Systemic 
and structural transformations creating the foundations of the safe 
operation of cooperative banks are a precondition for increasing 
their capital, the president of the National Bank of Poland (NBP) 
Hanna Gronkiewicz-Waltz told a general meeting of members of the 
National Union of Cooperative Banks in Wroclaw on 25 March. 

   She expressed the opinion that it is necessary to form a uniform, 
three-tier organizational structure of cooperative banks.  The 
cooperative banks should be grouped in some 10 regional banks and 
these, in turn, should be grouped in a national bank (bank krajowy), 
the NPB president said.  She explained that the cooperative banks 
would function in this system as independent and self-governed 
organizational units operating on the basis of uniform principles 
common for all the banks grouped in a given regional bank.  The 
regional banks would function as joint stock companies in which each 
of the shareholders would have one vote.  They would ensure the 
servicing of the cooperative banks grouped in them. 

   Ms Gronkiewicz-Waltz stressed that the Bank Krajowy would ensure 
a uniform policy of a given group of banks and coherent management 
of its resources, and would also be responsible for the correct 
functioning of all the groups of cooperative banks.  (Warsaw PAP in 
English 1500 GMT 25 Mar 94 AU) 

   FOREIGN INVESTMENT TOPS $3.5 BILLION:  The value of all foreign 
investments finalized in Poland reached $2.5 billion at the start of 
October last year, increasing to over $3.5 billion in March 1994, 
according to sources at the State Foreign Investments Agency.  U.S., 
Italian, German and French firms and international corporations are 
the largest investors in Poland.  They include Fiat, Coca-Cola, the 
Polish-American Enterprise Fund, Thomson, IPC, the European Bank for 
Reconstruction and Development, International Finance Corporation, 
ABB, Curtis International, and Unilever.  There are some 16,000 
joint-ventures and foreign companies in Poland, including over 200 
large investors whose investments exceeded or are to exceed $1 
million.  Most foreign investments focus on the production of 
consumer goods demanding simple technology. 

   Most of the foreign investments are made in Warsaw Province, 
where 38 firms have invested some $800 million.  Katowice and Krakow 
regions were also favored by foreign businessmen.  Until now, 
foreign capital was invested chiefly in such branches as 
construction, car industry, food-processing and electronics. 
(Warsaw PAP in English 1642 GMT 25 Mar 94 AU) 

   COCOM LIFTS EXPORT RESTRICTIONS:  The Council of the Coordinating 
Committee for East-West Trade Policy (COCOM) has lifted export 
restrictions imposed on Poland.  The decision was made in connection 
with the coming into force of the law on the principles of special 
control over foreign trade in commodities and know-how on 25 March, 
the Foreign Ministry said.  The long-term efforts of Polish 
diplomacy to gain free access to advanced Western know-how scored 
success.  This decision should result in further improvement in 
Poland's economic cooperation with states having the latest know- 
how, the Foreign Ministry's press and information department said. 
According to the Ministry, the COCOM decision is also of political 
significance, showing recognition for Poland's active and 
responsible policy in the non-proliferation of mass destruction 
weapons and facilitating Poland's integration strivings.  (Warsaw 
PAP in English 1950 GMT 25 Mar 94 AU) 

   POLISH-CHINESE ECONOMIC COMMISSION ON COOPERATION PROSPECTS:  The 
seventh session of the Polish-Chinese inter-governmental commission 
for economic and trade cooperation, held in Beijing on 28 March, 
sized up the state and prospects for the development of bilateral 
economic cooperation.  On the Polish side, the session was chaired 
by Transport Minister Boguslaw Liberadzki and on the Chinese side by 
Foreign Trade Minister Wu Yi.  The commission, which met for the 
first time in 1991, assessed positively the renewed rise in Polish- 
Chinese trade over the past three years.  Last year, this trade 
amounted to $397 million according to Poland, and $472 million 
dollars according to China, and was higher by 125 percent as 
compared with 1992.  The protocol signed by the Commission  shows 
that mining, power, aviation, electronic, light, chemical and food 
processing industries and transport offer the greatest opportunities 
for the development of Polish-Chinese economic cooperation.  Working 
groups are to seek concrete possibilities of cooperation in these 
areas.  (Warsaw PAP in English 2012 GMT 28 Mar 94 AU) 

   LOCAL GOVERNMENT ORGANIZATIONS TO FIGHT UNEMPLOYMENT:  The state 
is unable to solve the problem of unemployment on it own, and 
therefore local government agencies, funds and private businesses 
will have to play a greater role in fighting it, head of the Central 
Office of Planning (CUP) Miroslaw Pietrewicz told a conference 
entitled "local initiatives in solving the problems of 
unemployment."  He stressed that the scaling down of actions by the 
state does not mean that the government is giving up the problem, 
but, he claimed, its role should be to integrate local initiatives. 
"Within the next four years, we plan to reduce the unemployment rate 
from 16.5 percent in 1994 to 13.5 percent in 1997.  Assuming that 
the number of economically active persons in that period will rise 
by 620,000, over 1.1 million new jobs should be created by 1997," 
Pietrewicz explained. 

   Representatives of local government organizations emphasized that 
unsatisfactory efficiency in combating unemployment is caused by a 
scarcity of rural district funds and inaccurate legal regulations on 
the labor market.  It is necessary for the central administration to 
more actively cooperate with local organizations in fighting 
unemployment, they argued.  Districts hit with structural 
unemployment need the state's assistance.  The state, it was said, 
may help by finding prospective investors, creating economic 
initiatives, setting up economic databases and increasing the labor 
fund's means for active forms of combating unemployment.  (Warsaw 
PAP in English 1614 GMT 10 Mar 94 AU) 

   SZCZECIN SHIPYARD SIGNS CONTRACT WITH CHILEAN SHIPOWNER:  The 
Szczecin shipyard signed a contract with Compania Chile de 
Navegacion Interoceanica for the construction of two sophisticated 
container ships of 22,900 DWT each.  The two ships are to delivered 
in the fourth quarter of 1995 in addition to four other vessels to 
be conveyed to the Chilean customer next year.  (Warsaw PAP in 
English 1628 GMT 10 Mar 94 AU) 

   HIGHWAYS CONSORTIUM SET UP IN GDANSK:  Eight founding members, 
including the Gdansk refinery, the port of Gdansk, and Bank Gdanski, 
have set up a consortium with the aim of participating in the 
construction of motorways in Poland, and especially the north-south 
trans-European motorway, head of the Transport Department of the 
Provincial Government in Gdansk, Jerzy Stefanski, announced on 10 
March.  The consortium, called "Autostrady Gdanskie" ("Gdansk 
Motorways"), intends to focus on the construction of the Gdansk- 
Torun section of the north-south motorway.  Part of this strategic 
10,000 km long motorway, constructed under the aegis of the UN 
Economic Commission for Europe, is ready and the greatest delays in 
its construction have occurred on the territory of Poland.  However, 
the consortium has to obtain credits if it wants to apply to the 
state authorities for a license to carry out investment activity. 
(Warsaw PAP in English 1748 GMT 10 Mar 94 AU) 

   EUROPEAN UNION TO INVESTIGATE POLISH ENTREPRENEURSHIP:  The 
European Foundation for Entrepreneurship Research (EFER) will 
examine the 150 most dynamic companies in Poland, the Czech 
Republic, Hungary, Slovakia, and Slovenia, EFER President Bert 
Twaalhoven told reporters in Warsaw on 11 March.  The research is 
aimed at defining the needs of the best companies and setting up a 
data bank covering 750 of the most dynamic enterprises in central 
Europe.  The research will focus on private firms whose turnover 
exceeded 1 million ECU in 1993 and whose production growth was 
higher than the growth of the GDP (about 4 percent).  The firms 
should employ at least 10 people and their products should be 
innovative and partly exported. 

   The research is financed by the PHARE (Economic Reconstruction 
Aid for Poland and Hungary) project and its results will be 
presented to the European Union Commission.  The research will help 
to suggest to central European governments what steps they should 
take to support entrepreneurship.  The Polish part of the program is 
supported by the Business Centre Club, Polish Business Council, 
Confederation of Polish Employers, and Bank Rozwoju Eksportu (Export 
Development Bank).  The foundation, set up in 1987, groups 
scientists, financiers and entrepreneurs.  In future, EFER wants to 
carry out similar research in the republics of the former Soviet 
Union and hopes that the 750 dynamic companies from eastern Europe 
will set a pattern for them.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1807 GMT 10 Mar 
94 AU) 

   LONDON CLUB CUTS POLISH DEBT:  After four years of tough 
negotiations, Poland and the London Club reached an agreement in 
Frankfurt on 11 March on a 45 percent reduction of the $13.2-billion 
Polish debt to Western commercial banks.  The repayment of the debt 
is to last 30 years but the annual payment is not to exceed $400 
million.  The agreement covers all elements of the debt, including 
overdue interest. (Warsaw PAP in English 1514 GMT 11 Mar 94 AU) 

   NATIONAL BANK PRESIDENT URGES BANKS TO MERGE:  The Polish banking 
system needs to change due to the development of free market 
mechanisms.  "The consolidation of banks in order to increase their 
capitals is the most important thing now," president of the National 
Bank of Poland Hanna Gronkiewicz-Waltz told a seminar on 12 March. 
According to Gronkiewicz-Waltz, only big and strong banks with 
capital exceeding 1 trillion zlotys ($46 million) will be able to 
compete efficiently with foreign financial institutions.  She also 
pointed to the fact that banks are unwilling to merge and mergers 
happen only when the situation of a bank worsens.  Only then does 
the bank look for a partner that would help it to overcome problems. 
Gronkiewicz-Waltz sees the opportunity for smaller banks to operate 
as well but they should specialize in some kind of services or work 
in certain fields of economy. 

   President of the Polish Banks Union Marian Krzak does not 
consider the present situation of banks as bad.  Current 
difficulties concern only 10-15 per cent of banks and so far none of 
them has been liquidated, he said.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1705 GMT 
11 Mar 94 AU) 

   INDUSTRIAL LOBBY TO SET UP IN ALL INDUSTRIAL CENTERS:  The 
coordinator of the Polish Industrial Lobby, Pawel Soroka, announced 
in Warsaw that its branches would be established in all industrial 
centers of the country and cooperation started with similar 
movements throughout Europe.  On Saturday (12 March), the industrial 
lobby celebrated the first anniversary of its operation.  According 
to representatives of the lobby, it is essential to create an 
industrial and pro-innovative policy favoring structural changes in 
industry and enterprises.  Conditions for a rise in the 
effectiveness, competitiveness on foreign markets and equity 
accumulation should be created for enterprises through a relaxation 
of taxes and lowering interests on investment credits, Soroka said. 
The Polish Industrial Lobby, established in Warsaw in March 1993, 
affiliates scientists, employers and representatives of trade 
unions.  Its goal is to influence industrial policy of the state and 
take part in its implementation.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1959 GMT 12 
Mar 94 AU) 

   WARSAW-LONDON FLIGHTS RESUME AFTER 4-MONTH BREAK:  Flights on the 
Warsaw-London route were resumed after over four months when a 
passenger plane of LOT Polish Airlines left Warsaw for London on 
Sunday (13 March) morning.  Direct flights between Warsaw and London 
were suspended on 31 October 1993 as a result of a dispute between 
LOT and British Airways caused by the British carrier's demand that 
the number of its flights on the route be doubled during the winter 
season.  Under an agreement reached earlier this month, the two 
carriers have been allotted nine flights a week each during the 
winter season ending in March, and 12 flights a week during the 
summer season.  Three additional flights are to be added in the 
period from June to August.  The Polish carrier will also operate 
some London flights from Krakow and Gdansk. 

   According to LOT's marketing director Marek Serafin, each airline 
will have 10 flights weekly during the next winter season and two 
additional flights for each of the carriers are possible in case of 
good performance.  LOT commercial manager Jan Mich said that the 
airline had lost around $1 million in ticket revenues as a result of 
the  war  with British Airways, but added that actual losses would 
be smaller when operating expenses are deducted.  (Warsaw PAP in 
English 1920 GMT 13 Mar 94 AU) 

   UNEMPLOYMENT RISES 0.5 PERCENT IN FEBRUARY:  In February the 
unemployment rate rose by half a percent over the January figure. 
There are some 2,972,809 people unemployed nationally, which equals 
16.1 percent of all those employed.  In February, unemployment rose 
in 37 provinces and dropped in 8.  February saw a slow-down in the 
tempo of the increase of unemployment.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1219 
GMT 14 Mar 94 AU) 

   EU GRANTS TOTAL EIGHT MILLION ECUS:  Polish minister of industry 
and trade Marek Pol and ambassador of the European Union to Poland 
Alexander Dijckmeester on 14 March signed a financial memorandum on 
the granting to Poland by the European Union Commission of 1 million 
ECU to modernize a laboratory base of the State Trade Inspection 
Office and an agreement on Poland's further participation in the 
FIESTA program.  Under the agreement, Poland will receive 7 million 
ECU, 3 million of which are to be spent on the restructuring of the 
fuel and power industries and 4 million for similar operations in 
other industrial branches.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1419 GMT 14 Mar 
94 AU) 

   TEN MILLION ECUS FOR EDUCATION REFORM:  Poland is to receive 10 
million ECUs from the European Union for the reform of its 
educational system.  A memorandum to this effect was signed in 
Warsaw on 16 March by the minister of education Aleksander Luczak 
and head of the Warsaw mission of the EU Commission Alexander 
Dijckmeester.  The TERM (Training for the Management of Educational 
Reform) is to last till the end of 1996 and help improve the 
managerial abilities of Polish educators and school administrators. 
It is planned that some 1,500 workers of edcuational establishments 
will be trained under the program.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1518 GMT 
16 Mar 94 AU) 

   PRICES, INCOMES RISE IN FEBRUARY:  Consumer prices rose by an 
average of 1.1 percent in February compared with January, according 
to data released by the Central Statistical Office (GUS) on 15 
March.  GUS said in its communique that in January prices had risen 
by 1.8 percent.  Earnings rose by an average of 1.7 percent 
reaching, 4,718,400 zlotys (almost $300) a month.  (Warsaw PAP in 
English 1545 GMT 15 Mar 94 AU) 

   VOLVO TRUCK ASSEMBLY PLANT OPENS IN WROCLAW:  An assembly plant 
of Volvo trucks was officially opened on 15 March at the Jelcz car 
plant in Jelcz-Laskowice, near Wroclaw.  The new plant employs 30 
people assembling Volvo FL 6 trucks and FH 12 truck tractors from 
parts delivered by Sweden.  Plans call for increasing the number of 
employees to some 100 people.  The Volvo Truck Poland company has 
already received orders for 100 Volvo FH 12 truck tractors and is 
planning to sell some 500 tractors in Poland this year.  (Warsaw PAP 
in English 1720 GMT 15 Mar 94 AU) 

   GERMAN INVESTMENT EXPECTED TO INCREASE:  One of the founders of 
the Polish-German Chamber of Commerce, Hans Juergen Weber, told a 
conference in Gliwice on 15 March that "the present government, 
formed by the two biggest parliamentary parties, guarantees 
increased German investments in Poland."   Weber was speaking at a 
meeting entitled "foreign investments and the role of trade unions." 
Weber thought that an unstable system of regulations, for instance 
in customs, discouraged foreign business people from investing in 
Poland.  He said that the Germans were investing much more in 
Hungary and the Czech Republic than in Poland.  "It is said that 
Germans invest a lot in Poland.  However in 1993 the United States 
was twice as far ahead of us in this area," he added.  Theddaus 
Schape, director of the Office for the Friedrich Ebert Foundation, 
said that the meeting had been organized together with the Lower 
Silesian region of Solidarity because "if the trade unions do not 
back the economic changes in Poland, then these changes will not 
succeed." (Warsaw PAP in English 1723 GMT 15 Mar 94 AU) 

   INTERNATIONAL TENDER FOR ROAD MODERNIZATION CLOSES:  As much as 
34 tenders have been bid for modernizing eight branch roads off some 
of Poland's main highways.  Bidding closed on 14 March, and the 
committee for tenders immediately began evaluating the tenders, 
according to information from committee chairman Jerzy Sulot. 
Twenty-eight Polish firms and ten foreign companies have entered 
bids either on their own or as joint ventures.  The world bank is to 
provide loans for the road construction.  (Warsaw PAP in English 
1857 GMT 15 Mar 94 AU) 

   ENTERPRISES SHOW IMPROVED FINANCIAL RESULTS IN 1993:  The 
financial situation of enterprises improved last year compared to 
their situation in 1992, according to data released by CUP.  This 
trend applied to both public and private firms, although the former 
showed stronger improvement than the latter, reporters were told at 
a press conference.  The best results in 1993 were recorded by 
Poczta Polska (Polish Post) and Telekomunikacja SA.  The latter had 
a profitability rate of 36.5 percent after 11 months of 1993.  At 
the end of 1993 publicly owned enterprises accounted for 36 percent 
of the total number of firms in Poland, while privately owned units 
accounted for 64 percent.  In both sectors, almost 42 percent of 
firms were in the red.  Total financial obligations of all firms 
amounted to 520 trillion zlotys (approximately $20 billiion) at the 
end of 1993.  The number of firms which lost creditworthiness 
increased from 4,400 in 1992 to 5,800 last year.  (LD1603184294 AU) 
(Warsaw PAP in English 1753 GMT 16 Mar 94 AU) 

   RESEARCH CENTER URGES TOBACCO INDUSTRY PRIVATIZATION:  Janusz 
Lewandowski of Market Economy Research Institute said that the 
postponement of the privatization and modernization of cigarette 
plants is reducing the competitiveness of state-owned plants and 
indirectly harming Polish tobacco growers.  The institute also 
expressed the opinion that the domestic market should be protected 
through the introduction of customs on imported tobacco.  The state 
tobacco industry produced 85 billion cigarettes last year.  However 
its share in the market supply of tobacco products has been 
declining for several years now while private cigarrette plants have 
been increasing their production.  Last year, private firms, 
including those with foreign capital, produced almost 5 billion 
cigarettes.  Lewandowski said that further delay in the 
privatization of the state-owned tobacco plants may cause that they 
will be "pushed out" of the Polish market and thus the interests of 
workers of those plants and tobacco growers may be endangered. 
(Warsaw PAP in English 1901 GMT 16 Mar 94 AU) 

   ECOLOGICAL FUND TO SUPPORT INVESTMENT PROJECTS:  The council of 
the "Ekofundusz" Ecological Fund has approved 16 new investment 
projects to improve environment protection, says Maciej Nowicki, the 
Fund's president, adding that they would receive financial support 
from the Fund.  Nowicki said that the funds at the disposal of 
"Ekofundusz" represent 10 percent of the ecoconversion of the Polish 
debt towards banks gathered in the Paris Club.  So far, the United 
States, France, Switzerland and Finland agreed to such form of debt 
reduction.  "Ekofundusz" has earmarked 327 billion zlotys (some $15 
million) for the implementation of 25 eco-related projects between 
November 1992 and the end of 1993.  This year, "Ekofundusz" will 
support projects linked with the protection of the Baltic Sea, 
endangered birds, and the limitation of emission of gases.  (Warsaw 
PAP in English 1903 GMT 16 Mar 94 AU) 

   THOMSON-POLKOLOR GAINS ISO 9000 CERTIFICATE:  Thomson-Polkolor, 
Poland's largest manufacturer of TV picture tubes at Piaseczno, 
south of Warsaw, received an ISO 9000 certificate, which means that 
production quality management meets international standards.  The 
certificate covers four factories, producing seven groups of 
product.  Thomson-Polkolor chose 150 9000, the internationally 
recognized quality system, particularly respected by customers from 
the EU, in order to ensure better quality standards of its products. 
Thomson-Polkolor is a Franco-Polish company set up in the second 
half of 1991.  Thomson Tubes and Displays, a branch of the Thomson 
consumer electronics company specializing in the production of TV 
picture tubes, has 51 percent of shares in the enterprise.  (Warsaw 
PAP in English 1629 GMT 3 Mar 94 AU) 

   U.S.-POLISH ECONOMIC RELATIONS ASSESSED:  Despite a growing trade 
deficit, Polish-U.S. economic relations in 1993 were marked by 
progress and augured well for subsequent years, according to the 
Polish economic counselor's office in Washington.  Exports from 
Poland to the U.S. market reached $454 million, 21 percent more than 
in 1992.   the major export items being glass products and men's 
clothing.  U.S. exports to Poland increased by 44 percent and 
amounted to $916.5 million, leaving a trade deficit of $462.5 
million. 

   The officials from the Polish economic counselor's office believe 
that especially important for the future development of bilateral 
relations are growing U.S. direct investments in Poland, especially 
by large corporations, a significant increase in the volume of 
bilateral trade, and the setting up of new institutions of trade 
promotion and development.  The United States was among the five 
biggest Polish trade partners last year.  (Warsaw PAP in English 
2257 GMT 3 Mar 94 AU) 

   BYDGOSZCZ COMMUNAL BANK FREEZES WITHDRAWALS:  The Bydgoski Bank 
Komunalny (Bydgoszcz Communal Bank), which was besieged by clients 
withdrawing their deposits 4 March, closed down operation of its 
teller positions and froze cash withdrawals at all the bank's 
branches nationwide on Friday.  Bank President Wojciech Malinowski 
said that to continue allowing withdrawals would threaten the bank's 
interests, as it paid out some 60 billion zlotys (about $2.7 
million) during Thursday's panic wave.  According to Malinowski, the 
panic was caused by clients being inadequately informed about the 
accusations leveled against the bank by the Bydgoszcz branch of the 
Supreme Chamber of Inspection (NIK), which has forwarded a complaint 
of mismanagement against the bank to the Prosecutor's Office.  NIK 
has been in consultation with the Prosecutor's Office. 

   The bank's management will reveal only that the controversy is 
centered on bad credits granted in what it terms "the distant past." 
The Bydgoszcz bank has been in existence since 1989 and 90 percent 
of the credits in question were granted in 1990-1991, 3 percent of 
the 3.6 trillion zlotys ($164 million) the bank has granted to date. 
Malinowski announced that prior to Thursday's panic, clients had 
been withdrawing funds for some 10 days.  In his opinion the 
freezing of withdrawals was absolutely necessary, because otherwise 
the bank would find itself in even greater trouble than at present. 
The bank is still offering transfer and brokerage services. 
Malinowski stated that the bank requires at least 150 billion zlotys 
to maintain its financial liquidity.  "At this point we can count 
only on our own activity and the help of the Polish National Bank," 
he said.  "For the moment, the national bank has requested a full 
financial analysis."  Negotiations on a financing agreement with the 
Pierwszy Bank Komercyjny (First Commercial Bank) have produced no 
concrete results.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1821 GMT 4 Mar 94 AU) 

  SEMINAR ON PHARE ASSISTANCE:  Experts and government officials 
from Poland and the EU have held a three-day seminar in Warsaw, 
which sized up the results of assistance offered to Poland under the 
PHARE (Economic Reconstruction Aid for Poland and Hungary) program. 
The Polish side emphasized the need to transform the PHARE fund to 
adjust it to the new conditions that have emerged since Poland's 
association with the EU.  The Polish delegates also wanted PHARE to 
lend greater support in the form of investments.  The delegates from 
the EU union declared their understanding for the Polish postulates 
concerning a simplification of procedures used by PHARE.  The 
conclusions reached by the participants in the seminar will be 
submitted to the European Commission in Brussels.  (Warsaw PAP in 
English 2149 GMT 4 Mar 94 AU) 

   CENTRAL STATISTICAL OFFICE GETS 12 MILLION ECU PHARE AID:  Under 
the terms of a financial memorandum signed on 9 March, the Central 
Statistical Office (GUS) will receive 12 million ECU in aid within 
the PHARE program to develop the "Polstat" system of statistical 
information.  GUS chairman Jozef Olenski said that the program's aim 
will be to facilitate and accelerate the modernization of the 
economy, whose rapid changes require access to a wide spectrum of 
reliable economic and social data.  When implemented, "Polstat" will 
help GUS better carry out its tasks.  GUS needs a more efficient 
computer system in Warsaw and all provincial offices to carry out a 
necessary modernization of a system of data processing and 
transmitting.  Some 300 users should be able to have access 
simultaneously to the computer database.  Olenski added that the 
PHARE funds will be chiefly earmarked for the modernization of 
computer hardware and software, implementation of a modern 
methodology of statistical research, and upgrading the skills of GUS 
staff.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1359 GMT 9 Mar 94 AU) 

   ROMANIA 

   ROMANIA'S FOREST RESERVES:  Romania's forest stock currently 
covers an area of 6,367 thousand hectares, which is 28 percent of 
the country's total area, according to the National Statistics 
Board. This area has been roughly the same since 1938.  There are 
forest areas in all counties of the country, with a share ranging 
from 4 percent in Calarasi County (southwestern Romania) to 50 
percent in Suceava County (northeastern Romania).  A total of 
13,310.5 thousand cubic meters of wood was cut in 1993, of which 
75.3 percent went to industrial production and 24.7 percent were 
used to meet local needs.  As compared with the previous years, a 
decline in wood felling has been recorded recently.  This is 
explained by the steps taken for yearly rationing the wood felling 
contingent according to the requirements of industry and of the 
population, while also paying attention to environment protection. 
Provisions for 1994 are also lower than last year's.  (Bucharest 
ROMPRES in English 0310 GMT 17 Mar 94 AU) 

   RECORD DEALS AT CONSTANTA COMMODITIES EXCHANGE:  The Maritime and 
Commodities Exchange of Constanta (Romanian Black Sea port) has 
recently reported record deals in only one session:  1.177 billion 
lei (the current official exchange rate of the leu is 1,570 to $1). 
Set up on December 17, 1993, the exchange in Constanta is the second 
of its kind in Romania, after the Romanian Commodities Exchange in 
Bucharest.  The ECONOMISTUL review writes that in the respective 
session a contract of 1,000 tons corn was offered at 150,000 lei/ton 
and sold for 168,000 lei/ton, five contracts of 1,000 tons fodder 
barley each, first bid 170,000 lei/ton, final bid 165,000 lei/ton, a 
contract of 200 Toshiba color television sets was bought for 550,800 
lei apiece, from a first bid of 565,000 lei apiece, and a contract 
of 200 freedom color television sets sold for 369,300 lei apiece, 
from the first bid of 375,000 lei apiece. 

   Exchange President Viorel Marian Pana termed the deals as the 
most important ones in the last few years in Romania.  He said that 
since the exchange was opened, 40 deals were concluded, which 
resulted in contracts worth some 300 million lei on the average per 
session. The bids already made for the next session (for the time 
being, the sessions are being scheduled once a week) show that the 
one billion lei mark will be topped again.  "Together with the 
colleagues of the Bucharest Commodities Exchange, and with other 
colleagues in the country, we plan to draw up some standings of our 
common problems. We try to overcome certain difficulties of a legal 
nature.  We are interested in a law of exchanges to be issued," he 
told the ECONOMISTUL.  (Bucharest ROMPRES in English 0603 GMT 17 Mar 
94 AU) 

   TELECOMMUNICATIONS SECTOR RECORDS GROWTH:  Romanian 
telecommunications have recorded sizable growth in the last four 
years.  The most spectacular drive started in November 1992 with the 
introduction of the new number system all over the country.  The 
second stage of the action will be completed by 25 March 1994 when 
the county digits will change.  The purpose of this great change in 
the telephone system in Romania is to achieve uniformity of numbers, 
first in Bucharest and then in other cities where digital exchanges 
were installed and the automated international system was 
introduced.  There were 2.6 million mainlines in Romania in 1993. 
The number of telephone sets went up to some 3.5 million and the 
rate of telephone penetration reached 11.53 percent.  Likewise, the 
access to international telephone lines has been considerably 
improved since 1990.  Currently, there are 5,880 international 
automated posts and 58 manual lines, as well as 133 satellite 
connections.  The Romanian microwave networks ensure five 
international connections in Bulgaria, former Yugoslavia, Hungary, 
Ukraine, and the Republic of Moldova.  These achievements have been 
facilitated by an EBRD (European Bank for Reconstruction and 
Development) loan and cooperation with the Italian Sirti and 
Japanese Tomen companies.  Four joint ventures are currently 
building telephone exchanges in Romania:  Alcatel network system, 
Emcom, Electromagnetica Goldstar and Felix Telecom.  (Bucharest 
ROMPRES in English 0335 GMT 18 Mar 94 AU) 

   RADIO COMMUNICATIONS SECTOR EXPANDS:  Three new companies emerged 
in the free market of value-added radio communication services in 
1993:  Telefonica Romania SA, providing services of mobile cellular 
radio telephony; Comunicatii Nationale Mobile SA, providing paging 
service; and Societatea 3 TV Timisoara, handling the production and 
broadcasting of television programs. The Radiocommunication National 
Company is directly involved in the setting up of these new 
companies, with stakes of 20 percent, 46 percent and 20 percent, 
respectively, of their total stock. 

   According to the National Program of Communication Development in 
1991-2005, television channel 2 will be extended all over the 
national territory, the cost of the works being estimated at $120 
million.  Another $95 million will be spent on setting up three 
national radio channels to broadcast on ultra short waves and on 
replacing the worn-out equipment operated in the long, medium, and 
short bands.  As regards the telephone services, the company has a 
network covering some 50 percent of the long-distance telephone 
traffic, as well as five international connections with Bulgaria, 
former Yugoslavia, Hungary, Ukraine, and Moldova.  The land stations 
for satellite communications cover 92 percent of the continental 
traffic though the Intelsat stations (for the Atlantic and Indian 
oceans) and 31 percent of the inter-European traffic through the 
Eutelsat station.  All stations are being used both for telephone 
and television services. 

   According to the magazine FLACARA, the conversion of the 
analogous circuits with IDR digital circuits for the Atlantic- 
Intelsat connection has started.  As for the new services, the radio 
communication company plans to approach the sector of cable 
television, develop classical and cellular radio telephony, the 
paging and trunking systems, and the VSAT networks; it also plans to 
introduce numeric television and radio in Romania, and improve the 
performance of the satellite communication equipment.  (Bucharest 
ROMPRES in English 0533 GMT 21 Mar 94 AU) 

   PRIME MINISTER DISCUSSES PRIVATIZATION:  The pace of 
privatization has been more rapid this year than last year, said 
Prime Minister Nicolae Vacaroiu in an interview with the daily VOCEA 
ROMANIEI.  Two hundred and seventy small- and middle-sized companies 
were privatized last year as against the 140 businesses that passed 
into private ownership in the first two months of this year.  Yet 
the pace has not met our expectations, said the prime minister, who 
mentioned that the "action has to be stepped up."  The Romanian 
prime minister told VOCEA ROMANIEI that his cabinet had referred a 
bill to parliament on transferring ownership to employees grouped in 
associations.  Mr. Vacaroiu also mentioned that the Council for 
Reform had been putting the final touches to a bill favoring rapid 
attraction of the vouchers that have been distributed to the 
population, with which shares would be bought.  Simultaneously, a 
more powerful offensive started with a view to attracting foreign 
investors.  A bill was drafted and forwarded to parliament, added 
the prime minister, on additional opportunities for foreign 
investors, who bring in more than $50 million worth of capital. 
(Bucharest ROMPRES in English 1011 GMT 18 Mar 94 AU) 

   PRIVATIZATION PROGRAMS IN INDUSTRY:  The Administration Board of 
the State Property Fund, FPS, adopted several decisions aimed at 
speeding up privatization.  The FPS adopted a new list of companies 
proposed for privatization including 203 small-sized units and 71 
middle-sized ones.  The sale of the shares of eleven important 
businesses was endorsed, four big units were given an opportunity to 
choose from among partial sale, leasing, and transfer of assets to 
other companies.  The FPS approved the creation of seven commercial 
companies with private capital, foreign or Romanian.  Several 
studies for the restructuring of commercial companies were endorsed 
in fields considered to be of maximum importance by the Romanian 
Government, such as agriculture, metal processing, and machine 
building.  (Bucharest ROMPRES in English 0521 GMT 21 Mar 94 AU) 

   BALKAN BUSINESS COOPERATION CENTER OPENS:  A delegation of the 
Romanian Development Agency (ARD) attended Monday, 21 March, the 
opening in Bucharest of the Romanian branch of the Balkan Center for 
Cooperation Between Small and Medium-Sized Businesses, established 
at Romania's initiative in October 1992 at Varna, Bulgaria. 
Adhering to it were the national bodies in charge of small and 
medium-sized business development policies in Albania, Bulgaria, 
Greece, Romania, and Turkey.  The center has a permanent secretariat 
at the Romanian Development Agency, financed by the Romanian 
Government.  The secretariat has two offices, one in Thessaloniki 
and the other one in Istanbul, to be-inaugurated in March, both 
being sponsored by their host countries.  The Romanian delegation 
attending the opening of the Thessaloniki subsidiary is to discuss 
bilateral relations between ARD and the Hellenic organization for 
small and medium-sized businesses and their joint activities related 
to technical assistance and training.  (Bucharest ROMPRES in English 
1314 GMT 21 Mar 94 AU) 

   'INTERNATIONAL BANK OF RELIGIONS' OPENS:  Officially inaugurated 
on 1 March 1994 in a modern Bucharest headquarters, the 
International Bank of Religions opened its gates for the public on 
Monday, 21 March 1994.  Initially called the Romanian 
Interconfessional Bank, "the International Bank of Religions aims to 
become the bank of all the faithfuls, the bank of those who pray for 
their daily bread and of the businessmen who are convinced that 
their prosperity is coming also from God," reads a press communique 
released to ROMPRES news agency.  Initiated by the International 
Ecumenical Center, its main founding member operating in Romania 
under the aegis of the UNESCO National Committee, the International 
Bank of Religions launched its public subscription on 25 February 
1993 and has now several hundreds of shareholders among whom 
businessmen from the United States, Africa, the Gulf area etc. 

   A unique bank of its kind in the world, the International Bank of 
Religions aims to become a bridge between good faithfuls all over 
the world, regardless of their religion.  Among the bank's founding 
members are several representatives of all officially recognized 
denominations in Romania.  Besides the support provided for the 
confessional activity of these denominations, the new banking 
institution has a concrete business programme in the oil industry, 
in tourism, in health care, and in education.  (Bucharest ROMPRES in 
English 1200 GMT 22 Mar 94 AU) 

   KRUPP EXPERTS DISCUSS DANUBE SHIPPING ISSUES:  A delegation of 
Krupp Hoesch International Managers and Experts is in Constanta 
port, Romania, to discuss problems concerning the shipping on the 
Danube and the operation in Romanian ports.  The talks will cover 
sea shipping and communications, logistics of road, river and air 
transportation, and tourist issues.  At the end of the visit, the 
delegation is expected to sign important documents on cooperation. 
(Bucharest ROMPRES in English 1500 GMT 22 Mar 94 AU) 

   GOVERNMENT TO BOOST IRON, STEEL INDUSTRY:  Governmental bodies 
have drafted programs intended to revive the metal-processing branch 
by fully using production units and reducing the lag in technology 
as compared to developed countries.  This will contribute to the 
revival of the economy as a whole, assess the said bodies.  Designed 
to produce 17 million tons of steel each year, the Romanian iron and 
steel industry registered a continuous drop after 1989, with a low 
in 1992, when merely 5 million tons of steel were manufactured, 
writes the daily VOCEA ROMANIEI.  That was caused, among other 
things, by a drop in production in all the other branches of the 
economy, the severe reduction of investments, financial blockage, 
and inflation.  As for 1993, production in that industry increased 
by 3 percent as compared to the previous year, but it was still 
suffering from the financial blockage. 

   The metal-processing department of the Ministry of Industries has 
elaborated together with research and design institutes a "Study for 
the Restructuring and Modernization of the Iron and Steel Industry 
Over 1994-2002," which was debated and amended during the 25 
February meeting of the government.  Restructuring and modernization 
studies have also been elaborated for the non-ferrous industry and 
the industry of heat-resisting substances.  The adjusting of the 
production capacity to domestic and foreign demand, the use, by at 
least 80 percent, of the production units, a gradual reduction of 
the technology lag compared to developed countries by the revamping 
of huge plants, such as the ones in Galati, Calarasi, and Hunedoara, 
and the launching of privatization in that branch are among the 
priority goals, said Petre Ianc, secretary of state in the Ministry 
of Industries.  "The development and boosting of the metal- 
processing sector can ensure the redressing of the whole Romanian 
economy," added Ianc.  (Bucharest ROMPRES in English 0825 GMT 10 Mar 
94 AU) 

   CUSTOMS HEAD OUTLINES SITUATION ON BORDERS:  The customs system 
in Romania is ensured by 94 units, 37 of which are border crossing 
points belonging to 10 regional departments.  They are run by a 
staff of 4,800, out of which 650 persons work in central 
departments, said Mihai Pinzariu, general director of the Romanian 
Customs Services, who granted an interview to the review BURSA. 
Over 50 percent of the personnel are university graduates, and many 
of them are taking training courses in Romania and in other 
countries, such as the United States, Austria, Great Britain, 
Belgium, and France.  According to Pinzariu, envisaged is the 
setting up of a customs school in Romania.  Referring to the border 
crossing points flow, Pinzariu said that "there is a growing need 
for new border crossing points."  Presently, modernization and 
expansion works are carried out on 42 border crossing points.  At 
Giurgiu, on the Danube River, a first part of the customs unit was 
built with $450,000 worth of U.S. assistance, through the agency of 
UN bodies.  In addition, four more units were opened recently on the 
eastern border, to the Republic of Moldova, and eight on the western 
border of Romania.  Pinzariu also mentioned the fact that for the 
observance of the UN-imposed embargo over Yugoslavia, Romanian 
customs workers received three speedboats from the United States, a 
patrol boat from Great Britain, and over 40 stationary and mobile 
radio-receiver stations.  (Bucharest ROMPRES in English 0939 GMT  11 
Mar 94 AU) 

   GOVERNMENT EFFORTS TO LURE FOREIGN INVESTORS:  During its Friday, 
11 March, meeting, the executive approved a decision concerning some 
enlightenments granted to foreign investors, intended to increase 
the flow of foreign capital invested in the industrial sector.  The 
companies with participation of foreign capital over $50 million, 
having a 60-percent integration in the Romanian industry and 
exporting more than 50 percent of their production, shall be 
exempted for seven years from tariffs on imports of machine-tools 
and equipment, spare parts, and raw materials necessary for their 
production.  They shall also be exempted for five years from tax on 
profits. 

   The Romanian executive also examined the strategy of reform and 
restructuring in the fields of physical and town planning, public 
works, and building industry.  The latter sector was considered to 
have large possibilities for privatization, as about 30 percent of 
the construction enterprises have been privatized so far, four of 
them being large companies.  While analyzing the present stage and 
the 1994-1995 priorities of the sector of small and middle 
companies, the fact that there are currently 524,000 such private 
companies registered was considered to be relevant.  The government 
adopted a decision setting the minimum gross monthly salary, the 
payment of which is guaranteed by the government, at 60,000 lei per 
month (the official exchange rate of the dollar is $1=1,570 lei.) 
(Bucharest ROMPRES in English 1658 GMT 12 Mar 94 AU) 

   PRIME MINISTER VIEWS 1993 ECONOMIC ACHIEVEMENTS:  The economic 
achievements in 1993 were "satisfactory" with the flattening of the 
production decline as a "partial success," said Romanian Prime 
Minister Nicolae Vacaroiu at a press conference on Monday, March 14, 
where the prime minister briefly assessed the government's activity 
in 1993 and the priorities for the future.  "Our basic concern was 
to speed up the reform and manage Romania's recovery from crisis," 
said the prime minister.  The main achievements of the present 
cabinet were said to be:  the 1-percent growth of the gross domestic 
product; the 1.3-percent increase of industrial production; the 
growth of agricultural production by 12.4 percent; the rise of labor 
productivity per employee by 3.6 percent; a 4-percent growth of 
exports and a 4-percent decrease of imports, all comparisons being 
made to 1992. 

   "Despite the fact that exports increased over the second part of 
1993, the trade balance still showed a deficit," the prime minister 
said.  Romania's foreign debt has remained constant in 1993, as no 
new loans were granted.  Referring to the agriculture as a priority 
sector, Prime Minister Vacaroiu said that its privatization remains 
an essential preoccupation of the executive.  The prime minister 
expressed his concern over the problems facing the animal-breeding 
sector.  Referring to the social issues, Vacaroiu said that despite 
the fact that social protection represented a major concern of the 
executive, 1993 had brought no improvement in the living standard. 
The inflation rate surged as high as 295.5 percent, while salaries 
rose merely by 210 percent.  "For us, 1993 has also meant a sequence 
of difficult, unpopular actions, such as the cut of state subsidies 
or the introduction of the value-added tax," Prime Minister Nicolae 
Vacaroiu said.  (Bucharest ROMPRES in English 1149 GMT 15 Mar 94 AU) 

   STATISTICS BOARD REPORT ON INDUSTRIAL PRODUCTION:  Romania's 
industrial production in January 1994 was 5.5 percent greater than 
last December and 1.8 percent greater than in January 1993, 
announced the National Statistics Board.  Nineteen industrial 
branches reported bigger production than in December.  Sizable rises 
were recorded especially in computing and office equipment (plus 
68.7 percent), metallic construction and products (plus 44.4 
percent), means of road transport (plus 40.8 percent), electric 
machines and apparatus (plus 21.4 percent).  The lowest production 
levels were reported with wireless, television and communication 
sets (minus 61.1 percent), means of transport other than road (minus 
44.7 per cent). 

   Physical production went up over December 1993 with a number of 
important products:  coal, gasoline, sodium products, chemical 
fertilizers, synthetic and man-made yarn and fibers, window glass, 
bearings, refrigerators, electric engines, transformers, city and 
all-terrain cars.  Decreases were reported especially with cement, 
rough steel, tractors, fish, meat, edible oil.  The value of 
production totalled 2,130.1 billion lei, and the deliveries to the 
home and foreign markets were worth 2,055 billion lei, which made 
the stocks of finished goods with producers grow during the month, 
reaching 1,417.9 billion lei, i.e. 66.6 percent of January's 
production, as compared with 64.9 percent last December.  The value 
of contracts and orders concluded by economic operators in the 
processing industry last January totalled 7,944.0 billion lei, so 
that by 31 January they were worth 8,390.3 billion lei. 

   At the end of January industry had 2,543,5000 employees, by 
19,500 less than at the end of last December.  The work time in 
January was used 83.8 percent (as compared with 79.7 percent the 
month before and 83.2 percent in January 1993).  The level of hourly 
labor productivity in January was 5.5 percent higher than in January 
1993, but 4.5 percent lower than in December 1993.  Labor 
productivity per employee was better (in comparable conditions in 
point of number of work days), topping by 1.5 percent the level of 
December 1993 and by 5.9 percent that of January 1993.  (Bucharest 
ROMPRES in English 0919 GMT 3 Mar 94 AU) 

   ECONOMIC TIES WITH SOUTH AMERICA:  Romanian Commerce Minister 
Cristian Ionescu told daily VOCEA ROMANIEI with reference to the 
results of his recent tour of Brazil, Venezuela and Colombia, that a 
salient feature he noted was "the three countries' interest in using 
the facilities offered by Romanian industries, especially the 
petrochemistry and iron-and-steel industry.  The wish was expressed 
to process large amounts of oil from those countries in refining 
units in Romania, with payment either in products resulting from 
processing or in cash."  Mentioning that both Venezuela and Brazil 
were Romania's traditional iron ore suppliers, the minister outlined 
Romania's readiness to accept investments in that domain and also 
the participation of foreign partners as stockholders of big 
Romanian iron-and-steel combines.  The idea was also discussed that 
the ore should be processed into products with safe outlets in 
Europe, maybe by joint marketing. 

   The Romanian minister showed that in Venezuela export contracts 
were concluded for the following products:  machine-tools ($1.3 
million), tractors (300,000), ARO all-terrain cars (2.5 million), 
coaches and buses to be assembled on the spot.  As for Colombia, a 
protocol was signed on the commissioning of an ARO car assembly 
line, worth some $26 million this year.  In Brazil, a new trade 
agreement was signed, that gives purely commercial bases to the 
economic relations, eliminating the clearing pattern.  The Brazilian 
partners are extremely interested in buying ARO all-terrain cars, 
buses, trucks and concrete forms of collaboration are to be 
established soon.  The minister also recalled the wish of the Bank 
of Brazil, the biggest in South America, to open a branch in 
Bucharest.  All three countries visited showed great interest in 
opening an airline between South America and Romania, that would 
cover also Central and Eastern Europe and would allow for two-way 
flow of businessmen.  (Bucharest ROMPRES in English 1430 GMT 3 Mar 
94 AU) 

   DESTRUCTION OF IRRIGATION SYSTEM HURTS CROP YIELDS:  Experts of 
the Romanian Ministry of Agriculture and Food Industry have proposed 
that some 2.1 million hectares be irrigated in 1994 out of the 
3,101.743 hectares of appropriately laid-out land.  A "ministry of 
irrigation" was also proposed to be founded in order to manage the 
re-actuation of the irrigation system.  More than two-thirds of the 
land to be irrigated in case of drought conditions, according to the 
ministry plans, is held by private farmers.  The most troubled zone 
includes the southern counties affected for over 10 years by a 
severe drought with temperatures over 40 degrees centigrade in 
summer.  The tree veils protecting communication roads and river 
beds have vanished and the irrigation utilities devastated, 
mistakenly taken as communist vestiges.  Under these circumstances, 
the agricultural product has fallen dramatically.  "Production has 
fallen from 4.5 tons of wheat and 10 tons of corn per hectare of 
previously irrigated land to 1.9 tons and 3.0 tons respectively, 
said a village mayor of Calarasi County, cited by the daily CURIERUL 
NATIONAL.  (Bucharest ROMPRES in English 1826 GMT 4 Mar 94 AU) 

   BOEING-ROMAERO COOPERATION PROTOCOL:  The Romanian firm ROMAERO 
and the U.S. firm Boeing signed a protocol of bilateral cooperation 
in Bucharest, March 5.  "It is no secret that we want to become 
major under-contractors of the American firm that manufactures more 
than 60 percent of the world aircraft production," said engineer 
Tudorel Dumitrascu, director of the ROMAERO at the signing ceremony. 
According to the 8-year contract -- which can be prolonged -- the 
Romanian party will build parts and subassemblies for Boeing 737 and 
Boeing 757 (trailing edges, landing gear).  Larry Warfield, 
representative of the firm Boeing for Romania and Dorin Dumitriu, 
head of the direction for restructuring of the State Ownership Fund 
attended the signing ceremony.  The cooperation is expected to stop 
the decline of the aircraft industry and to attract foreign 
investors, said the persons who took the floor.  "We think that the 
restructuring of the plant has been completed and all conditions 
have been put in place for the company to secure profits, said 
ROMAERO director Tudorel Dumitrascu.  (Bucharest ROMPRES in English 
1850 GMT 4 Mar 94 AU) 

   KOREAN CREDIT FOR TELECOMMUNICATIONS MODERNIZATION:  A credit 
contract worth $50 million was signed Friday, 4 March at Bucharest 
between Eximbank of the Republic of Korea and Telecom, the Romanian 
Telecommunications Corporation, for the modernization of the 
latter's network in the County of Prahova.  The Korean Government's 
credit has been granted in terms of an advantageous 4.2 percent 
annual interest, a five-year period of grace and reimbursement 
scheduled for 20 years," Telecommunications Minister Andrei Chirica 
told ROMPRES at the signing ceremony.  The money will be used by 
Telecom to buy equipment for Prahova's telecommunications, a project 
estimated to be completed in 36 months and to consist of the 
installation of 100,000 digital telephone lines in some 80 of the 
county's communities.  (Bucharest ROMPRES in English 1553 GMT 5 Mar 
94 AU) 

   VIENNA TRADE FAIR IN BUCHAREST:  The well-known Vienna Trade Fair 
(IFABO), held for the first time in Bucharest under the organization 
of Romexpo and the Wiener Messen und Congress of Austria has been 
entered by 50 firms specializing in computers, communications and 
office equipment from Romania, Austria, Denmark, France, Germany, 
Italy, Great Britain, the United States of America and others.  The 
organizers and the participants alike are sure that the IFABO 1994 
will be successful and that it will contribute to boost the 
commercial exchanges of Romanian economic units. 

   Guenther Hickl, director-general of the organizing firm, said 
that the IFABO was first held in Vienna in 1970, and that it had 
been held in the past years in Budapest and Prague.  "The Romanian 
market is still at the beginning of a phase characterized by 
mounting interest from economic units in computerization, 
telecommunications and office equipment.  According to estimates, 
the computers to be installed the country in the next two years will 
double the present number.  I should like to say that Romanians are 
very clever, very good technicians, that they can readily become 
accustomed to the new technologies.  That is an important national 
resource to boast of.  We shall be very content to turn this first 
IFABO into the starting point of many mutually advantageous trade 
and partnership contacts," said Hickl.  Speaking about this first 
holding of IFABO-Bucharest, Berry van den Hoven, director-general 
for Eastern Europe of the Alcatel Business Systems Austria, 
mentioned:  "I think that it will be a promising start, first of all 
for Romanian businessmen, who have an opportunity to become informed 
on the situation on the international market as far as computers, 
communications and office equipment are concerned."  (Bucharest 
ROMPRES in English 1705 GMT 8 Mar 94 AU) 

   AGREEMENT WITH GERMANY ON BUCHAREST WHOLESALE MARKET:  Romania 
and Germany signed on 8 March in Bucharest an agreement between the 
two governments on a bilateral project for the building of the 
biggest farm foodstuff sales center.  Under the agreement, the 
German party will give free technical assistance in the 
implementation of the project that benefits a loan given by the 
European Bank for Reconstruction and Development.  The Bucharest 
wholesales market for fruit and vegetables will be built in the zone 
of Popesti-Leordeni over 30 hectares.  The building will start in 
mid-1996 and will be completed in two years.  The project is 
estimated to cost $35 million, 25 million of which will be given by 
the EBRD.  the wholesale market is organized upon the system of 
share-holding companies.  The Romanian party will cover its part of 
the expenses by selling stock to home and foreign investors. 
(Bucharest ROMPRES in English 1503 GMT 8 Mar 94 AU) 

   DROP OF INFLATION VIEWED AS POSITIVE SIGN:  Commenting on the 
January 1994 cut on inflation, the daily COTIDIANUL regards it as an 
optimistic sign but only in the short term, for control over 
inflationist pressure should be exercised by speeding up the process 
of privatization and restructuring.  According to the head of the 
IMF mission, Maxwell Watson, one success in the process of reform is 
that scored over "the monster of inflation," the daily writes.  For 
the monster had to return to its den.  Its force has subsided from 
14 percent in November 1993 to five percent in January 1994.  Is it 
good, or bad?  This is the question raised by the people, by 
economic agents and even by our master, the state. 

   In 1993, "the monster" of inflation was the worst thing of all. 
Its "spewed fire" devastated the population's savings, profits (for 
those who managed to make them), incomes and banking capital, 
investment sources, etc.  But worst of all was that inflation 
weakened the social cohesion of the nation.  Inflation in Romania 
had erupted after the elimination of subsidies to several basic 
goods, the introduction of the value added tax and liberalization of 
the mark-up.  The most recent "corrections" were made to the prices 
for pork and chicken meat, after "pressures" put by farm units 
threatened with bankruptcy.  The persisting effects of inflation 
over 1991-1993 have steadily lowered and eroded confidence in the 
national currency, the daily adds.  Through the measures taken by 
banks to attract money deposits promoting interests between 100 and 
130 percent and under the circumstances of reduced inflation, one 
can hope in the revival of the investment process. 

   In conclusion, the daily COTIDIANUL remarks:  "The positive signs 
regarding inflation are optimistic only in the short term, for the 
phenomenon must be correlated with price evolutions, the offer, the 
exchange rate, with the ratio between circulating assets and fixed 
assets (re-capitalization).  And all these can be controlled only by 
speeding up the process of privatization and restructuring.  So, it 
is useless for the National Bank to initiate and announce new anti- 
inflation programs, if they do not match the real economy." 
(Bucharest ROMPRES in English 0852 GMT 9 Mar 94 AU) 

   INTERNATIONAL TRADE FAIRS, SHOWS ORGANIZED BY ROMEXPO:  "The year 
1993 was a special year.  The success of the 19th Bucharest 
International Fair TIB confirmed our company's seriousness and 
maturity," said George Cojocaru, director-general of the ROMEXPO to 
the government daily VOCEA ROMANIEI.  "This is proved also by our 
admission with full rights to the Union des Foires Internationales 
based in Paris, along with 159 other members, to the most 
prestigious organizers of fairs and shows of 63 countries". 
ROMEXPO's name, he added, is not associated only with the TIB or the 
TIBCO (the International Consumer Goods Fair).  "We also pay 
attention to the diversification of the themes of specialized shows. 
ROMEXPO, under the aegis of its major stockholder -- the Chamber of 
Commerce and Industry of Romania -- facilitated the organization of 
the official participation of 369 Romanian companies in 26 
international events, including those in London, Paris, Hanover, 
Leipzig, Tokyo, Cairo, Buenos Aires, general fairs, and also in 
technical or consumer goods fairs. 

   Cojocaru said that apart from the international fair of 
computers, communication and office technique IFABO, held at the 
beginning of March in Bucharest, this month will see also the 
organization of the "Construct Expo," an international show of 
building and construction technologies.  An international show of 
sports gear "Sports" will be held next June.  There will be another 
12 international fairs and shows as well, including:  BITME, the 
textile machinery show; the group of medical shows -- Rommedica, 
Rompharma, Romcontrola, Romdent; a Metallurgical Technology show -- 
EXPOMET; a fair of furniture, glassware, ceramics -- BIFE; a show of 
hotel and restaurant furniture -- Romhotel, a car salon, Bims, a 
computing technique show Cerf, organized by the American Comtec 
Company and the Computerland Company of Romania.  (Bucharest ROMPRES 
in English  0902 GMT 9 Mar 94 AU) 

   SLOVAKIA 

   JANUARY PRODUCTION RESULTS:  The volume of industrial production 
in January 1994 was 1.2 percent lower than in December 1993 but 4.5 
percent higher than in January 1993, the Slovak Statistical Office 
(SSU) announced.  According to SSU Chairman Rudolf Krc, this is the 
first increase in industrial production, compared with the same 
month the year before, since the start of economic reform.  The 
increase was achieved due to an increase in labor productivity, 
which is another positive factor, Krc said.  The volume of 
construction work, on the other hand, was 1.2 percent lower than in 
January 1993.  (Bratislava SMENA in Slovak 15 Mar 94 pp 1,2; 
Bratislava REPUBLIKA in Slovak 15 Mar 94 p 2 AU) 

   NUMBER, STRUCTURE OF BUSINESSES:  A total of 28,972 "economic 
entities" entered in the company register operated in Slovakia at 
the end of January 1994, 26,156 of which belonged to the private 
sector (including cooperatives, joint ventures, and foreign-owned 
firms) and 1,936 were in "public ownership."  Compared with December 
1993, the number of private firms increased by 442, while the number 
of firms in public ownership declined by 452.  The Slovak 
Statistical Office registered 283,300 private entrepreneurs at the 
end of January; their number remained virtually unchanged compared 
with December 1993.  (Bratislava REPUBLIKA in Slovak 15 Mar 94 p 2 
AU) 

   LIVESTOCK NUMBERS:  Livestock numbers in Slovakia continue to 
decline as a result of the restrictive policy of the last few years. 
A total of 976,400 heads of cattle, 2,159,400 pigs, and 425,700 
sheep are being bred in Slovakia at present.  (Bratislava REPUBLIKA 
in Slovak 15 Mar 94 p 2 AU) 

   ROLLER BEARING PLANT 'IN DEATH THROES':  The ZVL (Roller Bearing 
Plant) Kysucke Nove Mesto a.s., which is "in death throes," has 
changed hands.  As of 1 March 1994, the company has been transferred 
to the administration of the ZVL-KLF AS, the only firm that has met 
the conditions of a public tender organized by ZVL's creditor banks. 
This largest factory in the Kysuce area now employs only 2,100 of 
its original work force of over 6,000; another 746 employees are to 
be laid off as of 1 May.  The company's credit burden exceeds the 
sum of 2.3 billion Slovak korunas (Sk).  (Bratislava SLOVENSKY 
DENNIK in Slovak 15 Mar 94 p 2; Bratislava HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in 
Slovak 15 Mar 94 p 2 AU) 

   DEFICIT IN TRADE WITH CZECH REPUBLIC DECLINES:  According to 
Martin Svehla, spokesman for the Czech National Bank, the Slovak 
deficit on the clearing account that records the balance of payments 
between the Czech and Slovak Republics is declining.  This is due to 
a reduction in payments from Slovakia to the Czech Republic.  The 
volume of payments from the Czech Republic to Slovakia, on the other 
hand, remains roughly at the previous level, Svehla told the 
economic daily HOSPODARSKE NOVINY.  The deficit on the "old 
account," which records payments for transactions carried out prior 
to the currency split of 8 February 1993, amounts to less than 0.5 
billion Czech korunas (Kc), while the deficit on the "new account," 
for transactions carried out after 8 February 1993, has dropped to 
approximately 96 million European Currency Units (ECUs), which is 
over Kc3 billion.  Altogether, the Slovak deficit amounts to 
approximately Kc3.6 billion.  (Bratislava HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in 
Slovak 15 Mar 94 pp 1, 2 AU) 

   MINERS ON FORCED LEAVE:  The 2,500 employees of the Cigel Mine 
near Prievidza will each be compelled to take 10 days of annual 
leave in March and April.  This was decided by the company's 
management, following an agreement with the trade union 
organization, in view of the low volume of deliveries to the Novaky 
power station and smaller customers.  The mine has extracted 160,000 
tons of coal since the beginning of the year, of which 34,000 tons 
have had to be placed on an "emergency dump" where there is a danger 
of oxidation and subsequent self-ignition.  New extraction has 
therefore had to be scaled down.  (Bratislava HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in 
Slovak 17 Mar 94 p 2 AU)  The 1,500 employees of the Dolina Mine in 
Velky Krtis had to take "extraordinary leave" in the second week of 
March because the capacity of the dumps has been exceeded.  The main 
customer, the Novaky power station, will purchase in the first three 
months of this year 42,000 fewer tons of coal from the Velky Krtis 
mine than it had ordered.  Miners' organizations blame the situation 
on the import of cheaper Czech, Polish, and Ukrainian coal and 
demand "measures to protect the domestic market." (Bratislava 
NARODNA OBRODA in Slovak 18 Mar 94 p 22 AU) 

   CONTRACT ON APARTMENTS FOR RUSSIA:  A contract for the 
construction of over 1,000 apartments in Voronezh in the Russian 
Federation has been signed by a consortium of Banska Bystrica 
building companies, including Stavex and the Banska Bystrica Civil 
Engineering Works.  The project, which is worth Sk1.1 billion, is 
financed by the German Government.  The construction of the 
apartments, which are intended for Russian soldiers returning from 
Germany, will take 13 months and more than 1,000 builders from 
Slovakia will participate in the project.  While the main building 
materials will come from local sources, special materials and steel 
will have to be transported to Voronezh by truck, of which there 
will be about 1,200.  (Bratislava HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Slovak 17 
Mar 94 p 2 AU) 

   DATA ON DEPOSITS, CREDITS:  According to the latest Slovak 
National Bank (NBS) data on monetary development in the Slovak 
Republic, koruna deposits of both businesses and the population 
reached Sk208.3 billion by the end of 1993.  Foreign currency 
deposits amounted to the equivalent of Sk29.5 billion at the end of 
the year.  By the end of last year, banks had provided Sk264.7 
billion in credit to businesses and households, of which Sk260.6 
billion were koruna credits.  (Bratislava HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in 
Slovak 21 Mar 94 p 2 AU) 

   'POSITIVE TURNABOUT' IN PAYMENTS WITH CZECH REPUBLIC:  A 
"positive turnabout" in the development of payments between the 
Slovak Republic and the Czech Republic occurred in March, according 
to Ivan Paska, head of the Slovak National Bank Press Department. 
The Slovak Republic's deficit on the clearing account, which stood 
at over 136 million clearing ECU on 1 March, dropped to under 109 
million clearing ECU (5.031 billion Slovak korunas) by 7 March. 
This falls 21 million clearing ECU short of the "marginal credit" of 
130 million ECU laid down in the agreement on payments between the 
two republics.  Sums exceeding the "marginal credit" must be 
defrayed in hard currency.  (Bratislava REPUBLIKA in Slovak 9 Mar 94 
p 3 AU) 

   AUSTRIAN FIRM IN JOINT VENTURE:  One of the latest activities of 
the Slovak National Agency for Foreign Investments and Development 
(SNAZIR) is the establishment of a joint venture between the 
Austrian firm Roehring Neudorf and Plasmet Vrable.  The joint 
venture, whose production program consists of plastics components, 
will create approximately 50 jobs by the end of 1994.  In the 
future, the number of employees should double.  The Austrian partner 
pledged to invest 45.5 million Slovak korunas (Sk) in the venture, 
SNAZIR Director General Jozef Cernak announced.  (Bratislava 
HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Slovak 10 Mar 94 p 2 AU) 

   STATE OF TELECOMMUNICATIONS:  Although Slovak Telecommunications 
put into operation the record number of 72,000 telephones in 1993 
(in the past, this used to be the volume realized in an entire five- 
year planning period), the number of pending applications for a 
telephone further increased last year.  The number of telephones in 
Slovakia increased from 820,882 at the end of 1992 to 892,766 at the 
end of 1993, which represents an 8.8 percent increase.  Of the 
892,766 telephones installed, 662,179 are in households.  In the 
same year, the number of pending applications for a telephone 
increased from 159,042 to 166,498 -- that is, by 4.7 percent.  Only 
in the capital of Bratislava, which is "slowly reaching a decent 
European average" in the number of telephones per 100 households, 
did the number of pending applications drop:  from 22,500 at the end 
of 1992 to 17,600 at the end of 1993.  Despite the continuing 
expansion of the digital network (a new modern digital telephone 
exchange has just been opened in Zilina), the complete transition to 
digital technology can be expected only after the year 2000. 
(Bratislava HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Slovak 9 Mar 94 pp 1, 2; 
Bratislava HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Slovak 11 Mar 94 p 2 AU) 

   TELECOMMUNICATIONS EQUIPMENT FOR TURKMENISTAN:  In Stropkov "this 
week," representatives of Tesla Stropkov AS and Turkmenistan 
Communications signed a contract worth $995,000 for the supply of 
telecommunications equipment to Turkmenistan.  During the talks, 
they also prepared documentation for the establishment of a joint 
venture to be based in Askhabad.  (Bratislava HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in 
Slovak 11 Mar 94 p 2; Bratislava SME in Slovak 12 Mar 94 p 3 AU) 

   HOECHST-BIOTIKA DIVERSIFIES PRODUCTION:  New production equipment 
worth more than 6.3 million German marks was put into operation in 
the Hoechst-Biotika Ltd. company in Martin, central Slovakia, on 10 
March, in the presence of Heike Zenker, FRG ambassador to Slovakia. 
Hoechst-Biotika is a joint venture formed by the Hoechst AG from 
Frankfurt am Main, Germany, and Biotika Slovenska Lupca in 1992. 
The German partner has a 52 percent stake in the venture.  The joint 
venture, which employs approximately 300 people in its Martin plant, 
has been producing only drugs in the form of ampules thus far. 
Following the installation of the new equipment, it will start 
producing pills, lotions, and ointments as well.  (Bratislava 
HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Slovak 11 Mar 94 p 2; Bratislava PRAVDA in 
Slovak 11 Mar 94 p 1 AU) 

   Biotika Slovenska Lupca, the parent company, was one of the most 
profitable Slovak companies in 1993.  It achieved a profit of Sk163 
million on a turnover of Sk1.2 billion.  It employs 2,900 people, 
including subsidiaries, whose average monthly wages of Sk7,100 are 
well above the Slovak average.  The company exports 60 percent of 
its output to 15 countries and demand for its products greatly 
exceeds supply.  The main export commodities are penicillin and 
chlortetracycline.  The share price of Biotika Slovenska Lupca went 
up from Sk600 in the second half of 1993 to about Sk3,000 at 
present.  More than 40 percent of its stock remains, however, in the 
possession of the National Property Fund of the Slovak Republic. 
(Bratislava SMENA in Slovak 14 Mar 94 p 7; Bratislava HOSPODARSKE 
NOVINY in Slovak 14 Mar 94 p 2 AU) 

   PRINCIPLES FOR SALE OF CITY-OWNED APARTMENTS:  At its meeting on 
11 March, the City Council in Kosice, Slovakia's second largest 
city, approved principles for the sale of community-owned apartments 
to tenants.  The maximum price of apartments, and the plots 
belonging to them, will be Sk200 per square meter.  The tenants' 
motivation should be stimulated by the decision to reduce the price 
50 percent if all tenants of an apartment bloc decide to purchase 
their apartments.  A price reduction of 25 percent will be granted 
if more than 50 percent of all tenants decide to purchase their 
apartment.  (Bratislava NARODNA OBRODA in Slovak 14 Mar 94 p 12 AU) 

   AUTOMOBILE COMPANY CHANGES NAME:  The general meeting of 
shareholders of the VAB automobile company, based at Banovce nad 
Bebravou, decided to change the company's name to Tatra Sipox AS. 
Besides manufacturing small utility vehicles equipped with 
Lombardini LDW 903 engines, the company produces and sells axles, 
winches, flat beds and boxes, and other components for trucks and 
other vehicles.  (Bratislava SMENA in Slovak 12 Mar 94 p 1 AU) 

   GENERAL OVERHAUL OF NUCLEAR PLANT UNIT:  The first unit of the V- 
1 nuclear power plant at Jaslovske Bohunice was taken out of 
operation on 12 March due to a general overhaul.  In the course of 
the general overhaul, which will last until 24 April, planned 
inspections and revisions of the unit's equipment will be carried 
out and "some other work designed to make the power plant 
seismically more resistant will be completed."  (Bratislava SMENA in 
Slovak 14 Mar 94 p 5 AU) 

   FOREIGN INVESTMENT DOWN IN 1993:  Foreign investment in the 
Slovak Republic amounted to $135 million in 1993, compared with $151 
million in 1992, prior to Slovakia's independence.  Since the 
political changes of 1989, foreigners have invested a total of $366 
million in Slovakia.  (Bratislava HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Slovak 14 
Mar 94 p 1 AU) 

   DUBNICA FIRM TO DELIVER DEMOLITION HAMMERS TO MOSCOW:  The Heavy 
Engineering Plants in Dubnica nad Vahom will deliver six hydraulic 
demolition hammers to Russia in March.  They will be used to remove 
the remains of the buildings destroyed during the coup attempt last 
October.  The Dubnica engineers have also signed a contract to 
supply 20 of these hammers to Ukraine.  Most interest in these 
hammers comes from the Czech Republic.  Almost 90 percent of the 
hammers manufactured in Dubnica are exported there.  (Bratislava 
HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Slovak 7 Mar 94 p 1 AU) 

   IMPORTS INCREASED 15.4 PERCENT IN 1993:  The Slovak Republic 
exported goods worth 167.2 billion korunas (Sk) in 1993.  The 
largest amount, 41.9 percent, was exported to the Czech Republic. 
This was followed by Germany with 15.3 percent, Austria with 5.0 
percent, and Russia with 4.7 percent.  Overall exports declined by 
11.2 percent.  On the other hand, Slovak imports increased by 15.4 
percent to Sk193.9 billion.  Most imports came from the Czech 
Republic (35.5 percent), Russia (19.6 percent), Germany (11.7 
percent), and Austria (6.4 percent).  The balance of trade was in 
the red by Sk26.7 billion.  However, trade with the Czech Republic 
was in the black by Sk1.3 billion.  Inflation rose to 23.2 percent 
and the average monthly wage was Sk5,372.  (Bratislava HOSPODARSKE 
NOVINY BURZOVE NOVINY in Slovak 7 Mar 94 p 1 AU) 

   LACK OF FUNDS FORCES PLANT TO FURLOUGH WORKERS:  A lack of funds 
to purchase material and spare parts means that almost 2,000 
employees of the Vrutky Railroad Repair and Engineering Plants had 
to take a week's leave beginning on 7 March.  Officials from the 
Slovak Republic Railroads, which owes the plants more than Sk881 
million, have promised to pay the debt within a week.  (Bratislava 
SME in Slovak 8 Mar 94 p 3 AU) 
   SMALL, MEDIUM-SIZED PRIVATE ENTERPRISE INCREASING:  More than 
26,000 private businesses were registered in the republic at the end 
of January.  They include both domestic and foreign companies. 
Their number has increased by 440, that is, by 1.7 percent, since 
December 1993.  Only a 0.1 percent increase in the number of 
business licenses issued has been recorded.  At the end of January, 
283,300 had been issued in the republic.  The influence of small and 
medium-sized enterprise on overall output is increasing.  It was 8.0 
percent in industry and 9.8 percent in construction.  However, it 
accounted for almost 70 percent of the overall volume of retail 
sales.  (Bratislava SME in Slovak 8 Mar 94 p 14 AU); 

   FOREIGN CURRENCY RESERVES INCREASING GRADUALLY:  According to 
Slovak National Bank (NBS) Governor Vladimir Masar, the foreign 
currency reserves are increasing gradually, despite payments. 
Overall foreign currency reserves in Slovakia amount to $1.836 
billion.  The reserves in the NBS, without gold, amount to $380 
million.  (Bratislava SLOVENSKY DENNIK in Slovak 8 Mar 94 p 2 AU) 

   TRADE WITH GERMANY DECLINED 1.1 PERCENT IN 1993:  Slovakia's 
imports from Germany last year amounted to Sk22.3 billion, which was 
11.6 percent of the republic's overall imports.  The republic's 
exports to Germany amounted to Sk25.4 billion, which was 15.2 
percent of overall exports.  However, compared with 1992, the volume 
of mutual trade was 1.1 percent lower.  German capital amounting to 
Sk2.15 billion has been invested in 685 Slovak firms.  (Bratislava 
NARODNA OBRODA in Slovak 8 Mar 94 p 7 AU) 

   CONSUMER PRICES INCREASE IN JANUARY:  The consumer prices of 
goods and services in January rose by an average of 1.4 percent 
compared with December 1993.  The cost of foodstuffs increased by 
1.2 percent; egg prices increased most (by 14.9 percent), followed 
by fats (3.0 percent) and milk products (2.0 percent).  Prices for 
non-foodstuffs increased by an average 1.3 percent in the majority 
of monitored categories.  The cost of cultural goods rose by 8.5 
percent due to the higher prices for newspapers and magazines.  The 
cost of services rose by 1.7 percent.  (Bratislava SMENA in Slovak 8 
Mar 94 p 4 AU) 

ELAG/12 April/ECONF/East Europe Division/CL 12/1701Z APR 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-30 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000022194001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   14 April 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-13APR94-JAPAN-U.S. 
<H3> <TI>      Japanese Consumers Get Little Savings from Imported Rice </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Japanese Consumers Get Little Savings from Imported Rice </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY 
                              Recent Japanese media reporting has suggested that the Japanese 
Government and agricultural wholesalers have passed to Japanese 
consumers relatively little, if any, of the savings from the 
foreign rice Tokyo has been importing to make up for the current 
domestic rice shortage.  If this pattern continues, Japanese 
consumers will gain little advantage from Tokyo's decision to 
partially open its rice market as part of the Uruguay Round of 
International Trade talks. 
                        END SUMMARY 

   Despite the Japanese government's importation of an estimated 
2.29 million tons of foreign rice, rice prices in Japan have 
reportedly continued to rise sharply from their already high 
levels.  According to a 25 March Kyodo report, a Japanese 
government report released at the end of March revealed that 
consumer prices of rice in Tokyo rose 7.4 percent in March over 
those in February--reportedly the sharpest monthly increase in 17 
years.  The government report also indicated that the consumer 
price of rice in March rose 19.7 percent over prices a year 
earlier.  According to a 12 April Kyodo report, the Ministry of 
Agriculture, Forestry, and Fisheries' (MAFF) 1993 White Paper on 
Agriculture indicated that even before these increases, rice 
prices in Japan in 1993 were approximately 8 times higher than 
those in the United States. 
   While panic buying of domestic rice in response to rumors of an 
impending rice shortage accounted for some of this increase, the 
higher prices may also stem from a failure by the MAFF to pass 
significant savings from imports on to wholesalers and consumers. 
According to a 13 April Kyodo report, the Ministry has made a 
profit of 211.7 billion yen (slightly over $2 billion) on the 
2.29 million tons of rice it has imported so far.  Kyodo quoted 
unnamed Ministry sources as saying that this worked out to an 
average profit of about 92,000 yen (approximately $900) per ton 
on sales of rice to wholesalers, who presumably marked their 
prices up still further before selling it to consumers. 
   Another factor contributing to the high prices may be bidrigging 
on government sales of imported rice.  According to the 1 April 
Asahi Shimbun, the Director General of MAFF's Food Agency sends 
written instructions every 6 months to the 28 trading companies 
involved in grain purchases telling them, before bidding takes 
place, the share each company will receive in upcoming grain 
auctions.  Asahi Shimbun reported that, according to sources 
close to the trading companies, the companies then rig their 
bidding prices, deciding which company will bid the lowest price 
on the basis of the percentages determined by the Food Agency. 
Although Asahi Shimbun said nothing about the effect of this 
practice on rice prices, judging from the profits MAFF has 
reportedly been making on the sale of imported rice, the 
bidrigging probably limits competition and helps to keep the 
prices that wholesalers pay to the Ministry relatively high. 
   (AUTHOR:  BOUNDS.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
ASIA DIVISION ANALYSIS TEAM, (7O3)-733-6534.) 
EAG/HEBBEL/ta 13/1857z apr 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-31 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000022294001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   14 April 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-13APR94-CHINA-IRAN 
<H3> <TI>      PRC Foreign Minister's Visit Reflects Enhanced Ties with Iran </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       PRC Foreign Minister's Visit Reflects Enhanced Ties with Iran </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
SUMMARY 

                               Chinese Vice Premier and Foreign Minister Qian Qichen's early 
March visit to Iran as part of a five-nation tour has served to 
underscore Beijing's expanding bilateral ties with Tehran. 
Although Qian hinted at Beijing's interest in supporting regional 
economic cooperation efforts, he adopted a neutral stance on 
Iran's role in this regard and appeared wary of Iran's desire to 
lead efforts to resolve the political crisis in Afghanistan. 

                          END SUMMARY 

   As the latest high-level Chinese visitor to come to Iran (See 
Note 1), Qian used his 4-6 March official goodwill visit to 
reaffirm the value Beijing attaches to its expanding relationship 
with Tehran.  Meeting with his host, Foreign Minister 'Ali Akbar 
Velayati on 5 March, Qian reiterated Beijing's intention to 
further deepen bilateral ties, noting that the Chinese Government 
"pays great attention" to developing "friendly and cooperative" 
relations with Iran (Xinhua, 5 March).  Although no specific 
agreements were reported signed during the visit, Xinhua's 
account of the meeting reported that the two foreign ministers 
said that China and Iran have agreed to "further enhance" their 
cooperative relations in "various fields including politics, 
economics, and trade." 

   (Note 1)  Qian's visit was the latest in a series of high-level 
exchanges between China and Iran in recent years--including 
visits to Iran by PRC Premier Li Peng and then-President Yang 
Shangkun in 1991, then-Minister of Defense Qin Jiwei in 1992, and 
Politburo member and Vice Premier Li Lanqing last summer; and 
trips to China by Iranian Foreign Minister Velayati and President 
Rafsanjani in 1992. 

   Qian's visit comes on the heels of a significant expansion of 
economic ties between the two countries promoted by Vice Premier 
Li Lanqing's visit to Iran last July.  Li signed a memorandum of 
understanding to provide Iran with a $100 million loan for 
reconstruction efforts, while Iran agreed to help the PRC "reform 
its oil refineries" to allow China to import more crude oil from 
Iran (Xinhua, 6 July 1993).  Underscoring progress in developing 
economic ties, Xinhua accounts during Qian's visit noted that PRC 
exports to Iran had grown from textiles and light industrial 
products to "heavy machinery" and "high technology" and that in 
1993 trade volume between China and Iran rose to $712 million, a 
63.2 percent increase over the previous year (4,6 March). 

   Caution on Nuclear Cooperation 

   Apparently reflecting Beijing's sensitivity to recent Western 
news reports about possible Chinese nuclear exports to Iran, PRC 
media departed from recent practice and reported no remarks by 
Qian on China's nuclear cooperation with Iran.  By contrast, 
during Li Lanqing's visit to Iran last July, PRC media quoted him 
as "reiterating" Beijing's standard claim that nuclear projects 
with Iran are "only" for the "peaceful use of nuclear energy" 
(Xinhua, 6 July 1993).  Beijing had announced its decision to 
provide nuclear power plants to Iran during President 
Rafsanjani's September 1992 visit to China (Xinhua, 10 September 
1992) and since then Chinese media have claimed that the plants 
will be the largest that the PRC has built abroad (Xinhua, 22 
February 1993; Beijing radio, 6 June 1993).  On 19 January, the 
Hong Kong-based PRC-affiliated wire service Zhongguo Tongxun She 
reported that the president of the China National Nuclear 
Corporation "disclosed" that China expected to begin work this 
year on the installation of two 300,000 kilowatt nuclear power 
generating units it had agreed to provide Iran. 

   Hints at Regional Economic Cooperation 

   Although Qian expressed Beijing's support for greater regional 
economic interaction in general terms, he stopped short of 
satisfying Iran's apparent efforts to elicit a public endorsement 
of the Iranian-supported Economic Cooperation Organization (ECO), 
an attempt to create a regional economic alliance similar to the 
European common market.  In contrast to Iranian media reports 
before and during the visit that attributed to Qian statements of 
explicit support for the ECO (Tehran Hamshahri, 22 February; 
Tehran Abrar, 1 March; Salam, 5 March), Xinhua quoted Qian, at a 
press conference on 6 March, as observing only that "all" 
countries he had visited during his tour are trying to "improve 
their economic situation" and are "ready for regional 
cooperation" (6 March). 

   China's Concern over Afghanistan 

   PRC media reporting on the visit also suggested that Beijing and 
Tehran do not see eye to eye on the question of resolving the 
Afghan crisis.  Suggesting that Beijing is wary of Iranian 
efforts to impose a settlement on its terms, Qian failed to 
endorse Velayati's proposal, made at their meeting on 5 March, 
that Afghanistan's "neighboring countries" should play a greater 
role in bringing an end to the civil war there because of the 
"failure" of U.N. mediation efforts (Xinhua, 5 March).  Instead, 
Qian stated only that Beijing was "deeply concerned" about the 
Afghan situation and repeated China's standard position on such 
regional disputes, calling on "all factions" to resolve the 
confict peacefully.  By contrast, in Qian's 22 February meeting 
with Pakistan Foreign Minister Sardar Asif Ahmad Ali in Islamabad 
at the beginning of his tour, Qian expressed his "appreciation" 
for Pakistan's efforts to "settle differences" among the various 
Afghan factions and "restore peace and stability" there (Xinhua, 
22 February). 

   Implications 
   PRC media commentary on Qian's visit underscores Beijing's 
continuing efforts to develop closer bilateral ties with Iran, 
particulary in economic and trade relations.  At the same time, 
although Beijing supports more regional cooperation in principle, 
it appears concerned about greater Iranian involvement in the 
countries along China's borders. 

(AUTHOR:  SIMON.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
CHINA ANALYSIS TEAM, (703) 733-6097.) 
EAG/HEBBEL/CJR 14/0040Z APR 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-32 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000022394001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   15 April 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-I4Apr94-Russia-US 
<H3> <TI>      Moscow Condemns NATO Gorazde Strike, Lack of Consultation </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Moscow Condemns NATO Gorazde Strike, Lack of Consultation </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
SUMMARY 
                               Stressing their pique at NATO's failure to consult with Moscow in 
advance of airstrikes against Bosnian Serb positions, Russian 
President Boris Yeltsin, government officials, and legislators 
from  across the political spectrum have condemned the raids as 
ill-advised and likely to escalate the bloodshed in Bosnia. Media 
commentary echoed these sentiments and warned that the NATO 
actions could adversely affect Russian internal politics and 
U.S.-Russian relations. 
                        END SUMMARY 
   Yeltsin was strongly critical of NATO air strikes on Bosnian Serb 
positions around Gorazde and accused NATO and the United States, 
in particular, of failing to consult in advance with Russia. 
Yeltsin said in an 11 April press interview that "I have insisted 
and I insist now" that "questions such as bombing strikes against 
Serbian positions must not be decided" without prior U.S.-Russian 
consultations.  He told reporters that during a telephone 
conversation with U.S. President Bill Clinton early that morning 
he had made the same point about consultations "again and again." 
Insisting that any such action should be taken only "in 
accordance with UN decisions," Yeltsin complained that the 
telephone call had not clarified whether the UN Secretary General 
had given the "go-ahead" for the strikes and declared that 
Russia, "without a doubt," wanted the Security Council to discuss 
the issue (Ostankino TV, 11 April, Rossiyskaya Gazeta, 12 April). 
Stressing Russia's preference for continued negotiations, Yeltsin 
told reporters in Madrid on 12 April that a settlement in Bosnia 
"must come through political negotiations and not through force" 
which could lead to "everlasting war" and that the blame for such 
an outcome would "rest with those who took the decision" on the 
strikes.  At the same time he noted that the shooting in Gorazde 
had stopped and expressed the hope that the bombing "will not, 
after all, lead to greater confrontation and greater bloodshed." 
Continuing to display annoyance at what he termed "discrimination 
against Russia," however, Yeltsin emphasized that consultations 
would be held with the UN Secretary General and President Clinton 
"so that this does not happen again" (Moscow TV, ITAR-TASS, 12 
April). 
   Other Government Reaction 
   Other Government officials displayed similar irritation at the 
lack of consultation and expressed fears that the air strikes 
would jeopardize the peace negotiations and lead to a wider 
conflict.  Notably some officials criticized the Serbs as well as 
the Bosnian Muslims: 
   -- Foreign Minister Andrey Kozyrev called the air strikes "a big 
mistake and a great risk."  He told reporters that Russia was 
"worried" that the air strike decision "was made in a hurry" 
without considering "possible consequences," noting that this was 
why consultations were needed.  Warning like Yeltsin that the air 
strikes could result in an "escalation of the conflict instead of 
its suppression," he said he had "expressed his profound concern" 
to U.S. Secretary of State Warren Christopher that the world 
could be "engulfed in an exchange of blows" and had urged the 
West "to display the utmost restraint."  Pointing to diplomatic 
efforts with the Serbs made by special envoy Vitaliy Churkin, 
Kozyrev called the air strikes "especially annoying" because by 2 
April he claimed there were "already signs of a political 
settlement" (ITAR-TASS, 11 April). 
   -- Churkin criticized the UN and NATO for failing to consult with 
Russia about their actions.  Warning that UN and NATO 
"interference" in the conflict was leading to a "greater 
confrontation," he said that he was trying to work with the 
Bosnia Serbs "to bring together the fragments of a Bosnian peace 
settlement."  Churkin accused the Muslims of being the first to 
"initiate combat activities in Gorazde" despite the fact that it 
was a UN "safety zone," but also faulted the Bosnian Serbs for 
misleading him as to their intentions (ITAR-TASS, 11 April). 
   -- Ministry press spokesman Grigoriy Karasin stressed that Russia 
"will never reconcile itself to the role of a so-called junior 
partner, who is informed after the event about such decisions." 
He said Russia was "opposed to the practice of being consulted 
only to obtain a yes" (Moscow radio, 12 April). 
   -- Interfax (11 April) cited an unnamed "high-ranking diplomat" 
as saying that Moscow's reaction to the bombardment of Serb 
positions "will be tough" if it discovered that the strikes could 
have been "avoided."  He complained that Russia was not a "banana 
republic" and as a permanent member of the UN Security Council 
would not accept being informed about decisions to use force in 
Yugoslavia as a "fait accompli."  He also claimed that the 
Muslims had "provoked" the Serbs' military actions in Gorazde and 
that attacks on the Serbs would only "make them unwilling to 
negotiate." 
   An 11 April Russian Foreign Ministry statement complained that 
Moscow had been informed of the air strikes only "after the 
event" and said Russia continued to await "full information" 
about what has happened from the UN leadership.  The statement 
called for the implementation of "urgent measures" around Gorazde 
including the deployment of UN forces, the withdrawal of Serbs 
from their present positions, and the demilitarization of the 
area, including the disarmament of Muslim forces (ITAR-TASS, 11 
April). 
   Legislature Condemns the Attack 
   Predictably, the Russian legislature, many of whose members have 
for months been attacking the government for cooperating with the 
West on Bosnia and for giving insufficient support to the Serbs, 
opposed the NATO air strikes.  Leaders from across the political 
spectrum voiced disapproval: 
   -- Yeltsin supporter and Federation Council chairman Vladimir 
Shumeyko called the strikes "unjustified at this point" and 
criticized the United States for openly showing support for one 
side while "punishing" the other side (ITAR-TASS, 11 April). 
   -- Duma Speaker and Agrarian Party member Ivan Rybkin issued a 
statement on behalf of the Duma demanding "an immediate end" to 
NATO's "unilateral, unsanctioned use of force," complaining that 
NATO has "easily ignored not only Russia's view," but also the 
"achieved agreements," and that its action "threatens to ruin" 
prospects for a peaceful political settlement (ITAR-TASS, 12 
April). 
   -- Sergey Shakhray, co-chairman of the Party of Russian Unity and 
Accord (PRES) charged that conducting the air strikes without 
consulting Russia was a "slap in the face" to Yeltsin and would 
have an adverse effect within Russia, creating, indirectly, a 
"telling strike against Russian reforms" and benefitting "the 
national patriots" (Moscow radio, 12 April; Nezavisimaya Gazeta, 
13 April). 
   -- Former Ambassador to the United States Vladimir Lukin, a 
member of the moderately reformist Yavlinskiy bloc and chairman 
of the Duma's international affairs committee expressed 
"disappointment" at the "very unfortunate, badly timed" strikes 
which had occurred just when Russian diplomatic efforts were 
bringing results.  He faulted the lack of "preliminary 
consultations" with Russia and called for convening the UN 
Security Council to determine if the attacks were in line with UN 
resolutions.  While admitting that some Serb commanders "may have 
been at fault," he warned that the air strikes will "unavoidably 
complicate" the situation (ITAR-TASS, 12 April). 
   -- The Liberal Democratic Party (LDP), whose leader Vladimir 
Zhirinovskiy had called for the bombing of NATO bases in Italy in 
retaliation, denounced the air strikes, warning of the 
possibility of unleashing world war in the Balkans and stating 
that the "Russian people support their Serb brothers" (ITAR-TASS, 
Interfax, 11 April). 
   Media Reaction 
   The Russian media across the political spectrum expressed regret 
at the air strikes, with most commentary expressing anger that 
Moscow was not consulted in advance, (See box) and some warning 
that NATO's actions were becoming a factor in Russia's domestic 
political struggle: 
   -- The pro-Yeltsin newspaper Izvestiya tried to present a 
balanced view, expressing strong doubts about Serbian actions, 
but also warning that NATO's response would have unfavorable 
consequences for Russia.  A front-page 12 April report filed from 
Belgrade maintained that the NATO attack "was to be expected." 
Saying that Russia had "repeatedly warned" the Bosnian Serbs, who 
had been "attacking" Gorazde for "the past two weeks," of the 
"danger of the situation," the article charged that the Serbs had 
assured Russia that there would be no "exacerbation of the 
situation," but "immediately broke their word."  Another article 
the same day trenchantly observed that Belgrade only began 
extolling "Slav unity" after sanctions against Serbia were 
introduced and claimed that Serb diplomacy was mainly directed at 
pitting Russia against the West.  A 13 April Maksim Yusin article 
titled "NATO Resolve and Serb Stubbornness Put Russian Diplomacy 
in Difficult Position," stressed that events are "taking a most 
undesirable turn for Moscow."  Claiming that Russia had been 
"winning one diplomatic victory after another" when the stress 
was on negotiations, Yusin claimed that the Kremlin's ability to 
influence the situation was "very limited" once NATO-Serb 
hostilities began.  Yusin warned that Russia's relations with the 
West "would be put to a new test" if NATO carried out more 
military operations, but he nonetheless concluded that Yeltsin 
"attaches too much importance" to ties to the United States and 
Western Europe to "put them at risk over the Serbs' 
inflexibility." 
   -- A 13 April article in the independent reformist newspaper 
Nezavisimaya Gazeta condemned what it saw as the West's one-sided 
approach favoring the Bosnian Muslims and complained that the 
West is "apparently little concerned about the internal political 
complications" from such actions both for the Bosnian Serbs and 
in Russia. 
   -- A 13 April article in the mass-circulation newspaper 
Komsomolskaya Pravda titled "NATO'S Order: Kill the Serbs," 
faulted the U.S foreign policy for its "insolence" in 
demonstrating "unthinking support" and "clear favoritism" toward 
the Muslims, claiming that the U.S. "inability to compromise" had 
placed it "on a par' with the Bosnian Serbs.  The article 
suggested that the air strikes were a reaction to Russia's 
"surprisingly flexible and fresh" diplomatic approaches, which 
had caught Washington "unawares" and charged that Washington, by 
"constantly" declaring "Russia must not abandon us," has "placed 
Russia in a difficult position." 
   -- The pro-communist newspaper Pravda predictably adopted a 
shrill tone in a report titled "25 Minutes of War.  World War 
III?"  In a transparent effort to invoke Slav solidarity, the 
article quoted a Bosnian Serbian Orthodox priest, who, as a U.S. 
F-16 "Phantom" flew overhead, said "it is NATO, not God who is 
above us today" and "behaving as if it is above God."  He asked 
why foreign aircraft were "roaring over Slav land," and charged 
that the UN is becoming "NATO's hostage." After complaining that 
the dissolution of the Warsaw Pact left no one to stop the 
bombing, the article asked if the "Balkan fuse" "lit by the flame 
of the Kremlin 'perestroyka'" would once again explode? 
   Outlook 
   Yeltsin and other government officials are clearly angered by 
NATO's lack of consultation prior to launching airstrikes against 
Bosnian Serb positions around Gorazde, in part because the use of 
military force threatens to jeopardize Russia's role as a 
mediator with the Serbs in negotiations, but more importantly 
because this appears to indicate a continued refusal on the part 
of the United States to treat Russia as an equal partner. 
Apparently convinced that U.S. officials knew in advance of the 
Gorazde strike, the Russians regard the lack of prior 
consultation as a severe slight.  Moreover, NATO's actions give 
ammunition to domestic critics of Yeltsin's policies of 
cooperation with the West. 
   Box 
                   State Television Reaction 
   Russia's two major state-run television networks, Ostankino and 
Russian Television (RTV), have run commentaries more critical of 
the NATO bombings than Russian official reaction.  On 12 April 
RTV's Vesti aired a commentary by G. Shakhov  which used the NATO 
bombings to argue against Russian participation in the 
Partnership for Peace initiative asserting that the airstrikes 
call into question NATO's suitability as a partner.  Shakhov 
charged that U.S. President Bill Clinton "admitted" at a White 
House press conference that he had not informed Russian President 
Boris Yeltsin of the imminent airstrikes that were then "in 
preparation," which, according to Shakhov, created the impression 
that "the United States has decided to independently determine 
the fate of the peoples of Bosnia."  This occurred, according to 
Shakhov, despite the fact that during the recent crisis in 
Sarajevo, it was a Russian diplomatic iniative which helped to 
avoid tragedy.  It was this very initiative, according to 
Shakhov, which evoked the "irritation" of "certain circles" in 
Washington.  As a result, these "circles" have decided to act 
henceforth "without any consultations with Russia."  Shakhov 
concluded by questioning Russian participation in the Partnership 
for Peace initiative with a NATO which "ignores Russia's role as 
a great power and openly supports one of the sides to the 
[Bosnian] conflict." 
* This commentary was the third in a series of recent commentaries 
by Shakhov taking aim at the U.S. for unilateral foreign policy 
moves in areas which Russia considers to be within its sphere of 
influence.  For a discussion of the other two, see the FBIS 
Trends of 6 April 1994, pages 23-25. 
Ostankino's Vladimir Grigoryev began his commentary by citing an 
editorial from the French newspaper, Le Monde.  According to 
Grigoryev the editorial charged that NATO, which was formed as a 
restraining "shield," had become a "punishing sword," and that 
the airstrikes entailed a "radical change" in NATO's doctrine and 
strategy.  Grigoryev then cited the Washington Post which, he 
claimed, asserted that despite NATO claims that the bombings were 
authorized by UN resolutions, this was a mere "pretext" for the 
"widespread and massive use of military air power."  Noting 
comments by the U.S. officer in charge of NATO forces in Southern 
Europe to the effect that the airstrikes had destroyed three 
tanks, Grigoryev questioned why he did not take into account the 
"victims among the civilian population" and asserted that the 
airstrikes took place just as "signs of a possible political 
normalization" of the situation around Gorazde had appeared.  He 
cited remarks by both Yeltsin and Russian Foreign Minister Andrey 
Kozyrev that there had been no prior consultation with Clinton or 
NATO officials and asserted that the bombing had taken place "in 
violation" of previously held agreements.  He concluded by noting 
a UN announcement that henceforth airstrikes could take place 
without preliminary consultation with UN officials and asserted 
that this statement means "nothing but a further escalation" of 
the conflict. 
   End Box 
(AUTOR:  BELLINGER.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL 
CHIEF, ANALYSIS BRANCH, RUSSIA DIVISION (703) 733-6070.) 
ENEAG/BLOUGH/GSP 14/2039z APR 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-33 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000022494001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   16 April 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
FOREIGN MEDIA NOTE--FB PN 94-050-SO. KOREA/CHINA 
<H3> <TI>      ROK-PRC:  Emerging Issues in Bilateral Trade, Investment </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       ROK-PRC:  Emerging Issues in Bilateral Trade, Investment </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
SUMMARY:       Both the South Korean and Chinese press confirm a 
growing Korean surplus in bilateral trade, although there is some 
question as to the exact magnitude of the trade imbalance.  Press 
sources attribute the surplus to structural differences in the two 
countries' foreign trade regimes.  Bilateral investment has been 
hampered by problems in China's investment environment and is 
currently dominated by the ROK.  To address the situation, the press 
suggests that China adjust its export mix and the type of investment 
it attracts, while South Korean firms focus more on participating in 
China's market. 

   Recent articles in the South Korean and Chinese press discuss 
basic structural problems that are contributing to the growing 
imbalance in bilateral merchandise trade and limiting the scope of 
bilateral investment.  The articles also suggest several measures to 
address the problems. 

Trade 

   South Korea ran a $2.31 billion trade surplus with China in 1993, 
according to statistics published in the 2 February issue of Seoul 
SILMUL KYONGJE, the journal of the Korea Institute for Industrial 
Economics and Trade.  (Official Chinese customs statistics as cited 
by China Economic Information report this figure as $2.5 billion.) 
SILMUL KYONGJE predicted that in 1994 South Korea will enjoy a 
bilateral trade surplus of $3.86 billion, with exports to China 
projected at $8.73 billion and imports at 
$4.87 billion. 

   By contrast, Korea Trade Promotion Association statistics as 
cited in the 27 February Beijing JINGJI CAKKAO BAO are much lower, 
putting South Korea's 1993 trade surplus with China at $1 billion, 
with South Korea exporting $4.8 billion to the PRC and importing 
$3.8 billion.  Furthermore, the association projects a 1994 
bilateral trade imbalance of only $2.1 billion in favor of South 
Korea, with ROK exports to the PRC expected to total $6.6 billion 
and imports from the PRC $4.5 billion. 

   Articles from both the Chinese and South Korean press have 
attempted to analyze the causes of the bilateral trade imbalance. 
According to the 9 February Seoul CHUGAN MAEGYONG, a business 
weekly, the trade imbalance is a result of Chinese products being 
diverted to domestic markets instead of export markets, of large- 
scale foreign investment in the PRC, increased plant imports by 
foreign-funded PRC firms, and lower PRC import tariffs. 

   An article in the February Beijing GUOJI MAOYI WENTI, the 
University of Foreign Economic Relations and Trade monthly, however, 
pointed to basic inequities in the composition of bilateral trade as 
contributing to China's growing deficit.  For example, the PRC 
monthly noted four categories of processed products--fiber products, 
chemical products, iron, steel and metal products, and electronic 
products--account for 90 percent of ROK exports to China, while four 
categories of mainly primary commodities--agricultural products, 
mineral products, nylon products, and chemicals--account for 85 
percent of Chinese exports to South Korea.  The 2 February SILMUL 
KYONGJE also indicated that growth in Chinese exports to South Korea 
has been at a standstill since 1991 precisely because ROK demand for 
these imports has plateaued. 

   The December issue of the Chinese Ministry of Foreign Trade and 
Economic Cooperation journal, GUOJI MAOYI, noted that another factor 
in the trade imbalance is the trend to shift ROK labor-intensive 
industries to China, which necessitates large-scale imports by the 
PRC of equipment and raw materials for processing.  SILMUL KYONGJE 
also pointed out that most ROK investment in China has centered 
around manufacturing industries--such as textiles and footwear- 
-which have lost competitiveness in South Korea. 

   The February GUOJI MAOYI WENTI article also mentioned the lack of 
competitiveness of Chinese products and limited access to ROK 
markets as other causes of the bilateral trade imbalance.  Not only 
are prices of Chinese products becoming less competitive as Chinese 
domestic labor prices rise, these exports still cannot measure up to 
ASEAN exports in terms of quality, packaging, and other non-price 
factors.  Furthermore, "overly low" domestic prices in the past have 
led to "over exporting" of certain commodities to South Korea, and, 
in response, South Korea has raised tariffs and adopted other 
measures to limit Chinese imports in order to protect its domestic 
industries.  The lack of ROK market access, according to the 
article, contrasts with China's efforts to open its own markets and 
drop tariffs in preparation for entry into GATT. 

   The 11 January Seoul HANGUK ILBO discussed the possible impact of 
China's currency and financial reforms on ROK exports.  China's 
recent unification and devaluation of its currency is expected to 
strengthen the price competitiveness of Chinese goods in overseas 
markets for which both ROK and Chinese goods compete.  Furthermore, 
the paper noted that, while these reforms bring China's trading 
system closer to international norms, and thus may increase its 
exports in general, they will also likely curb PRC imports.  Chinese 
currency devaluation and the imposition of a higher VAT and a new 
consumption tax will act as a "double trap" for South Korean exports 
to the PRC.  However, ROK firms in China who manufacture for export 
will see their price competitiveness improve. 

Investment 

   Bilateral investment is very one-sided, according to press 
reports from both countries.  An article in the December issue of 
GUOJI MAOYI cited 1992 bilateral investment figures showing that, as 
of the end of 1992, South Korea had invested in 259 projects in 
China, with investments valued at $159 million.  These figures 
contrast sharply with Chinese investments of only $4.86 million in 
South Korea.  Furthermore, ROK investment continues to increase. 
According to SILMUL KYONGJE, ROK direct investment in China totaled 
$213.6 million  (26 projects) in 1992, some $507 million (550 
projects) from January through November 1993 and is expected to 
reach $875.4 million (970 projects) in 1994. 

   In addition, GUOJI MAOYI claimed that a generally poor investment 
environment in the Bohai region--including the two provinces of 
Shandong and Liaoning, which account for 75 percent of ROK 
investment--is responsible for the "decreased enthusiasm" of ROK 
investors targeting China.  The investment environment is marred by 
low productivity, poor discipline, high turnover of Chinese workers, 
and an "over-concentration" of investment zones in Shandong and 
Liaoning, according to the journal. 

   Moreover, these negative aspects of the PRC investment 
environment have been exacerbated by the high concentration of ROK 
investment in China's labor-intensive processing industries, which 
accounted for 90 percent of ROK investment in the first half of 
1992. South Korean investors have also favored small and medium- 
sized projects with quick returns.  GUOJI MAOYI indicated that the 
average size of ROK investment projects on the Shandong peninsula as 
of the end of 1992 was $750,000.  SILMUL KYONGJE reported that the 
average size of ROK direct investment projects in China was $800,000 
in 1992, rose to $1.4 million in 1993, and is projected to drop to 
$900,000 in 1994. 

   SILMUL KYONGJE also cautioned that the higher cost of imported 
raw materials and labor deriving from PRC currency devaluation will 
affect ROK firms' production activities in China.  In the long run, 
SILMUL KYONGJE expects to see large-scale ROK investment aimed at 
China's domestic market rather than the traditional export-oriented 
investment that takes advantage of low wages to produce labor- 
intensive goods. 

Suggestions 

   Both of the Chinese think tank journals outlined steps China can 
take to improve its trade deficit with South Korea.  The February 
GUOJI MAOYI WENTI article, for example, maintained that China cannot 
equalize the trade imbalance by simply increasing the quantity of 
its exports to South Korea.  It must also increase the per-unit 
value of exports.  The article went on to suggest increasing exports 
of technology-intensive products such as electronics and machine 
parts.  The December GUOJI MAOYI article cited two other areas of 
possible export growth--microcomputers and numerically controlled 
machine tools--in which China is already competitive on the world 
market.  It further recommended that specialized Chinese 
organizations conduct pricing and consumer research in South Korea 
and pass the information to Chinese enterprises so that they can 
tailor their prices and products to the ROK market.  On the 
noncommodity trade front, GUOJI MAOYI WENTI noted that South Korea 
is an excellent market for Chinese labor exports, especially for 
laborers from nearby Shandong, Hebei, and Liaoning provinces while 
GUOJI MAOYI proposed targeting ROK conglomerates to invest in 
projects worth over $10 million or ceding equity in cash-strapped 
Chinese companies to ROK conglomerates to attract capital.  GUOJI 
MAOYI called for encouraging investment in finance, commerce, 
tourism, and real estate while discouraging investment in projects 
that are energy- or capital-intensive or that produce rough-wrought 
products with little value-added content. 

   As for indirect investment, GUOJI MAOYI suggested attracting ROK 
mutual funds and even setting up a "Bohai Start-Up Fund" to be 
issued directly in the ROK.  GUOJI MAOYI also stressed the 
importance of encouraging ROK investment in technology-intensive 
industries, such as machinery and electronics, chemical, and 
automobile industries.  The journal further recommended that China 
trade market share for capital and technology and that commodities 
from ROK-invested enterprises could "take the place of imports" or 
fill gaps in domestic production. 

   South Korean publications have stressed the importance of 
upgrading investment in China and managing the bilateral trade 
relationship well.  CHUGAN MAEGYONG noted that China's economic 
reforms will give less preference to foreign investors and foreign- 
invested firms in the future and suggested that ROK firms could 
benefit from breaking away from investments focused on using China's 
cheap labor and raising their image and participation in the local 
market through technological investments.  The business weekly 
recommended that ROK firms increase their investment in 
transportation, real estate, and social infrastructure markets in 
order to expand their exports, profits, and opportunities.  SILMUL 
KYONGJE advocated big increases in large-scale investments targeting 
the domestic Chinese market and noted that ROK investment has moved 
recently into cement, automobiles, machinery, petrochemicals, and 
other capital-intensive sectors. 

   SILMUL KYONGJE commented that, as South Korea's trade surplus 
with China continues to expand, adjusting the bilateral trade 
imbalance will become an issue.  To reduce this friction, South 
Korea must work to balance exports to China with imports from that 
country.  At the same time, competition for markets in the United 
States, Japan, and the EU will become "even more heated."  China is 
already revising aspects of its foreign trade system that act as 
stumbling blocks to its participation in the global market.  These 
reforms, coupled with future GATT membership, would further 
strengthen China's competitiveness.  For this reason, the journal 
deemed South Korea's prospects for exports to developed countries as 
not all that bright, even if there is economic recovery in those 
countries. 


                                 ROK-PRC Trade 

                          (Source: GUOJI MAOYI WENTI) 

                               Unit: $1 billion 
                      1993  1992    1991   1990   1989  1988  1987 

ROK to PRC exports    7.2   4.493   2.37   1.553  1.438 1.7   .813 

ROK to world exports  8.5   76.63   71.89  65.02  64.39 62.38 60.7 

ROK from PRC imports  5.4   3.725   3.395  2.268  1.705 1.387 .673 

ROK from world imports 87   81.78   81.56  69.84  69.24 61.47 51.81 

PRC to world exports  90.1  85      71.84  62.09  52.54 47.52 39.44 

PRC from world imports97.95 80.63   63.79  53.35  59.14 55.28 43.21 

ROK-PRC trade         12.6  8.218   5.765  3.821  3.143 3.087 1.486 

ROK total trade    172   158.41  153.45 134.86 133.64 123.84 112.51 

PRC total trade    188.05 165.63  135.63 115.44 111.68 102.8  82.65 

ROK-PRC BOP            1.8   .768  -1.025 -.715  -.267  .313   .140 

                                 ROK-PRC Trade 

                           (Source:  SILMUL KYONGJE) 

                               Unit: $1 billion 
                1987  1988   1989   1990  1991  1992    1993   1994 
Direct exports   0.21  0.37  0.43   0.58  1.0   2.65    4.92   - 

Indirect exports 0.54  1.22  1.0    0.96  1.37  1.84    1.96   - 

Total exports    0.75  1.59  1.43   1.54  2.37  4.49    6.88   8.73 

Direct imports   0.08  1.38  1.7    2.26  3.39  3.72    3.81    - 

Indirect imports 0.65  0.84  0.9    0.84  0.97  0.84    0.76    - 

Total imports    0.73  2.22  2.6    3.1   4.36  4.56    4.57    4.87 

Trade balance    0.02  -0.06 -1.17  -1.56 -1.99 -0.06   2.31    3.86 

Total trade      1.48   3.81 4.03   4.64  6.73  9.05    11.45   13.6 

Percent change    --    157.4  5.7   15.1  45.0 4 34.4    26.5  18.7 

*1993 &amp; 1994 figures are  estimates 


                         Composition of ROK-PRC Trade 

                          (Source: GUOJI MAOYI WENTI) 

                                                                 (%) 
                        1982  1988  1989 1992  1982  1988  1989 1992 


Food; agricultural,     0.8   0.9   1.5  0.6   12.6  18.4  20.4 
32.0 
aquatic products 

Minerals                --    0.4   0.3  0.3   0.6   16.3  20.4 
18.2 

Fibers                  72.5  26.5  42.3 21.0  66.5  037.0 39.8 
20.7 

Chemical products       2.8   19.3  13.3 23.4  12.7  5.4   5.9 
17.4 

Iron &amp; steel, metals    10.5  7.4   14.6 25.2  5.6   14.3   6.9  7.7 


Machinery, electronics, 10.2  38.7  25.9 21.4  0.3   0.2    1.0  2.0 
electrical equipment 

Other products          3.2   6.6   7.4  9.1   1.7   3.0    5.7  2.0 

Total                  100    100   100  100   100   100    100  100 


                        ROK Direct Investment in China 

                           (Source:  SILMUL KYONGJE) 

                                          Unit: $1 billion 
Year             1989  1990  1991  1992  1993   Cumulative 

Total projects   11    37    109   26    550    970 

Total value      13.2  55.3  80.2  213.6 507    875.4 

Value/project    1.2   1.5   0.7   0.8   1.4    0.9 

*1993 figures include data through November 1993        only 





     (Authors:  Schmoll/Fornaro.  Questions and/or comments, please 
call 
Chief, Southeast Asia/Korea Branch (703) 733-6522 or Chief, Econ 
Branch 
(703) 733-6406) 

EAG/13APR94/ECONF/ASIA DIVISION/CHINA DIVISION/JF 15/1311Z APR 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-34 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000022594001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   16 April 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-15Apr94-Russia-U.S. 
<H3> <TI>      Moscow Condemns NATO Gorazde Strike, Lack of Consultation </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Moscow Condemns NATO Gorazde Strike, Lack of Consultation </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
SUMMARY 

                               Stressing their pique at NATO's failure to consult with Moscow in 
advance of airstrikes against Bosnian Serb positions, Russian 
President Boris Yeltsin, government officials, and legislators 
from  across the political spectrum have condemned the raids as 
ill-advised and likely to escalate the bloodshed in Bosnia. 
Media commentary echoed these sentiments and warned that the NATO 
actions could adversely affect Russian internal politics and 
U.S.-Russian relations. 

                          END SUMMARY 

   Yeltsin was strongly critical of NATO air strikes on Bosnian Serb 
positions around Gorazde and accused NATO and the United States, 
in particular, of failing to consult in advance with Russia. 
Yeltsin said in an 11 April press interview that "I have insisted 
and I insist now" that "questions such as bombing strikes against 
Serbian positions must not be decided" without prior U.S.-Russian 
consultations.  He told reporters that during a telephone 
conversation with U.S. President Bill Clinton early that morning 
he had made the same point about consultations "again and again." 
Insisting that any such action should be taken only "in 
accordance with UN decisions," Yeltsin complained that the 
telephone call had not clarified whether the UN Secretary General 
had given the "go-ahead" for the strikes and declared that 
Russia, "without a doubt," wanted the Security Council to discuss 
the issue (Ostankino TV, 11 April, Rossiyskaya Gazeta, 12 April). 

   Stressing Russia's preference for continued negotiations, Yeltsin 
told reporters in Madrid on 12 April that a settlement in Bosnia 
must come through political negotiations and not through force" 
which could lead to "everlasting war" and that the blame for such 
an outcome would "rest with those who took the decision" on the 
strikes.  At the same time he noted that the shooting in Gorazde 
had stopped and expressed the hope that the bombing "will not, 
after all, lead to greater confrontation and greater bloodshed." 
Continuing to display annoyance at what he termed "discrimination 
against Russia," however, Yeltsin emphasized that consultations 
would be held with the UN Secretary General and President Clinton 
"so that this does not happen again" (Moscow TV, ITAR-TASS, 12 
April). 

Other Government Reaction 

   Other Government officials displayed similar irritation at the 
lack of consultation and expressed fears that the air strikes 
would jeopardize the peace negotiations and lead to a wider 
conflict.  notably some officials criticized the Serbs as well as 
the Bosnian Muslims: 

   -- Foreign Minister Andrey Kozyrev called the air strikes "a big 
mistake and a great risk."  He told reporters that Russia was 
"worried" that the air strike decision "was made in a hurry" 
without considering "possible consequences," noting that this was 
why consultations were needed.  Warning like Yeltsin that the air 
strikes could result in an "escalation of the conflict instead of 
its suppression," he said he had "expressed his profound concern" 
to U.S. Secretary of State Warren Christopher that the world 
could be "engulfed in an exchange of blows" and had urged the 
West "to display the utmost restraint."  Pointing to diplomatic 
efforts with the Serbs made by special envoy Vitaliy Churkin, 
Kozyrev called the air strikes "especially annoying" because by 2 
April he claimed there were "already signs of a political 
settlement" (ITAR-TASS, 11 April). 

   -- Churkin criticized the UN and NATO for failing to consult with 
Russia about their actions.  Warning that UN and NATO 
"interference" in the conflict was leading to a "greater 
confrontation," he said that he was trying to work with the 
Bosnia Serbs "to bring together the fragments of a Bosnian peace 
settlement."  Churkin accused the Muslims of being the first to 
"initiate combat activities in Gorazde" despite the fact that it 
was a UN "safety zone," but also faulted the Bosnian Serbs for 
misleading him as to their intentions (ITAR-TASS, 11 April). 

   -- Ministry press spokesman Grigoriy Karasin stressed that Russia 
"will never reconcile itself to the role of a so-called junior 
partner, who is informed after the event about such decisions." 
He said Russia was "opposed to the practice of being consulted 
only to obtain a yes" (Moscow radio, 12 April). 

   -- Interfax (11 April) cited an unnamed "high-ranking diplomat" 
as saying that Moscow's reaction to the bombardment of Serb 
positions "will be tough" if it discovered that the strikes could 
have been "avoided."  He complained that Russia was not a "banana 
republic" and as a permanent member of the UN Security Council 
would not accept being informed about decisions to use force in 
Yugoslavia as a "fait accompli."  He also claimed that the 
Muslims had "provoked" the Serbs' military actions in Gorazde and 
that attacks on the Serbs would only "make them unwilling to 
negotiate." 

   An 11 April Russian Foreign Ministry statement complained that 
Moscow had been informed of the air strikes only "after the 
event" and said Russia continued to await "full information" 
about what has happened from the UN leadership.  The statement 
called for the implementation of "urgent measures" around Gorazde 
including the deployment of UN forces, the withdrawal of Serbs 
from their present positions, and the demilitarization of the 
area, including the disarmament of Muslim forces (ITAR-TASS, 11 
April). 

Legislature Condemns the Attack 

   Predictably, the Russian legislature, many of whose members have 
for months been attacking the government for cooperating with the 
West on Bosnia and for giving insufficient support to the Serbs, 
opposed the NATO air strikes.  Leaders from across the political 
spectrum voiced disapproval: 

   -- Yeltsin supporter and Federation Council chairman Vladimir 
Shumeyko called the strikes "unjustified at this point" and 
criticized the United States for openly showing support for one 
side while "punishing" the other side (ITAR-TASS, 11 April). 

   -- Duma Speaker and Agrarian Party member Ivan Rybkin issued a 
statement on behalf of the Duma demanding "an immediate end" to 
NATO's "unilateral, unsanctioned use of force," complaining that 
NATO has "easily ignored not only Russia's view," but also the 
"achieved agreements," and that its action "threatens to ruin" 
prospects for a peaceful political settlement (ITAR-TASS, 12 
April). 

   -- Sergey Shakhray, cochairman of the Party of Russian Unity and 
Accord (PRES) charged that conducting the air strikes without 
consulting Russia was a "slap in the face" to Yeltsin and would 
have an adverse effect within Russia, creating, indirectly, a 
"telling strike against Russian reforms" and benefitting "the 
national patriots" (Moscow radio, 12 April; Nezavisimaya Gazeta, 
13 April). 

   -- Former Ambassador to the United States Vladimir Lukin, a 
member of the moderately reformist Yavlinskiy bloc and chairman 
of the Duma's international affairs committee expressed 
"disappointment" at the "very unfortunate, badly timed" strikes 
which had occurred just when Russian diplomatic efforts were 
bringing results.  He faulted the lack of "preliminary 
consultations" with Russia and called for convening the UN 
Security Council to determine if the attacks were in line with UN 
resolutions.  While admitting that some Serb commanders "may have 
been at fault," he warned that the air strikes will "unavoidably 
complicate" the situation (ITAR-TASS, 12 April). 

   -- The Liberal Democratic Party (LDP), whose leader Vladimir 
Zhirinovskiy had called for the bombing of NATO bases in Italy in 
retaliation, denounced the air strikes, warning of the 
possibility of unleashing world war in the Balkans and stating 
that the "Russian people support their Serb brothers" (ITAR-TASS, 
Interfax, 11 April). 

Media Reaction 

   The Russian media across the political spectrum expressed regret 
at the air strikes, with most commentary expressing anger that 
Moscow was not consulted in advance, (See box) and some warning 
that NATO's actions were becoming a factor in Russia's domestic 
political struggle: 

   -- The pro-Yeltsin newspaper Izvestiya tried to present a 
balanced view, expressing strong doubts about Serbian actions, 
but also warning that NATO's response would have unfavorable 
consequences for Russia.  A front-page 12 April report filed from 
Belgrade maintained that the NATO attack "was to be expected." 
Saying that Russia had "repeatedly warned" the Bosnian Serbs, who 
had been "attacking" Gorazde for "the past two weeks," of the 
"danger of the situation," the article charged that the Serbs had 
assured Russia that there would be no "exacerbation of the 
situation," but "immediately broke their word."  Another article 
the same day trenchantly observed that Belgrade only began 
extolling "Slav unity" after sanctions against Serbia were 
introduced and claimed that Serb diplomacy was mainly directed at 
pitting Russia against the West.  A 13 April Maksim Yusin article 
titled "NATO Resolve and Serb Stubbornness Put Russian Diplomacy 
in Difficult Position," stressed that events are "taking a most 
undesirable turn for Moscow."  Claiming that Russia had been 
"winning-one diplomatic victory after another" when the stress 
was on negotiations, Yusin claimed that the Kremlin's ability to 
influence the situation was "very limited" once NATO-Serb 
hostilities began.  Yusin warned that Russia's relations with the 
West "would be put to a new-test" if NATO carried out more 
military operations, but he nonetheless concluded that Yeltsin 
"attaches too much importance" to ties to the United States and 
Western Europe to "put them at risk over the Serbs' 
inflexibility." 

   -- A 13 April article in the independent reformist newspaper 
Nezavisimaya Gazeta condemned what it saw as the West's one-sided 
approach favoring the Bosnian Muslims and complained that the 
West is "apparently little concerned about the internal political 
complications" from such actions both for the Bosnian Serbs and 
in Russia. 

   -- A 13 April article in the mass-circulation newspaper 
Komsomolskaya Pravda titled "NATO'S Order:  Kill the Serbs," 
faulted the U.S foreign policy for its "insolence" in 
demonstrating "unthinking support" and "clear favoritism" toward 
the Muslims, claiming that the U.S. "inability to compromise" had 
placed it "on a par" with the Bosnian Serbs.  The article 
suggested that the air strikes were a reaction to Russia's 
"surprisingly flexible and fresh" diplomatic approaches, which 
had caught Washington "unawares" and charged that Washington, by 
"constantly" declaring "Russia must not abandon us," has "placed 
Russia in a difficult position." 

   -- The pro-communist newspaper Pravda predictably adopted a 
shrill tone in a report titled "25 Minutes of War.  World War 
III?"  In a transparent effort to invoke Slav solidarity, the 
article quoted a Bosnian Serbian Orthodox priest, who, as a U.S. 
F-16 "Phantom" flew overhead, said "it is NATO, not God who is 
above us today" and "behaving as if it is above God."  He asked 
why foreign aircraft were "roaring over Slav land," and charged 
that the UN is becoming "NATO's hostage." After complaining that 
the dissolution of the Warsaw Pact left no one to stop the 
bombing, the article asked if the "Balkan fuse" "lit by the flame 
of the Kremlin 'perestroyka'" would once again explode? 

Outlook 

   Yeltsin and other government officials are clearly angered by 
NATO's lack of consultation prior to launching airstrikes against 
Bosnian Serb positions around Gorazde, in part because the use of 
military force threatens to jeopardize Russia's role as a 
mediator with the Serbs in negotiations, but more importantly 
because this appears to indicate a continued refusal on the part 
of the United States to treat Russia as an equal partner. 
Apparently convinced that US  officials knew in advance of the 
Gorazde strike, the Russians regard the lack of prior 
consultation as a severe slight.  Moreover, NATO's actions give 
ammunition to domestic critics of Yeltsin's policies of 
cooperation with the West. 

BOX 

Television Reaction 

   Russia's two major state-run television networks, Ostankino and 
Russian Television (RTV), have carried commentaries condemning 
the airstrikes and protesting that the strikes have changed the 
character of the NATO alliance from defensive to aggressive. 

   Commentator G. Shakhov* said on a 12 April RTV "Vesti" broadcast 
that Russia should refuse to participate in NATO's Partnership 
for Peace program because NATO, having carried out the 
airstrikes, sided openly with one side in the Bosnian conflict 
and "ignored Russia's role as a great power," and had thus shown 
itself to be an unsuitable partner.  He charged that U.S. 
President Bill Clinton "admitted" at a White House press 
conference that he had not informed Russian President Boris 
Yeltsin of the airstrikes that were then "in preparation," which, 
according to Shakhov, created the impression that "the United 
States has decided to independently determine the fate of the 
peoples of Bosnia."  The United States failed to consult, 
according to Shakhov, even though it was precisely Russia's 
diplomatic intervention that helped to ameliorate the situation 
during the recent crisis in Sarajevo.  Shakhov contended that 
"certain circles" in Washington had been irritated by Moscow's 
intervention in Sarajevo and had decided to act henceforth 
"without any consultations with Russia." 

   *This commentary is the third in a series of recent commentaries 
by Shakhov taking aim at the United States for its foreign policy 
actions in areas traditionally considered to be within Russia's 
sphere of influence.  For a discussion of the other two, see the 
Trends of 6 April 1994, pages 23-25. 

   Ostankino's Vladimir Grigoryev began his 12 April "Novosti" 
commentary by citing an editorial from the French newspaper, Le 
Monde, which he said, charged that the airstrikes entailed a 
"radical change" in NATO's doctrine and strategy, transforming 
the alliance from a restraining "shield" to a "punishing sword." 
Grigoryev then said that the Washington Post had called NATO's 
claims that the bombings were authorized by UN resolutions merely 
a "pretext" for the "widespread and massive use of military air 
power."  Grigoryev condemned the airstrikes, asserting that they 
took place just as "signs of a possible political normalization" 
of the situation around Gorazde had appeared and that they had 
taken place "in violation" of previous agreements.  He concluded 
by asserting that a UN statement that henceforth airstrikes could 
take place without preliminary consultation with UN officials 
means "a further escalation" of the conflict. 

END BOX 

(AUTHOR:  BELLINGER.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL 
CHIEF ANALYST, EURASIA/NEAR EAST/AFRICA GROUP, (703) 733-7072.) 

ENEAG/BLOUGH/JF 15/1451Z APR 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-35 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000022694001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   16 April 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-15APR94-YUGO-BOSNIA 
<H3> <TI>      Yugoslavia--Bosnia-Herzegovina </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Yugoslavia--Bosnia-Herzegovina </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
Serbs      Willing to Talk Despite Bluster 

                         SUMMARY 

While Serb leaders unleashed a storm of angry rhetoric following 
the 10-11 April NATO air at tacks on Serbian forces near Gorazde, 
they continue to participate in efforts to negotiate a peace 
agreement.  Serbian President Slobodan Milosevic, however, has 
announced that ending the conflict in former Yugoslavia will 
depend on lifting the UN embargo against the FRY. 
                             END SUMMARY 
   The Bosnian Serb leadership and leaders of the Federal Republic 
of Yugoslavia (FRY--Serbia and Montenegro) as well as the Serbian 
media--particularly the electronic media--sharply denounced the 
NATO air attacks and accused the UN and NATO of taking the 
Bosnian Government side against the Serbs in the Bosnian 
conflict.  Milosevic, setting the tone for the Serbian verbal 
attacks, claimed that the NATO action had "shattered the 
delusion" that the "international community" had an "unbiased 
attitude" toward the Bosnian crisis (Tanjug, 11 April).   Bosnian 
Serb "President" Radovan Karadzic bitterly complaining that the 
UN had "aided the Muslims before," described the air attacks as 
representing the "most direct form of support."  He went on to 
predict that now that "some circles in the United States" and the 
UN were "playing their last cards," they "will now have to send 
in ground troops" to fight the Serbs who are "prepared to fight 
to the last man."  Bosnian Serb army chief General Ratko Mladic 
warned that "anything that flies over" Bosnian Serb territory and 
"opens fire will be downed" (Tanjug, 11 April).  Belgrade 
television news repeated claims that originated with the Bosnian 
Serb military that the NATO aircraft had bombed an ambulance and 
killed two paramedics, hit a civilian's house with a bomb that 
did not explode, and dropped a bomb in the center of Gorazde that 
killed 160 civilians (Belgrade TV, 11-13 April).  (See Note 1) 
   (Note 1) Pictures of a damaged ambulance and a house with an 
unexploded bomb inside were not shown until 13 April and the 
evidence presented that they had been hit during the NATO air 
attacks was unconvincing (Belgrade TV, 14 April). 
   Despite the rhetoric, the Bosnian Serb leadership has signalled 
that it hopes to defuse the confrontation with the UN and NATO 
that culminated in the air attacks near Gorazde.  On 13 April 
Bosnian Serb assembly president Momcilo Krajisnik stepped back 
from earlier Serb threats to end relations with the UN and 
UNPROFOR and to negotiate with the international community only 
with Russian mediation (Tanjug, 11-13 April).  Krajisnik 
announced that the Bosnian Serbs would "leave the door open to 
talks" except with UNPROFOR commander for Bosnia-Herzegovina 
General Michael Rose and "others who have abused their positions" 
by ordering the 10-11 April air strikes.  Moreover, contradicting 
the threat issued by Mladic, Krajisnik indicated that Serb forces 
would not fire on NATO aircraft over Bosnia-Herzegovina. 
Attacking NATO would be a "double evil," he maintained, that 
would compound the "evil" done to the Serbs by the NATO bombing. 
While the NATO air strikes had "brought harm to the Serbian 
people," he argued that the effects had "remained inside the 
borders" within which it "pays to be patient in the interest of 
peace."  In a warning that appeared aimed at the Bosnian Serb 
army leadership, he added that if NATO aircraft were shot down, 
there would be "neither peace nor delimitation" of the conflict 
and "many plans would fail that way" (Tanjug, 13 April). 
Subsequently, the Serbs resumed talking with UN representatives. 
The Bosnian Serb armed forces "Supreme Command" issued an edict 
on 15 April declaring that, although "conditions are not yet 
ripe" for "normalization of relations" with the "military sector" 
of the UN Protection Force (UNPROFOR) in Bosnia-Herzegovina, 
Karadzic would "maintain contact" with UNPROFOR's "ciivilian 
department.  Karadzic met with UN envoy Yasushi Akashi the same 
day (Tanjug, 15 April). 
   Milosevic's Conditions for Talks 
   After a 13 April meeting in Belgrade with  Akashi, Milosevic, 
implicitly asserting the power to speak for all Serbs as he has 
on other recent occasions, announced his conditions for renewed 
peace negotiations.  He declared that the "Serb side" will enter 
"new negotiations without preconditions" after a "cessation of 
all hostilities" in Bosnia-Herzegovina.  However, he maintained 
that hostilities will not have ceased until sanctions are lifted. 
He argued that since talks can take place "only on an equal 
footing" and the UN sanctions constitute a form of hostile action 
against the FRY and Serbs generally in former Yugoslavia, the 
sanctions against the FRY must be lifted as part of a general 
ceasefire agreement in Bosnia-Herzegovina.  Moreover, he argued 
that the sanctions against "Serbia and the Serb nation" are a 
"constant impetus" for the Bosnian Government to continue the 
war," while lifting the sanctions is the "simplest way" to 
persuade the "Bosnian authorities to abandon their war policy" 
(Tanjug, 13 April).  Similarly, after an 11 April meeting in 
Belgrade with Russian envoy Vitaliy Churkin, Milosevic announced 
that further progress in normalizing relations between the 
Croatian government and the separatist Krajina Serbs of Croatia 
and between Zagreb and Belgrade will be "impossible" until the 
sanctions are removed (Tanjug, 11 April). 
   (AUTHOR: NASH.  QUESTIONS OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF ANALYST, 
EUROPE AND LATIN AMERICA GROUP, (703) 733-6120.) 
ELAG/GILISON JEG 16/0020Z APR 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-36 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000022794001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   19 April 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-18APR94-DPRK-U.S. 
<H3> <TI>      North Korea Signals Continued Interest in Talks With U.S. </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       North Korea Signals Continued Interest in Talks With U.S. </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
SUMMARY 

                             Pyongyang has used this year's commemoration of President Kim Il- 
song's birthday to signal ongoing interest in resuming the 
dialogue with Washington on the nuclear issue.  Pyongyang media 
so far have not been observed to report or comment on the arrival 
of the Patriot missiles in the South. 

                        END SUMMARY 

   The most direct indication of Pyongyang's desire to resume talks 
with the United States came in a 14 April KCNA report of a 
meeting between North Korean officials and foreign visitors 
invited for the birthday celebration, including representatives 
of The Washington Times and CNN.  KCNA depicted the North Korean 
delegation, which was headed by party secretary Kim Yong-sun, as 
insisting that DPRK-U.S. talks "must" be resumed and as 
contending that the nuclear issue is a matter to be solved 
between the DPRK and the United States.  KCNA further cited the 
North Koreans as affirming that there is no change in Pyongyang's 
twin declared objectives of resolving the nuclear issue and 
improving bilateral relations with Washington. 

   Rhetorical Restraint 

   Pyongyang's latest, albeit indirect, call for talks with the 
United States was accompanied by a measure of rhetorical restraint 
at commemorative birthday events. Premier Kang Song-san, keynote 
speaker at the main meeting marking President Kim's 82nd birthday, 
used the term "U.S. imperialists" only in reference to the Korean 
war (Pyongyang radio, 14 April).  His harshest indirect attack on 
Washington came in his standard charge that "the imperialists and 
reactionaries" are carrying out "antisocialist and anti-DPRK 
maneuvers" now -"more viciously than ever before."  The 
commemorative editorial in the party paper Nodong Sinmun was even 
more restrained, eschewing the term "U.S. imperialists" 
altogether (Pyongyang radio, 15 April). 
   In the past, Pyongyang did not hesitate to use Kim Il-song's 
birthday to ratchet up its war rhetoric.  For instance, last 
year--in the crisis atmosphere following the Team Spirit U.S.-ROK 
joint military exercise in March and Pyongyang's announcement of 
withdrawal from the Nuclear Nonproliferation Treaty the same 
month--Premier Kang in his keynote speech charged that "dark 
clouds of nuclear war' had been created by "the U.S. 
imperialists' reckless maneuvers" and  had led to "a touch-and-go 
situation" (Pyongyang radio, 14 April 1993). 

   Treatment of South 

   In sharp contrast to the measure of circumspect ion shown toward 
Washington, Pyongyang continued to treat Seoul in harsh tones.  Kang 
in his speech accused "the flunkeyist, nation-selling Kim Yong-sam 
ring, which flatters and submits to outside forces" of "recklessly" 
engaging in unspecified "provocative acts" after having lost "the 
ability to reason."  Similarly, in the latest attack on the South 
Korean government, Nodong Sinmun on 18 April held Seoul responsible 
for the current stalemate over the nuclear issue (KCNA, 18 April). 
It accused the South of "stalling" DPRK-U.S. talks in a bid to 
"obstruct" resolution of the nuclear issue and "accelerate" 
development of its own nuclear arms while still under the U.S. 
nuclear umbrella.  Pyongyang media have so far ignored Seoul's 
decision to withdraw the demand for an inter-Korean exchange of 
special envoys as a prerequisite to U.S.-North Korea high-level 
talks. 

   Implications 

   Pyongyang media treatment of events surrounding 
Kim Il-song's birthday appeared designed to convey the impression 
that the regime still hopes to resolve the nuclear issue through 
dialogue with Washington and that, at least for now, talks with 
Seoul are not on its agenda.  Pyongyang could harden its stance 
toward Washington over the deployment of the Patriot missiles. 
 (AUTHOR:  YIM.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
ASIA DIVISION ANALYSIS TEAM, (703) 733-6534.) 
EAG/HEBBEL/CB 18/1529z Apr 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-37 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000022894001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   19 April 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
FOREIGN MEDIA NOTE--FB PN 94-051--PALESTINIAN 
<H3> <TI>      PALESTINIANS: WEST BANK-GAZA DEVELOPMENTS # 1 </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       PALESTINIANS: WEST BANK-GAZA DEVELOPMENTS # 1 </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
This      Foreign Media Note series contains information on 
developments in West Bank-Gaza politics, economics, agriculture, 
education, and health care from Arabic-language Palestinian press 
and the London expatriate press. 

   Gaza Lawyers Union President on Role of Union Under Democracy 

   The newly elected president and vice president of the Lawyers 
Union in Gaza, Fayiz Abu-Rahmah, and Nazim 'Uwaydah, announced that 
the union's elections were ''orderly'' and went as planned.  Abu- 
Rahmah declared that they are a good model for Palestinian 
democracy, and could be copied by other local unions.  He added that 
the union and members of its administrative council will play a 
positive role in the unfolding Palestinian political scene, and will 
assist in facilitating the administration of justice and the 
implementation of laws.  He also noted that changing circumstances 
dictate the need for a unified code of law for the the West Bank and 
Gaza Strip, and that some of the laws implemented in years past are 
in need of review and modification.  Union Vice President 'Uwaydah 
said that he expects that West Bank and Gaza lawyers will join 
together in the near future to create a unified lawyers union 
represented by one administrative council.  (Jerusalem AL-QUDS IO 
Mar 94) 

   New Investment Projects in Gaza Announced 

   Jamil Hararah, head of the Center for Investment in Gaza, 
announced that on 9 March the Foreign Investment Council approved a 
number of new investment projects in Gaza.  Hararah noted that 
approximately $5 million in capital will be invested in these 
projects, and that they will employ about 175 people.  The projects 
include a fiberglass factory; a fabric factory; a factory-for 
aluminum siding, medical instruments, and water pipes; a jam 
factory; and two residential buildings.  (Jerusalem AL-QUDS 10 Mar 
94) 

   PLO Approves Cement Factory in Nabulus 

   According to Musaddiq Nasif, president of the administrative 
council and general manager of the Palestinian Cement Company, a 
special Palestinian committee in Tunis has studied and approved the 
construction of a cement plant in Nabulus.  Nasif, who just returned 
to Nabulus after visiting Tunis and several European countries, said 
that the project also received the blessing of PLO Chairman Yasir 
'Arafat.  (Jerusalem AL-NAHAR 7 Mar 94) 

   Real Estate Investments in Gaza on Hold 

   Gazan real estate investors are reportedly refraining from 
undertaking projects in the Gaza Strip due to the climate of 
instability and uncertainty there.  Usamah al-Khudayri, the head of 
Al-Khudayri Engineering and Contracting Company in Gaza, expressed 
his fears about investing in real estate construction in Gaza at 
this time, and said that he has decided to forego employing many 
workers at his company because he has had to stop some projects as a 
result of current conditions.  Investor Mahmud Saf iyah backed out 
of a project to construct 20 housing units because Gazans declined 
to put deposits on the apartments, hoping for better prices and 
payment terms from the new Palestinian authority.  In the recent 
past, the Israeli Government put up at least $100,000 in capital for 
each housing project that investors undertook in Gaza.  A study 
prepared by Jamil Hararah, head of the Center for Investment in 
Gaza,  concludes that future investment in Gaza should focus on 
industry, real estate, tourism, agriculture, and services. 
(Jerusalem AL-QUDS 28 Feb 94) 

   Health Council Requests Assistance From Egypt 

   During the week of 6 March, a delegation of Egyptian doctors 
visited the Gaza Strip and West Bank on behalf of the Egyptian 
health and foreign ministries as guests of the Palestinian Health 
Council.  The delegation, headed by Dr. Mahir Sha'ir, president of 
the Heart Surgery Institute in Cairo, visited hospitals in Hebron, 
Jerusalem, Ramallah, and the Gaza Strip.  The visit was arranged at 
the request of the head of the Red Crescent and Palestinian Health 
Council, Dr. Fathi 'Arafat, who had asked for assistance in treating 
the victims of the Hebron massacre.  The health councils in 
Jerusalem and Gaza presented the delegation with a working paper on 
arranging future cooperation between the Egyptian and Palestinian 
ministries of health, including the training of health workers.  The 
report from Gaza requested that Egypt help establish departments for 
surgical specialties for which Gazans must currently rely on Israeli 
hospitals.  (Jerusalem AL-QUDS 7 Mar 94; 13 Mar 94) 

   Administrative Assignments at Arab Medical University in Gaza 

   On 9 March the following administrative assignments were made at 
the Arab Medical University in Gaza: 

   President--Dr. Hasan Sharrab 
   Vice President--Dr. Rasim Idris 
   Chief Administrator--Dr. Sami Harb 
   Treasurer--Dr. Naf idh Shalah 
   Cultural Committee Director--Dr. Faysal Abu-Shahlan 
   Social Committee Director--Dr. Sa'id Gharbiyah 
   Medical Profession Affairs Committee Director--Dr. 'Ali Qa'ud 
   Journal Committee Director--Dr. Ibrahim al-Habbash 
   Supervisor for Rafah and Khan Yunus branches--Dr. Ziyad Sha'th 
   Directors of Rafah and Khan Yunus branches--Dr. 'Ali Abu-Afsh and 
   Dr. Ahmad Rabbah 
   (Jerusalem AL-QUDS 10 Mar 94) 

   Bi'r Zayt University Publishes Book on Declaration of Principles 

   The Center for the Study and Support of Palestinian Society at 
Bi'r Zayt University has published a.book entitled "The Palestinian- 
Israeli Declaration of Principles: Present and Future Horizons." 
The book was compiled under the editorship of Dr. Salih 'Abd-al- 
Jawad.  It consists of 11 speeches given at Bi'r Zayt University on 
18 December 1993 at a conference on the Declaration of Principles at 
which Dr. Ibrahim Abu-Lughd was the keynote speaker.  The conference 
speeches focus on the importance of the Declaration of Principles, 
and its political, cultural, and legal impact.  (Jerusalem AL-QUDS 
11 Mar 94) 

   New Newspaper To Be Published in Territories 

   The Israeli authorities have agreed to permit the publication of 
a new Palestinian newspaper entitled MASA' AL-BALAD ("The Evening of 
the Country").  MASA' AL-BALAD will be published by Palestinian 
journalist Hani 'Arafat, who previously managed a newspaper entitled 
AKHBAR AL-BALAD.  (London AL-SHARQ AL-AWSAT 28 Mar 94) 

   (QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, AFRICA/LEVANT 
BRANCH AT (703) 733-6408) 
ENEAG/18 Apr/POLCHF/ECONF/NEASA Division/CB 18/1717z Apr 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-38 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000022994001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   21 April 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING ITEM 
IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT CONSUMERS. 
S&amp;T PERSPECTIVES--VOL 9 NO 3, 29 APR 94 
<H3> <TI>      PERSPECTIVES SELECTIONS ARE BASED SOLELY ON FOREIGN NEWSPAPERS, </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       PERSPECTIVES SELECTIONS ARE BASED SOLELY ON FOREIGN NEWSPAPERS, </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
BOOKS,   JOURNALS, COMMERCIAL DATA BASES, AND OTHER OPEN-SOURCE 
PUBLICATIONS, OR ON RADIO AND TELEVISION BROADCASTS.  SOME OF THE 
MATERIALS USED IN THIS PUBLICATION WILL APPEAR AS ABSTRACTS OR FULL 
TRANSLATIONS IN FBIS SERIAL REPORTS.  COMMENTS AND QUERIES 
REGARDING THIS PUBLICATION MAY BE DIRECTED TO THE MANAGING EDITOR 
(RENEE MCG. AT (703) 733-6339), THE EDITORIAL ASSISTANT (CHRIS R. AT 
(703) 733-6450), OR INDIVIDUALS AT THE NUMBERS LISTED WITH ITEMS. 

   DEVELOPMENTS 

   DEVELOPMENTS highlights worldwide S&amp;T events reported in the 
foreign media. Items followed by an asterisk will be published in 
full by FBIS. The contributor's name and telephone number are 
provided. 

   Advanced Manufacturing 

   (Japan) Kyoden, a company that designs and manufactures printed 
wiring boards, has launched a prototype modeling service that uses 
rapid prototyping (RP) equipment. Kyoden recently added the Solid- 
Object Ultraviolet Laser Plotter SOUP-600 RP device from 
Mitsubishi's joint venture, CMET, to the SLA-500 machine previously 
acquired from the US company 3D Systems. Kyoden, which has already 
begun receiving orders to produce models of portable telephones and 
computer mice, is aiming for 120 million yen (approximately $1.2 
million) in sales from its RP business in 1994. (For previous 
reporting on Japanese RP developments, see PERSPECTIVES Vol. 8 No. 
12, 30 Dec 93.) (NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 2 Mar 94)* Stephen M. 733-6343 

Aerospace 

   (France) The National Office for Aerospace Studies and Research 
(ONERA) has tested a solid-fuel supersonic-combustion ramjet 
(scramjet) engine containing a plexiglass combustion chamber. The 
chamber, which consists of a short, uniform section attached to a 
flared section, is fueled by hot airflow at Mach 1.5. During the 
test a small amount of gaseous hydrogen was injected into a 
"stabilization zone" in the chamber's inlet to help maintain 
combustion at supersonic speeds. ONERA achieved exhaust speeds of 
Mach 1.1 to 1.4 and up to 87 percent combustion efficiency, with a 
calibration ratio of between 0.49 and 0.66. Heat buildup and 
friction inside the chamber, however, contributed to a 50- to 70- 
percent drop in stagnation pressure throughout the chamber. (AIR &amp; 
COSMOS/AVIATION INTERNATIONAL 10-16 Jan 94)* Alexis M. 733-6345 

   Biotechnology 

   (Russia) A recent press report describes a biotechnology R&amp;D 
contract between the Russian Academy of Medical Sciences' Institute 
of Biomedical Chemistry and the US company Procter &amp; Gamble as the 
"start of a new stage" in the Russian "brain drain" that is 
characterized by the "wholesale purchase" of entire groups of 
scientists at well-equipped research facilities. Both the Russian 
and American partners will retain rights to medicines jointly 
developed under the five-year contract for collaboration in the 
identification of new proteinases, basic research on the computer- 
aided design of drugs, and the development of antiallergens. 
(IZVESTIYA 9 Feb 94) Roberta D. 733-6331 
   (Russia) A Russian scientist at the Academy of Sciences' Physical 
Chemistry Institute has developed and patented geobioscotula (GBS), 
a non-antibiotic, anti-infectious therapeutic agent. The researcher 
produced GBS by saturating water with copper and silver ions through 
electrolysis, using a copper-silver alloy plate as an anode. GBS is 
reported to be effective in killing viruses and bacteria and in 
treating infectious diseases. The scientist achieved positive 
results in 70 percent of patients to whom GBS was administered in 
clinical tests and is seeking government permission for further 
testing to determine optimum concentrations and methods of 
application for the treatment. (NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA 15 Feb 94) 
Roberta D. 733-6331 

   High-Energy Physics 

   (Japan) Ritsumeikan University plans to install a powerful 
synchrotron radiation facility at its Science and Engineering 
Faculty campus, due to open in April 1994 in Kusatsu City, Shiga 
Prefecture. The radiation facility is expected to be operational in 
the spring of 1996. Equipped with large superconducting magnets 
developed by Sumitomo Heavy Industries, the synchrotron device will 
produce intense radiation from electrons accelerated to an energy 
level of 600 million electron volts. The radiation will be used in 
ultrafine semiconductor processing, new materials development, and 
study of the internal structure of living organisms. Ritsumeikan, 
which will be only the second Japanese university with independent 
ownership of a synchrotron radiation facility (Tokyo University has 
a small-scale device), plans to make it available to academia, 
industry, and the government for joint research. (NIHON KEIZAI 
SHIMBUN 31 Jan 94)* John H. 733-6341 

   Power Generation 

   (Japan) The Japan Gas Association and Japanese industry are set 
to begin a five-year joint research project to develop ceramic 
natural gas engines for cogeneration systems and natural gas 
vehicles. The new engine system is expected to reach 46 percent 
power generation efficiency, 50 percent higher than that of 
conventional engine systems. 

   GRAPHIC: Line drawing of ceramic natural gas engine 

   In addition to the Japan Gas Association, project participants 
include Tokyo Gas, Osaka Gas, Toho Gas, and Seibu Gas and industry 
manufacturers Isuzu Ceramics Research Corporation, Noritake Company, 
and Nippon Shokubai. The budget for the project, which is to end in 
fiscal year 1997, is estimated at approximately 5 billion yen ($50 
million), with a first-year budget of 400 million yen ($4 million). 
MITI's Agency of Natural Resources and Energy will fund 50 percent 
of the project's development cost; the groups of participating gas 
companies and manufacturing firms will each provide 25 percent of 
the financing. (NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 5 Jan 94; ENERUGI FORAMU Dec 
93)* Junko A. 733-6346 
   (China) The Nuclear Power Institute of China (NPIC) has completed 
the research and design process for the AC-600, an improved version 
of the 600-megawatt-electric pressurized-water reactor. The new 
reactor, a key science and technology project of China's Eighth 
Five-Year Plan (1991-95), features a core with a higher safety 
margin and simpler systems than the previous 600-megawatt-electric 
reactor. It also has nondynamic systems safety installations 
approved by international atomic energy organizations. The 
conceptual design for the AC-600 was completed in 1987 and an 
independent feasibility study concluded in 1990. The key element in 
the reactor's design, the critical heat-flow density, has been 
completed. The three nondynamic systems safety installations are 
being assembled, with completion expected in 1995, by which time 
NPIC also expects to complete testing and analysis of the reactor's 
overall design and operation. (ZHONGGUO KEXUE BAO 21 Jan 94)* Parker 
H. 733-6336 

   S&amp;T Policy 

   (Kazakhstan) The Kazakh National Academy of Sciences' newly 
elected president, Kenzhegali Sagadiyev, is an economist and the 
first person to be elected to the presidency who is not a member of 
the small, elite class of academicians who have traditionally held 
the top post. He is also the first to assume the position following 
an election in which there were alternate candidates. Sagadiyev's 
selection as a candidate did, however, occur at a secret meeting 
chaired by Kazakhstan's President Nazarbayev. According to the 
Russian weekly POISK, impending reforms in the Kazakh Academy played 
a role in the decision of its former president, Umirzak Sultangazin, 
to retire and undertake full-time scientific work. (POISK, 11-17 Feb 
94) Gary T. 733-6325 
   (Ukraine) The research institutes of the Ukrainian Academy of 
Sciences are facing enormous budget shortfalls as a result of 
dramatic increases this winter in the cost of energy. According to 
Anatoliy Shlak, chief scientist secretary of the Ukrainian Academy 
of Sciences, many institutes do not have enough money to heat their 
buildings and have had to send their personnel home until spring. 
Academy institutes now spend about one-third of their revenues on 
wages and the rest on energy (electricity, fuel oil and coal). 
Especially hard hit are energy-intensive institutes such as the 
Paton Institute of Electric Welding and the Institute of Nuclear 
Research, which employ two-thirds of the academy's workers. The 
budget shortfalls created by the energy crisis leave no funds for 
even local conferences or meetings, and many institutes have been 
unable to procure scientific equipment or renew subscriptions to 
foreign scientific literature. While some scientists are able to 
work at home, those who need laboratories to do their research 
cannot work at all. These problems, coupled with lagging wages, are 
driving Ukrainian scientists out of the academy to commercial 
organizations and accelerating the brain drain to the West. Shlak 
said the academy is experiencing the worst period in its history. 
(PRAVDA UKRAINY 3 Feb 94) Gary T. 733-6325 

   FEATURE ARTICLES 

   JAPAN: H-2 LAUNCH USHERS IN NEW SPACE ERA 

   Topic Sentence: The launch of Japan's first indigenous large 
rocket will be followed by a series of experimental launches 
culminating in the development of a space shuttle by the end of the 
century. 

   Key Points: Japan's successful launch on 4 February 1994 of its 
H-2 rocket positions the National Space Development Agency (NASDA) 
to proceed with the H-2 Orbiting Plane (HOPE) program. The program 
began in 1988 with the ultimate objective of flying by 1999 a 
reusable unmanned space shuttle demonstrator intended to conduct 
service missions to the International Space Station and to validate 
space plane development technologies. 
   Following the successful launch on 4 February 1994 of the H-2, 
the first all-Japanese heavy-lift rocket, Japan's National Space 
Development Agency (NASDA) is poised to proceed with the H-2 
Orbiting Plane (HOPE) program it began in 1988. The goal of the 400- 
to 500-billion yen ($4-5 billion) program is to fly a reusable 
unmanned space shuttle demonstrator--launched by the H-2--by 1999 to 
perform service missions to the International Space Station and to 
validate technologies for future space plane development. Besides 
the Orbiting Reentry Experiment (OREX) vehicle, which was launched 
by the H-2 on 4 February, the program calls for two additional 
experimental vehicles to be launched during 1995-96 to test 
materials and technologies for the shuttle development program. The 
program also calls for upgrading the H-2 and studying ways to make 
the launcher competitive in international markets (NIKKAN KOGYO 
SHIMBUN 5 Feb 94, 14 Feb 94; ASAHI SHIMBUN 5 Feb 94, 7 Feb 94; 
NATIONAL AEROSPACE LABORATORY 1993). 

   HOPE Shuttle 

   Construction of a reusable HOPE space shuttle demonstrator for 
structural, thermal protection, and landing technologies is 
scheduled to begin in 1995. The demonstrator will be 16 meters long 
and 10 meters wide--about the same size as a future operational HOPE 
under NASDA consideration--but will weigh only 10 tons, half as much 
as the operational shuttle. Payload capacity will be 1 ton, whereas 
that of the operational HOPE space plane will be 3 tons. Aluminum 
alloys will be used for the structural material in the airframe, 
which will be coated with protective carbon/carbon materials, 
ceramic tiles, and flexible heat-shielding materials.  In 1999, the 
demonstrator will be launched by an H-2 rocket to a 100-kilometer 
low-Earth orbit. It will reenter the atmosphere at Mach 24, touching 
down on a runway. The shuttle's main functions will be to carry out 
experimental, observation, and satellite-service missions and to 
transfer materials to and from the Japanese Experiment Module (JEM), 
which will be attached to the future International Space Station. It 
will also serve as a technology demonstrator for future space plane 
development. The total cost of the demonstrator program is expected 
to reach 150 billion yen ($1.45 billion). For fiscal year 1994, 
4.779 billion yen ($47.8 million) has been allocated. 

   OREX 

   One of two test spacecraft launched by H-2 on 4 February, the 
OREX collected data on HOPE's thermal protection system and reentry 
profile. (For previous reporting on the OREX experiment, see 
PERSPECTIVES, Vol. 8 No. 10, 31 Oct 93.) 

   ALFLEX 

   The Automatic Landing Flight Experiment (ALFLEX), is to be 
carried out in 1995 over a three-month period. ALFLEX is a one- 
third-scale vehicle designed to validate automatic landing and 
navigation technologies and equipment, including automatic angle-of- 
attack control during flare, an inertial sensor unit, a microwave 
landing system, and a radar altimeter. The scale model, currently 
under development, is 6.1 meters long by 3.8 meters wide and weighs 
760 kilograms. It will be released from a helicopter at an altitude 
of approximately 1.5 kilometers and will make a fully automatic 
landing on a 3,000-meter runway. (For reporting on ALFLEX and on 
wind-tunnel tests being conducted in preparation for this 
experiment, see PERSPECTIVES Vol. 9 No. 2, 28 Feb 94.) 

   HYFLEX 

   In February 1996, a J-1 rocket is scheduled to launch the 
Hypersonic Flight Experiment (HYFLEX), a one-fifth-scale vehicle 
designed to validate HOPE's heat-resistant structures and guidance- 
control systems. The model measures 4.4 meters long by 1.36 meters 
wide by 1.04 meters high, and weighs about 1 ton. It will have 
highly heat-resistant carbon/carbon material covering the nose cone 
and elevons, heat-resistant ceramic tiles on the fuselage and 
stabilization fins, and flexible, heat-shielding materials on the 
upper portion of the fuselage. The model will also be equipped with 
a gas jet, an elevon actuator, and a parachute. It will separate 
from the rocket at an altitude of 110 kilometers and a speed of 4.4 
kilometers per second, then descend into the atmosphere at a high 
angle of attack using the gas jet and elevons for guidance and 
control. When the vehicle reaches subsonic speed, it will parachute 
into the Pacific near the Ogasawara Islands. 

   COVER GRAPHIC: Color illustration of Hypersonic Flight Experiment 
Vehicle 

   GRAPHIC: Line drawing of HYFLEX experiment 

   Enhanced H-2 

   As currently configured, the H-2 can launch a maximum of 10 tons 
to low-Earth orbit at an altitude of up to 250 kilometers. The 
20-ton HOPE would require an upgraded launcher with a lift capacity 
of 15 to 39 tons. Three configurations are being studied for an 
upgraded H-2: 

   GRAPHIC: Line drawing of three configurations for upgraded H-2 

   -- A 15-ton capacity can be achieved by replacing the second 
stage of the existing H-2 with a total of six solid-fuel boosters; 
   -- A 17-ton capacity can be achieved by replacing the two 
existing solid-fuel boosters with two liquid hydrogen boosters, each 
of which would have two LE-7 engines; 
   -- A 27-ton capacity can be achieved by using an LE-7 engine 
together with two hydrocarbon-fueled boosters, each containing four 
additional LE-7 engines. 

   Preparing the H-2 for Commercial Markets 

   With a domestic market that in fiscal year 1992 amounted to only 
200 billion yen ($2 billion), Japan's space industry has largely 
depended on government-driven programs, such as the H-2 program, 
which has involved the participation of various aerospace firms 
under contract to NASDA. (See appendix for corporate participants in 
the H-2 program and large satellites planned for H-2 launch by the 
year 2000.) The Ministry of International Trade and Industry (MITI) 
will conduct a study during fiscal year 1994 to examine ways of 
expanding Japan's aerospace market. 
   Although the development cost for the H-2 was only 270 billion 
yen ($2.6 billion)--one-third to one-half that of other countries' 
launchers--its launch cost is 19 billion yen ($189 million), or 
about twice that of the European Ariane-4. That, plus the fact that 
H-2 launches can only take place twice a year--during January/ 
February and August/September so as not to disrupt the local fishing 
season--puts the H-2 at a significant competitive disadvantage in 
global markets. Negotiations are under way with local fishermen for 
a more flexible schedule. In addition, cost-cutting measures, such 
as mass-production, increased automation, use of cheaper materials, 
and more efficient testing procedures are being considered. 
According to Takaaki Yamada, president of Rocket Systems 
Corporation--a consortium formed in July 1990 by about 70 
Japanese aerospace firms to market the H-2--these measures could 
lead to cost reductions of some 30 to 50 percent. 

   Appendix 
   Major Corporate Participants in the H-2 Rocket Development 
Program 
Mitsubishi Heavy Industries, Ltd. (MHI) (prime contractor for 
airframes and engines) 
Ishikawajima-Harima Heavy Industries, Co., Ltd. (IHI) (engines) 
Kawasaki Heavy Industries, Ltd. (KHI) (fairings) 
Nissan Motor Company, Ltd. (solid rocket motors) 
Nippon Electric Corporation (NEC), Mitsubishi Electric Corporation, 
Japan Aviation Electric Industry, Ltd., and Mitsubishi Precision 
Co., Ltd. (onboard electronic equipment) 
MHI, IHI, KHI, Oki Electric, NEC, and Toshiba (launch complex 
facilities, communication and radio systems, and launch control 
system facilities) 
MHI as head of a group of seven manufacturers (the OREX vehicle) 
IHI and Toshiba (the VEP, an H-2 launch vehicle evaluation payload) 
(For previous reporting on the VEP package, see Perspectives Vol. 8 
No. 11, 30 November 1993) 

   Large Satellites Planned for H-2 Launch by the Year 2000 

1. ETS-6, a 2-ton engineering test satellite (summer 1994) 
2. GMS-5, a 345-kilogram geostationary meteorological satellite 
(February 1995) 
3. SFU, a 4-ton space flyer unit (February 1995) 
4. ADEOS-1, a 3.5-ton Earth-observation satellite (February 1996) 
5. ETS-7, an engineering test satellite (summer 1997) 
6. TRMM, a 3.6-ton tropical rainfall-observation satellite (summer 
1997) 
7. OICETS, an optical intersatellite communication experimental 
satellite (February 1997) 
8. COMETS, an advanced communications technology satellite (February 
1997) 
9. ADEOS-2, an Earth-observation satellite (February 1998) 
10. HIROS, a high-resolution observation satellite (1999) 
   Junko A. 733-6346 

   SOUTH KOREA: ACQUIRING DUAL-USE ADVANCED WEAPONS TECHNOLOGY 

   Topic Sentence: Articles on several new technologies and 
equipment types that qualify as "dual-use" by standard criteria have 
appeared over the past few months in South Korean and Japanese 
publications. 
   Key Points: Press articles written last year by members of South 
Korea's military and civilian S&amp;T establishments call for a 
coordinated program to develop dual-use technologies that can be 
used to manufacture highly advanced weapons "if the need arises." 
South Korean press sources note that any efforts by South Korea to 
acquire advanced weapons components or technology would be enhanced 
by S&amp;T agreements recently concluded with Russia, China, and Israel. 

   In the past year, several articles have appeared in the South 
Korean press urging the government to support dual-use technology as 
a hedge against an "uncertain" future. For example, the December 
1992 issue of KUKBANG KWA KISUL argued that changes in the world's 
geopolitical relationships have made it impossible for South Korea 
to defend itself by relying on foreign equipment and technology. Not 
only are traditional suppliers reluctant to transfer technology, but 
the defense requirements themselves are changing, forcing South 
Korea to "consider medium and long-term plans to secure the military 
power to deal with countries on the periphery through S&amp;T 
development for national defense and qualitatively superior weapons 
systems." The journal claimed the key to both problems lies in 
"strengthening the bonds" between government and the defense 
industry, and in South Korea's use of its own technology to develop 
sophisticated independent weapons systems. 
   The same journal featured an article in May 1993 by a nuclear 
engineer from South Korea's Agency for Defense Development on the 
need to apply nuclear technology to national defense. The article 
maintained that the distinction between civilian and military use of 
nuclear technology is unclear, and that products with defense 
applications can be "derived" by improving South Korea's use of 
nuclear power. The article highlighted the engineer's remark that 
South Korea "must vigorously invest right now in research and 
development of the nuclear power industry, so that we can make use 
of it under new conditions if the situation changes. We have to 
maintain at least a technical capability." 
   Similarly, a senior researcher at the Korea Institute of Science 
and Technology's (KIST's) Policy Management Research Institute wrote 
in the July 1993 issue of KUKBANG KWA KISUL that "South Korea needs 
to establish a new policy that can achieve the two national goals of 
economic development and national security." What is needed, 
according to the KIST researcher, is a "coordinated program" to 
develop "dual-use technology" with both civilian and military 
applications, that will enable South Korea to "deal with changes as 
the need arises." The 4 August 1993 CHUGAN MAEGYONG made the same 
basic plea for "dual technologies," developed through coordination 
between the South Korean Defense Ministry, the Ministry of Trade, 
Industry, and Energy (MOTIE), and the Ministry of Science and 
Technology (MOST). In the 30 August 1993 MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN (MKS), 
the head of the Korea Advanced Institute of Science and Technology 
(KAIST), which was directly responsible for two of the dual-use 
projects listed below, wrote that South Korea's present task is to 
create an independent national defense based on high technology 
appropriate to the post-cold-war era and developed through greater 
cooperation between the military and industrial sectors. 

   New Technology, Equipment With Potential Weapons Applications 

   Recent South Korean and Japanese media reports describe some 
commercial technologies developed or acquired by South Korean 
companies and government institutes that could be used to design or 
manufacture highly advanced weapons. All of the technologies listed 
below qualify by widely accepted criteria as dual-use in the sense 
described above. 
   -- An electron-beam welder developed jointly by the Korea 
Institute of Machinery and Metals (KIMM) and Korea Ion for some 200 
million won ($250,000) can be used for precision welding and to join 
different types of metals (MKS 23 Oct 93). 
   -- An ion-nitriding electric furnace and numerically-controlled, 
gas-powered metal-cutting machinery has been developed by KIMM 
(CHUGAN MAEGYONG 29 Dec 93). 
   -- An ultra-high precision (nanometer-scale) lathe has been 
developed by KAIST (CHUGAN MAEGYONG 29 Dec 93). 
   -- High-speed image processing equipment has been developed by a 
team from KAIST's chemical research laboratory to observe "how 
molecules of a material undergoing a disintegrating reaction are 
spatially distributed." The equipment uses a high-energy charge- 
coupled device for "direct observation of the size and form of the 
disintegrating material's distribution in three dimensions." The 
only other institutions in the world that reportedly have this 
equipment are the US Sandia National Laboratory and one US and one 
Japanese university (MKS 22 Jan 94). 
   -- Manufacturing technology for instruments able to measure high 
pressure was obtained from an unidentified Russian research 
institute. This is one of several technologies reportedly being 
acquired by South Korean firms through R&amp;D contracts with Russia 
(HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN 11 Sep 93). 
   -- A high-energy capacitor developed by Daewoo can withstand 
severe shock and extreme temperatures, and can operate in a vacuum 
(CHUGAN MAEGYONG 9 Jun 93). 
   -- Technology for a solid-fuel rocket engine able to boost a 50- 
to 70-kilogram payload to an altitude of 80 to 90 kilometers has 
been developed by the Korea Aerospace Research Institute (KARI). 
Projected performance doubles that achieved by South Korea's 
indigenous KSR-420 rockets launched in 1993, and gives South Korea 
the ability to develop a rocket booster that "meets South Korea's 
particular needs" (CHUGAN MAEGYONG 29 Dec 93). 
   -- A small gas turbine is to be developed by Korea Air for 
commercial use in generating electricity and as a prototype to 
develop related technology "for such things as aircraft engines." 
Without mentioning the Korea Air project, KIMM's director also said 
his institute would "indigenize" a "small gas turbine engine" (MKS 7 
Jan 94). 
   -- An inertial navigation system (INS) has been developed by 
Korea Air, a company that also plans to acquire aviation electronics 
technology through a buyout of Litton Korea, a firm specializing in 
INS equipment (MKS 5 Jan 94). 
   -- A pilotless helicopter being developed by Daewoo Heavy 
Industries in cooperation with Russian scientists is to be used for 
sowing seeds and spraying agricultural chemicals (SIN TONGA Apr 93; 
CHOSON ILBO 5 Apr 93). 
   -- A Cray model C916 supercomputer, reportedly the company's 
most powerful, has been acquired for KIST's Systems Engineering 
Research Institute. The computer reportedly will be used for 
structural analysis and fluid mechanics simulations, weather 
forecasting, and researching environmental problems (NIKKEI SANGYO 
30 Jun 93). 
   -- A computer software research center has been established in 
Moscow by Samsung Electronics. Samsung, a major defense contractor, 
hopes to take advantage of the large number of high-level Russian 
military software development technicians in Moscow and plans to 
become involved in joint projects with Russian Government research 
agencies (NIKKEI SANGYO 29 Nov 93). 

   Foreign S&amp;T Agreements Conducive to Weapons Technology Transfer 

   As noted in the South Korean press, the country's efforts to 
acquire dual-use technologies are likely to be enhanced by recent 
S&amp;T agreements with three major arms and arms technology exporting 
countries: Russia, China, and Israel. Russia, in particular, has 
attracted South Korean media attention with its reported offers to 
barter advanced weapons (CHUNGANG ILBO 24 Jan 94) and enriched 
uranium (YONHAP 25 Jan 94) to repay its debts to South Korea. The 
infrastructure is already in place for acquiring other types of 
sophisticated Russian technology. In addition to various "S&amp;T 
cooperative centers" and "industrial cooperation information 
centers" established in Russia during the past year, the South 
Korean Government operates at least two organizations through MOST 
(HKS 13 Oct 93) and MOTIE (MKS 9 Nov 93) aimed at recruiting Russian 
scientists and transferring advanced technology. 
   Arrangements to acquire Russian aerospace technology have been 
concluded by South Korea's three largest defense contractors, Daewoo 
Heavy Industries (MKS 8 Jan 93), Samsung Aerospace (HKS 1 Aug 93), 
and Hyundai--which reportedly sent some 30 PhDs to Russia to study 
"satellite technology" (HKS 31 Jul 93), and has a joint venture with 
the aerospace firm Yakovlev (CHUNGANG ILBO 5 Nov 93). A 24 December 
1992 CHUGAN CHOSON report describes how an unnamed South Korean 
company successfully bribed a Russian technician to hand over 
electronics technology that could not be obtained through formal 
channels. 
   On 5 November 1993, YONHAP reported some details of an S&amp;T 
agreement signed by China and South Korea on 20 September 1993, 
including joint development of a "multipurpose satellite, aircraft 
design and testing technology, and medical lasers." The satellite 
project was described by YONHAP as paving the way for a Chinese- 
Korean partnership in the defense industry. Citing diplomatic 
sources, YONHAP also noted that "cooperation in nuclear energy may 
be not only in the reactor sector but could possibly develop into a 
closer and wider partnership in the field." In addition, the 5 
October 1993 CHOSON ILBO reported on an agreement with Israel 
concerning scientific cooperation on several levels. The paper 
observed that Israel, which is shifting much of its state-funded 
research from military to civilian projects, is entering the 
agreement partly out of "concern about employment for its high-level 
S&amp;T personnel in defense-related industries." 
William H. 733-6521 

   FRANCE:  EXPERIMENTAL TELECOMMUNICATIONS SATELLITE 

   Topic Sentence: France plans to develop a 1.5-ton experimental 
telecommunications satellite to be launched by mid-1998. 

   Key Points: The French Government has approved the development by 
the French aerospace industry of an experimental telecommunications 
satellite for use by both military and commercial customers. The 
satellite will conduct experiments in geostationary orbit on 
technologies for ion propulsion, active antennas, and onboard 
switching systems. The $410 million development project will be open 
to participation by France's traditional European aerospace 
partners. 
   French Minister of Industry, Post, Telecommunications, and 
Foreign Trade Gerard Longuet has approved the development of an 
experimental telecommunications satellite recommended in a 
government report that identifies the advanced technologies that 
will be critical to the French space communications industry by the 
end of the decade (AIR &amp; COSMOS/AVIATION INTERNATIONAL 20 Dec 93-2 
Jan 94). The report, written in collaboration with the private and 
public sectors, identifies experiments in geostationary orbit to 
validate technologies for ion propulsion, active antennas, and 
onboard switching systems as a top priority. It recommends a small, 
1.5-ton satellite with a development cost of about 2.5 billion 
francs (about $410 million) as a "realistic" option, given current 
financial constraints. Although Longuet admits that 1994 project 
funding may be difficult to obtain, he has asked the National Center 
for Space Studies (CNES) to prepare a technical proposal to present 
to Prime Minister Edouard Balladur this spring. Longuet hopes to 
begin the project by late 1994 and is aiming for a mid-1998 launch 
date. 
   The satellite development project, which will serve both civil 
and military interests, will be managed by a committee reporting to 
the Ministries of Industry and Defense. The committee will oversee a 
team including the General Directorate for Armaments (DGA) and 
France Telecom and headed by CNES, which will assume the bulk of the 
operating costs. Alcatel Espace, Aerospatiale, and Matra Marconi 
Space (MMS) will make up the industrial committee, with MMS as the 
project leader, Aerospatiale responsible for the platform, and 
Alcatel responsible for the payload. MMS will build the satellite in 
Toulouse and Aerospatiale will assemble it in Cannes. According to 
Longuet, France will take the leading role, and French equipment 
manufacturers Dassault Electronique, Thomson, Sagem, Sextant, and 
European Propulsion Company (SEP) will participate in the 
satellite's construction. In the interest of competitiveness and to 
help finance the project, it will be open to other European firms as 
well, especially France's traditional aerospace partners, such as 
Germany's Deutsche Aerospace, Belgium's ETCA, and the UK's MMS-UK. 
The experimental payload for the satellite will consist of two 
Ku-band active electronic-scanning antennas and an onboard switching 
system, all built by Alcatel. The antennas, one for transmission and 
another for reception, will consist of 46 and 32 modules distributed 
on panels measuring 900 and 600 millimeters square, respectively. 
Each antenna will aim, and reconf igure according to ground control, 
four beams at 12 to 14 gigahertz. The antennas will be linked to 
three traveling-wave-tube transponders, one of which is connected to 
the microprocessor-based onboard signal processing system (OBP). 
This equipment will be either a smaller (4 x 33 megabits) version of 
the civil OBP developed by the European Space Agency or the military 
OBP (with coding and antijamming capability) developed by the 
General Directorate for Armaments (DGA). 
   The satellite will also have the first European electric xenon- 
plasma propulsion system, consisting of two small, energy-efficient 
thrusters developed by France's SEP and the Russian firm Mireva (see 
PERSPECTIVES Vol. 8 No. 10, 31 Oct 93) in an effort to reduce the 
weight and cost of telecommunications satellites. 
   These components will be mounted on a modular "hybrid" platform 
that combines Aerospatiale's Eurostar and MMS's Spacebus 1000 three- 
axis-stabilized designs with structures of aluminum/carbon sandwich 
composite materials. The lightweight wiring system will consist of 
aluminum wires and subminiature connectors. The satellite platform 
is box-shaped, with flat panels surrounding a central cylinder 
containing the two tanks that hold the chemical bipropellants for 
the propulsion system. One component of this system, a 400-newton 
engine, will be used for orbit transfer and control; small 10-newton 
thrusters will be used for three-axis control of the satellite's 
attitude and for north-south stabilization if the experimental ion 
propulsion system should fail. Three-axis attitude control will also 
be ensured (to nearly 0.05 degrees by several means, including: 
using a momentum wheel on a magnetic bearing; using a new technique 
for shifting the satellite's center of gravity by moving the solar 
panels; and using an autonomous Navstar/Global Positioning System 
(GPS) satellite navigation package. 
   The platform will also have autonomous onboard management 
capability based on a 1750-type central computer with uploadable 
software, linked by a high-speed bus to the peripherals for the 
payload and servicing equipment. The thermal control system for the 
platform will use passive technology based on coatings, insulators, 
heaters, and optical solar reflectors. Thermal control for the 
payload will be active, consisting of capillary-pumping fluid loops 
for the antennas and constant-conductance heat pipes linked to 
deployable radiators. Electric power will be supplied by a 
lightweight, GSR-3-type solar generator with two deployable wings, 
each consisting of two segments, one made of silicon photocells, the 
other of gallium arsenide cells on a germanium substrate. The 
panels, which are regulated by electric motors, will be fully 
deployed in transfer orbit and will provide 1.6 kilowatts of power 
over a service life of three years. The circuit will be continuously 
controlled by nickel-hydride (NH2) batteries. 
   The satellite will weigh about 1.5 tons, including the payload 
(about 220 kilograms), the platform (about 600 kilograms), and the 
propellant (about 680 kilograms). Depending upon the type of OBP 
used, the satellite's projected budget is 2.5 to 2.8 billion francs 
(about $410 million to $460 million), including launch by either 
Ariane 4 or 5 at a cost of 300 million francs (about $50 million). 
Alexis M. 733-6345 

   REPORTS 

   REPORTS surveys science and technology trends as detailed in 
articles, books, journals, and other open source documents. 

   JAPAN: SUPERCONDUCTING POWER GENERATOR 

   On 21 October 1993 the Engineering Research Association for 
Superconductive Generation Equipment and Materials (SUPER-GM), which 
has been conducting R&amp;D on "superconducting power applications" 
under contract with the New Energy and Industrial Technology 
Development Organization (NEDO) since 1989, announced plans to build 
a 70-megawatt-class superconducting power generator prototype, the 
world's largest. 

   GRAPHIC: Artist's color illustration of 70-megawatt 
superconducting power generator prototype 
   SUPER-GM has already developed a number of the components (shown 
below) that will be included in its 70-megawatt generator. 
   GRAPHIC: Color photo of field winding prototype (ultrahigh-speed 
response) 
   GRAPHIC: Color photo of stator winding prototype undergoing 
testing 
   GRAPHIC: Color photo of rotor field winding mounting axis 
prototype (low-speed response) 

   The helium cooling system developed for the 70-megawatt power 
generator prototype has achieved 10,000 hours of continuous 
operation and maintained a level of helium impurity concentration 
below 0.1 part per million. An oil-free compressor currently under 
development should improve reliability. 

   GRAPHIC: Color photo of helium supply/exhaust device undergoing 
testing 
   GRAPHIC: Color photo of helium cooling system's cold box 
prototype 
   GRAPHIC: Color photo of helium cooling system's turbo-style oil- 
free compressor unit prototype (under development) 

   The SUPER-GM program has already developed superconducting wires 
for use in field windings in superconducting power generators. The 
photos below show niobium-titanium 10-kiloampere-class 
superconducting wires. 

   GRAPHIC: Color photo of high-stability conductor 
   GRAPHIC: Color photo of high-current-density conductor 
   GRAPHIC: Color photo of low-loss conductor 
   GRAPHIC: Color illustration of superconducting field winding 

   R&amp;D is under way to develop alternating current (AC) metal 
superconducting wires and high-temperature superconducting oxide 
wires (shown in photos below) designed specifically for future 
applications in power equipment (SUPER-GM Oct 93, NIKKEI SANGYO 
SHIMBUN 22 Oct 93). 

   GRAPHIC: Color photo of superconducting stranded wires (Nb3Sn) 
   GRAPHIC: Color photo of yttrium-based oxide tape-like wire 
material 

   From fiscal years 1996 to 1999, researchers will conduct 
demonstration tests to assess system performance and operational 
reliability and ultimately, to help design a 200-megawatt pilot 
generator. The demonstration facility will consist of a 
superconducting power generator, an electric motor acting as the 
drive, and a helium cooling system that maintains extremely low 
temperature (-269 degrees C). Total construction costs are expected 
to be about 7 billion yen ($70 million). Compared with previously 
developed superconducting power generators, improvements in the new 
design include a 1-percent increase in generation efficiency, a 
50-percent reduction in size and weight, and an increase of up to 
1.5 times in the power sent through transmission lines. Japanese 
developers expect to market the superconducting power generator 
early in the 21st century. 
   The diagram below illustrates the R&amp;D schedule for SUPER-GM's 
superconducting power generator. 
   GRAPHIC: Diagram of the 1988-1998 development schedule for SUPER- 
GM's 70-megawatt superconducting power generator 
Junko A. 733-6346 

   CHINA: ATOMIC-SCALE LITHOGRAPHY USING SCANNING TUNNELING 
MICROSCOPE 

   Researchers from the Chinese Academy of Sciences' (CAS') Beijing 
Vacuum Physics Laboratory (BVPL) have achieved room-temperature 
direct modification of single-crystal-silicon surface atoms using a 
scanning tunneling microscope (STM) probe. An STM micrograph of the 
three Chinese characters, "Mao Zedong", drawn with the probe, is 
shown below. The background shows the lattice of individual silicon 
atoms. 

   GRAPHIC: B/W photo of STM micrograph 

   In the micrograph, average line width is 2 to 3 nanometers (20 to 
30 Angstroms), or three to six silicon atoms; individual character 
size ranges from 28 to 34 nanometers (280 to 340 Angstroms). To 
date, the best effort of a joint team of BVPL and CAS Institute of 
Chemistry researchers was a 10-nanometer linewidth for 200-nanometer 
x 200-nanometer characters drawn directly onto a graphite surface 
using the STM probe (see PERSPECTIVES Vol. 7 No. 13, 31 Dec 92). The 
BVPL scientists also succeeded in sequenced "transplantation" of the 
surface silicon atoms, moving them from one straight line and 
redepositing them to form a second, raised straight line. The 
Chinese researchers expect to apply their atomic-scale lithography 
to developments in nanoelectronics and nanomachines, especially 
nanorobots (KEJI RIBAO 7 Feb 94). 
Thomas T. 733-6342 

   JAPAN: ATOMIC-SCALE DESIGN WITH SCANNING TUNNELING MICROSCOPE 

   Scientists at the Research and Development Corporation of Japan's 
Aono Atom Surface Control Project have developed a technology they 
claim greatly reduces the time required for the fabrication of 
atomic-scale structures and designs. After applying pulse voltage (5 
volts at 30-millisecond intervals) to the probe tip of a scanning 
tunneling microscope placed near a silicon substrate, researchers 
were able to transfer atoms from the tip to the silicon surface. In 
repetitive, reproducible experiments, each of the atoms was 
extracted from the surface. When the voltage polarity was reversed, 
the atoms were released and re-deposited at selected locations on 
the surface. Such atomic manipulation was not reproducible before 
the Aono project because scientists could not be certain when the 
extracted atom was adhering to the probe tip and when it was being 
released. The Japanese researchers developed a method to detect and 
analyze in real time very weak signal changes that always occur when 
the atom is either adhering to the tip or being released from it. In 
these experiments the researchers used both hydrogen atoms and 
silicon atoms to etch nanometer-scale grooves and ridges onto the 
substrate; in future tests they plan real-time analysis of other 
types of atoms. The developers expect this "atomcraft" to be used in 
future-generation ultra-fine semiconductor processing and in the 
development of new materials (NIHON KOGYO SHIMBUN 7 Jan 94). 
John H. 733-6341 

   EUROPE: JOINT FINANCING FOR SPOT 4 VEGETATION INSTRUMENT 

   The European Union and France's National Center for Space Studies 
(CNES) have agreed on joint financing for an agricultural and 
environmental monitoring package to be included on board France's 
SPOT 4 Earth-observation satellite, scheduled for launch in mid- 
1997. This agreement follows 1989 budget cuts in the SPOT 4 program 
and France's subsequent cancellation of its plans to develop the 
package. The European Union will provide 16 million ECUs or half of 
the program's estimated construction cost (about $36 million). CNES 
will be responsible for construction, with Aerospatiale as prime 
contractor. Subcontractors will include other French companies as 
well as Belgian, Italian, and Swedish firms (AIR &amp; COSMOS/AVIATION 
INTERNATIONAL 7-13 Feb 94). 
   The sensor package, known as the Vegetation instrument, will 
weigh 160 kilograms and will consist of a platform carrying an 
optical bench with five cameras, associated electronics, and an L- 
band antenna. Capable of photographing the Earth in the visible and 
near infrared ranges with a resolution to 1 kilometer, the 
Vegetation instrument will be used to observe natural ecosystems as 
well as continental agricultural systems, according to CNES. The 
European Union will use the data gathered by the instrument to guide 
policy on agriculture, environment, research, and related 
international cooperation. The data will be used specifically by the 
Institute for Applications of Remote Sensing, which is part of the 
European Union's Joint Research Center in Ispra, Italy. 
Alexis M. 733-6345 

   CHINA: FREE ELECTRON LASER RESEARCH 

   Chinese physicists who used a radio-frequency linear accelerator 
to generate Asia's first infrared free electron laser (FEL) light in 
May 1993 (see PERSPECTIVES, Vol. 8 No. 8, 31 Aug 93) have succeeded 
both in raising the charge density of the electron beam in the 
undulator interaction zone and in improving the uniformity of the 
electron-beam quality factor within the 4-microsecond-wide 
macropulse. This permitted researchers at the Beijing FEL (BFEL) 
facility of the Chinese Academy of Sciences' Institute of High- 
Energy Physics to improve system gain from the original 6 percent to 
17 percent. On 28 December 1993 the scientists thereby achieved 
saturated oscillation with a saturated-oscillation maximum output 
energy of 3 millijoules, a saturated-oscillation pulse plateau width 
of 2 microseconds, and an intracavity oscillation average power of 
190 kilowatts. The BFEL physicists also raised stimulated 
oscillation signal strength by 100,000 times and spontaneous 
radiation strength by 100 million times (RENMIN RIBAO OVERSEAS 
EDITION 15 Jan 94; ZHONGGUO KEXUE BAO 10 Jan 94; GUANGXUE XUEBAO 
Vol. 13 No. 5, May 93). 
   In related research, scientists at Beijing University's Technical 
Physics Department and at the Chinese Academy of Engineering 
Physics' Institute of Applied Electronics have been conducting joint 
experiments on an 8-millimeter-wavelength multi-electron-beam 
Cerenkov FEL oscillator. Using a small accelerator to provide 374- 
kilovolt, 1,036-ampere electron beams, the physicists generated a 
laser output power of 9.1 megawatts at a wavelength of 8.3 
millimeters with an efficiency of 2.3 percent, ten times higher than 
that achieved with similar devices developed and tested in other 
countries (KEJI RIBAO, 27 Jan 94). 
Thomas T. 733-6342 

   JAPAN: RAMJET TEST FACILITY COMPLETED 

   Construction of Japan's first ramjet test facility, which began 
in 1989 at the Kakuda Research Center, has been completed with a 
total investment by the Science and Technology Agency's National 
Aerospace Laboratory (NAL) of about 3.5 billion yen ($35 million). 
The new test facility can simulate a high-speed, low-pressure 
atmosphere like that in which space planes will fly at 20- to 35- 
kilometer altitudes. 
   Researchers use a heat reservoir heater and a combustion heater 
together to heat gas under high pressure (up to 100 atmospheres) to 
2,300 degrees C. The heat reservoir heater, 2 meters in diameter and 
about 10 meters high, contains aluminum oxide bricks that function 
as heat exchangers. The combustion heater burns a mixture of 
hydrogen and oxygen. Performance, pressure, and temperature 
throughout the engine are measured while it is kept in an air 
current accelerated through a supersonic nozzle with a 51-centimeter 
x 51-centimeter outlet. To simulate conditions at altitude, the 
ramjet facility is connected to the exhaust system of the existing 
rocket engine high-altitude performance test facility. The pressure 
in the low-pressure chamber, which houses the engine and propulsion 
measurement equipment, is lowered to between 0.1 and 0.01 
atmosphere. 
   Other features of the ramjet test facility include: a wide range 
of flight simulation capabilities, from Mach 4 to Mach 8; the 
ability to test at up to Mach 6 using pure gas heated by the heat 
reservoir heater; a comparison of engine performance using heated 
pure gas and combustion exhaust gas; the capability to simulate 
engine regenerative cooling by holding the temperatures of hydrogen 
and engine fuel to between -253 degrees C and 500 degrees C; and the 
capability to measure the main thrust, lift, and vertical moment 
generated by the engine. 
   The ramjet will serve as the main engine for Japan's space 
planes, aircraft that will take off like airplanes, fly like 
satellites in space orbit, and land once again like airplanes 
(KAGAKU GIJUTSU JANARU Dec 93, KOGIKEN NYUSU Nov 93). 
Junko A. 733-6346 

   GERMANY: HYPERSONIC TURBORAMJET ENGINE 

   Researchers at Motoren- und Turbinen-Union (MTU) have completed 
the design for the first-stage hybrid airbreathing propulsion system 
for the future Saenger hypersonic space transportation vehicle (AIR 
&amp; COSMOS/AVIATION INTERNATIONAL 7-13 Feb 94). (For previous 
reporting on the Saenger program, see PERSPECTIVES Vol. 5 No. 12, 31 
Dec 90.) The coaxial, liquid-hydrogen turbojet/ramjet engine 
consists of a rectangular air inlet attached to a diffuser, an 
af terburner duct that also serves as the ramjet's combustion 
chamber, and an asymmetrical, hydrogen-cooled ejector nozzle with a 
carbon-fiber- reinforced carbon expansion ramp at the rear. The 
turbojet is designed to propel the plane to about Mach 3.5 (and is 
protected during hypersonic flight by a shutoff system). The ramjet 
would begin operating between Mach 3.0 and 3.8 (the transition 
phase) and would propel the plane to Mach 7. Researchers are 
currently testing the ramjet's air inlet, combustion chamber, 
ejector nozzle, and cooling system. (For previous reporting on 
nozzle tests, see PERSPECTIVES Vol. 8 No. 7, 30 Jul 93). 
   Phase two of the program calls for development of a reduced-scale 
hypersonic flight demonstrator engine, called TDR 500, by 1995. The 
7-meter long engine will consist of a variable-geometry, rectangular 
air inlet, a circular combustion chamber 50 centimeters in diameter, 
and an asymmetrical nozzle with an expansion ramp. The tests will 
have to be conducted in the United States or in Russia because there 
are no facilities in Europe to test such an engine. 
   During the third phase of the program to begin about the year 
2006, supersonic combustion ramjet (scramjet) technology studies 
will be carried out by the German Aerospace Research Establishment 
(DLR) in cooperation with Russia's Central Institute of 
Aerohydrodynamics, which has been involved in the program since 
1992. 
Alexis M. 733-6345 

   RUSSIA: MILITARY ELECTRONIC MEDICAL TREATMENT CONVERTED TO 
CIVILIAN USE 

   Russia has declassified and begun selling an electronic stimulant 
pill developed in 1984 by the Soviet military. The capsule contains 
a power source and a microprocessor that stimulates organs by 
sending them electrical pulses through nerve endings in the stomach 
and intestine. The pill is eliminated from the body within 25 to 30 
hours, but its therapeutic effect lasts for several months. The 
developers claim that in addition to enhancing immunity and physical 
stamina, the pill reverses intractable coma and shock and that it 
may have applications in oncology. Since developing the capsule, 
researchers have determined that applying a thin layer of zinc, 
copper, or silver to the pill's surface facilitates absorption of 
the metal ions by the blood, increasing the effectiveness of the 
treatment. The pill was clinically tested at the Institute of 
Surgery and the military initially produced it in small quantities 
for treatment of elites. Since 1991, the plant has converted to 
civilian production, and Russia's Ecomed scientific production 
association has begun selling the capsule through pharmacies (TRUD 
12 Mar 94; MOSCOW NEWS No 7, 18-24 Feb 94). 
Roberta D. 733-6331 

   JAPAN: ELECTROSTATIC MOTOR FOR MICROMACHINES 

   Matsushita Research Institute has developed a miniature 
electrostatic motor for micromachines by combining semiconductor 
manufacturing technology with machining techniques. The motor, 1.4 
millimeters in diameter and approximately 10 millimeters long, 
consists of a rotating shaft laminated with a dielectric substance 
and electrode and supported by a bearing attached to a substrate. 
The tube-like bearing contains 16 electrodes, separated from the 
shaft by an 11-micron gap. Electrostatic force generated by the 
sequential application of 350 volts to the electrodes drives the 
motor at 100 revolutions per minute. Its torque is about 500 times 
that of other motors of comparable size. Matsushita developed the 
motor as part of a contract with the Micromachine Center, a 
nonprofit foundation established in January 1992 within the 
Machinery and Information Industries Bureau under the Ministry of 
International Trade and Industry (MITI). The Micromachine Center is 
working under MITI's New Energy and Industrial Technology 
Development Organization (NEDO) as an information "clearinghouse" in 
MITI's 10-year micromachine program (fiscal years 1991 to 2000). 
(NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 21 Jan 94, 18 Feb 92; NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 23 
Jan 92) 
Stephen M. 733-6343 

   JAPAN: TEMPERATURE-CONTROL PAINT FOR AEROSPACE APPLICATIONS 

   Nippon Paint Company has developed a paint that will be used to 
control the surface and interior temperatures of satellites. The 
paint, certified by the National Aerospace Laboratory for use on 
aerospace parts, will be used for the largest Japanese advanced 
earth observation satellite, the ADEOS, which is scheduled for 
launch in February 1996. (For previous reporting on ADEOS, see 
PERSPECTIVES Vol. 8 No. 11, 30 Nov 93). Developers believe the new 
paint could also be used to control temperature fluctuations in 
automobiles and buildings if production costs can be lowered. 
   Nippon Paint has also developed temperature-control paint for 
antennas, using a paint base material that contains the silicon 
resin, "NOVA500 ASTRO WHITE" (trade name). Another paint developed 
for equipment uses a base that contains the urethane resin, "NOVA5OO 
ASTRO BLACK" (trade name). In addition, Nippon claims it has 
developed a white pigment that controls absorption of solar energy 
by antennas. Adding the pigment to the paint results in a solar 
absorption rate of about 0.26, and a solar energy vertical radiation 
rate of about 0.88 for the antenna. This holds the surface 
temperature of the antenna to about 120 degrees C, whereas an 
unpainted antenna would reach nearly 500 degrees C. The new paint's 
high elasticity prevents it from cracking, even when exposed to 
extreme temperatures. Addition of a special inorganic ultraviolet 
absorbent material also increases durability under extreme 
conditions. The paint used on satellite-mounted sensors, receivers, 
and recorders contains a special elastic urethane resin that excels 
at heat radiation and irradiates outward the heat waves emitted by 
the onboard equipment. 
   The company solved the problem of paint gasification by 
developing a technology to remove the low-molecular-weight portion 
of the resin (KAGAKU KOGYO NIPPO 10 Dec 93). 
Junko A. 733-6346 

   SPECIAL PUBLICATIONS 
   JAPAN: AUTOMOTIVE TECHNOLOGIES 
A special issue of the JPRS report series SCIENCE &amp; TECHNOLOGY/JAPAN 

entitled "Electric Vehicle, Other Automotive Technology 
Developments" (JPRS-JST-94-014-L, 5 April 94), presents reporting on 
Japanese developments concerning electric vehicles, car navigation 
systems, and related advanced design techniques. 
Stephen M. 733-6343 

   FOREIGN MEDIA NOTES 

   Foreign Media Notes are narrative reports that summarize and 
distill information from one or several sources for rapid processing 
and targeted dissemination. 

   JAPAN: SPOTLIGHT ON JAPAN ASSOCIATION OF DEFENSE INDUSTRY 
The Japan Association of Defense Industry, under the administration 
of the Japan Defense Agency and the Ministry of International Trade 
and Industry, promotes the development of Japanese defense 
technology and equipment, monitors foreign technology, lobbies on 
behalf of its corporate members, and cooperates with the government 
on export controls. (FB PN 94-036, 21 Mar 94) 
Stephen M. 733-6343 

   EUROPE/INTERNATIONAL: HIGH-TECH INDUSTRY HIGHLIGHTS 

   This report includes articles on French research policy, a German 
semiconductor laser research program, an agreement between China and 
the German company DASA for the development and marketing of 
telecommunications and Earth observation satellites, and a list of 
annual reports for various European companies involved in R&amp;D of 
economically competitive technologies. (FB PN 94-037, 22 Mar 94) 
Bryan C. 733-6335 

   GRAY LITERATURE 

   Technology Issues Division has acquired the proceedings, other 
conference-related papers, and corporate and organization reports 
listed below, copies of which are available upon request for a 
period of six months from the date of this PERSPECTIVES--contact 
Cathy G. (703) 482-4182. 
   All contractor requests must be received in writing, by letter 
(FBIS/CSG/PPD, GE47 OHB, Washington, DC 20505) or by fax ((703) 734- 
9408), on the sponsoring agency's letterhead and signed by the 
contracting officer technical representative. 
   Please use the number in parentheses at the end of the paragraph 
when requesting proceedings. 

   PROCEEDINGS 

   23rd EUROPEAN SOLID STATE DEVICE RESEARCH CONFERENCE, held 13-16 
September 1993 in Grenoble, France. The 969-page proceedings 
contains abstracts of 189 papers in English by authors from Europe, 
Asia, Russia, and the United States. Topics covered in the 
proceedings include modeling of silicon and compound semiconductor 
devices, low-frequency and microwave noise, thin-film transistors, 
silicon bipolar devices, complementary metal oxide semiconductor 
(CMOS) devices, lasers, dielectrics, silicides, and detectors and 
surface lasers (v9n3-1). 
   STRATEGIC PROGRAM FOR INNOVATION AND TECHNOLOGY TRANSFER (SPRINT) 
CONFERENCE ON THE FUTURE OF RESEARCH TECHNOLOGY ORGANIZATIONS IN 
EUROPE, held 16-17 November 1993 in Brussels, Belgium. Project 
reports obtained at the SPRINT conference include (v9n3-2): 
   "The European Network of Research and Technology Organizations: 
Synopsis of Projects," a 125-page booklet in English that summarizes 
62 SPRINT projects involving more than 200 organizations in the 
European Union; 
   "Innovation Project and Marketing Policy in European Research 
Centers," a 56-page report in English that presents the results of a 
survey conducted by six European research organizations to analyze 
the commercial exploitation of new technologies and expertise by 
government-sponsored research centers; 
   "Typical Steps in Starting up SME Research Projects," a 56-page 
report that was compiled by 13 research organizations from various 
European Union member states and that identifies techniques for 
transferring technologies from research technology organizations to 
small and medium-sized companies. 
   Other material obtained at the SPRINT conference includes 
brochures reviewing SPRINT projects, investment opportunities, 
science parks, technology transfer networks, and the research 
technology organizations listed below: 

   -- PERA International (UK) 
   -- Advanced Manufacturing Technologies (AMT) (Ireland) 
   -- Technical University of Delf t (Netherlands) 
   -- Imperial Exploitation Limited (IMPEL) (UK) 
   -- Institute for Material Research and Application Engineering 
      (Germany) 
   -- Bioquant (Germany) 
   -- Freiberger Ne-Me tall GmbH (Germany) 
   -- TNO (Netherlands) 
   -- The Welding Institute (UK) 
   -- Technology, Innovation, Information (Luxembourg) 
   -- European Association of Contract Research Organizations 
(EACRO) 

   REPORTS FROM COMPANIES, OTHER ORGANIZATIONS 

   Annual reports and other documents in English concerning the 
corporations and other organizations listed below present financial 
highlights, R&amp;D activities, and/or other information for the 
business year 1993. 

   Europe 
   -- European Space Agency (Transferable European Technologies) 
   -- Alcatel (3rd, 4th quarter reports on electrical communication) 
      (Italy) 
   -- Racal Electronics (UK) 

   Pacific Rim 
   -- Kobe Steel (Japan) 
   -- Tokyo Electric Power Company (Japan) 
   -- Kawasaki Heavy Industries (Japan) 
   -- Fuji Heavy Industries (Japan) 
   -- Marubeni (Japan) 
   -- Nippon Sanso Corporation (Japan) 
   -- Dae Ryung Industries (South Korea) 
GIG/McGinnis/CS 19/0143z apr 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-39 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000023094001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   21 April 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
USMISSION USVIENNA PLEASE PASS TO STEVE FLEISCHMANN 
WARNING: DUE TO COPThIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-20APR94-DPRK-U.S.-IAEA 
<H3> <TI>      DPRK SUggests IAEA Inspection for Simultaneous U.S. Talks </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       DPRK SUggests IAEA Inspection for Simultaneous U.S. Talks </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
SUMMARY 

                                  In a clear effort to nudge Washington toward resuming dialogue, 
Pyongyang has hinted at a willingness to accept additional 
international nuclear inspections if they were to take place 
simultaneously with the resumption of DPRK-U.S. high-level talks. 
Pyongyang's veiled call was accompanied by relatively muted 
criticism of the arrival of U.S. Patriot missiles in the South 
and Defense Secretary Perry's visit to Seoul. 

                                  END SUMMARY 

   Pyongyang used a 20 April Foreign Ministry memorandum--a vehicle 
sometimes employed to stake out the DPRK's initial negotiating 
position--to suggest a way out of the current nuclear impasse. 
The key passage in the memorandum called for the "gradual 
rebuilding" of mutual confidence through "inspections to ensure 
the continuity of [nuclear] safeguards" and, "simultaneously," 
the "tackling" of DPRK-U.S. nuclear talks "with sincerity."  In 
this way, the memorandum went on, Pyongyang's full return to the 
Nuclear Nonproliferation Treaty (NPT) will be worked out "in due 
course" and the nuclear issue "can be completely resolved."  In a 
conciliatory note, the memorandum also expressed "wholehearted 
hope" that the issue will be settled "at an early date." 
Despite its conciliatory elements, the memorandum also indicated 
that Pyongyang is poised for hard bargaining.  The bulk of the 
memorandum reiterated the standard North Korean argument for 
Pyongyang's "special status" with regard to the NPT and attempted 
to portray North Korea as a victim of an international conspiracy 
led by Washington and the secretariat of the International Atomic 
Energy Agency (IAEA).  For example, the memorandum contended that 
because Pyongyang is in a state of having temporarily suspended 
withdrawal from the NPT, it is under no obligation to accept 
full-scope IAEA inspections, and that North Korea's return to the 
NPT and full-scope safeguards obligations are possible only after 
the United States has discontinued its "policy of hostility" and 
the IAEA has restored its "impartiality." 

   Perry Visit, Patriot Missile     Clearly attempting to avoid 
further complicating the chances of resuming dialogue with 
Washington, Pyongyang has so far limited its criticism of Defense 
Secretary Perry's visit to Seoul and the introduction of Patriot 
missiles in the South.  Monitored Pyongyang media have so far 
withheld authoritative comment on these developments and low- 
level media commentary has also been restrained.  Coverage of 
Secretary Perry's visit that has appeared included a 19 April 
commentary in the party paper Nodong Sinmun, carried by Pyongyang 
radio the same day, that attempted to assign financial motives to 
Secretary Perry's visit, rather than depicting it in terms of 
perennial U.S. attempts to "crush" the DPRK.  The secretary, the 
commentary said, is trying to find an outlet for the U.S. 
"munitions industrial complex," which, it said, is facing 
shrinking markets as a result of the end of the Cold War. 

   Similarly, in repeating the familiar argument that the Patriot 
can be turned into an offensive weapon simply by switching its 
warhead, KCNA on 19 April avoided using the pejorative term "U.S. 
imperialists" --normal for criticism of this kind--and simply used 
the designation "the United States," as did Pyongyang radio on 20 
April.  By contrast, both KCNA and the radio referred to Seoul as 
a "puppet clique." 

(AUTHOR:  YIM.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENT, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, ASIA 
DIVISION ANALYSIS TEAM, (703) 733-6534.) 

EAG/HEBBEL/DEW 20/2059Z APR 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-40 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000023194001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   21 April 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
FOREIGN MEDIA NOTE--FB PN 94-054-CAMBODIA 
<H3> <TI>      CAMBODIA:  Paper Airs Border Problems, Influx of Vietnamese </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       CAMBODIA:  Paper Airs Border Problems, Influx of Vietnamese </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
SUMMARY:        February and March editions of the Phnom Penh daily 
REAKSMEI KAMPUCHEA reported continuing problems with Vietnam over 
the demarcation of the Cambodian-Vietnamese border and with the 
influx of ethnic Vietnamese, who allegedly engage in illegal 
logging, fishing, and farming.  The paper indicated that local 
officials are considering measures to address these problems. 

   Reflecting Cambodian concern over border issues with Vietnam, the 
12 March REAKSMEI KAMPUCHEA quoted State Secretary of the Ministry 
of the Interior (MOT) Khan Savoeun telling Mondolkiri provincial 
officials that "a national security force and a provincial security 
force would be formed as soon as possible" for duty along the 
border.  According to the paper, Khan Savoeun went on to say that 
"all issues pertaining to missing markers along the border must be 
revisited." 

   In line with Phnom Penh's attempt to deal with the influx of 
ethnic Vietnamese, an article in the 27 February REAKSMEI KAMPUCHEA 
reported that the new Cambodian immigration law--which draws on laws 
in effect during former Sihanoukist, Lon Nol, and State of Cambodia 
regimes--"will give the MOT full authority to expel illegal 
immigrants and protect the livelihoods of those in Cambodia 
legally."  The article cited an unnamed MOT official as saying that 
the law "is not just for Vietnamese, but applies to all foreigners." 
The paper noted that 5,000 Vietnamese are waiting in boats along the 
SRV border.  The article said that these people--many of whom fled 
Cambodia following Khmer Rouge attacks in 1993--claimed to have 
documentation verifying Cambodian citizenship, long-term residence 
in Cambodia, and fluency in Cambodian, adding that they expect to 
return when the new law is promulgated.  The paper cited an unnamed 
analyst as saying that the new law "should solve the Vietnamese 
settler problem" but that negotiations will have to be held with SRV 
immigration authorities to return illegals to the SRV. 

   A 3,000-word article in the 5 March REAKSMEI KAMPUCHEA that 
extensively quoted a Pursat Province subdistrict official's remarks 
on the continuing influx of Vietnamese immigrants served to 
underscore longstanding ethnic Khmer fears of Vietnamese 
encroachment.  The official, according to the article, estimated 
that his jurisdiction's population is about 80 percent Vietnamese 
and that 60-70 percent of them are undocumented.  The article ended 
with the observation that the ethnic Khmer in the subdistrict live 
in poverty "while the Yuon [pejorative for Vietnamese] live in 
proper houses and accumulate lots of money." 

   Complaints about a Vietnamese influx were also given front page 
coverage in a 10 March REAKSMEI KAMPUCHEA article.  The article 
quoted an unnamed Kandal Province agriculture official as saying 
that immigrants are "farming dozen of hectares" of prime land in Koh 
Thom District, opposite the SRV's Ben Tre Province.  The article was 
accompanied by a photograph of boats lashed together below a 
headline that read "Chrei Thom and Prek Chrei:  Khmer or Yuon 
Territory?"  The article cited the agriculture official as saying 
"there is no sign that the Vietnamese have stopped coming," although 
Kandal's governor has negotiated extensively with Ben Tre 
authorities on the problem.  According to the article, Vietnamese 
families in Prek Chrei Subdistrict outnumber the Cambodians nearly 
10 to one, "and that doesn't include those living on boats."  The 
article added that Vietnamese living there grow peanuts and corn and 
take the crops back to Vietnam.  The article went on to cite a Khmer 
villager as complaining that all the good, flat land has been taken 
by the "Yuon" while the Khmer are left with the marginal, hilly 
areas.  Noting that the majority of the Vietnamese settlers have 
Cambodian identity cards, the article cited a villager as blaming 
local authorities and the military for this situation and as saying 
that many Khmer natives "have been forced to leave because they 
can't live with the Yuon." 

   The 12 March article also reflected Cambodian fears about 
Vietnamese encroachment.  The apaper quoted an unnamed Mondolkiri 
Province police official as claiming that "hundreds of Yuon 
nationals are illegally logging 40 kilometers inside Cambodian 
territory" and that "armed units are protecting them." 

   (Author:  Thomas.  Questions and/or comments, please call Chief, 
Southeast Asia/Korea Branch at (703) 733-6522) 

EAG/20APR94/MILFI/POLCHF/ECONF/ASIA DIVISION/DEW 20/2105Z APR 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-41 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000023294001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   21 April 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-20Apr94-Ukraine 
<H3> <TI>      Communists Run Far Ahead in Supreme Soviet Election </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Communists Run Far Ahead in Supreme Soviet Election </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
SUMMARY 

                                   The Communist Party of Ukraine (CPU) has far outdistanced other 
parties in the 27 March-10 April Ukrainian Supreme Soviet 
election, based on a big win in Donetsk and Luhansk and poor 
showing by the more moderate leftist parties and eastern-oriented 
democratic parties competing for the same voters.  Meanwhile, 
election results for Rukh appeared disappointing and other 
nationalist democratic parties were almost wiped out, gathering 
only a handful of seats at best.  The election will probably 
exacerbate the regional split between east and west since 
communists and other leftists won not a single seat in all seven 
western oblasts while nationalist democrats appeared to win only 
a few in the east. 

                              END SUMMARY 

   Although one fourth of its 450 seats remain unfilled, the new 
parliament has sufficient deputies to form a quorum and legally 
begin sessions.  According to Central Electoral Committee 
Chairman Ivan Yemets, 338 deputies were elected in the 27 March 
election and 3 and 9-10 April runoffs and these form "a qualified 
majority as envisaged by the constitution" (UNIAR, 13 April). 
The other 111 or 112 seats were unfilled because both candidates 
fell short of 50 percent in the runoffs or because insufficient 
voters turned out to meet the 50 percent turnout requirement. 
The biggest blocks of vacancies occurred in Kiev city (18 of the 
23 seats), Krym (12), and in Dnipropetrovsk (15).  The Supreme 
Soviet leadership on 12 April proposed that new elections be held 
in these districts on 10 July (UNIAR, 12 April). 

Success of Parties (See Note 1) 

   Candidates backed by or affiliated with parties won exactly half 
the seats (169), according to Yemets (UNIAR, 13 April), with the 
other half going to independents.  Except for the CPU, few 
parties won more than a handful of seats.  Most parties- 
-especially democratic parties--may dwindle or disappear or have 
to combine to continue existence. 

   (Note 1) The following detailed results are based largely on 
district-by-district results provided in daily bulletins from the 
Post-Postup News Agency or in the 1-7 April Post-Postup 
newspaper. 

   The leftists, based on the big block of CPU deputies, won over 
one-third of the seats filled.  Yemets said that 86 CPU members 
were elected, along with 14 for the Socialist Party of Ukraine 
(SPU) and 18 for the leftist Peasant Party of Ukraine (SelPU), 
for a total of 118 (UNIAR, 13 April).  Rukh won only 20 and the 
Ukrainian Republican Party (URP) only 8, according to Yemets 
(UNIAR, 13 April).  The Election-94 press center, set up to 
gather election information independently of the electoral 
commission because of the alleged frequent "inaccuracy" of 
information from the latter (Ukrainian Weekly, 20 February 1994), 
announced alternative and more detailed figures, indicating that 
339 seats had been filled and giving fewer seats to leftists and 
more to Rukh (UNIAR, 12 April): 

bot 
         Leftists 

         Communist Party of Ukraine (CPU)         75 
         Socialist Party of Ukraine (SPU)         12 
         Peasant Party of Ukraine (SelPU)         11 
         Labor Party                               3 
         Civil Congress of Ukraine                 2 
               total                             103 

         Nationalist Democrats 

         Rukh                                     26 
         Ukrainian Republican Party (URP)          9 
         Union of Officers of Ukraine (SOU)        5 
         Democratic Party of Ukraine (DemPU)       4 
         Christian Democratic Party of Ukraine     2 
         National Rukh (the Rukh set up in 
            opposition to Rukh Chairman 
            Vyacheslav Chornovil)                  1 
                total                             47 

         Non-nationalist Democrats 

         Interregional Bloc for Reforms (MBR)      6 
         Party of Democratic Revival of 
            Ukraine (PDVU)                         3 
         Social Democratic Party of Ukraine        2 
                 total                            11 

         Ultranationalists 

         Congress of Ukrainian Nationalists (KUN)  6 
         Ukrainian National Assembly (UNA)         3 
         Ukrainian Conservative Republican 
            Party (UKRP)                           2 
                   total                          11 
eot 

   Rukh itself claimed 30 of its members were elected and listed 
them in the 14 April issue of its paper Rada.  In the first 
round, of the 49 seats settled, 12 had gone to the CPU, 4 to 
Rukh, 2 apiece to the URP, SelPU, SPU, and KUN, and 1 to the UKRP 
(Holos Ukrainy, 31 March). 

Leftists 

   The CPU lead came out of the east, which gave the party at least 
52 of its 86 or so seats, with 40 from Donetsk and Luhansk alone. 
The CPU also picked up 17 in the south (Krym, Odesa, Mykolaiv, 
and Kherson) and ran strong in Kirovohrad, where it took 5 of the 
8 seats settled, judging from Post-Postup district figures. 
Other leftist parties did much worse, but still better than 
almost all democratic parties.  Most leftist party leaders ran 
for election in the east or south and won, CPU First Secretary 
Petro Symonenko in Donetsk, SelPU Chairman Serhiy Dovhan in 
Kherson, and Labor Party Chairman Nikolay Azarov in Donetsk, 
while SPU Chairman Oleksandr Moroz won in Kiev Oblast and leftist 
Civil Congress Chairman Valeriy Meshcheryakov dropped out of his 
race in Kharkiv after running poorly (see appendix at the end of 
the article). 

Nationalist Democrats 

   Rukh lost its chance to sweep most of Kiev city's seats because 
of invalidated elections and also won relatively few seats in its 
base in the west.  In the 27 March election, Rukh had run 
strongest in Kiev city, where it backed the two first-round 
winners, and it seemed likely to win most of Kiev city's 
remaining 21 seats in the runoffs.  But only 3 seats were settled 
(won by Rukh) in the runoffs, so Rukh's total includes only 5 
from Kiev.  Moreover, the failure to settle most Kiev city races 
is a big blow to Rukh because all candidates who failed to win in 
the March election and April runoffs are barred from competing in 
the new elections, and hence Rukh may lose the candidates it was 
counting on in the city.  In addition, Rukh won only 19 of the 
seven western oblasts' 82 seats, judging from Post-Postup's 
district figures and Rukh's claims in the 14 April Rada.  Even 
the 30 members claimed by Rukh in the 14 April Rada are far less 
than the 49 members it had in the present Supreme Soviet when it 
registered as a faction in late 1992 (Narodna Hazeta, No. 38, 
October 1992). 
   Other nationalist democratic parties did even worse, with only a 
handful of deputies for even the well-established URP and DemPU. 
The URP was humiliated not only by its tiny showing (9 seats, 
according to Election-94) but by the defeat of its chairman, 
Mykhaylo Horyn, in its Lviv base.  DemPU won only 4 seats, 
according to Election-94, although its chairman, Volodymyr 
Yavorivskyy, won in a runoff in Kirovohrad (Post-Postup, 11 
April).  The Christian Democratic Party of Ukraine won only 2, 
according to Election-94, and its chairman, Vitaliy Zhuravskyy, 
lost in a runoff in Zhytomyr (Post-Postup, 4, 11 April). 
   Other Democratic Parties 
   The non-nationalist democratic parties, expected to run strong in 
the east where nationalists have little appeal, also failed 
badly, losing to the CPU and other leftist parties: 
   -- The much-heralded Interregional Bloc for Reforms (MBR), formed 
by former Premier Leonid Kuchma and former Supreme Soviet Deputy 
Chairman Volodymyr Hrynyov and expected to emerge as a major 
centrist force, ran poorly even in its Kharkiv-Dnipropetrovsk 
base.  Election-94 credited it with just 6 seats, although Post- 
Postup identified 15 (6 MBR winners in Kharkiv, 3 in 
Dnipropetrovsk, 3 in Mykolaiv, and 1 in Chernihiv, Kherson, and 
Krym).  Kuchma won a smashing victory, with 90 percent of the 
vote in his Chernihiv district (Post-Postup, 28 March), but 
Hrynyov was forced into a runoff before winning a seat in his 
native Kharkiv. 

-- New Ukraine barely showed up in the election results.  It 
apparently only elected 1 deputy--in Chernivtsi (Post-Postup, 11 
April)--and hardly any candidates identifying with it even got 
into the runoffs. 
   -- The Party of Democratic Revival of Ukraine (PDVU) won only 3, 
according to Election-94, and its leader Volodymyr Filenko lost 
in a Kharkiv runoff (Post-Postup, 11 April). 
   -- The Labor Congress of Ukraine (TKU) won no seats, and its 
leader Anatoliy Matviyenko was beaten running for reelection in 
Vinnytsya (Post-Postup, 4 April). 
   -- The Party of Greens of Ukraine (PZU) did not really attempt an 
organized election campaign (the 31 Green candidates were 
nominated by groups, rather than by the party) and its leader 
Vitaliy Kononov lost his bid for a seat (Rada, 27 March). 
   -- The well-financed Liberal Party of Ukraine ran many candidates 
in the east (for example, fielding 11 candidates in Donetsk 
city's 10 districts--Vecherniy Donetsk, 19 February) but, judging 
from Post-Postup district results, won only 1 (in Donetsk).  Its 
chairman, Ihor Markulov, did not even run. 
   Other Nationalists 
   Ultranationalist parties won few seats.  The least radical of 
them, the Congress of Ukrainian Nationalists (KUN), won the most- 
-6, according to Election-94, but at least 8, according to the 
Post-Postup district results (5 in Lviv, 1 or 2 in Volyn, 1 in 
Ternopil and Ivano-Frankivsk).  Its leader, Slava Stetsko, was 
disqualified from running because of lack of Ukrainian 
citizenship.  The Ukrainian National Assembly (UNA) won 2 in Lviv 
and 1 in Ternopil (Post-Postup district results), but its leader 
Yuriy Shukhevych was defeated in Lviv.  Ukrainian Conservative 
Republican Party Chairman Stepan Khmara was elected in Lviv, and, 
according to Election-94, one other member of his party was 
elected.  The Organization of Ukrainian Nationalists (OUN) won no 
seats and its chairman, Mykola Slyvka, was defeated in Lviv 
(Post-Postup, 28 March).  The semi-fascist Social-National Party 
of Ukraine also won no seats. 
   Regional Patterns 
   The sharply contrasting voting patterns in east and west will 
undoubtedly exacerbate already existing regional tensions, as the 
east appeared to vote against economic reform and for closer ties 
to Russia while the west backed nationalists. 

East 
   Leftists won overwhelmingly in the east, building up big leads in 
the five oblasts of this populous region which hold 152 of the 
450 Supreme Soviet districts. 
   -- Donetsk (43 of 47 seats filled).   Communists won a smashing 
victory in Donetsk, and virtually all party-affiliated candidates 
elected here were leftists.  The CPU won 22 seats (4 in the first 
round and 18 in the second), the SPU 3, Labor 2, SelPU 1, and 
Civil Congress 1, along with one backed jointly by the CPU, SPU, 
and Labor (Post-Postup, 1-7 April; Post-Postup, 11 April).  In 
addition, 1 Liberal and 12 independents were elected, but no 
nationalist democrats.  In 4 districts elections were invalid or 
neither runoff candidate won a majority.  Although not all runoff 
candidates were identified, there is no sign that any nationalist 
democrats even got into the runoffs.  Even among eastern non- 
nationalist democrats (MBR, Liberals) only one candidate backed 
by the Liberals was elected. 
   -- Luhansk (23 of 25 seats filled).  The CPU won 18, with the 
other 5 going to independents.  Apparently only one democrat 
(nominated by Rukh and the MBR) got into the runoffs, based on 
district results in the 1-7 April weekly Post-Postup and 13 April 
Post-Postup news bulletin. 
   -- Zaporizhzhya (16 of 18 seats filled).   Communists won a 
plurality of 7 seats, one on the first round and 6 on the second. 
One SelPU member was also elected.  Democrats managed to elect 3 
candidates on the "We" bloc ticket, plus an independent 
considered close to the democrats (Post-Postup, 30 March).  Four 
other independents were elected. 
   -- Dnipropetrovsk (19 of 34 seats filled).   In contrast to 
neighboring Donetsk and Zaporizhzhya, Communists did poorly in 
Dnipropetrovsk.  Only 1 CPU member was elected, versus 3 MBR, 2 
Labor, 1 SPU, 1 SelPU, and 11 independents.  The independents 
included bank chairmen, plant leaders, sovkhoz directors, 
academics, and local politicians.  Democrats--even nationalist 
democrats--managed to put up a spirited fight.  The Ukraine 
democratic bloc got 11 candidates into the runoffs and Rukh got 
1, but they all lost. 
   -- Kharkiv.  Not all of Kharkiv's.28 districts have been reported 
yet, and the results show a very mixed picture.  Post-Postup on 
11 April reported 6 MBR members elected, and Post-Postup district 
reports for 15 districts identified 5 independents elected, 4 
CPU, 3 democrats, and 2 SPU (Post-Postup, 4 April). 

South 
   The CPU also ran ahead in the south, winning 17 seats, while 
nationalist democrats won only 1.  Surprisingly, the MBR did 
relatively well, even though its regional base is the east, 
rather than the south. 
   -- Odesa (19 of 23 seats filled).  The CPU picked up 6 seats and 
SelPU 2 in Odesa, while no nationalist democrats won.  Most 
winners were independents (10), while 1 Social-Democrat won 
(Post-Postup, 13 April). 
   -- Krym (11 of 23 seats filled).  The Communists (Communist Party 
of Krym--KPK) won 5, independents 5, and the MBR 1 seat.  In 3 of 
these races, the losers were Crimean Tatars (Medzhlis candidates) 
and in one, a pro-Ukrainian ("Krym With Ukraine") candidate 
(Post-Postup, 11 April). 
   -- Kherson (10 of 11 seats filled).  Leftists won almost all 
seats (5 CPU, 1 SPU, 1 SelPU), with 2 going to independents and 1 
to the MBR (Post-Postup, 13 April).  Only 2 Rukh-democratic bloc 
candidates got into the runoffs, according to Post-Postup 
identifications. 
   -- Mykolaiv (8 of 11 seats filled).  In contrast to other 
southern oblasts, Communists did poorly in Mykolaiv, winning only 
one seat, while the MBR won 3, the democratic bloc (Party of 
Greens) 1, and independents the other 3 (Post-Postup, 11 April). 

   West 
   The western region of Ukraine filled 68 of its 82 seats, giving 
virtually all to democratic candidates but only 19 specifically 
to Rukh, which was expected to do better in its home base.  Among 
other nationalist democrats, the URP won 7, New Wave 4, DemPU 3, 
and the Christian Democratic Party 1, while the non-nationalist 
democrats elected one candidate on a joint New Ukraine-Social- 
Democratic Party ticket.  Among ultranationalists, KUN won 7, UNA 
3, and the UKRP 1, while independents won 19. 
  -- Lviv (20 of 23 seats filled).  Rukh won only 5 of the 23 
seats, but in the 14 April Rada also claimed independent Yevhen 
Zherebetskyy as a member after the election.  Although moderates 
outpolled ultranationalists in the first round--Rukh won 4, 
including Zherebetskiy, and New Wave 3--compared to one apiece 
for KUN and UKRP, the ultras did better than the moderates in the 
runoffs, KUN winning 4 and UNA 2, while Rukh won 2, New Wave one, 
and the URP one.  The total of both rounds was 11 for the 
moderates and 8 for the ultras, but KUN, which won most of the 
ultranationalist seats, is the least extreme of the ultras.  The 
URP--the best-established Lviv party after Rukh--was almost shut 
out.  No leftists at all won. 

bot 
             Lviv's First and Second Rounds 
                      1st   2nd   total 
         Independents  0     1      1 
                     Moderates 
          Rukh         4     2      6 
          New Wave     3     1      4 
          URP          0     1      1 
                  Ultranationalists 
          KUN          1     4      5 
          UKRP         1     0      1 
          UNA          0     2      2 
eot 
   -- Rine (8 of 10 seats filled).  Proportionally, Rukh ran best in 
this district, winning exactly one half of the total seats.  URP 
got 2 and an independent won 1.  Judging by Post-Postup 
characterizations, 6 leftists got into the runoffs (including 2 
CPU and 1 SPU) but all lost. 
   -- Ternopil (7 of 10 seats filled).  The URP did better in 
Ternopil than in Lviv, winning 3, as did Rukh (Post-Postup, 1-7 
April, Post-Postup, 11 April, Rada, 14 April).  Ultranationalists 
won 2 (1 KUN, 1 UNA). 
   -- Ivano-Frankivsk (all 12 seats filled).  Rukh did not do well 
in Ivano-Frankivsk, but neither did other parties.  As a 7 April 
Post-Postup analysis argued, parties have little influence in 
Ivano-Frankivsk.  Most victors were clearly democrats but not 
linked to parties.  Only 2 DemPU, 1 Rukh, 1 URP, and 1 KUN 
candidate were elected. 
   -- Zakarpattya (7 of 10 seats filled).  Parties also appeared to 
play little role here.  The only winner identified with a party 
was a Christian Democrat.  Ethnic politics played a bigger role. 
Several Hungarian candidates got into the runoffs, but the only 
one to win was in district No. 169, which was formed to have a 
Hungarian majority (Post-Postup, 17-24 March). 
   -- Chernivtsi (6 of 8 seats filled).  Here the seats were 
scattered among democrats--2 Rukh, 1 DemPU, and 1 New Ukraine- 
Social-Democratic Party--plus 2 independents. 
   -- Volyn (7 of 9 seats filled).  Rukh claimed 2 of Volyn's 9 
seats (Rada, 14 April), while 1 seat went to a candidate backed 
by both KUN and URP, and 4 to independents, with 2 remaining 
vacant (Post-Postup, 11 April). 

Kiev City 

   A remarkably low turnout in the capital city left 18 of the 
city's 23 district seats unfilled and ruined Rukh's hopes for a 
big victory.  Rukh-backed candidates won all the seats filled--2 
in the first round and 3 in the second--and Rukh had candidates 
in almost all runoffs--half of whom were ahead in the runoff vote 
tallies and would have won (Khreshchatyk, 13 April) if the 
turnout had been sufficient.  In 5 districts neither candidate 
won a majority in the runoffs, while in the rest elections were 
invalidated because of the low turnout (Post-Postup, 13 April). 
This was a far worse turnout than in any other area of the 
country--even Krym, where many were boycotting the election, 
filled almost half its seats. 
   The invalidation of the elections in 18 districts means Rukh has 
lost all its candidates who competed in those districts, since 
Ukraine's election law bars candidates who lost in earlier rounds 
from running in new elections to fill those seats.  For example, 
Former Defense Minister Kostyantyn Morozov, touted as a 
presidential candidate by nationalist democrats, was defeated in 
district No. 1 when both he and his opponent won only 45 percent 
of the vote (UNIAR, 13 April) and Morozov will be ineligible to 
run again anywhere in the country. 

Government Leaders 

   Even though Supreme Soviet members are barred from holding other 
jobs, many cabinet members ran for election and most won, 
although usually only in runoffs.  Acting Premier Yukhym 
Zvyahilskyy, although supposedly popular in Donetsk, only won in 
a runoff there, and Deputy Premiers Valentyn Landyk (ITAR-TASS, 
11 April) and Mykola Zhulynskyy (ITAR-TASS, 11 April) won in 
runoffs, but neither Deputy Premier Vasyl Yevtukhov nor his rival 
won a majority in a Dnipropetrovsk runoff (Post-Postup, 11 
April).  Transport Minister Orest Klympush and Health Minister 
Yuriy Spizhenko won seats in the first round, Agriculture 
Minister Yuriy Karasyk, Minister of Environmental Protection 
Yuriy Kostenko, Economy Minister Roman Shpek, and Industry 
Minister Oleksandr Holubchenko won in runoffs.  Labor Minister 
Mykhaylo Kaskevych lost in a runoff in Chernihiv (Post-Postup, 11 
April). 
   Apparently anticipating--correctly, it turns out--that they would 
be unpopular with the voters, only 188 of the present Supreme 
Soviet members ran for reelection, and only 56 were reelected 
(Ivan Yemets, UNIAR, 12 April).  Supreme Soviet Chairman Ivan 
Plyushch won easily in Chernihiv with 74 percent of the vote 
(Post-Postup, 28 March), and First Deputy Chairman Vasyl 
Durdinets won in Kirovohrad.  But many prominent deputies lost, 
including conservative-communists Aleksandr Charodeyev in 
Donetsk, Serhiy Dorohuntsov in Kiev city, and Oleksandr Kotsyuba 
in Vinnytsya, and nationalist democrats Mykhaylyo Horyn in Lviv, 
Ihor Hryniv in Lviv, and Dmytro Pavlychko in Cherkassy. 

Outlook 

   With nearly one-third (103-118) of the 338-339 seats filled, 
leftist parties may easily be able to attract enough independents 
to swing a majority (169-170), especially since the 169 or so 
independents are in many cases linked to the establishment and 
probably unsympathetic to reform.  In contrast, even if democrats 
form a parliamentary bloc embracing all nationalist democrats, 
non-nationalist democrats, and ultranationalists, they would have 
only about 70 seats, using the Election-94 figures.  While the 
current Supreme Soviet has long been deadlocked over reform, 
prospects in the new parliament appear even more bleak.  The 
largest faction--the leftists--will actively oppose reform, while 
deputies from the east will oppose both reform and Ukrainian 
nationalism, and both groups have been armed with a fresh mandate 
from the voters. 

Appendix 

List of prominent figures who ran for the Supreme Soviet: 

Nikolay Azarov (chairman of Party of Labor) won in runoff in 
Donetsk district No. 115 (Post-Postup, 11 April). 

Ruslan Bodelan (Odesa Oblast Soviet chairman) won in a runoff in 
Odesa district No. 312 (Post-Postup, 13 April). 

Aleksandr Charodeyev (member of Civil Congress of Ukraine) lost 
in Donetsk district No. 116 (Za Vilnu Ukrainu, 30 March). 

Volodymyr Chernyak (author of Rukh economic program), not backed 
by Rukh, lost in Lviv district No. 271 (Post-Postup, 28 March). 

Vyacheslav Chornovil (chairman of Rukh) won on first round in 
Ternopil district No. 357 (UNIAN, 28 March). 

Yevhen Chulakov (former CPU secretary for agriculture, chairman 
of subcommittee of Supreme Soviet Commission on Agroindustrial 
Complex), SelPU candidate, yon in Dnipropetrovsk district No. 99 
(UNIAN, 28 March; UNIAR, 30 March). 

Serhiy Dorohuntsov (conservative, pro-communist chairman of 
Supreme Soviet committee), defeated in Kiev city district No. 16 
(Khreshchatyk, 1 April). 

Serhiy Dovhan (chairman of SelPU) won in a runoff in Kherson 
district No. 400 (Post-Postup, 13 April). 

Vasyl Durdinets (first deputy chairman of Supreme Soviet), won in 
runoff in Kirovohrad district No. 229 (Post-Postup, 11 April). 

Volodymyr Filenko (chairman of PDVU) lost in a runoff in a 
Kharkiv district (Post-Postup, 11 April). 

Vitold Fokin (former premier) was in a runoff in Cherkassy 
district No. 420, but the result is still unreported. 

Ivan Hel (deputy chairman of Lviv Oblast Soviet) lost on first 
round in Lviv district No. 282 (Post-Postup, 11 April). 

Ivan Herts (former minister for foreign economic ties) lost in 
Zakarpatsk district No. 175 (Post-Postup, 28 March). 

Serhiy Holovatyy (Rukh leader), Rukh candidate, not backed by 
democratic bloc, won on first round in Kiev city district No. 19 
(UNIAR, 30 March). 

Oleksandr Holubchenko (industry minister) won in a runoff in 
Zaporizhzhya district No. 188 (Post-Postup, 11 April). 

Mykhaylo Horyn (chairman of URP) lost in first round to UKRP head 
Stepan Khmara in Lviv district No. 261 (Za Vilnu Ukrainu, 30 
March). 

Mykola Horyn (chairman of Lviv Oblast Soviet), Rukh candidate, 
lost in a runoff in Lviv district No. 275 (Post-Postup, 11 
April). 

Ihor Hryniv (Supreme Soviet member) New Wave candidate, lost in 
Lviv district No. 276 (Post-Postup, 28 March). 

Volodymyr Hrynyov (leader of New Ukraine and MBR) won in runoff 
in Kharkiv district No. 376 (Kiev radio, 11 April). 

Iryna Kalynets (Supreme Soviet member, KUN leader) lost in a 
runoff in Lviv district No. 273 (Kiev radio, 11 April). 

Yuriy Karasyk (agriculture minister) won in a runoff in Cherkassy 
district No. 427 (Nezavisimost, 6 April). 

Vitaliy Karpenko (Vecherniy Kiev editor), non-party but backed by 
Rukh and democratic bloc, lost in a runoff in Kiev city district 
No. 14 when the election was invalidated (Vecherniy Kiev, 12 
April). 

Mykhaylo Kaskevych (minister of labor) lost in a runoff in 
Chernihiv district No. 441 (Post-Postup, 11 April). 

Yaroslav Kendzyor (Supreme Soviet member) Rukh candidate, won on 
first round in Lviv district No. 280 (Za Vilnu Ukrainu, 30 
March). 

Stepan Khmara (chairman of UKRP) won in first round in Lviv 
district No. 261 (Za Vilnu Ukrainu, 30 March). 

Larysa Khorolets (former culture minister) lost in Poltava 
district No. 318 (Post-Postup, 29 March). 

Orest Klympush (minister of transport) won on first round in his 
native Zakarpatsk district No. 172 (UNIAR, 30 March). 

Vitaliy Kononov (chairman Party of Greens) lost in the first 
round (Rada, 27 March). 

Mykhaylo Kosiv (Supreme Soviet member) Rukh candidate, won on 
first round in Lviv district No. 279 with 72 percent (Za Vilnu 
Ukraina, 30 March). 

Yuriy Kostenko (minister of environment) Rukh candidate, backed 
by democratic bloc, won in a runoff in Kiev city district No. 23 
(Kiev radio, 11 April). 

Oleksandr Kotsyuba (Supreme Soviet member) lost in Vinnitsya 
(Post-Postup, 11 April). 

Oleksandr Kryvenko (editor of Post-Postup), New Wave candidate, 
lost in Lviv district No. 262 (Post-Postup, 11 April). 

Leonid Kuchma (former premier) won on first round in Chernihiv 
district No. 448 with 90 percent (Post-Postup, 28 March). 

Valentyn Landyk (deputy premier) non-party, won in a runoff in 
Donetsk district No. 114 (Post-Postup, 11 April). 

Volodymyr Lanovyy (economic reformer, former deputy premier), 
backed by Rukh but not by democratic bloc, elected on first round 
in Kiev city distict No. 17 (UNIAR, 30 March). 

Oleksandr Lavrynovych (deputy chairman of Rukh) runoff in Lviv 
district No. 274 (Post-Postup, 11 April). 

Yevhen Marmazov (CPU secretary) won in a runoff in Kirovohrad 
district No. 234 (Post-Postup, 11 April). 

Vitaliy Masol (former premier) won in a runoff in Chernihiv 
district No. 446 (ITAR-TASS, 11 April). 

Anatoliy Matviyenko (chairman of Labor Congress of Ukraine--TKU), 
defeated in Vinnytsya (Post-Postup, 4 April). 

Valeriy Meshcheryakov (leader of Civil Congress) got into the 
runoff in Kharkiv district No. 376 against Volodymyr Hrynyov but 
with only 13 percent of the vote (UNIAR, 28 March) and then 
withdrew, accusing Hrynyov of unfair tactics (Post-Postup, 1 
April). 

Oleksandr Moroz (chairman of SPU) won in a runoff in Kiev Oblast 
district No. 223 (Nezavisimost, 6 April). 

Kostyantyn Morozov (former defense minister), non-party but 
backed by Rukh and democratic bloc, lost in a runoff in Kiev city 
district No. 1 when neither he nor his foe won a majority (Post- 
Postup, 11 April: UNIAR, 13 April). 

Pavlo Movchan (Supreme Soviet member, chairman of Prosvita 
Society--Post-Postup, 11 April) non-party, backed by democratic 
bloc, but not Rukh, won on first round in Ivano-Frankivsk 
district No. 198 (Halychyna, 29 March). 

Volodymyr Mulyava (hetman of Ukrainian Cossacks) won on first 
round in Ivano-Frankivsk district No. 197 (Halychyna, 29 March). 
Boris Oliynik (CPU leader) won in a runoff in Zaporizhzhya 
district No. 190 (ITAR-TASS, 11 April). 

Hryhoriy Omelchenko (deputy chairman of Officers Union of 
Ukraine) backed by democratic bloc, won on first round in Poltava 
district No. 322 (Post-Postup, 1-7 April). 

Dmytro Pavlychko (DemPU leader) lost in Cherkassy district No. 
428 (Post-Postup, 29 March). 

Ivan Plyushch (Supreme Soviet chairman) won on first round in 
Chernihiv district No. 445 with 74 percent (Post-Postup, 28 
March). 

Mykola Porovskyy (URP deputy chairman, Supreme Soviet member) won 
in a runoff in Rivne district No. 341 (Post-Postup, 11 April). 
Serhiy Pravdenko (Holos Ukrainy editor) lost in a runoff in 
Dnipropetrovsk district No. 82 (Post-Postup, 11 April). 

Volodymyr Pylypchuk (economic reformer) non-party, backed by 
democratic bloc but not Rukh, won on first round in Ivano- 
Frankivsk district No. 196 (Halychyna, 29 March). 

Volodymyr Pynzenyk (economic reformer, former deputy premier), 
New Wave candidate, won on first round in Lviv district No. 264 
(Za Vilnu Ukrainu, 30 March). 

Ivan Saliy (maverick communist, fired by Kravchuk as presidential 
representative for Kiev city) non-party, opposed by Rukh and 
democratic bloc, lost in a runoff in Kiev city district No. 13 
when the election was invalidated (Post-Postup, 12 April). 
Roman Shpek (minister of economy) won in a runoff in Ivano- 
Frankivsk district No. 200 (Post-Postup, 11 April). 

Yuriy Shukhevych (head of UNA) lost in Lviv district No. 277 
(Post-Postup, 11 April). 

Oleksandr Skipalskyy (head of military intelligence) backed by 
KUN and URP, won on first round in Volyn district No. 66 (UNIAN, 
28 March; UNIAR, 30 March; Post-Postup, 11 April). 

Larysa Skoryk (leader of VNRU--the national Rukh, i.e., the anti- 
Chornovil Rukh) lost in a runoff in Lviv district No. 260 (Kiev 
radio, 11 April). 

Mykola Slyvka (chairman of OUN) lost in Lviv district no. 276 
(Post-Postup, 28 March). 

Yuriy Spizhenko (minister of health) won on first round in 
Zhytomyr district No. 165 (Post-Postup, 31 March). 

Taras Stetskiv (Supreme Soviet member, a DPVU leader) New Wave 
candidate, won in a runoff in Lviv district No. 273 (Kiev radio, 
11 April). 

Petro Symonenko (first secretary of CPU) won on first round in 
Donetsk district No. 150 (UNIAN, 28 March). 

Valentyn Symonenko (councillor to Kravchuk, former chairman of 
president's Coordinating Council for Economic Reform) won in a 
runoff in Odesa district No. 298 (Post-Postup, 13 April). 

Les Tanyuk (Rukh leader) won on first round in Lviv district No. 
267 (Za Vilnu Ukrainu, 30 March). 

Bohdan Ternopilskyy (adviser to Kravchuk), KNDS (Congress of 
National Democratic Forces)-URP candidate, won in a runoff in 
Ternopil district No. 364 (Post-Postup, 11 April). 

Oleh Vitovich (commander of UNSO (Ukrainian National Self- 
Defense), UNA's paramilitary arm) won in a runoff in Lviv 
district No. 275 (Post-Postup, 11 April). 

Volodymyr Yavorivskyy (chairman of DemPU), backed by democratic 
bloc but not Rukh, won in a runoff in Kirovohrad district No. 228 
(ITAR-TASS, 11 April). 
Vasyl Yevtukhov (deputy premier) got into the runoff in 
Dnipropetrovsk district No. 92 but failed to win a majority and 
so is excluded from the new election (Post-Postup, 11 April). 

Ihor Yukhnovskyy (former first deputy premier), New Wave 
candidate, won on first round in Lviv district No. 263 (Za Vilnu 
Ukrainu, 30 March). 

Ivan Zayets (chairman of Narodna Rada--the democratic bloc in the 
Supreme Soviet) Rukh candidate, backed by democratic bloc, won in 
a runoff in Kiev city district No. 18 (Kiev radio, 11 April). 

Mykola Zhulynskyy (deputy premier) won in a runoff in Volyn 
district No. 64 (Post-Postup, 1-7 April). 

Vitaliy Zhuravskyy (chairman of Christian Democratic Party) lost 
in a runoff in Zhytomyr district No. 163 (Post-Postup, 4, 11 
April). 

Yukhym Zvyahilskyy (acting premier), non-party, won in a runoff 
in Donetsk district No. 110 (ITAR-TASS, 11 April; Post-Postup, 11 
April). 

Box 1 
                       Eastern Oblasts 

       total CPU  SPU SelPU  Labor  Indep  MBR  Democrats* vacant 
Dnipro.  34    1   1    1      2      11    3       0        15 
Donetsk  47** 22   3    1      2      12    0       0         4 
Kharkiv  28    4   2    0      0       5    6       3         ? 
Luhansk  25   18   0    0      0       5    0       0         2 
Zaporizh.18    7   0    1      0       5    0       3         2 
        152   52   6    3      4      38    9       6 

*No Rukh candidates were elected. 
**Also elected 1 Labor-SPU-CPU and 1 Civil Congress candidate, as 
well as 1 Liberal. 
End Box 1 

Box 2 

                      Southern Oblasts 

      total   CPU  SPU  SelPU  Indep MBR  Rukh  Democrats*  vacant 
Kherson   11    5   1     1      2    1     0      0           1 
Krym      23    5   0     0      5    1     0      0          12 
Mykolaiv  11    1   0     0      3    3     0      1           3 
Odesa**   23    6   0     2     10    0     0      0           4 
          68   17   1     3     20    5     0      1          20 

*No Rukh candidates were elected. 
**Also 1 Social Democrat elected. 
End Box 2 

Box 3 

                      Western Oblasts* 

         total  Rukh DemPU  URP  indep   KUN   UNA  vacant 
Chernivtsi 8      2    1     0     2      0     0      2 
Ivano-Fr. 12      1    2     1     5      1     0      0 
Lviv      23      6    0     1     1      5     2      3 
Rivne     10      5    0     2     1      0     0      2 
Ternopil  10      3    0     3     0      1     1      2 
Volyn      9      2    0    0-1**  4     0-1**  0      2 
Zakarpat. 10      0    0     0     6      0     0      3 
  total   82      19   3    7-8   19     7-8    3     14 

*No CPU candidates were elected.  In addition to the numbers in 
the chart, in Chernivtsi, one New Ukraine-Social Democrat 
candidate was elected; in Ivano-Frankivsk, 2 democratic bloc 
candidates were elected; in Lviv, 4 New Wave and 1 UKRP candidate 
were elected; and in Zakarpattya, one Christian Democrat was also 
elected. 

**One candidate was backed by both URP and KUN. 
End Box 3 

(AUTHOR:  HAHN.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
ANALYSIS BRANCH, RUSSIA DIVISION (703) 733-6070.) 
ENEAG/BLOUGH/LRT 20/2134Z APR 94 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-42 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000023394001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   21 April 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
FOREIGN PRESS SURVEY-FBPSP 94-08-ASIA 
<H3> <TI>      PACIFIC RIM ECONOMIC REVIEW -- 20 APRIL 1994 </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       PACIFIC RIM ECONOMIC REVIEW -- 20 APRIL 1994 </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
Table      of Contents 

   JAPAN:  Auto Industry - Automakers' Recent Parts Procurement 
Plans Reveal Little Growth; Nissan To Build Auto Suspensions 
Overseas, Boost Local Content 

   Aviation Industry - FEATURE:  Recent Japan-U.S. Route Dispute 
Sparks Deeper Concern 

   Defense Industry - SJAC Forms Committee To Study Aerospace 
Industry Base 

   Economic Trends - MOT To Initiate Tourist Expansion Program To 
Ease Trade Tensions 

   Energy/Petroleum - Tokyo Gas Introduces New 'Composite Energy 
System' 

   Financial Issues - FEATURE:  Article Says MOF Prepared To Stop 
Money Flows to North Korea; FEATURE:  Financial Institutions 
Expanding Derivatives Operations; Tokyo Exchange May Relax 
Regulations To Attract Asian Companies 

   Foreign Trade and Investment - CHINA:  Sony To Reimport Camcorder 
Parts From Shanghai Joint Venture Firm; SMS Technologies Establishes 
Joint Venture To Make Switching Devices 

   KAZAKHSTAN:  Business Agreement Between Japanese Insurance Firm, 
Local Company 

   RUSSIA:  Japanese Retail Chain To Expand Operations in Russian 
Far East 

   UNITED STATES:  Aichi Steel Works Signs Consulting Contract With 
Steel Firm 

   VIETNAM:  FEATURE:  Companies Seeking To Help Vietnam Expand 
Steel Production; Sumitomo Marine &amp; Fire Latest Insurance Firm To 
Open Hanoi Office 

   Japan-U.S. Relations - FEATURE:  Tug of War With U.S. Over 
Corporate Transfer Pricing 

   Machine Tools/Robotics - FEATURE:  Machine Tool Sales Languish, 
Firms Take Cost-Cutting Measures; Okuma To Sell Numerically 
Controlled Lathes in China 

   Semiconductors/Computers/Electronics - NEC Wins Four New Orders 
for Its Cenju-3 Supercomputer; Fujitsu Wins Contracts To Build 
University LAN Networks; TDK To Import Semiconductors From Its U.S. 
Subsidiary 

   CHINA:  Domestic Developments - FEATURE: Labor Disputes Within 
Foreign-Funded Enterprises On Rise; Planning Commission Outlines 
Investment System Changes; Bill Drafted on Transfer of Enterprise 
Property Rights; State Planning Commission Proposes Measures To 
Develop Rural Enterprises; Objectives Set To Establish Securitized 
Mortgage Market; Shanghai GNP Grows at Annual 13 Percent in First 
Quarter of 1994; Shortage Leads to Rising Office Rents in Beijing 

   Foreign Trade and Investment - Yunnan To Emphasize Economic 
Relations With Southeast Asia; Foreign Investors Wary of Value-Added 
Land Tax; Guangzhou's Six Measures To Increase Utilization of 
Foreign Capital; Guangdong To Attract $10 Billion of Foreign 
Investment in 1994; Shenzhen's Exports, Investment, Foreign Trade 
Grow by 20 Percent; Xiamen Woos Foreign Capital for Designated 
Projects; Hong Kong Investors Pour $1 Billion Into Tianjin in 1993; 
China's Squeeze on Imports Affects Export Trade; Imports of Capital 
Goods Rise in January; Steel Firm To Use Hong Kong as Base for 
Regional Expansion; Contracts Signed With China During Berlin 
Mayor's Visit; Hutchison To Manage Zhuhai Port; Hutchison Invests 
2.5 Billion Yuan for Share of Port Project; Li Companies To Operate 
Power Stations in Guangdong's Nanhai; French Loan To Fund Water 
Supply Project in Xiamen; Japanese, ROK Banks Fund Steel Plant in 
Guangzhou; MING PAO Parent in Sichuan Light Rail System; Chartered 
Bank To Open Representative in Chengdu; Foreign Capital Sought To 
Construct Aviation Fuel Stations; Hong Kong-Based PRC Firms Invest 
in Shanghai-Nanjing Expressway; Pacific Concord To Invest 6 Billion 
Yuan in Retail Sector, Housing; Japanese Firm To Supply Coal 
Handling Equipment; ELF Aquitaine Invests in Chemicals, 
Pharmaceutical Sectors; Singapore Firm Invests in Suzhou Tourism 
Area; Merrill Lynch, Sanyo Invest in Anhui; Sino-UK 
Telecommunications Firm To Increase Output; Volkswagen, U.S. 
Technology Firm To Invest in Hainan; Fujian Company Provides Labor 
Services Overseas 

   Taiwan:  KMT-Run Enterprise To Build Power Plant in Indonesia; 
1993 Overseas Investment Increases 41.7 Percent Over Previous Year 

   NORTH KOREA:  Average Wages for Workers Reported; DPRK Obtains 
Foreign Currency Through 'Foreign Exchange Shops'; Worsening 
Inflation in North Korea Reported 

   SOUTH KOREA:  FEATURE:  Research Institutes Get High-Tech Help 
From MIT, Stanford; FEATURE:  New Government Initiatives To Support 
Commercial S&amp;T; FEATURE:  Developments in Database Industry 
Reported; FEATURE:  New ROK 'Foundation' Aims at U.S. High-Tech; 
FEATURE:  South Korea Responds to 'Technical Trade Barriers'; 
Samsung Electronics Indigenizes Several Technologies; Competition 
for Color Printer Market Expected To Heat Up; Daewoo To Expand R&amp;D 
Centers at Home, Abroad; Statistics for First Quarter Exports 
Reported; KINITI To Promote Tech Transfers for Small Firms; ROK- 
DPRK-China Shipping Route To Open in April; ROK Firms Receive 
Shipbuilding Orders From Hong Kong, Canada; Firms Invest in Overseas 
Spinning Plants; Daewoo Gets Financing From Exim Bank for Overseas 
Plant; Hyundai Active in Saudi Power Plant Construction 

   SOUTHEAST ASIA - BURMA:  Joint Venture Brewery To Be Established 

   INDONESIA:  Cambodia To Use Palapa Satellite Transponder; IPTN- 
Airbus Industrie Flight Test Agreement Signed 

   MALAYSIA:  FEATURE:  Islamic Money Market Established 
   PHILIPPINES:  International Consortium Seeks To Operate Bataan 
Nuclear Plant 

   THAILAND:  Oil-Related Joint Venture in Vietnam Reported; First 
Quarter Rice Exports Reach 1.3 Million Tons; Firms Form Consulting 
Company With Burmese State Agency; CP Group To Invest in Shanghai 
Industrial Park; Regional Banks' Loan Package to Refinery Company; 
Firm Signs Memorandum on Lao Hydropower Project; Bank Reports 
Decline in Foreign Investment 

   VIETNAM:  FEATURE:  Export Processing Zones' Development 
Reviewed; Thai Firm To Build Industrial Zone at Bien Hoa; Ministry's 
Plan for Development of Auto Industry; Park Resort Venture With 
Singaporean Company; Minister Outlines Measures to Facilitiate 
Investment; Prices, Export-Import Value Increase in First Quarter; 
Heavy Industries Increase Output in First Quarter; Taiwan Firms Join 
Sugar Production Venture; HCMC Lists 265 Projects Needing Foreign 
Investment; Coffee Output Reported; Exporters Using Direct 
Contracts; Cashew Growers Earn Over $40 Million in 1993; Transformer 
Manufacture With Switzerland Reported; First Quarter Foreign 
Investment Figures in Dong Nai Reported; National Power Company To 
Start Operation in May; Construction Begins on Bach Ho-Ba Ria Gas 
Pipeline 

   (Pacific Rim Economic Review FBPSP 94-08) 

   JAPAN:  Auto Industry - Automakers' Recent Parts Procurement 
Plans Reveal Little Growth -- On 29 March, Honda Motor Co. and Mazda 
Motor Corp. became the last two of the five major Japanese 
automobile makers to formally announce "independent plans" to 
increase their procurement of U.S.-made auto parts, according to the 
30 March YOMIURI SHIMBUN.  In response to U.S. pressure and possible 
sanctions, each of the five firms, including Toyota Motor Corp., 
Nissan Motor Co., and Mitsubishi Motors Corp., have released 
purchase plans over the past several weeks.  According to the 10 
March ASAHI SHIMBUN, the companies have "intentionally" drawn up 
separate plans with different dates and announced these plans at 
different times "so that they would not be considered as one 
package" by the United States.  YOMIURI stated that the companies 
"fear" the United States will treat their purchase plans as "public 
commitments," as happened with their FY94 procurement goals. Thus, 
the firms are emphasizing that their plans are "forecasts" and not 
goals . 

   The 4 April NIKKEI WEEKLY asserted that the automakers will 
"sharply increase" purchases from foreign suppliers, especially the 
United States.  But the claim of large increases is not borne out by 
the the figures on company purchase plans contained in the 30 and 31 
March YOMIURI and the 4 April NIKKEI WEEKLY, compiled below. 
(Figures are in billions of dollars. 1992 figures are actual; 1993 
figures are estimated; 1994 figures are voluntary targets set in 
January 1992; and 1995-1997 figures are "planned" purchase figures. 
The newspapers did not provide figures and estimates for all years.) 


              Fiscal         Local           Parts 
              Year          Purchases        Imports        Total 

Toyota        1993           3.50            1.20         4.70 
              1994           3.82            1.46         5.28 
              1996           5.15            1.30         6.45 

Nissan        1992           1.95            0.44         2.39 
              1994           2.90            0.80         3.70 
              1997           3.40            0.90         4.30 
Mitsubishi    1993           0.65            0.26         0.91 
              1994           1.20            0.40         1.60 
              1996           1.40-1.63       0.35-0.44    1.75-2.07 

Honda         1992           3.21            0.53         3.74 
              1994           4.38            0.56         4.94 
              1995           4.65            0.54         5.19 

Mazda         1993           1.65            0.19         1.84 
              1994           1.90            0.40         2.30 
              1997           1.90            0.35         2.25 



   The figures show that all companies, except Mazda, are 
forecasting an expansion of "local" parts purchases for vehicles 
built in the United States, which press reports attribute to 
increased Japanese auto production in the United States.  For 
example, the 26 March NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN stated that Nissan will 
increase local procurement as production at its Tennessee auto plant 
reaches "full capacity," while the 29 March NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 
reported that Toyota is progressing towards "doubling" its 
production capacity in the United States, which will lead to greater 
local procurement of "parts and materials." 

   According to the above figures, however, only Nissan is planning 
to increase imports into Japan of U.S.-made auto parts beyond its 
FY94 goals, although Mitsubishi has given a range that might exceed 
FY94's level.  Further, several press reports only mentioned the new 
purchase plans in comparison with FY93 procurement levels, in which 
case all automakers show increasing imports.  For example, the 30 
March NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN stated that Mazda plans to "raise" 
imports from just under $2 billion in FY93 to about $3.5 billion for 
FY97, but did not mention Mazda's FY97 import goal is $.5 billion 
less that the firm's FY94 goal of $4 billion. 

   According to the 31 March YOMIURI, unless Japan's auto market 
recovers soon, the automakers will find it difficult to attain "even 
their FY94 procurement goals."  The paper stated that based on the 
expected FY93 figures, both Toyota and Nissan will have to boost 
procurement over 10 percent in one year to reach their FY94 goals, 
while Honda, Mitsubishi, and Mazda are between 20 and 40 percent 
short of their goals. 

   Ministry of Finance Statistics on Principal Auto Parts Trade - 
The following chart, based on Ministry of Finance trade statistics 
obtained from the Nikkei Telecom News and Retrieval Database, lists 
Japanese imports and exports of auto parts with the United States 
according to the International Harmonized Commodity Description and 
Coding System, which shows Japanese auto parts imports by specific 
category. 


         Japanese Auto Part Exports/Imports To/From the United 
States 
                       (Figures in millions of dollars) 
Trade Codes- 
Descriptions        1990          1992          1992          1993 

8708:  bumpers, seat belts, brakes, gear boxes, drive axles, shock 
absorbers, mufflers, clutches, and steering wheels. 

  Exports          5,340         5,241         5,761         6,534 
  Imports            223           266           308           354 

84073:  diesel and gasoline automobile engines. 

  Exports          1,247         1,189         1,567         2,015 
  Imports              2             3            41           103 

8483:  transmission shafts, housings and housed bearings, gears, 
flywheels, pulleys, clutches, shaft couplings, and parts thereof. 

  Exports            388           387           435           539 
  Imports             87            82            96           100 

8511:  spark plugs, distributors, ignition parts, and starter 
related motors and equipment. 

  Exports            415           354           397           503 
  Imports             29            25            36            39 

8512:  lighting and signaling equipment, sound signaling equipment, 
windshield wipers, defrosters, and related parts. 

  Exports            208           213           230           260 
  Imports              6             4             5             8 


   Nissan To Build Auto Suspensions Overseas, Boost Local Content - 
Nissan Motor Co. soon will begin production of automobile suspension 
assemblies at its manufacturing bases in the United States, Mexico, 
and Britain.  Following this move, virtually all "critical" auto 
parts, except transmissions, will be produced at its overseas 
facilities.  The value of the suspension systems produced overseas 
is expected to exceed 10 billion yen ($95 million) annually, which 
will contribute "greatly" to achieving Nissan's recently announced 
plans to expand purchases of foreign-made auto parts. 

   The suspension systems are a new type, "multi-ring beam 
suspensions," that Nissan began making for the new "Sunny" model in 
Japan.  By the end of 1994, Nissan plans to produce them at its U.S. 
plant in Tennessee for "Sentra" models; by early next year it will 
produce them in Mexico for the "Sol;" and in 1996 they will be made 
in Britain for "Primera" models.  Total annual production of Sentra, 
Sol, and Primera models is expected to be between 400,000 and 
500,000 units. 

   Nissan has already begun manufacturing engines in Mexico and 
Britain and is assembling engines in the United States. 
Consequently, localizing production of the remaining critical parts- 
-suspension systems and transmissions--had become a "hot topic."  In 
addition, local production will help Nissan attain its recently 
announced goal of purchasing $3.4 billion in U.S. auto parts in 
FY97.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 31 Mar 94 p 12) 

   Aviation Industry - FEATURE:  Recent Japan-U.S. Route Dispute 
Sparks Deeper Concern -- SUMMARY:  The recent Japan-U.S. aviation 
dispute triggered by the U.S. deferral of a Japan Air Lines (JAL) 
license application for a new Sendai-Honolulu route has developed 
into a retaliatory conflict, in which both sides have reduced the 
time spans on their respective licenses for existing routes between 
both countries, according to press reports.  The Kansai 
International Airport Co. is particularly concerned about this 
conflict because its new international airport in Osaka is scheduled 
to open in September 1994, and the large revenues it projects from 
airport fees will not materialize if the dispute grows more 
complicated. 

   In a 6 April YOMIURI SHIMBUN article, Mitsuhiro Kusumi, an 
aviation industry commentator, wrote that the heightened tensions 
between the United States and Japan as a result of the deadlocked 
framework talks have given rise to the fear that "new friction" will 
develop over aviation issues.  Kusumi noted that the main issue in 
the dispute concerns "beyond rights," an issue that was not resolved 
in earlier aviation agreements between the two countries. 

   Kusumi explained that aviation industry relations between Japan 
and the United States are based on a general aviation agreement 
signed in 1952 and two "provisional agreements" signed in 1985 and 
1989 respectively.  In both the 1985 and 1989 agreements, the two 
sides agreed to "freeze the rights and interests on existing routes" 
as a regulatory measure on routes the United States had been "freely 
enjoying."  The Japanese side has interpreted the agreements to mean 
that the rights and interests on all routes between the two 
countries and beyond would be frozen, while the United States has 
stressed that the agreements apply to only routes between the two 
countries.  Kusumi wrote that conflict has continued because each 
side has persisted in its own interpretation of the agreements, and 
this has led to "the further entanglement of issues" and mutual 
distrust. 

   For U.S. airlines, Kusumi observed, "beyond rights" are "given, 
natural rights."  He cited the cases where Japan approved licenses 
for U.S. airlines to fly Tokyo-Bangkok and Tokyo-Kuala Lumpur routes 
which, in effect, recognized U.S. "beyond rights" and acknowledged 
the U.S. interpretation of the agreements.  In light of these cases, 
Kusumi explained, the Japanese side "is the violator of the 
agreements" and "falls short" in its criticism of the U.S. deferral 
concerning JAL's license for the Sendai-Honolulu route as being 
"unilateral."  Kusumi noted that in this case Japan asserted its 
"natural rights," and that in deferring the license the United 
States is making a "strong assertion" toward seeking a solution to 
the issue of "beyond rights." 

   Mutual Distrust on Both Sides - According to Kusumi, Japan-U.S. 
aviation talks have been suspended since last year because of a 
"lack of aggressive moves" to reopen them as a result of the 
recession's adverse impact on Japanese airline companies, which are 
suffering from "reduced competitiveness."  He observed that the U.S. 
side is growing "increasingly wary" of Japanese aviation policy 
because it focuses on "protecting the industry" and on a "closed 
market to rescue the industry." 

   On the Japanese side, the Japanese Ministry of Transport (MOT) is 
growing more dubious and distrusting of the negotiating capabilities 
of its counterparts in the U.S. Department of Transportation (DOT), 
according to the 23 March MAINICHI SHIMBUN.  MAINICHI noted that the 
recent U.S. "sanctions" regarding the time limits on licenses for 
existing routes seems to have "passed by" the DOT and were "directly 
imposed by the White House," because they "trample all over" the 
aviation agreements between the two countries. 

   According to MAINICHI, the assistant secretary's position in DOT, 
which is "equivalent" to the director-general's position in MOT's 
Civil Aviation Bureau, has been vacant since the Clinton 
administration took office.  MAINICHI noted that "there is no one to 
do the job" of shouldering responsibility for U.S. aviation policy, 
and that the DOT officials that attend aviation talks "are of the 
deputy director-general level." 

   The Japanese side, MAINICHI added, is also wary because recent 
U.S. measures "strongly reflect" the desires of United Air Lines and 
Federal Express--whose request for additional routes have been 
rejected by the MOT--and because the "opinions" of United's chairman 
and President Clinton show a "close relationship."  The Japanese 
side believes that President Clinton "immediately carries out the 
wishes of private industry." Japan also wonders whether the DOT "has 
properly explained existing Japan-U.S. aviation agreements" to the 
President, MAINICHI noted. 

   Concerns About New Kansai International Airport - The 23 March 
SANKEI SHIMBUN reported that the Kansai International Airport Co. is 
concerned over the potential impact recent events may have on the 
opening of the new Kansai International Airport in September.  The 
airport company is projecting revenues derived from about 90 flights 
daily, or 630 flights a week, but the 34 airline companies 
represented at a recent International Air Transport Association 
meeting only expressed interest in a total of 500 flights weekly. 
According to SANKEI, U.S. airline companies are the "last hope" for 
the airport company, because they have expressed an interest in "30 
percent of the total projected flights."  Any complications in the 
aviation dispute could be "fatally damaging" to the airport. 

   SANKEI noted that foreign and domestic airlines are all 
considering a "downward revision" in the number of flights through 
the Kansai airport because the landing fees are 10 percent higher 
than at Narita International Airport, and fees for one jumbo jet--at 
about 1 million yen ($9,600)--are the highest in the world. 
According to SANKEI, the airport company's deficit will increase by 
an annual 9 billion yen ($86.5 million) if there are ten less 
flights each day than it has projected. 

   MOT To Promote International Flights at Kansai Airport - The 10 
April NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN (NIKKEI) reported that the MOT has 
adopted a policy of promoting international flights to Kansai as a 
priority measure.  The MOT has been actively promoting the 
inauguration of international flights to other regional Japanese 
airports because Narita and Osaka's Itami airports have a limited 
capacity for handling international flights.  According to NIKKEI, 
the MOT has decided to focus on Kansai because it wants to develop 
the new facility into a "hub airport" for both international and 
domestic flights.  Under the same policy, the MOT will carefully 
consider requests for international flights into regional airports 
in light of demand trends, and will "enhance" the domestic route 
structure linking regional airports to Kansai.  NIKKEI noted that 
"the MOT is also seeking to back" the Kansai International Airport 
Co. "in attracting more international flights" to Kansai. 

   Defense Industry - SJAC Forms Committee To Study Aerospace 
Industry Base -- The Society of Japanese Aerospace Companies (SJAC), 
an industry association (shadan hojin) chaired by Isamu Kawai, 
chairman of Fuji Heavy Industries, has established a committee to 
study Japan's aerospace industrial base.  The new organ, the 
"Aircraft Industrial Base Study Committee," was established because 
the aerospace industry is facing a difficult business environment, 
including a recession on the part of commercial air carriers, the 
appreciation of the yen, and the aircraft industry's reliance on the 
Japan Defense Agency for 75 percent of its business. 

   The committee, which will have 15 members, will be chaired by 
Yasuyuki Kogure, a managing director of Fuji Heavy Industries.  It 
will have three subcommittees--Technical Foundations Study 
Subcommittee, Production Foundations Study Subcommittee, and the 
Business Issues Study Subcommittee--composed of working-level 
officials that will meet biweekly.  The subcommittees will examine 
"how the industry should respond to the government's new defense 
policy now being planned;" "industry expectations toward defense 
policy;" "what constitutes an effective aircraft industrial base;" 
and "what industrial policy should be and self-help efforts to 
strengthen business structures."  The committee is scheduled to 
complete its work by early fall.  (Tokyo NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 1 Apr 
94 p 13) 

   Economic Trends - MOT To Initiate Tourist Expansion Program To 
Ease Trade Tensions -- The Ministry of Transportation (MOT) will 
establish a "Japan-U.S. tourist exchange expansion program' to 
expand the number of Japanese tourists visiting the United States by 
the year 2000 and increase the money they spend in order to add to 
the surplus the U.S. enjoys in bilateral tourism.  The ministry's 
objective is to "improve Japan-U.S. relations." 

   In terms of revenues from travelers, in FY92 Japan registered a 
total worldwide deficit of $30.5 billion, of which $10 billion was 
with the United States.  The ministry believes it can increase this 
current deficit--or the U.S. surplus--in earnings from Japanese 
visitors to the United States from $10 billion to $20 billion by 
doubling the number of travelers between the two countries--4.2 
million in FY92--to about eight million.  According to the MOT, the 
objectives of the program will be achieved by "joint Japan-U.S. 
efforts."  However, these objectives will not be "numerical targets" 
which the Japanese Government will guarantee.  The program is also 
not part of Japan's "external economic measures." 

   The MOT plans to submit a proposal to the United States to form 
an "executive committee" to examine specific ways of implementing 
the program.  The executive committee will be established as a joint 
Japan-U.S. effort, and will be led by government officials from both 
countries.  Potential topics for discussion include Japan's 
consideration of measures to expand "leisure time systems" for 
Japanese visitors and U.S. measures to prepare a "service 
infrastructure" for implementing the program.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI 
SHIMBUN 29 Mar 94 p 7) 

   Energy/Petroleum - Tokyo Gas Introduces New 'Composite Energy 
System' -- Tokyo Gas, Japan's largest metropolitan gas company, has 
begun operating a composite energy system which uses three new 
energy technologies--fuel cell, solar power, and gas cogeneration- 
-to supply electricity, heating and cooling, and hot water at the 
Senju Technostation, its experimental center in Arakawa-ku, Tokyo, 
which opened on 18 March.  The company's new "Three Fleche (Arrow)" 
system supplies 57 percent of Technostation's energy demand, with 
the remainder supplied by Tokyo Electric Power Co.  The solar 
generation unit supplies 30 kilowatts; the gas cogeneration unit 
supplies 1,360 kilowatts; and a phosphoric acid fuel cell generates 
200 kilowatts of electricity by using hydrogen from vaporized water 
heated by gas. 

   The system requires an investment of 760 million yen ($7.3 
million) to install, but saves up to 40 million yen ($385,000) 
annually in total utility costs.  Companies which install this 
system can also avoid the 300 to 400 million yen ($2.8-3.8 million) 
investment which electric power companies require of consumers with 
service contracts for 2,000 kilowatts or more. 

   Masao Ogura, chief of the Total Energy Systems Division of Tokyo 
Gas, stated:  "Now is the time to look at various energies and make 
them more efficient.  This will also ease the strained resources of 
electric power companies."  The future diffusion of such composite 
energy systems, however, will reduce the number of electric service 
contracts and will create "strong rivalries" between gas and 
electric power companies.  (Tokyo SANKEI SHIMBUN 25 Mar 94 p 3) 

   Financial Issues - FEATURE:  Article Says MOF Prepared To Stop 
Money Flows to North Korea -- SUMMARY:  A leading Japanese business 
weekly reported that in the event the UN Security Council approves a 
resolution authorizing economic sanctions against North Korea, the 
Ministry of Finance (MOF) would "completely stop direct money 
transfers" via Japanese banks to North Korea and strengthen checks 
of luggage at the Niigata Port to prevent travelers to North Korea 
from carrying large amounts of cash.  Although it is not known 
exactly how much money is sent to North Korea, the article stated, 
figures quoted in the media "appear too high." 

   An unattributed article in the 11 April issue of NIKKEI BUSINESS 
reported that the MOF has finished a preparatory study on how Japan 
would implement sanctions against North Korea in the event the UN 
Security Council passes a resolution authorizing economic sanctions. 
According to the article, the ministry will "completely stop direct 
money transfers" via Japanese banks to North Korea and "strengthen 
luggage checks" at Niigata Port to guard against members of the pro- 
North Korean Organization of Korean Residents in Japan (Chosen 
Soren) carrying large amounts of cash when they travel on ships to 
North Korea.  Concerning money transfers through third countries, 
the MOF believes that policing is the responsibility of the third 
country where the transfer to North Korea actually takes place.  If 
the third country involved is also a UN member, the ministry 
believes, they would "also be held responsible" for preventing such 
transfers. 

   Direct Money Transfers Through Japanese Banks - The article 
reported that the MOF plans to stop direct money transfers through 
Japanese banks to North Korea by instituting a rule, based on the 
Foreign Exchange and Trade Control Law, that "all money transfers to 
foreign countries must be approved by the MOF."  At present, 
according to the article, 18 Japanese banks have correspondent 
agreements with two North Korean banks, the Foreign Trade Bank of 
Korea and Taesong Bank, but only two of the 18 banks, Hokkaido 
Takushoku Bank--Japan's 21st largest bank--and Ashikaga Bank--the 
largest regional bank in Tochigi Prefecture-- "are being used for 
money transfers from Japan to North Korea."  According to the 
article, the MOF knows that a total of 4 billion yen ($38 million) 
was transferred to North Korea through Japanese banks in 1993.  Of 
that amount, 90 percent was transferred through Ashikaga Bank and 10 
percent through Hokkaido Takushoku Bank. 

   Money Transfers Through Third Countries - The article observed 
that Japan's administrative system does not  provide the MOF with 
authority to check money transfers through third countries.  It 
pointed out that the Bank of Japan does not possess a mechanism for 
tracking money transferred to foreign countries, even if it was 
transferred through a bank. 

   Yoichi Mabe, director of the Japan-South Korea Economic Research 
Center, was quoted in the article as saying that Chosen Soren 
members own more than 100 restaurants and trading firms overseas. 
Mabe claimed that some members legally send money to their firms in 
China or Switzerland, where they "hand money to North Korean 
representatives."  Another method cited by Mabe is that some Chosen 
Soren members legitimately write bank checks to themselves, go to 
Hong Kong and cash them, and then hand the money "to North Korean 
trading firms in Hong Kong."  The article concluded that, in the 
event the UN resolution is passed, the MOF would state that it is 
impossible for Japan to stop such transfers. 

   MOF's Fear of International Criticism - According to the article, 
the MOF decided to complete its preparatory study "well in advance" 
so that Japan would be prepared to state what it could and could not 
do when and if a UN resolution is passed.  The ministry also 
intended to counter the "international view" that "Japan has a heavy 
responsibility to respond to North Korea's development of nuclear 
weapons" by indicating what preventive measures are within Japan's 
reach.  The article reported that the MOF fears the same criticism- 
"too little, too late"--made by the United States against Japan 
during the Gulf War, if it were "unprepared and slow" in 
implementing economic sanctions. 

   The article explained that nobody, including the MOF, knows 
exactly how much money is actually being transferred to North Korea. 
Saying that "figures quoted here and there" are all "guesses," it 
warned that it would be "dangerous" for Japan to allow "those 
groundless figures to take on lives of their own." 

   Researcher Claims 60 Billion Yen Sent to North Korea - According 
to the article, Katsumi Sato, editor in chief of the journal GENDAI 
KOREA (Modern Korea), a publication for Korea specialists, in 
January 1992 estimated that the amount of funds sent by Chosen Soren 
members to North Korea at 60 billion yen ($571 million) a year. 
According to NIKKEI BUSINESS, the U.S. Congressional Research 
Service (CRS) stated in the 16 February 1994 issue of CRS ISSUE 
BRIEFING that "Chosen Soren members send $600-700 million to North 
Korea a year, and the total amount transferred to North Korea from 
Japan is $1.8 billion a year."  Because Sato visited the United 
States and met with CRS staffers several times in 1992, NIKKEI 
BUSINESS speculated that CRS's numbers "appear to be based on Sato's 
figures. 

   The article indicated that Sato had calculated the 60 billion yen 
figure in the following way.  Using Ministry of Justice statistics 
on reentry permits, he assumed that about 14,500 "Korean residents 
in Japan with North Korean citizenship" leave and reenter Japan 
every year, and that each person who went to North Korea carried 3 
million yen ($28,500), for a total amount of 43.5 billion yen ($414 
million).  He also calculated that each of the 200,000-250,000 
Chosen Soren members sent 100,000 yen ($952) a year to North Korea 
through Chogin Credit Associations and Kongo Insurance, both of 
which are affiliated with Chosen Soren, for a total of 20-25 billion 
yen ($190-238 million).  When the two totals are added together, 
they come to "around 60-70 billion yen ($571-667 million)." 

   Article Questioned Sato's Figure - The NIKKEI BUSINESS article 
used trade statistics compiled by Teruo Komaki, director of the 
Trend Analysis Department of the Institute of Developing Economies, 
to question the $1.8 billion total cited in the CRS ISSUE BRIEF. 
According to Komaki, in 1992 North Korea's total exports amounted to 
$860 million, while its total imports amounted to $1.64 billion, 
leaving it with a trade deficit of $780 million.  The article stated 
that if $1.8 billion were remitted to North Korea from Japan 
annually, "North Korea would have a $1 billion surplus" after 
balancing its trade accounts, a situation that it viewed as very 
unlikely. 

   Concerning Sato's figure of the 60-70 billion yen ($571-667 
million), the article noted that since the 14,500 Korean residents 
had presumably traveled to other places in the world, it would be 
"illogical" to assume that all had visited North Korea.  Moreover, 
since the total number of travelers included babies and old people, 
it also would also be "illogical" to assume that everyone hand- 
carried 3 million yen to North Korea. 

   FEATURE:  Financial Institutions Expanding Derivatives Operations 
- SUMMARY:  Japanese financial institutions are enhancing their 
derivatives operations domestically and abroad, according to press 
reports.  To compensate for declining core businesses profits and to 
hedge against increasing currency and interest rate risks, financial 
institutions are bolstering their derivatives businesses in 
anticipation of further globalization and the concomitant need to 
hedge.  As a result, ancillary businesses have developed in areas 
like financial computer systems and financial insurance. 

   According to the 16 March NIKKEI KINYU SHIMBUN, the use of 
derivative financial products such as swaps, options, futures, and 
forward contracts is expanding worldwide, particularly in Tokyo's 
financial markets, and has prompted the Bank of Japan to establish a 
"project team" to study their effect.  Moreover, the Ministry of 
Finance will begin incorporating derivatives into its calculations 
of its capital account balance in 1995, according to the 15 April 
NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN. 

   Banks, Securities Companies Expanding Derivative Operations - 
Sumitomo Bank was the first Japanese bank to establish local 
subsidiaries specializing in derivatives in New York (1989), London 
(1990), and Hong Kong (1991) in a "trilateral" operation staffed by 
150 people worldwide, according to the 12 April NIKKEI KINYU.  They 
have formulated a competitive "start-to-finish" strategy, ranging 
from derivative product development to marketing, risk management, 
settlement of payments, and accounting. 

   Sakura Bank's wholly-owned subsidiary, Sakura Global Capital, 
located in New York, focuses on derivatives, the NIKKEI KINYU 
article reported.  It introduced two new interest rate derivative 
products in 1994 that had garnered $1.05 billion in contract amounts 
as of the end of March 1994.  In addition, Sakura Global Capital 
will establish a wholly-owned subsidiary in Hong Kong in July 1994 
that will coordinate with Sakura subsidiaries in London and New 
York, paving the way for "trilateral" operations between the United 
States, Europe, and Asia.  During 1994 all major Japanese banks are 
expected to establish "trilateral operational systems" like those of 
Sumitomo and Sakura. 

   Two strategic companies in the Nomura Securities group currently 
specialize in derivatives, according to the 13 April NIKKEI KINYU. 
They are Nomura Option International, established in London in 1990 
to manage risk and to "globalize" Nomura's stock derivatives 
business, and Nomura Capital Service, which entered the over-the- 
counter derivatives market in 1992.  Nomura Capital Service deals in 
highly-liquid derivatives such as interest rate and currency caps 
and floors and "swaptions" (an option to enter into or cancel a 
swap). 

   According to the 12 April NIKKEI KINYU, the Industrial Bank of 
Japan (IBJ) stationed a "capital markets task force" in its New York 
branch in 1991 to nurture its derivative business "though local 
expertise."  The branch's FY93 revenues reportedly grew by 50 
percent over FY92.  In Japan IBJ has concentrated its efforts on the 
derivatives market, according to the 11 March NIKKEI KINYU, because 
it believes "banks can no longer survive on profits from traditional 
lending" and "expansion cannot occur without taking derivatives into 
account."  The chief of IBJ's "financial products development 
division" visited more than ten regional banks recently to discuss 
derivatives.  He is also aggressively encouraging corporations to 
use them as well, holding more than 400 meetings with companies 
during which he analyzes the companies' financial risk position 
caused by interest and currency rate fluctuations and suggests ways 
to reduce such risk through derivatives.  IBJ's "international 
investment division derivative team" earns half the division's 
annual revenues from derivatives transactions. 

   The Bank of Tokyo, anticipating a growing need for companies to 
be able to compensate for fluctuations in interest and exchange 
rates in their operating localities, is increasing capital 
investment and the number of personnel at its London and Hong Kong 
securities subsidiaries to enhance sales of swaps and options, 
according to the 7 April NIKKEI KINYU.  The bank has already doubled 
its capital investment in Bank of Tokyo Capital Markets in London 
and will double its number of personnel by 1995.  Likewise, it has 
tripled capital investment in its Hong Kong subsidiary, BOT 
International (HK), and plans to increase personnel from the current 
50 employees to 70. 

   For Sanwa Bank, derivatives have been a "strategic area" for 
roughly a year, according to the 24 March NIKKEI KINYU.  The bank is 
steadily building up its derivatives operations by more than 
quadrupling the number of domestic employees responsible for 
derivatives by the end of April 1994, bringing its worldwide 
derivatives contingent to over 130 people.  Sanwa has established 
derivative-support task forces at its marketing offices and a task 
force of specialists at its Tokyo headquarters to work together in 
response to the growing demand for derivatives.  With the increased 
manpower, derivative transactions have doubled from 15 to 30 per 
month. 

   According to the 23 March NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN, Fuji Bank is 
currently considering establishing a branch or subsidiary in Hong 
Kong through its U.S. subsidiary to specialize in derivatives, and 
has already decided to increase capital investment in its Hong Kong 
securities subsidiary to expand derivatives operations. 

   Derivatives Business Stimulates Computer Systems Development - 
NCI Systems Integration Inc., established by Nippon Steel Corp. in 
1988 to develop financial computer systems, is rapidly expanding its 
derivative-product systems, according to the 23 March NIKKEI KINYU. 
To date it has developed some 40 financial systems and earns roughly 
500 million yen ($4.76 million) annually from developing derivative 
systems for major commercial, long-term credit, and trust banks. 

   The Bank of Tokyo is focusing its efforts on software systems for 
large corporations where derivative transactions are on the rise, 
according to the 29 March NIKKEI KINYU.  It has developed and begun 
marketing new software which accommodates currency exchange options 
data into a personal computer.  With the new software, it is 
possible to account for profits or losses on a currency exchange and 
calculate the settlement amount before the transaction settlement 
date. 

   Tokai Bank will introduce a new on-line system in the fall of 
1994 that connects all its overseas branches and can calculate the 
mark-to-market" price of currency futures contracts, according to 
the 10 March NIKKEI KINYU.  The system already connects London, New 
York, and Tokyo.  The bank currently is expanding it to Singapore 
and Hong Kong and, in the future, will expand it to Los Angeles and 
Frankfurt.  The system is notable for its derivative risk management 
capabilities because it is able to calculate the "mark-to-market" 
price of derivatives at the end of every trading day. 

   In another computer-system related development, according to the 
17 March NIKKEI KINYU, foreign exchange brokers on the Tokyo 
exchange are introducing local area networks (LANs) to enhance their 
derivative product information systems.  Last year Tokyo Forex Co., 
Japan's largest foreign exchange broker, which is affiliated with 
Tokyo Tanshi Co., set up a LAN that connected over 100 trading 
terminals of the two companies.  Ueda Harlow Ltd., a subsidiary of 
Ueda Tanshi Co., established a LAN network connecting Tokyo, Hong 
Kong, Singapore, and Sydney and this year will complete the network 
by connecting these overseas offices with Ueda Tanshi.  According to 
its planning office, Nit tan AP Co. is currently considering 
introducing a LAN as well. 

   Insurance Companies Offer Products To Cover Derivatives - Japan's 
largest nonlife insurance companies--Tokio Marine and Fire, Yasuda 
Fire and Marine, Mitsui Marine and Fire, and Sumitomo Marine and 
Fire--are entering the financial insurance business, according to 
the 10 March NIKKEI KINYU.  Currently, foreign financial 
institutions are reluctant to engage Japanese firms in derivatives 
transactions due to their declining credit ratings and the 
concomitant credit risk.  With a "credit guarantee" on a derivatives 
transaction from a triple A-rated Japanese insurance company, the 
credit risk is reduced, which allows foreign firms to tap into the 
the growing demand for derivatives in Japan. 

   Tokio Marine and Fire Insurance, Japan's largest nonlife insurer, 
recently signed a "credit guarantee contract" on derivatives 
transactions with two European banks, according to the 12 April 
NIKKEI KINYU.  Reportedly this is the first use of such a "credit 
guarantee" in Japan.  Under the terms of the contract Tokio Marine 
will guarantee the payment of principal and interest involved in the 
derivative transaction to the European bank if the Japanese company 
or bank that is the counterparty to the derivative transaction 
defaults.  In return, the company will receive a guarantee fee from 
the foreign bank.  Tokyo Marine anticipates that this "credit 
guarantee" will become a powerful new source of business. 

   Yasuda Fire and Marine Insurance, Japan's second largest nonlife 
insurer, is building a structure to monitor and undertake such 
guarantees, according to the 10 March NIKKEI KINYU.  Although it has 
not entered into "credit guarantee" arrangements in Japan to date, 
and for the time being will simply manage swaps, Yasuda in April 
will upgrade its financial insurance section into a separate 
division and double the number of personnel.  NIKKEI KINYU pointed 
out that the yen-related interest rate swap market Yasuda is 
entering totaled $700 billion as of the end of 1992, "an eighteen- 
fold increase over the 1987 figure." 

   According to the same article, Mitsui Marine and Fire Insurance, 
Japan's third largest nonlife insurer, began its derivative 
insurance business in February.  According to the 14 October 1993 
NIKKEI, through an agreement with Goldman, Sachs and Co., Mitsui 
established Goldman, Sachs, Mitsui Marine and Fire Derivative 
Products to learn "cutting-edge financial techniques" and enhance 
its know-how of derivatives. 

   Sumitomo Marine and Fire Insurance, Japan's fourth largest 
nonlife insurer, has established a tie-up with General Electric's 
Financial Guarantee Insurance Company to exchange personnel and 
know-how concerning financial insurance, according to the 8 February 
NIKKEI KINYU. 

   Tokyo Exchange May Relax Regulations To Attract Asian Companies - 
The Tokyo Stock Exchange is considering relaxing regulations 
governing listings on its foreign section to encourage companies, 
especially Asian companies, to list there.  With an increasing 
number of American and European companies applying to delist from 
the exchange because of its low trading volume, and with exchanges 
in the United States and Europe encouraging Asian companies to list 
with them, the Tokyo exchange fears it will be left out of the 
world's capital markets. 

   There has been no new foreign listing on the Tokyo exchange since 
February 1993, while some 22 foreign firms have delisted since last 
year.  In mid-March, the exchange dispatched a group to China and 
other Asian nations to survey their accounting and company oversight 
systems.  Based on the group's findings, the exchange is hammering 
out a policy to stimulate new listings. 

   Currently foreign listing restrictions tend to hinder Asian 
companies from listing on the Tokyo exchange.  According to exchange 
rules, a foreign company's stocks must be listed for a minimum of 
two years at home before it can be listed.  Also, the minimum asset 
and profit requirements companies must meet before they can be 
listed are too large for Asian companies, which tend to be smaller 
than their U.S. and European counterparts.  As a result, the Tokyo 
exchange is using the New York Stock Exchange as its reference point 
in "thinking about fundamentally relaxing regulations so that more 
Asian companies can list there."  (Tokyo NIKKEI KINYU SHIMBUN 5 Apr 
94 p 1) 

   Foreign Trade and Investment - CHINA:  Sony To Reimport Camcorder 
Parts From Shanghai Joint Venture Firm -- Shanghai Suoguang 
Electronics Co. Ltd., a joint venture company created between Sony 
and Shanghai Jiaodian Co., China's largest electronics manufacturer, 
has begun "reexporting" camcorder "mechanical decks" to Japan.  Sony 
originally planned to export camcorder parts from Japan, assemble 
finished camcorders at Shanghai Suoguang, and sell them in China. 
However, the Chinese Government has delayed lowering the 75 percent 
tariff on imported Japanese parts, making this plan unprofitable. 

   Because there are no Chinese tariffs on parts used in products 
that will be reexported, Shanghai Suoguang now plans to use the 
parts to assemble 100,000 mechanical decks annually and reexport 
them to Sony Koda, a Sony subsidiary based in Aichi Prefecture, 
where they will be incorporated in Sony TR303 export model 
camcorders.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 5 Apr 94 p 11) 

   SMS Technologies Establishes Joint Venture To Make Switching 
Devices - SMS Technologies, a mid-sized electronic-parts trading 
company located in Tokyo, in conjunction with the Shanghai Tape 
Recorder Factory, a Chinese state-run electronics company, will 
establish a joint venture company to manufacture standardized 
switching power sources for use in TV sets and fax machines.  The 
joint venture company, as yet unnamed, will be capitalized between 
$800,000 and $1 million and will be collocated at Shanghai Tape 
Recorder Factory's facilities outside Shanghai.  It will employ 200 
workers and is scheduled to begin producing about 200,000 power 
sources per month in 1995. 

   Thirty percent of the new company's output will be sold to the 
Shanghai Tape Recorder Factory and other Chinese companies, while 
the remaining 70 percent will be exported to Japan and the United 
States.  By creating this joint venture, SMS will create a 
"relatively low-cost" part procurement structure and will 
"strengthen its ties with Chinese state-run companies."  (Tokyo 
NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 4 Apr 94 p 8) 

   KAZAKHSTAN:  Business Agreement Between Japanese Insurance Firm, 
Local Company - Sumitomo Marine and Fire Insurance, Japan's fourth 
largest nonlife insurance company, concluded a "cooperative business 
agreement" on 6 April with a major insurance company in Kazakhstan, 
according to the 7 April NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN.  The move by Sumitomo 
sets a precedent among Japanese nonlife insurers, since it will be 
the first agreement by a Japanese  insurance company in any Central 
Asian republic and it will be a precursor to future agreements in 
the other Central Asian Republics.  Sumitomo plans to conclude a 
similar arrangement in Uzbekistan during 1994. 

   Although Kazakhstan does not permit foreign insurance companies 
to operate independently, because of the huge amounts of insurance 
required for large projects, it has decided, in this case, to allow 
Sumitomo to reinsure the local company and to determine for itself 
the insurance premiums it will charge.  The local firm offers 
primarily cargo and accident insurance.   Under the agreement, 
Sumitomo will introduce Japanese companies entering Kazakhstan's 
market to the local company, will reinsure the existing policies the 
local company has, and will provide the local company with damage 
assessment know-how. 
   According to a 7 April NHK NEWS report, carried in the Nikkei 
Telecom database, Sumitomo will aggressively seek out business in 
anticipation of increasing demand for insurance as economic activity 
expands between Kazakhstan and Japan--such as the recent low- 
interest loan from the Export-Import Bank of Japan for energy 
development--and attracts more Japanese companies to the region. 

   RUSSIA:  Japanese Retail Chain To Expand Operations in Russian 
Far East - Shoren, a major wholesaler of general merchandise and 
home electronics products headquartered in Sapporo, is cooperating 
with local Russian companies to expand its chain of retail stores in 
the Russian Far East, according to the 5 April HOKKAIDO SHIMBUN. 
Income from its operations in the Russian Far East already account 
for 2 billion yen ($19 million) of Shoren's 15.5 billion yen ($147.6 
million) in annual sales of over 700 types of household products. 
Shoren is the first Japanese company to build a retail chain on this 
scale in Russia. 

   Shoren currently has three stores in Kamchatka and one each in 
Vladivostok and Yuzhno-Sakhalinsk.  It plans to expand its chain by 
opening ten new stores within a year in Irkutsk, Khabarovsk, 
Yakutsk, Blagoveshchensk, Novosibirsk, and in Central Asian 
republics of Kyrgyzstan and Kazakhstan. 

   Shoren's success or failure in penetrating the Russian market, 
HOKKAIDO SHIMBUN observed, will influence Japan's major general 
trading companies as to whether they should enter the region. 
Likewise, the trading companies consider Shoren a "test case" amid 
growing interest in the Russian Far East. 

   UNITED STATES:  Aichi Steel Works Signs Consulting Contract With 
Steel Firm - Aichi Steel Works, a major specialty steel manufacturer 
affiliated with Toyota Motor, has signed an agreement with 
Louisville Forge and Gear Works Inc., a Kentucky-based manufacturer 
of forged steel products, to provide consulting services concerning 
construction of a new Louisville Forge and Gear Works plant.  Aichi 
will advise the U.S. firm on various aspects of building its new 
plant, including site layout, facility specifications, and product 
finishing processes.  The new plant is still in the planning stage, 
and the Louisville firm has not decided on a location or a 
construction schedule. 

   Louisville Forge and Gear Works currently supplies forged steel 
parts to the "Big Three" U.S. automakers and "several" Japanese 
automakers that assemble vehicles in the United States.  The firm 
has been working with Aichi under a technical assistance agreement 
signed in July 1990.  The two firms also signed a technical 
cooperation agreement in August 1993 concerning crankshaf t 
manufacturing.  (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 7 Apr 94 p 10) 

   VIETNAM:  FEATURE:  Companies Seeking To Help Vietnam Expand 
Steel Production - SUMMARY:  Nippon Steel and NKK, two leading steel 
companies are conducting several feasibility studies on behalf of 
the Vietnamese Government and the state-run Vietnam Steel Co. on how 
Vietnam might expand its steel production to meet the rapidly 
increasing demand.  Kyoei Steel, an electric furnace steel firm, has 
entered into a joint venture agreement with Vietnam Steel and two 
Japanese general trading companies to build a steel mill in Vung Tau 
to produce steel rods and wire. 

   Nippon Steel, the world's largest steel company, and NKK, the 
world's fifth largest steelmaker, are conducting feasibility studies 
concerning the expansion of Vietnam's steel industry, according to 
the 11 March NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN.  Nippon Steel's study was 
requested by Vietnam's Ministry of Heavy Industry during a November 
1993 visit to Vietnam by Nippon Steel's president, while NKK has 
undertaken its study at the request of the state-run Vietnam Steel 
Co.  While the content of the two studies are similar, NIKKEI SANGYO 
noted, the NKK study focuses on the feasibility of building a steel 
mill in northern Vietnam, while Nippon Steel's study is not limited 
to operations in a specific area of Vietnam.  The firms will submit 
their studies separately with Nippon Steel reportedly aiming to 
formulate its "general conclusions" about the current status of 
Vietnam's steel industry in March. 

   NKK Has Forged Close Ties With Vietnam Steel - NKK sent a 
delegation to Vietnam in 1991 to study the country's steel industry, 
according to the NIKKEI SANGYO article.  A report on the visit 
written by Kenichiro Sekino, head of NKK's International Business 
Development Center, stated that while Vietnam was not ready for 
upgraded steel operations due to poor electricity supplies and 
roads, "exchanges of personnel" could begin.  In 1992 NKK invited 
two Vietnam Steel executives to attend a 3-month training program at 
NKK steel mills and other facilities in Japan.  In November 1992, 
after the executives had returned to Vietnam, Vietnam Steel 
requested that NKK undertake a "pre-feasibility" study concerning 
construction of a steel mill in northern Vietnam that would use iron 
ore mined in That Kei, near the Chinese border.  NKK is reportedly 
completing its study on the site as well as on the demand for steel 
in Vietnam. 

   According to the 16 February NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN, Vietnam Steel 
also commissioned NKK and Mitsubishi Corp. to conduct a feasibility 
study concerning construction of a electric furnace steel mill with 
a capacity to make 500,000 tons of steel billets annually at Cai 
Ran, located in the outskirts of Hanoi.  Through an adjacent 
continuous casting line the billets would be made into steel bars 
and shaped steel products.  In February 1994 NKK and Mitsubishi sent 
a team of experts to Vietnam to conduct a study of the Cai Ran 
project.  Vietnam Steel now reportedly plans to begin construction 
of the mill in mid-1995, at the earliest, and also has plans for a 
similar mill to be built outside Ho Chi Minh City. 

   According to NIKKAN KOGYO, Vietnam's crude steel output currently 
does not exceed 200,000 tons, while demand is at 800,000 tons and 
will increase to 2.5 or 3 million tons by the year 2000.  This is 
why rapid expansion of steel production facilities is so urgent for 
Vietnam, the paper noted.  The NIKKEI SANGYO article also pointed to 
the Vietnamese Government's desire to expand steel output despite 
the country's poor electric power situation and other 
infrastructural shortcomings. 

   NKK Study on Breaking Up Old Ships for Steel Scrap - NKK has also 
received a request from Vietnam Steel to conduct a pre-feasibility 
study concerning an operation in Vietnam to break apart old ships 
and reuse the high-quality scrap steel, according to the 15 March 
NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN.  As a result of this request, after 
completing its study on Vietnam's steel industry potential, NKK will 
then study the feasibility of establishing a facility on Vietnam's 
coast to break apart ships and build a "relatively small-sized 
electric steel mill" to melt down and process the scrap steel. 

   According to NIKKAN KOGYO, NKK calculates that worldwide, about 
100 million tons of obsolete ships are broken apart annually, with 
10 percent of this work being done in India, Pakistan, and 
Bangladesh.  However, because of the depressed state of ship- 
breaking operations in these countries, this business would have 
strong potential" in Vietnam.  While building a blast furnace or a 
coke furnace mill would be extremely costly, building a small 
electric mill is feasible, except that Vietnam has virtually no 
scrap steel. 

   NIKKEI SANGYO reported NKK also would like to exploit the 
resources of its Shipbuilding Division and use tug boats to tow in a 
facility somewhere on Vietnam's coast at which old ships would be 
broken apart.  The company would furnish the know-how to Vietnam 
Steel to build an electric steel mill near this location to melt 
down the scrap and equip the facility with steel rolling and other 
equipment. 

   Kyoei-Vietnam Steel Joint Venture To Produce Steel Bars - Kyoei 
Steel, an Osaka-based electric steel company, has received approval 
from Vietnam's State Committee to Coordinate Investments to 
establish a joint-venture steel company with Vietnam Steel, 
according to the 10 February NIKKEI SANGYO.  The general trading 
companies Mitsui and Co. and Itochu also will invest in the joint 
venture.  The new company, VINAKYOEI, will be capitalized at $20 
million, with Kyoei contributing 45 percent of the total, Vietnam 
Steel 40 percent, Mitsui 9 percent, and Itochu 6 percent.  The 
company will begin operations in October 1995 and plans to produce 
240 tons of steel rods and wire annually. 

   The 10 February NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN added that the new plant 
will be built in Phu My District, Ba Ria-Vung Tau Province, and will 
cost $46 million.  The company's management board will consist of 
ten members, including four from Kyoei and Vietnam Steel and one 
each from Mitsui and Itochu.  The board chairman will be Shuichiro 
Takashima, a Kyoei vice president, and the company's president will 
be Mitsuhiro Mori, a Kyoei executive. 

   Sumitomo Marine and Fire Latest Insurance Firm To Open Hanoi 
Office - Sumitomo Marine and Fire Insurance, Japan's fourth largest 
nonlife insurance company, has received permission from Vietnam's 
Commerce Ministry to establish a Hanoi resident office in August 
1994.  Sumitomo is the fifth Japanese insurance company--following 
Tokio Marine and Fire, Yasuda Fire and Marine, and others--to 
establish an office in Vietnam.  The goal of all insurance firms is 
to provide a full range of accident settlement and  insurance 
services to Japanese companies operating in Vietnam. 

   In 1992 Sumitomo concluded a business agreement with Bao Viet, 
Vietnam's sole national insurance company, through which it received 
reinsurance business.  But with the rapid increase in the number of 
Japanese firms setting up operations in Vietnam, Sumitomo felt it 
necessary to establish an office to provide information to clients 
and to market insurance products. 

   Among other Japanese insurance firms, Nippon Fire and Marine is 
investigating the establishment of an office in Vietnam, while 
Yasuda plans to open a second office--a resident office in Ho Chi 
Minh City--before yearend.  (Tokyo NIKKEI KINYU SHIMBUN 5 Apr 94 p 
2) 

   Japan-U.S. Relations:  FEATURE:  Tug of War With U.S. Over 
Corporate Transfer Pricing - SUMMARY:  Japan's National Tax 
Administration Agency (NTAA) appears to have made its first 
counterattack on the U.S. Internal Revenue Service (IRS) over its 
"aggressive" tax assessments on Japanese firms operating in the 
United States by ordering Coca Cola Japan to pay $143 million in 
back taxes, the largest assessment of its kind, according to press 
reports.  One academic predicts an escalating tug of war between 
Japan and the United States over which country receives the bulk of 
taxes on the profits of multinational companies. 

   The 26 March NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN (NIKKEI) reported that the NTAA 
had ordered Coca Cola Japan, a wholly owned Japanese subsidiary of 
the Coca Cola Company, to pay back corporate taxes of 15 billion yen 
($143 million) stemming from a recalculation of the multinational 
company's transfer pricing, the largest assessment it has ever 
imposed.  The NTAA explained that Coca Cola Japan transferred 
profits worth 36 billion yen ($343 million), about one-quarter of 
its total profits, to its U.S. parent company between 1990 and 1992 
by paying its parent royalties which were "higher than usual."  In 
particular, the NTAA judged that royalties paid for canned coffee 
and Chinese tea products, which were the "inventions" of Coca Cola 
Japan, were "too high."  NIKKEI noted that Coca Cola Japan intends 
to appeal the assessment. 

   Reasons Why NTAA Has 'Targeted' Coca Cola Japan - In the 29 March 
TOKYO SHIMBUN, Meiji University Professor Masatsugu Fujie commented 
that the NTAA has "targeted" Coca Cola Japan because it was 
relatively easy to estimate royalties for canned drinks by comparing 
royalties for similar products made by other companies.  Another and 
more important reason for targeting the company, according to Fujie, 
is the "brand power" of Coca Cola, "the symbol of America's cultural 
invasion of postwar Japan."  Fujie concluded that this symbolism 
will have "enormous" influence on other U.S. firms operating in 
Japan. 

   For these reasons, the TOKYO SHIMBUN article observed, the NTAA 
appears "firmly determined" to pursue what it views as Coca Cola 
Japan's tax evasion through inflated transfer pricing.  The paper 
observed that the NTAA asked Finance Minister Hirohisa Fujii for 
approval to impose the assessment on Coca Cola Japan because of the 
parent firm's "political connections to the current U.S. 
administration."  Usually, the only approval required to impose 
additional taxes is from the NTAA director general. 

   NTAA's Frustration With Aggressiveness of IRS - The 29 March 
TOKYO SHIMBUN quoted Hitotsubashi University Prof. Mitsuhiro Ishi as 
characterizing the NTAA's action as a "declaration of a tax war" 
against the IRS.  Ishi stated that since the IRS has been 
"aggressively" taxing Japanese companies operating in the United 
States, which in turn have been receiving credits from the NTAA for 
the higher taxes paid to the IRS, the Coca Cola case is an 
expression of the NTAA's firm resolve "not to let the IRS do 
whatever it wants."  TOKYO SHIMBUN also noted the mounting 
frustration within the NTAA, capsulized in the remark by an 
anonymous official:  "How long do we let the IRS take our tax 
money?" 

   According to the TOKYO SHIMBUN article, the NTAA has not been 
able to effectively impose assessments based on "questionable" 
transfer pricing practices employed by U.S. companies operating in 
Japan because of legal differences between Japan and the United 
States.  Under Japanese law the NTAA must prove that the Japanese 
subsidiary of a U.S. company has transferred a part of profits to 
its parent firm "to evade taxes," while under U.S. law a foreign 
company must prove it has not done this.  In 1993, for example, the 
NTAA tried to "reinterpret" the transfer pricing policies of U.S. 
securities firms in Japan, which had reaped "huge profits" while all 
Japanese securities firms suffered losses, however, the NTAA had to 
give up "because it was too difficult to prove."  According to the 
article, lack of resources on the part of the NTAA has also limited 
it from charging foreign firms with transfer pricing irregularities. 
Beginning in FY94, however, the number of auditors examining foreign 
firms will double from 9 to 18 in order to "more aggressively 
pursue" cases of tax evasion by foreign companies. 

   The TOKYO SHIMBUN article reported that "contrary" to the NTAA, 
the IRS had become "more aggressive" in reassessing the transfer 
pricing of Japanese companies in the United States since the spring 
of 1993, when the IRS introduced a rule allowing itself to assume 
profits on the part of Japanese companies based on the profits of 
U.S. companies in the same industry.  The 26 March NIKKEI reported 
that under the Clinton administration, the IRS had "tightened up" 
taxation on international transfers of patent fees, royalties, and 
other intangible assets.  In the TOKYO SHIMBUN article, Prof. Ishi 
also commented that the IRS "targets foreign--particularly Japanese- 
-companies" because assessing heavier taxes on foreign firms "is the 
easiest way to increase tax revenues."  In addition, Ishi noted the 
idea of "attacking" Japanese companies will be received with 
"political favor" by American voters. 

   Tug of War Over Corporate Taxes Likely To Continue - In the TOKYO 
SHIMBUN article, Prof. Ishi predicted that the "tug of war" over 
which country will receive the profits of multinational companies is 
unlikely to be settled quickly.  One reason is the complexity of the 
issues concerning international transfers of profits derived from 
royalties, patent fees, and other intangible assets.  As one 
example, he explained that taxes on royalties can be very difficult 
and complicated to calculate, and that in a broader, international 
context it will take a long time to reach any multilateral agreement 
on rules for taxing royalties.  "In the absence of agreed-upon 
rules," Ishi concluded, the number of disputes over transfer pricing 
"will likely increase in the future." 

   Machine Tools/Robotics - FEATURE:  Machine Tool Sales Languish, 
Firms Take Cost-Cutting Measures -- SUMMARY:  Machine tool orders 
for January and February 1994 were down by double-digit amounts 
compared to 1993, and several companies reported losses for FY93, 
which ended on 31 March, according to press reports. Companies are 
resorting to a number of measures to cut costs, including moving and 
merging corporate offices, soliciting "voluntary" retirements, and 
eliminating divisions and subsidiaries. 

   According to the 11 March NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN (NIKKEI), an 
industry survey conducted by the Japan Machine Tool Builders' 
Association (JMTBA) showed total machine tool orders for January 
came to 37.976 billion yen, down 11.6 percent from January 1993 and 
also down 5.2 percent from December 1993.  January domestic orders 
were down 27.7 percent from 1993 to 19.17 billion yen ($182.6 
million).  "This is the first time domestic orders have dropped 
below the 20 billion yen ($190.5 million) level" since JMTBA began 
conducting its surveys in 1983.  Orders from the general machinery 
industry fell 31.3 percent and orders from the auto industry fell 
54.1 percent.  Export orders came to 18.869 billion yen ($179.7 
million), down 14.4 percent year-on-year, but this total does not 
include overseas production. 

   The JMTBA's February survey, reported in the 5 April NIKKEI 
SANGYO SHIMBUN, showed total machine tool orders of 38.924 billion 
yen ($370.7 million), down 16.7 percent from February 1993. 
Domestic orders totaled 22.273 billion yen ($212.1 million), up from 
January but down 24.6 percent year-on-year.  Orders from the 
electrical machinery, general machinery, and auto industries were 
down between 20 and 30 percent.  February export orders came to 
16.651 billion yen ($158.58 million), down 3.1 percent.  Exports to 
Europe are still in a slump, but exports to the United States, 
China, and Southeast Asia were good. 

   Several Companies Report Losses for FY93 - Press reports noted 
that a number of machine tool companies have reported current or 
"final" losses for FY93, as follows: 

   Hitachi Seiki--One of Japan's largest manufacturers of CNC lathes 
and machining centers, Hitachi Seiki reported 24 billion yen 
($228.57 million) in machine tool sales in FY93, down 20 percent 
from the previous year, according to the 5 April NIKKEI.  Current 
losses were 6.7 billion yen ($63.8 million) compared to 4.916 
billion yen ($46.82 million) in FY92.  "Final losses" for FY93 were 
4.743 billion yen ($45.17 million), because the firm realized 1.5 
billion yen ($14.3 million) in extraordinary profits from the sale 
of land and facilities in Abiko, Chiba Prefecture.  The company sold 
the land to cover about 800 million yen ($7.62 million) in 
extraordinary losses related to retirement allowances for about 200 
"early and voluntary retirements."  Without the sale, final losses 
would have been greater than the 7.5 billion yen ($71.43 million) in 
surplus funds it had on hand as of March 1993.  For FY94, Hitachi 
Seiki projects sales of 27 billion yen ($257.14 million) and a 
shrinkage of its current losses to 3.4 billion yen ($32.38 million). 

   Hamai--According to the 30 March NIKKEI, Hamai, which specializes 
in machining centers and gear-hobbing machines, is trying to emerge 
from insolvency.  Its liabilities exceeding assets will be 1.3 
billion yen ($12.38 million) at the end of FY93.  Its sales for FY93 
are expected to be 4 billion yen ($38.1 million).  FY93 current 
losses will come to 1.9 billion yen ($18.1 million), compared to 
losses of just under 2.5 billion yen ($23.81 million) for the 
previous six-month period.  Extraordinary losses related to 
allowances for voluntary retirements will cause final losses to 
total 2 billion yen ($19.05 million). 

   Hamai hopes its operating losses can be limited to 12.5 billion 
yen ($14.28 million) for the September 1994 six-month settlement 
period.  Hamai will sell stock from its investment portfolio and 
will sell an employee dormitory in Meguro Ward, Tokyo, to reduce its 
final losses to 1.3 billion yen ($12.38 million) and reduce its 
liabilities in excess of assets to 600 million yen ($5.7 million). 
Hamai is also studying raising over 2 billion yen in extraordinary 
profits by selling its company headquarters building and "some land" 
at its Ashikaga plant in Tochigi Prefecture to entirely eliminate 
its liabilities in excess of assets by the end of FY94. 

   Tsugami--A medium-sized firm specializing in computer-numerically 
controlled lathes and machining centers and which depends on machine 
tools for 90 percent of total sales, Tsugami reported sales of 9.1 
billion yen ($86.6 million) for FY93, down 28 percent from FY92, 
according to the 5 April NIKKEI.  Operating losses were 1.3 billion 
yen ($12.38 million).  Revenues were just over 100 million yen 
($952,000), but nonoperating losses were also 100 million yen. 
Current losses were about 1.4 billion yen ($13.3 million).  This 
compares with current losses of 2.525 billion yen ($24 million) in 
FY92. 

   Tsugami expects a 10 percent increase in sales this year and 
anticipates that its rationalization efforts will reduce current 
losses in FY94 to about 900 million yen ($8.57 million).  The 23 
March NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN adds that Tsugami will move its company 
headquarters and its sales subsidiary, Tsugami Kobai, from 
Shimbashi, Tokyo, to Hamamatsu, Shizuoka Prefecture, in mid-April to 
cut office expenses. 

   Nippei Toyama--According to the 1 April NIKKEI, Nippei Toyama, a 
leading machine tool firm that specializes in transfer machines, 
will incur 800 million yen ($7.62 million) in extraordinary losses 
associated with the liquidation of Norion Kogyo, its machine tool 
and industrial machinery assembly and parts subsidiary located in 
Yokohama City.  Nippei will also incur another 550 million yen 
($5.24 million) in extraordinary losses to cover special allowances 
involving the early retirement of 21 workers.  As a result, final 
losses will be 3.7 billion yen ($35.24 million).  NIKKEI noted that 
Nippei is "currently insolvent," but did not disclose the amount by 
which its liabilities exceed total assets. 

   Firms Undertake More Cost-Cutting Efforts - Press reports noted 
that other companies are adopting rationalization and cost cutting 
measures, as follows: 

   Toyoda Machine Works--According to the 10 March NIKKEI SANGYO 
SHIMBUN, Toyoda Machine Works, a subsidiary of the Toyota Motor 
Group, on 1 April will merge two wholly owned subsidiaries, Toyo 
Giken, its machine-tool design company, and High-Tech System, its 
software development firm, both located in Tokyo, into a new 
company, Toyo High Tech.  The new firm will be capitalized at 38 
million yen ($362,000) with Toyoda Machine Works investing the 
entire amount.  The new company, to be located in the former Toyo 
Giken's office space, will employ 190 workers.  Toyo High Tech 
expects to have 2.2 billion yen ($20.95 million) in sales in the 
first fiscal year. 

   Matsuura Machinery--According to the 23 February NIKKEI SANGYO 
SHIMBUN, Matsuura, a major manufacturer of high-speed machining 
centers located in Fukui City, Fukui Prefecture, will close two 
business offices in the Kanto region and consolidate their 
operations at its office in Taito Ward, Tokyo.  The offices to be 
closed are its Eastern Kanto Office located in Kashiwa, Chiba 
Prefecture, and the Southern Kanto Office located in Machida City, 
Tokyo.  Matsuura now will serve the Kanto region from its Tokyo 
office and its North Kanto office located in Kawagoe City, Saitama 
Prefecture. 

   Mitsui Seiki Kogyo--According to the 23 March NIKKEI SANGYO 
SHIMBUN, Mitsui Seiki Kogyo, a medium-sized machine tool company, in 
January moved nearly all its headquarters offices from Nihonbashi, 
Tokyo, to its plant in Ota Ward, Tokyo, to save an estimated 500 
million yen ($4.76 million) per year in office rental and 
communications costs. 

   OKK--One of Japan's seven largest machine tool companies that 
specialized in machining centers and numerically controlled milling 
machines, OKK will extend its temporary worker furloughs, which had 
been in effect through March 1994, according to the 7 April NIKKEI 
SANGYO SHIMBUN.  Between April and June OKK will furlough for a 
total of 12 days workers at its Inagawa plant in Hyogo Prefecture. 
OKK furloughed these workers for 12 days between April and September 
1993, and for 28 days between October 1993 and March 1994.  Since 
October, workers have been furloughed every Friday, a practice the 
firm will continue. 

   In addition, Mitsubishi Motors has agreed to retain 20 OKK 
workers temporarily assigned to its Mizushima plant in Kuraki, 
Okamoto Prefecture, for another six months.  In October 1992, 40 
workers were temporarily assigned to Mitsubishi Motors for one year, 
but were extended through March 1994.  The current six month 
extensions cover only half of the workers. 

   Okuma--According to the 2 April CHUNICHI SHIMBUN, the prolonged 
recession is forcing Okuma, a major machine tool manufacturer, to 
streamline its organization "by eliminating four of its five 
divisions."  The functions of its management, service, 
manufacturing, and technical divisions will be absorbed by its 
Business Division, which will be managed by company president Junro 
Kashiwa. 

   Shoun Machine Tool--According to the 2 March NIKKEI SANGYO 
SHIMBUN, Shoun, a company in the Yanmar Diesel Engine Group, will 
cut its workforce by 36 percent as of 20 June.  To do this, it will 
solicit 92 "voluntary" retirements from workers 50 years of age or 
older, including workers currently on temporary assignment to Shoun 
Shinzaki Engineering and Shoun Seiki, both located in Kamakura, 
Kanagawa Prefecture.  This will reduce Shoun's workforce from 254 to 
162.  Shoun anticipates this move will save about 500 million yen 
($4.76 million) per year in personnel expenses. 

   Okuma To Sell Numerically Controlled Lathes in China - Okuma, a 
leading machine tool manufacturer, has signed an eight-year contract 
to provide the Shenyang Third Machine Tool Factory with the 
technology to manufacture its LB15 series of general-purpose 
numerically controlled lathes.  Initially Okuma will export all 
parts for the lathes, which will be assembled by the Shenyang firm, 
but gradually the ratio of locally procured parts will be increased. 
The finished product will be sold in China under the "Okuma-Shenyang 
Third" brand. 

   Okuma will also set up service centers in Shanghai and Beijing by 
mid-April which will operate by consigning work, performed under the 
supervision of Okuma technicians, to the Shanghai Machine Tool 
Factory and the Beijing Second Machine Tool Factory.  To date Okuma 
has delivered more than 230 lathes to companies in China.  (Tokyo 
NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 29 Mar 94 p 13) 

   Semiconductors/Computers/Electronics - NEC Wins Four New Orders 
for Its Cenju-3 Supercomputer -- NEC Corp. has won four orders from 
three Japanese universities and one company for its new "Cenju-3" 
parallel processing supercomputer.  The orders for "core basis" 
machines--which do not include peripheral equipment--have a combined 
value of about 200 million yen ($1.9 million).  NEC has received a 
total of six orders for Cenju-3 machines.  Its first order was from 
Kyoto University in February 1994, and the second was from the Dutch 
Aviation and Space Research Laboratory for joint research use with 
the Swiss National Supercomputer Center.  Consequently, NEC now 
believes it will receive more than ten orders in FY94, which would 
place the company in "hot pursuit" of U.S. firms that make parallel 
processing supercomputers. 

   The latest orders are from Nagoya University, the University of 
Electro-Communications Graduate School, the Yokohama Image 
Transmission Technostation Co., and an unidentified private 
university.  The Nagoya University and Electro-Communications 
University machines were purchased under government procurement 
funding, but NEC "was the only firm to submit bids." 

   The Cenju-3 can be conf igured with up to 256 "VR4400" 64-bit 
RISC processors capable of running at 12.8 billion floating point 
operations per second (GFLOPS).  Yokohama Image Transmission 
Technostation ordered a model with 64 processors capable of 3.2 
GFLOPS for use in "image processing research and development."  The 
three universities ordered a model with 8 processors, NEC's smallest 
configuration, which operates at a speed of 266 million (M) FLOPS. 
Nagoya University will use its supercomputer to aid in research 
concerning the design of highly integrated circuits, and will also 
receive two "EWS48OO" workstations and eight "color X-stations." 
The University of Electro-Communications will use its machine to 
conduct research into advanced parallel information processing, and 
will receive a "complete set" of peripheral equipment, including 
printers.  (Tokyo NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 25 Mar 94 p 8) 

   Fujitsu Wins Contracts To Build University LAN Networks - Fujitsu 
has won contracts to build local area networks (LANs) at 10 national 
universities with funds appropriated in the Japanese Government's 
second FY93 supplemental budget.  Having earlier won LAN contracts 
from eleven universities with funds appropriated under the first 
supplemental budget, Fujitsu now has contracts worth about 3.5 
billion yen ($33 million) from 21 universities.  (For information on 
the earlier LAN contracts, see the 1 December 1993 Pacific Rim 
Economic Review, Vol 2, No 24, p 14.) 

   Fujitsu will build Ethernet LANs connected with fiber distributed 
data interfaces (FDDI) for 10 universities, including Hitotsubashi 
University, Yamagata Medical College, and the University of the 
Ryukyus.  Currently Ethernet and FDDI LANs are the most commonly 
used systems, but Kobe University (under the first supplemental 
budget) chose an asynchronous transfer mode (ATM) LAN. 

   The Ministry of Education plans to build LANs at each of the 92 
public universities in Japan.  At this point the ministry does not 
plan to link the universities together, but it does plan to connect 
each university LAN system to Internet by mid-FY94.  Funds to build 
LANs at 31 universities were contained in the first supplemental 
budget, 28 under the second supplemental budget, and the remaining 
33 universities will hold bids during March.  (Tokyo NIKAAN KOGYO 
SHIMBUN 3 Mar 94 p 9) 

   TDK To Import Semiconductors From Its U.S. Subsidiary - TDK 
Corp., the world's largest maker of magnetic tapes and a major 
producer of electronics parts, is taking steps to import and market 
in Japan semiconductors produced by its U.S. subsidiary, Silicon 
Systems (SSi).  On 1 April TDK set up a permanent in-house group to 
oversee operations with SSi.  SSi's main products are integrated 
circuits (ICs) for hard disk drives, but the firm also makes "high 
technology" ICs for communications equipment, such as local area 
networks.  TDK is strengthening its efforts to sell products such as 
the "passive elements" used in portable communications equipment. 
By combining its own products with those of SSi, TDK hopes to expand 
its share of the communications market. 

   TDK bought out SSi, a semiconductor manufacturer, in May 1989. 
Until now SSi's products have been sold in Japan through a 
representative, but TDK is assuming control of sales with the 
expiration of SSi's contract with the representative.  SSi holds 
about a 50 percent share of the U.S. market for hard disk drive ICs 
and is promoting sales of ICs for communications equipment.  TDK 
sees SSi's IC products as the "key" to participation in the 
communications equipment market.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 30 Mar 
94 p 12) 

   CHINA:  Domestic Developments - FEATURE: Labor Disputes Within 
Foreign-Funded Enterprises On Rise -- SUMMARY:  Recent PRC and Hong 
Kong media reveal that Chinese workers have been mistreated by 
foreign-funded enterprises.  The condition is sufficiently serious 
and widespread to draw the attention of the Labor Ministry. 

   Many foreign entrepreneurs, including Taiwan and Hong Kong 
businessmen who have opened factories on the mainland to take 
advantage of low labor costs, have ignored workers' safety and 
sanitary conditions.  The Hong Kong monthly TANG TAI (CONTEMPORARY) 
reports on 15 March that foreign-funded factories in Shenzhen are 
filthy, noisy, and poorly lighted.  According to an article in the 
16 February issue of the Hong Kong biweekly PAI-HSING (THE PEOPLE), 
last November a fire broke out that killed 84 workers and injured 46 
others in a Shenzhen factory owned by a Hong Kong company.  The 
article also reported that dozens of workers lose fingers to 
accidents each year in a foreign-funded hardware factory in the same 
city.  None of the injured workers has received compensation. 

   Low wages, shabby treatment, and even physical attacks against 
workers have also been reported by the media.  According to an 
article in the 21 January issue of Beijing ZHONGGUO XINXI BAO, a 
foreign-funded enterprise only pays its workers $18 to $24 monthly 
and often forces them to work overtime up to 15 hours a day, 
including Saturdays and Sundays.  The article also noted that the 
factory building of a foreign-funded shoe factory is so hot that the 
workers frequently suffer heatstroke and their home-made lunches 
often spoil by noon.  Many foreign-funded enterprises have hired 
security guards to supervise the workers, who view them as "hatchet 
men" from the "underworld."  Several female workers in one factory 
were hauled to a small room, stripped, and were badly beaten by 
these security guards after complaining about their low wages, the 
article continued. 

   Another article in ZHONGGUO XINXI BAO reported that a female 
worker in a shoe factory in Fujian was beaten by her boss, a Taiwan 
businessman, after being caught stealing two pairs of shoes.  She 
was further humiliated by being locked up in a dog cage, the stolen 
shoes hanging from her chest.  This same factory pays its worker $11 
to $17 monthly and provides no sick leave. 

   According to a second article in the 16 February PAI HSING, 
disputes between workers and foreign-funded enterprises have 
intensified, and strikes have occurred in Dalian, Zhuhai, and Xiamen 
in the past few years.  For instance, there have been over 30 
strikes, the biggest involving over 700 workers, in Xiamen, an area 
heavily invested in by Taiwanese businessmen. 

   Most workers in foreign-funded enterprises do not have trade 
unions and the few that do exist in some enterprises are too weak to 
protect workers' interests.  According to an article in the 8 
February issue of the Beijing daily ZHONGGUO SHANGBAO, less than 10 
percent of the 47,000 foreign-funded enterprises nationwide have 
labor unions.  The article noted the following reasons for this:  1. 
Foreign entrepreneurs distrust labor unions and think they are 
troublemakers;  2.  Chinese managers do not support labor unions. 
Their goal is to secure more foreign capital, not to look after 
workers' needs; and  3.  Relevant authorities do not consider it 
important to establish labor unions.  They have been trying to 
accommodate foreign businessmen as much as possible and fear that 
labor unions might scare them away. 

   The article also maintained that the few existing trade unions in 
foreign-funded enterprises are but empty shells.  They are expected 
to "support" management views and are not allowed to express 
different opinions.  Some firms even spy on workers and fire those 
workers found to be too close to the labor union. 

   The labor issue has become so serious that the Labor Ministry 
decided to include labor disputes as one of the main targets of its 
comprehensive employment inspection beginning 1 April, according to 
an article in the 19 March Beijing CHINA DAILY.  The article further 
noted that the Labor Ministry, concerned about the growing number of 
labor disputes--3,352 cases in Shenzhen SEZ alone in the first half 
of 1993--will investigate and punish those found guilty of illegal 
practices. 

   Planning Commission Outlines Investment System Changes - An 
unsound state investment system has resulted in overly large 
projects, an irrational investment structure, and low returns on 
investment.  An official in the State Planning Commission disclosed 
that the following six steps will be taken to reform the investment 
system in 1994: 

   1.  Investment projects will be categorized as competitive 
projects, infrastructure projects, and public welfare projects based 
on the efficiency, market demand, and the nature of the investment. 
Enterprises will be the main sponsors of competitive projects, and 
related capital will be raised in the market place.  The state will 
fund infrastructure projects that reinforce central policies, but 
will increase enterprises and local government responsibilities. 
Finally, the state will finance all public welfare projects. 

   2.  An investment risk regulatory system will be established and 
project initiation and approval procedures changed.  For example, a 
legal entity must now be established before making decisions on 
projects and conducting feasibility studies.  Legal entities will be 
given greater independence in decision making. 

   3.  The central government will promulgate macroeconomic 
regulatory policies and define objectives.  Nonetheless, in 
principle, both the central government and the autonomous region or 
provincial government will be held responsible.  Provincial 
governments will be the main sponsors for local infrastructure 
construction. 

   4.  Total investment will no longer be dictated by planned 
targets.  Instead, the state will use indirect economic levers, such 
as funding, to regulate investment. 

   The state will no longer exercise direct control over individual 
investment.  Provincial governments will supervise collective 
investments in accordance with state industrial policies and local 
conditions. 

   5.  Policy funding will be separated from commercial funding. 
Loans for projects that are in accordance with state industrial 
policy can be arranged through commercial banks.  Both individual 
legal entities and banks can make their own choices with respect to 
loans and will assume their own risks.  The government will have a 
regulatory and guidance function. 

   6.  A central policy-oriented investment funding system and a 
state development bank will be established. 

   By establishing an investment scheme that corresponds with a 
socialist market economy, resources will be determined by the 
market.  Meanwhile, the state can regulate investment quantity and 
structure more effectively through financial means, such as using 
domestic and foreign loans, issuing stocks and bonds, and adjusting 
interest rates. 

   The state also plans to compile a comprehensive national index 
showing appropriate national and regional investment scales to help 
the government monitor investment activities around the country and 
regulate them on a timely basis.  (Beijing ZHONGGUO WUZI BAO 9 Mar 
94 p 1) 

   Bill Drafted on Transfer of Enterprise Property Rights - An 
official in the State Commission for Restructuring the Economic 
System (CRES) revealed that the preliminary draft of a bill on 
transferring state enterprise property rights has been drawn up. 
According to the official, the government encourages the transfer of 
small enterprise property rights and does not erect ideological 
barriers to the transfer of large and medium-sized enterprise 
property rights.  The government's only concern is that no one has 
the ready capital to buy these new property rights. 

   The Deputy Chief of the Production Department of CRES, Gu Shishi, 
maintained that property-right transfers will not cause a loss of 
assets for state enterprises.  On the contrary, funds derived from 
the transfer of assets will be extremely beneficial in adjusting the 
industrial structure.  Gu stated that since there has always been a 
severe shortage of construction funds, proceeds from property-right 
transfers can be better utilized in more important sectors. 

   An official of the State Asset Management Bureau, Zheng Li, 
contended that proceeds from property right transfers must be used 
in developing transportation, energy, and other infrastructure. 
Zheng further emphasized the following points:  State assets must 
undergo scientific and accurate evaluation; one-time payment is 
mandatory and no installment payments are allowed; ownership of 
assets must be clearly defined; and appropriate arrangements must be 
made for reemployment of workers, labor insurance, and retirement 
benefits after the transfer of property rights.  (Hong Kong CHING 
CHI TAO PAO No 8, 28 Feb 94 p 27) 

   State Planning Commission Proposes Measures To Develop Rural 
Enterprises - According to the 29 March issue of Chongqing XINAN 
JINGJI RIBAO, the State Planning Commission recently proposed 
measures to accelerate development of rural enterprises.  The 
measures are to include rural enterprises in the national economic 
plan to avoid irrational, low-level, duplicative projects, and blind 
development; to include rural enterprises in development programs 
for different trades areas, in the distribution of productive 
forces, and in resource allocation; to use credit and tax measures 
and information to guide rural enterprise policy; to push the 
development of central-western rural enterprises and improve 
cooperation between the east and central-western regions by taking 
advantages of raw materials and energy in the central-west regions 
to support the east, and using the superiority of funds, technology, 
and talent in the east to support central-western regions; and to 
increase funds to develop rural enterprises. 

   The State Planning Commission suggests that rural enterprises be 
allowed to retain at least 60 percent of profits to enhance 
enterprise fund accumulation and self-development ability and 
suggests that the annual rate of increase for loans correspond to 
the annual planned rate of growth for rural enterprises.  The 
commission also encourages provinces, municipalities, and regions to 
set up a rural enterprise development fund.  Loans from 
international financial organizations should be used to develop 
rural enterprises and the state should formulate preferential 
policies to help rural enterprises build small industrial zones. 
During the Eighth Five-Year Plan, the state set up a special fund to 
encourage rural enterprises to increase exports, and during the 
Ninth Five-Year Plan the state should continue to give special loans 
to rural enterprises engaged in exports.  National construction 
projects should be transferred to rural enterprises through joint 
development with state enterprises or by establishing enterprise 
groups. 

   Objectives Set To Establish Securitized Mortgage Market - In 
another step encouraging the development of debt markets, the 
Monetary Authority has set out objectives for establishing a 
domestic mortgage securitization market.  A minimum credit standard 
will be created in this sector under a blueprint being put together 
to ensure Hong Kong gets the best possible credit rating for these 
instruments, standardized documentation, and sufficient liquidity to 
attract major investors.  Andrew Sheng, deputy chief executive of 
the authority, said that the minimum credit standard will be similar 
to the loan standard of the U.S. Federal National Mortgage 
Association.  The Monetary Authority is looking at the legal and 
regulatory implications for banks securitizing their mortgage 
portfolios, such as whether loans would be offloaded from their 
balance sheets without recourse.  Banks are said to be keen to 
spread their risks by securitizing a portion of their mortgage 
assets and property developers want to offload the mortgage 
financing they provide to home buyers from their balance sheets. 
(Hong Kong SOUTH CHINA MORNING POST (BUSINESS POST) 14 Apr 94 p 1) 

   Shanghai GNP Grows at Annual 13 Percent in First Quarter of 1994 
- Shanghai's GNP in the first quarter of this year reached 42.05 
billion yuan, up 13.1 percent over the same period last year; total 
industrial output value was 87.05 billion yuan, up 13.9 percent over 
the same period last year; and exports grew from month to month, up 
19.9 percent over the same period last year.  The economic 
efficiency of the municipality in the first quarter also improved at 
the same rate and local revenue increased by a big margin.  For the 
first time, value added by tertiary industry overtook that provided 
by secondary industry.  (Hong Kong ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE 1147 GMT 9 
Apr 94) 

   Shortage Leads to Rising Office Rents in Beijing - According to 
reports from real estate agents, office rents in Beijing are the 
highest in the country, with monthly rents for first-class office 
premises set at $57 per square meter.  After rising 27 percent over 
the past nine months, rents are also likely to rise in the future. 
Beijing expects that 200 to 300 multinational companies will set up 
offices within the next two years.  By then, however, rents will 
have risen further because of the tight supply of offices.  As an 
increasing number of foreign banks and financial organizations are 
moving to the mainland, it is believed that commercial property 
prices will rise by 15 to 20 percent this year.  (Hong Kong MING PAO 
26 Mar 94 p A12) 

   Foreign Trade and Investment - Yunnan To Emphasize Economic 
Relations With Southeast Asia -- In an interview with a reporter 
from Hong Kong's TA KUNG PAO, Yunnan Governor He Zhiqiang said that 
the province will pursue an opening up policy emphasizing relations 
with Southeast Asia.  He noted that despite a late start, Yunnan has 
now assumed a "leading position" in opening to the outside world. 
With over 4,000 km of borders, Yunnan has enjoyed healthy 
development of border trade with Southeast Asia and is currently 
working to expand it.  Yunnan now has over 800 foreign-invested 
enterprises, of which 80 percent are associated with Hong Kong, 
Taiwan, and Macao.  Noting that Yunnan has certain disadvantages in 
utilizing foreign investment compared with coastal regions, he 
pointed out that the province will educate cadres to expand the 
scope of opening up.  He also said that Yunnan will put money into 
improving basic infrastructure such as roads and railroads.  When 
asked about narcotics trafficking, he pointed out that this is an 
international problem and is not necessarily linked to Yunnan's 
opening up.  However, Yunnan will continue its counternarcotics 
effort.  (Kunming YUNNAN RIBAO 3 Mar 94 p 1) 

   Foreign Investors Wary of Value-Added Land Tax - Detailed 
regulations on the implementation of China's Value-Added Land Law 
will be announced soon, but some foreign investors and economic 
experts have pointed out that there are irregularities in the 
legislation, and investor confidence will be affected if these are 
not corrected.  When the Provisional Regulations on the 
Implementation of the Value-Added Land Law were promulgated at the 
beginning of this year, foreign investors reacted strongly and 
pointed out that the tax rates were too high.  Viewing different 
situations in different localities, the central government will 
announce detailed implementation regulations soon, but the results 
remain to be seen.  Many foreign investors say that the mainland 
authorities did not carry out adequate research or receive enough 
recommendations before legislation was enacted, causing foreign 
investors to worry as they drew up long-term investment plans.  They 
hope that the central government will avoid hastily promulgating the 
"provisional regulations," because this will cause foreign investors 
to lose confidence in the authority of the law.  (Hong Kong ZHONGGUO 
TONGXUN SHE 0943 GMT 10 Apr 94) 

   Guangzhou's Six Measures To Increase Utilization of Foreign 
Capital - Guangzhou will embark on a campaign to attract more 
international capital, especially from major consortia in Hong Kong, 
Macao, Taiwan, and other countries.  The measures to be taken 
include encouraging foreign investors to engage in the development 
of basic industries and urban capital construction, involving such 
projects as power plants, steel mills, ethylene and polypropylene 
plants, expressways, underground railways, light rail networks, port 
facilities, and a new international airport; encouraging foreign 
investors to help accelerate the development of service industries 
such as real estate, information services and consultancy, finance, 
and tourism; encouraging foreign investors to take part in the 
transformation of old enterprises, under a new policy where those 
helping to relocate and renovate enterprises in old urban districts 
will be entitled to develop real estate on their former sites; 
encouraging foreign investors to take part in the establishment of a 
large international development zone in southeast Guangzhou, 
occupying 219 square km; encouraging foreign investors to develop 
technologically advanced and export-oriented enterprises in several 
major fields, namely, electronics and information technology, new 
materials, biotechnology, energy efficiency and environmental 
protection, fine chemicals, and high-tech light industry; and 
encouraging the construction of bases for foreign-funded production 
of export commodities in light industry, which aims to expand 
exports of handicrafts, textiles, foodstuffs, chemicals, machinery, 
native products, animal products, and medical and health products. 
(Hong Kong TA KUNG PAO 6 Apr 94 p 5) 

   Guangdong To Attract $10 Billion of Foreign Investment in 1994 - 
At a work conference on attracting foreign investment, Governor Zhu 
Senlin said that the province will absorb $10 billion in foreign 
investment in 1994, which will be used to transform old enterprises 
and upgrade products.  Foreign investors will be encouraged to 
develop projects in energy, transportation, communications, 
petroleum, chemicals, iron and steel, electronics, autos, high 
technology, and agricultural products earning foreign exchange. 
Last year, Guangdong accounted for 26 percent of the foreign capital 
invested in China.  (Hong Kong TA KUNG PAO 1 Apr 94 p 7) 

   Shenzhen's Exports, Investment, Foreign Trade Grow by 20 Percent 
- According to data supplied by the Shenzhen Statistics Bureau, 
major economic indexes in the first quarter of this year displayed 
growth rates in excess of 20 percent.  Total industrial output value 
was 13.912 billion yuan, up 33 percent over the same period last 
year, of which the output value of exports was 5.819 billion yuan, 
up 15 percent, and foreign-invested industrial output value was 
9.068 billion yuan, up 43 percent.  Investment in capital 
construction was over 3.1 billion yuan, a rise of nearly 42 percent. 
The total vdlume of retail sales was over 4.7 billion yuan, more 
than 40 percent higher than the same period last year, and the 
volume of foreign trade exceeded $3.35 billion, up more than 40 
percent, of which exports increased by 30 percent and imports by 
more than 50 percent.  (Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 1133 GMT 9 Apr 
94) 

   Xiamen Woos Foreign Capital for Designated Projects - Xiamen has 
decided to promote the participation of foreign investment in the 
following five projects this year: 1. the Xiayu Bonded Zone, which 
aims to attract multinational companies and trading firms to carry 
out entrepot and transit trade and set up bonded warehouses, 2. the 
Haicang Investment Zone, including port infrastructure and basic 
industries, 3. highway renovation, 4. investment in the 
transformation of old enterprises and township and town enterprises, 
and 5. high-tech and new-technology projects under the Torch 
program.  Delegations will be sent to Japan, Singapore, the 
Netherlands, Australia, and Hong Kong in April, May, and June to 
invite investment in these projects.  (Hong Kong TA KUNG PAO 9 Apr 
94 p 7) 

   Hong Kong Investors Pour $1 Billion Into Tianjin in 1993 - Last 
year, Hong Kong investors launched many investment projects in 
Tianjin, entailing a total investment of nearly $1 billion, 
according to an official from the Tianjin Economic Relations and 
Foreign Trade Committee.  Since 1978, when Tianjin first opened to 
foreign investors, the city has approved a total of 3,097 Hong Kong 
investment projects, involving a total investment of $3.69 billion, 
with $2.328 billion realized.  Forty percent of the Hong Kong 
investment projects in Tianjin are industrial ventures, with the 
international trade and real estate sectors accounting for 30 and 23 
percent respectively.  Hong Kong investors include well-known firms 
such as Cheung Kong, Hopewell Holdings, and New World Development. 
They are engaged in real estate development and the construction of 
power stations and warehouses.  (Hong Kong MING PAO 7 Apr 94 p B1) 

   China's Squeeze on Imports Affects Export Trade - Re-exports to 
China, Hong Kong's biggest market, grew 12.7 percent to HK$18.74 
billion in the first two months of 1994, down from 1993's growth of 
45.1 percent in the same period.  Enzio von Pfeil, an economist at 
S.G. Warburg Securities, said the figures indicated a cooling of the 
Chinese economy was taking place and cited the PRC's desire to 
reduce its trade deficit in 1994.  Re-exports to the United States 
rose 19.4 percent to HK$11.94 billion, and those to Japan rose 25.9 
percent to $3.52 billion.  Re-export trade with the UK also 
rebounded 30.3 percent to HK$1.88 billion.  (Hong Kong SOUTH CHINA 
MORNING POST (BUSINESS POST) 14 Apr 94 p 2) 

   Imports of Capital Goods Rise in January - Hong Kong's imports of 
capital goods rose 22 percent by volume year on year with notable 
increases in office machines and electrical machinery.  The import 
volume of raw materials rose and semi-manufactures rose 37 percent 
compared with January 1993.  However, considerable decreases were 
recorded in domestic exports with footwear dropping 23 percent and 
textiles and related articles falling 16 percent.  Total exports 
increased 29 percent by volume while imports grew by 26 percent. 
(Hong Kong HONGKONG STANDARD (FINANCIAL REVIEW) 13 Apr 94 p 2) 

   Steel Firm To Use Hong Kong as Base for Regional Expansion - Zhou 
Guanwu, a director of the Beijing-based Shoudu Iron and Steel 
Corporation, says that the corporation plans to establish a company 
in Hong Kong to expand its interests in Southeast Asia using the 
territory as a base.  After reviewing Shoudu's previous experience 
of investing abroad, Zhou said that the company will focus the next 
stage of its investment in Southeast Asia because of the region's 
exceptional growth.  Zhou said Shoudu will set up a holding company 
and will seek partners and investment projects appropriate to its 
characteristics and resources.  (Hong Kong WEN WEI PO 15 Mar 94 p 
A2) 

   Contracts Signed With China During Berlin Mayor's Visit - Berlin 
Mayor Eberhard Diepgen recently led a trade delegation to Beijing, 
Shanghai, and Shenzhen.  The delegation signed 12 contracts with 
Chinese parties worth a total of 200 million Deutsch marks.  The 
projects are in traffic control, packaging, environmental 
protection, infrastructure, and high-speed railways.  (Hong Kong WEN 
WEI PO 12 Apr 94 p A3) 

   Hutchison To Manage Zhuhai Port - Zhuhai Port Investment Company 
and Li Ka-shing's Hutchison Whampoa Zhuhai Port Investment Company 
Limited officially have signed an agreement to establish a joint 
venture for the management of two berths at Zhuhai Port.  An equal 
share will be held by each partner.  The project is the first of its 
kind at Zhuhai Port, and its main function is to handle containers 
and bulk goods with a planned capacity of 950,000 tons a year. 
Construction of the facilities are under way and are expected to 
become operational in July this year.  (Hong Kong WEN WEI PO 10 Apr 
94 p AS) 

   Hutchison Invests 2.5 Billion Yuan for Share of Port Project - 
The Shenzhen Port Buildings Headquarters has sold a 70-percent stake 
in the first and second stages of Yantian Port to Hutchison Whampoa 
for 2.5 billion yuan.  Construction of six berths has been 
completed, and 1.2 billion yuan has already been invested in the 
first phase of the port project.  When Yantian Port opened in 1992, 
Shenzhen invested more than 1 billion yuan in the first stage of the 
project with most of the capital provided by loans from the Japanese 
Government and Tokyo finance houses.  The six berths are projected 
to handle 200,000 twenty-foot equivalent units each year.  Shenzhen 
Port Building Headquarters will also sell rights to the second stage 
of the port (including land use rights) for 1.3 billion yuan.  The 
second stage will include three container berths and construction 
will begin when the first stage reaches 70 percent of its designed 
capacity.  (Hong Kong MING PAO 18 Mar 94 p A11) 

   Li Companies To Operate Power Stations in Guangdong's Nanhai - 
Cheung Kong (Holdings) Limited and Hutchison Whampoa Limited, both 
controlled by Li Ka-shing, have concluded an agreement with 
Guangdong's Nanhai Power Station A and the Nanhai Nantang Power 
Company Limited on the joint operation of four power plants.  Total 
investment in the initial projects will be $200 million, while 
$57.98 million will be spent on the second phase.  (Hong Kong TA 
KUNG PAO 29 Mar 94 p 25) 

   French Loan To Fund Water Supply Project in Xiamen - Fujian's 
Xiamen has obtained a loan from France to expand its drinking water 
supply capacity.  The city will use the loan to import water supply 
equipment from the Paris-based Degremont Group to enlarge the 
capacity of its water plants from 30 to 50 tons a day.  The $13.6 
million loan is the first of a batch of loans promised by the French 
Government this year.  An official at the French embassy said five 
or six other Chinese cities will also receive official loans from 
Paris to renovate their water supply systems.  Additional loans will 
be made for communications and paper manufacturing projects, the 
official said.  (Beijing CHINA DAILY 9 Apr 94 p 3) 

   Japanese, ROK Banks Fund Steel Plant in Guangzhou - The Guangzhou 
International Trust and Investment Company Limited has agreed on 
terms for a $48 million loan to build the Zhujiang Iron and Steel 
Plant.  Banks involved in providing the syndicated loan include Dai- 
Ichi Kangyo Bank, Fuji Bank, Industrial Bank of Japan, Sakura Bank, 
Bank of Tokyo, First Finance Company Limited of South Korea, Daiwa 
Overseas Finance Company Limited, and Aomori Bank.  (Hong Kong TA 
KUNG PAO 23 Mar 94 p 5) 

   MING PAO Parent in Sichuan Light Rail System - CIM, the parent 
company of leading Hong Kong daily MING PAO, has signed a letter of 
intent with the Chinese Government to build a 550-million yuan 
elevated light rail system in Chongqing, Sichuan.  Mainland sources 
said a joint venture was expected in the coming months between CIM 
and the municipal government, but equity holdings in the new company 
had yet to be finalized.  Sources said an initial blueprint for the 
project envisaged 11 kilometers of track with an estimated 
construction cost of 50 million yuan per km.  (Hong Kong HONGKONG 
STANDARD (FINANCIAL REVIEW) 14 Apr 94 p 2) 

   Chartered Bank To Open Representative in Chengdu - The Standard 
Chartered Bank has a favorable view of the development prospects for 
southwest China and plans to open a representative office in 
Chengdu, the bank's eighth office in mainland China, according to a 
Beijing-based executive of the bank.  Since its China desk was 
established in Hong Kong in 1986, Standard Chartered has lent $1.2 
billion to projects in China.  (Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 1135 GMT 
8 Apr 94) 

   Foreign Capital Sought To Construct Aviation Fuel Stations - The 
China Aviation Fuel Corporation has decided to introduce foreign 
capital this year to construct a number of aviation fuel supply 
bases.  The company plans to modernize or build almost 100 
facilities over five to seven years, which will require investment 
of 4 billion yuan.  However, lacking adequate capital, the company 
has signed letters of intent with British and French oil firms on 
the joint construction of fuel supply facilities in northern, 
eastern, central, and southern China.  In the near future, the 
company will build bases for imported oil in Tianjin, Shanghai, 
Guangzhou, and Beihai.  The project includes the construction of 
620,000 square meters of fuel transit stations and 294 km of 
pipelines.  On completion of these facilities, China's aviation fuel 
supply will grow to 3.4 million metric tons in 1995 and 7.5 million 
metric tons by the year 2000.  (Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 0723 GMT 
4 Apr 94) 

   Hong Kong-Based PRC Firms Invest in Shanghai-Nanjing Expressway - 
A consortium comprising Chinese-funded companies based in Hong Kong 
and led by the Bank of China Group will invest 6.2 billion yuan to 
build an expressway between Shanghai and Nanjing.  An unidentified 
company from Southeast Asia will have a 40-percent holding.  Since 
construction began in 1992, Jiangsu Province has invested 1.8 
billion yuan in the project.  Members of the consortium include the 
Bank of China Group, China Travel Service (Hong Kong) Limited, and 
China Resources Limited, who, together with the foreign partner, 
will form the Jiangsu Nanjing-Shanghai Expressway Construction 
Company.  The operational term will be 20 years from the date of 
completion.  There are 360 bridges along the Jiangsu section of the 
Nanjing-Shanghai expressway, and a total of 17 construction teams 
are involved in the project.  The expressway is expected to open in 
mid-1996.  (Hong Kong MING PAO 21 Mar 94 p A10) 

   Pacific Concord To Invest 6 Billion Yuan in Retail Sector, 
Housing - Hong Kong's Pacific Concord Holdings Limited will have 
invested 6 billion yuan in mainland China by the end of 1997 and is 
set to far exceed its original plan to set up a chain of 30 
department stores.  Chang Hung, the group's director in Beijing, 
said that this was in accordance with the present development of the 
group's business.  Chang also said that the firm's Concord Aoguang 
Commercial Building in Beijing will be ready for leasing at the end 
of June.  Concord invested almost 400 million yuan in the complex, 
which will provide 28,000 square meters of floor space.  By 1997, 
the Concord Commercial Town in the downtown area of Wangfujing will 
be completed.  It will have 100,000 square meters of floor space and 
will contain the third department store set up by Pacific Concord in 
Beijing.  Pacific Concord has run the joint venture Lei Meng-Concord 
Department Store in Beijing since 1991 and experience gained from 
this is being used in the operation of six department stores in 
Chengdu, Xian, Shanghai, Ningbo, and Xiamen.  The company plans to 
set up more stores in the downtown areas of other major cities.  At 
present, large malls funded by Pacific Concord are under 
construction in Shenzhen and Zhuhai.  In addition, the group has 
real estate projects in Shanghai, Suzhou, Shenzhen, Zhuhai, 
Guangzhou, Shenyang, Dalian, Chengdu, and Wuhan.  The group is also 
constructing office buildings and apartments in Jiuxianqiao in the 
eastern suburbs of Beijing, involving an investment of 400 million 
yuan.  (Hong Kong WEN WEI PO 5 Apr 94 p B5) 

   Japanese Firm To Supply Coal Handling Equipment - The Tomen 
Corporation of Japan has signed a $96 million contract with the 
China National Technical Import and Export Corporation to supply 
equipment for a coal terminal in Qinhuangdao, Hebei.  The equipment 
includes dump trucks, ship loaders, and computer control systems for 
the Fourth Coal Terminal, a key construction project incorporated in 
the Eighth Five-Year Plan.  The equipment will be manufactured by 
Mitsubishi Heavy Industries and financing will come from the 
Japanese Overseas Economic Cooperation Fund.  The port plans to 
expand capacity from the current 60 million tons to 90 million tons 
in 1996.  (Beijing CHINA DAILY 7 Apr 94 p 2) 

   ELF Aquitaine Invests in Chemicals, Pharmaceutical Sectors - Elf 
Aquitaine, France's biggest investor in China, is poised to 
strengthen its presence in the oil, chemical, and pharmaceutical 
sectors by launching joint ventures with Chinese partners.  Michel 
Labie, Elf's representative in China, said the company's biggest 
global investments will be in China "in the next few years," adding 
that this was "the strategy of our group." 

   Atochem, the chemicals division of Elf, has been studying a 
proposal for a $2.1 billion joint-venture refinery in Jinshan, 
Shanghai.  Elf is set to take a 70-percent stake and the Shanghai 
municipal government and Shanghai Petrochemical Co. Ltd will hold 
the balance.  The joint venture would be the biggest refinery in 
China, with a capacity of 8 million tons.  A feasibility study is 
expected to be completed in July, which will then be handed over to 
the State Planning Commission for approval.  In addition, Sanofi, 
Elf's pharmaceutical division, is negotiating with a Shanghai 
pharmaceutical factory to set up a $20 million joint venture in the 
Pudong New Area.  An agreement is expected to be signed in October. 
In 1993, Elf companies had sales of $295 million in China, up from 
$240 million in 1992.  (Beijing CHINA DAILY (BUSINESS WEEKLY) 10-16 
Apr 94 p 8) 

   Singapore Firm Invests in Suzhou Tourism Area - The Suzhou Panmen 
Tourist Development Company and Singapore's Landmark Pte (Private) 
Limited are cooperating to develop the Panmen tourist area.  The 
first phase of the project involves a 600 million yuan investment, 
and the tourist area covers 23.3 hectares.  (Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN 
SHE 1149 GMT 2 Apr 94) 

   Merrill Lynch, Sanyo Invest in Anhui - Six international 
companies including Italy's Meloni, Japan's Sanyo, Hong Kong's 
Allied Group, and Merrill Lynch from the United States are investing 
in Anhui.  Meloni plans to build a washing machine factory in 
cooperation with the Hefei Meiling Company, involving a total 
investment of $29.8 million.  The factory will turn out 300,000 
machines with an annual output value of 1.25 billion yuan.  A number 
of Japanese companies led by Sanyo have decided to set up a plant 
with the Hefei Washing Machine Factory, which will produce automatic 
"intelligent" washing machines.  The project, which involves a total 
investment of $13 million (not including the factory building and 
technology), will produce 400,000 machines each year, with an output 
value of 1.2 billion yuan.  Meanwhile, Merrill Lynch, one of the 
largest securities companies in the world, has signed an agreement 
with Anhui's power, energy, and communications departments 
concerning direct investment of up to $5 billion.  (Hong Kong WEN 
WEI PO 26 Mar 94 p A8) 

   Sino-UK Telecommunications Firm To Increase Output - According to 
Simon Roper, managing director of Shanghai International Digital 
Telephone Equipment Company Limited (SIDTEC), a Sino-British joint 
venture, the firm's annual output will reach 300,000 lines when it 
expands to a new plant in the Jinqiao Export Processing Zone in the 
Pudong New Area at the end of this year.  Roper said that the 
company, established in 1989 with an initial investment of $10 
million, would continue to upgrade technology and localize the 
supply of materials.  In August 1993, SIDTEC became China's first 
foreign-funded joint venture to pass ISO9000 quality appraisal and 
in November received its BSI quality certificate from the UK. 
(Beijing CHINA DAILY (BUSINESS WEEKLY) 3-9 Apr 94 p 4) 

   Volkswagen, U.S. Technology Firm To Invest in Hainan - 
Volkswagen's representative in China recently signed a contract in 
Haikou to invest 120 million yuan to set up a plant in the Haikou 
Bonded Zone to manufacture high-performance autos.  Aptronix, a 
leading U.S. company in the fuzzy technology sector, also plans to 
set up a joint venture in the zone and invest 200 million yuan to 
produce fuzzy logic electronic controls.  (Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN 
SHE 0826 GMT 8 Apr 94) 

   Fujian Company Provides Labor Services Overseas - Since its 
establishment in 1989, the Fujian Company for Cooperation in 
Communications and Labor Service With Foreign Countries has 
established commercial relations with Singapore, Japan, the United 
States, Thailand, Canada, Cambodia, Papua New Guinea, Taiwan, and 
Hong Kong.  This company has opened up markets in Hong Kong, 
Singapore, and Japan and has supplied 3,000 seamen, forming a 
complete organizational and management system.  Since 1990, the 
company has cooperated with the relevant department in Taiwan to 
send 500 fishermen to Taiwan each year to operate in Singapore, 
Mauritius, and Brazil.  The company has also contracted for marine 
services at the new airport in Macao.  (Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 
0922 GMT 1 Apr 94) 

   Taiwan:  KMT-Run Enterprise To Build Power Plant in Indonesia - 
Yueh Sheng Chang Corporation, a KMT (Kuomintang)-run enterprise, 
plans to cooperate with a Japanese company to build a thermal power 
plant in Java, Indonesia.  The National China Petroleum Corporation 
of Taiwan also plans to cooperate with Indonesia to lay 100 
kilometers of pipeline from Musi to Dumai in Sumatra.  Indonesia 
will pay for its investment with oil exported to Taiwan.  The amount 
of investment for the two projects will be about $200 million each. 
An official in charge of Taiwan's KMT-run enterprises said further 
negotiations are necessary before a final decision can be made. 
(Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-PAO 4 Apr 94 p 2) 

   1993 Overseas Investment Increases 41.7 Percent Over Previous 
Year - According to the Ministry of Economic Affairs, Taiwan's 1993 
direct overseas investment was $2.4 billion, an increase of 41.7 
percent increase over the 1992 level. This was the first rise after 
three consecutive years of decline.  (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-PAO 31 
Mar 94 p 2) 

   NORTH KOREA:  Average Wages for Workers Reported - According to a 
Korean Development Institute study, North Korean workers' wages are 
not as low as generally believed.  Using 1990 as a standard year, 
the study shows that a North Korean worker's marginal productivity 
salary was $1,046 a year or $87 a month.  However, the actual wage 
standard set for each worker was 1.7 percent higher; it was, and 
still is, $150 per month.  (Seoul HANGUK ILBO 26 March 94 p 8) 

   DPRK Obtains Foreign Currency Through 'Foreign Exchange Shops' - 
North Korea has been operating "foreign exchange shops" to obtain 
foreign currency from foreigners and North Koreans returning from 
overseas.  There are about 20 such shops in Pyongyang alone, as well 
as others in cities such as Nampo and Kaesong.  Most of the goods 
sold in the shops are imported from Japan, Russia, Hong Kong, and 
China, while domestic products, such as cigarettes and liquor, 
account for only about 10 percent of the merchandise.  To make 
purchases at the shops, North Koreans are required to use vouchers 
bought with foreign currency ($1 is equivalent to 2.15 won in 
vouchers).  (Seoul NAEWOE TONGSIN 17 Feb 94 pp E1-E3) 

   Worsening Inflation in North Korea Reported - Inflation is 
reportedly becoming a "serious problem" for North Korea.  The 
currently "severe inflation" was caused by wage increases and the 
budget deficit that resulted from the "double price system" for 
grain.    Prices of industrial and agricultural products (except for 
rice) have increased by 300-400 percent, bringing about higher 
prices at state-run stores.  Egg and bread prices rose from 1 won to 
3.5 won and from 1 won to 2 won, respectively. 

   Money circulation has reportedly increased since 1992, following 
a 43.4- percent wage increase for laborers, technicians, and office 
workers, a 50.7-percent increase in social security benefits, a 33- 
percent increase in student scholarships, and 25.2-percent and 44.8- 
percent increases in the government's purchase prices for rice and 
corn.  Before 1992, the government used to pay 0.6 won for 1 kg of 
rice, but it is currently paying 0.82 won per kilo.  In spite of 
purchase price increases since 1992, the government has kept the 
official sale price for rice at 0.08 won per kilo.  (Seoul NAEWOE 
TONGSIN 3 Mar 94 pp E1-E2) 

        SOUTH KOREA: FEATURE: Research Institutes Get High-Tech Help 
  From MIT, Stanford - ,SUMMARY:  The ROK press recently reported on 
        high-tech cooperation between ROK government-funded research 
          institutes and U.S. universities.  In one instance, a U.S. 
      university donated plasma research equipment to a ROK research 
  institute, which will incorporate it in a plasma research facility 
    under construction.  In another case, a ROK institute and a U.S. 
       university have cooperated on developing a computer operating 
                                                             system. 

             According to the 23 February HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUM, the 
      Massachusetts Institute of Technology (MIT) has donated plasma 
      research equipment to the Korea Research Institute of Stanford 
   Science (KRISS).  The equipment includes high-temperasture plasma 
    containment and heat testing equipment.  This equipment is being 
          installed in a research facility, which will begin initial 
  operations at the end of this year and enter full-scale use in the 
        beginning of 1995.  The Paper reported that KRISS will spend 
 approximately 10 billion won (12.5 million) to set up the facility, 
which will be one of the two largest basic science research 
installations in South Korea (the other is a radiation accelerator 
under construction at Pohang Institute of Science and Technology, or 
POSTECH). 

   HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUM noted that KRISS has "completely 
reconstructed" the core part of the plasma generating equipment it 
received from MIT and renamed it TARA.  (A captioned photo 
accompanying the article shows the device, which has three distinct 
parts, including a 2.5-meter high plasma stabilizer section, a 
plasma containment section, and a high-intensity magnetic field 
generator section.)  The 27-meter long TARA will be housed in a 
subsidiary facility along with a 9-megawatt, large-capacity 
electrical generator, and radio heating equipment.  The overall 
facility will also have high-tech diagnostic equipment that can 
measure the physical characteristics of high-temperature plasmas. 
The paper observed that the installation work seems to be 20 percent 
complete.  Things are expected to progress quickly as domestically 
produced parts are brought in, starting in June.  When the facility 
goes into service, it will mark the beginning of an era of "full- 
scale research to realize nuclear fusion," the "peaceful application 
of hydrogen bomb technology," according to the paper.  The facility 
will not only lead to basic research about plasma production and 
containment, but also to developments in peripheral technologies, 
such as ultra-high vacuums, high-intensity magnetic fields, ultra- 
high temperatures, ultra-high frequencies, and development of new 
heat-resistant materials. 

   The 22 February MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN reported another instance of 
cooperation between a ROK research institute and a U.S. university. 
According to the paper, the Electronics and Telecommunications 
Research Institute (ETRI) and Stanford University have jointly 
developed an operating system for an "indigenous" ROK multimedia 
workstation.  The cooperative effort between the university and 
ETRI, which the paper reported as affiliated with the Communications 
Ministry, began in 1991 and will run until this July.  The operating 
system the two developed--named Cosmos--is now undergoing testing. 
Currently ETRI technical staff are receiving special technical 
training, including performance test training, at Stanford.  MAEIL 
KYONGJE SINMUN noted that, as soon as this is complete, the related 
technologies will be "transferred" to Samsung Electronics, Goldstar, 
Hyundai Electronics, and Daewoo Telecom.  These four companies 
cooperated with ETRI to develop a multimedia workstation, named 
Combi, which they plan to start commercializing next year.  They 
have also developed a board with both audio and video capabilities 
for use with the Cosmos operating system.  It is expected that the 
Combi workstation will use B-ISDN (broad-band integrated services 
digital network) terminals, which the Communications Ministry is 
promoting. 

   On 8 April, the Communications Ministry announced the development 
of Combi, a "multimedia personal computer," which was "developed in 
South Korea," according to a 10 April YONHAP item.  YONHAP reported 
that the computer is the product of cooperation by ETRI and the four 
firms mentioned above, as well as the Korea Computer Research 
Association.  The press service commented that South Korea "lacked" 
multimedia software and hardware, and that its multimedia 
applications were at "the beginning stage.  The Combi team will try 
to develop a multimedia workstation by June 1994, YONHAP noted.  It 
made no mention of the operating system for the multimedia 
workstation that ETRI has developed "in cooperation with" Stanford. 
It noted that the government will contribute 11.5 billion won 
($14.375 million) and the companies 7.8 billion won ($9.75 million) 
to the workstation effort. 

   FEATURE:  New Government Initiatives To Support Commercial S and 
T - SUMMARY:  Recent Seoul newspapers reported several ROK 
government initiatives to improve technical cooperation between 
South Korean research institutes, companies, and universities, and 
to help these facilities get better access to foreign technology. 
The government will reform its own R and D structure by eliminating 
barriers to cooperation between agencies and by making their 
research results commercially available.  Measures are also being 
enacted to facilitate "indirect" acquisition of foreign technology 
as a substitute for licensing and to build up a "technological 
infrastructure" through various subsidies, including aid to 
universities cooperating with industry.  Underlying the enterprise 
are efforts to improve control and dissemination of technological 
data. 

   The ROK Government is behind new measures to stimulate commercial 
S and T development by improving the distribution of technical data 
and by creating synergistic structures where researchers of 
different affiliations meet to share ideas and train new personnel, 
according to Seoul newspaper reports.  Included among these is a 
plan reported in the 16 March CHONJA SINMUN for the S and T Policy 
Management Research Institute to enact a "System of National S and T 
Reform" that will enable South Korea to build a "technology 
development strategy for the new economy" by revising the S and T 
budget system, "pooling" research, and setting up an "R and D 
commercial product market." 

   The plan would "transform the national R and D project structure, 
which at present is conducted by each agency separately, into three 
types:  state-run projects of the top-down style, balanced state-run 
projects that combine top-down and bottom-up styles, and basic 
state-run projects of the bottom-up style."  CHONJA SINMUN explained 
that this would involve reversing the usual procedure of allotting a 
general S and T budget and deciding later on particular programs. 
The plan reportedly calls for a greater amount of integration and 
control of the agencies involved in R and D, to include evaluating 
and providing information on products that result from government 
research through an "R and D product market."  It would also 
establish a "National Agency for Technology Management" to maintain 
consistent S and T policies, eliminate duplication of effort, and 
stop interagency rivalry. 

   In addition, the 16 March CHONJA SINMUN reported the ROK 
Government is enacting measures to import more foreign technology by 
standardizing laws on technology imports, giving tax breaks to firms 
importing certain types of technology, and relaxing restrictions on 
foreign capital.  The government will also take steps to eliminate 
"overdependence" by ROK companies on licensed technology and put 
more effort instead into "indirect technology transfers through 
direct investment."  The newspaper went on to report the substance 
of a study by the Korea Institute for International Economic Policy 
(KIEP) recommending that government and industry work together to 
"manage the whole technology transfer process" by building a 
database of information on technology transfer, organizing data 
distribution systems, and creating specialized "service agencies" 
that supply technology transfer data.  KIEP, a government think tank 
whose recommendations often impact on policy, cautioned that without 
an effective technology import plan it would be difficult for South 
Korea to continue selling products in advanced countries.  The 
government must also become better at "managing information so that 
effective technology transfer can be possible." 

   The 17 March MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN also reported that the ROK 
Ministry of Trade, Industry, and Energy (MOTIE) has drafted a "Law 
on the Formation of an Industrial Technology Base" to go into effect 
later this year. The proposed legislation is designed to build up 
the country's "technological infrastructure" by nurturing new 
technology, training technical personnel, modernizing research 
facilities, building a data distribution network, and expanding 
"technical cooperation" through a support base of financial 
subsidies and tax incentives.  MOTIE's plan would have technical 
data held in state-run labs, private research institutes, and 
companies entered into a database managed by the Korea Institute of 
Industry and Technology Information for distribution to technology 
consumers (see related article on South Korean databases in this 
issue of Pacific Rim Economic Review).  It would also link industry 
and academia into a "cooperative structure" by forming "combined 
research centers" at all of South Korea's major universities. 

   According to the newspaper, such centers are already being set up 
at Yonsei and Korea Universities, Pohang Engineering college, and 
the Korea Advanced Institute of Science and Technology.  The present 
legislation would provide government support for the centers, and 
beginning next year expand them to all major ROK universities. 
MOTIE would also establish an "industrial technology university" and 
develop training programs for use in universities and research 
institutes.  In what is the same or a related development, the 9 
March CHONJA SINMUN reported that the ROK's Ministry of Education is 
providing 200 billion won ($250 million) to support institutions 
designated "national policy universities" by virtue of their 
willingness to pursue joint research with South Korean companies. 
The ministry originally intended to limit the recipients to four, 
but is now negotiating with the Economic Planning Board to expand 
that number, the paper stated. 

   FEATURE:  Developments in Database Industry Reported - SUMMARY: 
Major changes are occurring in South Korea's database industry, in 
response to government wishes to expand access to foreign and 
domestic commercial technology, the Seoul press reported.  The Korea 
Institute of Industry and Technology Information, which runs the 
ROK's largest database of S and T information, is upgrading and 
systematizing its network to improve efficiency, and has signed new 
access agreements with foreign database companies to support 
domestic R and D.  In addition, the Korea Database Promotion Center 
has unveiled a multi-million dollar plan to promote the database 
industry on three fronts. 

   South Korea's database (DB) industry is getting a boost from 
initiatives recently taken by ROK government and quasi-official 
institutions, according to Seoul press reports.  The 19 March CHONJA 
SINMUN reported that the Korea Institute of Industry and Technology 
Information (KINITI) will spend 6 billion won ($7.5 million) 
upgrading its KINITI-IR (Information Retrieval) system, a nationwide 
network that provides on-line access to "data on advanced industrial 
technology" stored in foreign and domestic DB's.  The newspaper 
reported the current system, which is based on a 32MB IBM 3090-150 
computer, has "limited" ability to process technical data and 
satisfy users' demands for information.  It will be replaced by a 
64MB IBM 912-411 host computer, 45MB IBM 3390-A28 disk equipment, 
and 64K BPS (bits per second) IBM 3745-210 communications equipment. 
The new installation will make the system "three times faster," use 
better search procedures, and provide picture data, CHONJA SINMUN 
said. 

   The October 1993 DATABASE WORLD explained that KINITI's IR data 
network was put into operation when KINITI was founded in 1991. 
Designed and built by the institute itself, the system consists of a 
computer, databases, and communications equipment in Seoul connected 
to "local information centers" in the ROK's 10 most important 
cities.  The latter act as "nodes" linking the system to individual 
subscribers.  The network makes available "in a systematic fashion 
industrial, scientific, and technological information" from foreign 
and domestic sources "needed by South Korean industry for R and D 
and technical development." 

   According to the magazine, the system offers information from 
eight foreign databases, including INSP (electricity, electronics, 
physics, computers, information science, control engineering), PA92 
(world patents), COMP (applied and general engineering), ISMC 
(machine and production engineering), FSTA (foods), META 
(metallurgy), NTIS (U.S. government-supported research reports in 
science, technology, and social sciences), and BIOT (life science, 
genetic engineering, biochemistry).  Some 18 million items of 
information from foreign sources were stored in the system as of 
August 1993 and 800,000 more are added annually.  Patents-related 
data accounted for 9.6 million or 58 percent of the items stored. 
KINITI's IR allows subscribers to access 15 domestic DB's, which as 
of August 1993 held 1.3 million items.  Two more domestic databases 
on commerce and trade, and "R and D data" were scheduled to be added 
at the end of 1993, the magazine noted. 

   In a related development, the 11 March CHONJA SINMUN reported 
that KINITI signed agreements with two more international DB 
services--the Scientific Technical Information Network (STN) and the 
Chemical Abstracts Service.  STN was reported to be operated by 
U.S., German, and Japanese companies, and to cover more than 160 
scientific and technological fields.  According to the newspaper, 
ROK database users who had been paying high prices for these 
services will now be able to obtain "high-quality S and T data" 
cheaply.  CHONJA SINMUN also reported on 21 March that in May, South 
Korean subscribers to the Korea Research Computer Network, a system 
run by the Ministry of Science and Technology's Systems Engineering 
Research Institute (SERI), will have access to Europe Net which 
offers R and D data from more than 20 European countries.  The 
network with 81 institutional subscribers (compared with 40 a year 
ago), is linked to INTERNET, an international computer network with 
some 2 million customers.  One SERI official reportedly called the 
system a "magic box" for South Korean S and T development. 

   The 21 March CHONJA SINMUN also reported the Korea Database 
Promotion Center's (DPC's) announced plans to build a foundation for 
developing the domestic DB industry by more effectively managing 
data from public sources and by systematizing data distribution 
routes.  The plan, with a budget of 1.17 billion won ($146 million), 
divides the database industry into three sub-fields:  government- 
funded databases, the general database industry, and "public" 
databases.  The first of these will benefit by a DPC-hosted seminar 
in June to give private companies an opportunity to express their 
views on how government database policies should develop, and by a 
second international database show held in Seoul between 12-15 
September.  DPC will also form, disseminate, and encourage use of 
standards relating to fees, classification techniques, and search 
commands. 

   For the general database industry, DPC will promote cooperation 
with overseas DB companies in order to observe trends in the foreign 
database industry and secure channels for exchange.  DPC has 
selected England's Computer Research Association, Japan's Database 
Industry Promotion Society, and the United States' Bruno Blenheim as 
the foreign institutions with which it will cooperate.  DPC's plans 
for the "public" DB industry involve maintaining close relations 
with those businesses receiving government support for database 
development as provided for in the Ministry of Communications' 1993 
policy on DB promotion, CHONJA SINMUN reported. 

   FEATURE:  New ROK 'Foundation' Aims at U.S. High-Tech - SUMMARY: 
The "ROK-U.S. Industrial Technology Cooperation Foundation" will 
begin operating in April with joint funding from the South Korean 
Government and businesses, according to the ROK press.  The 
foundation's reported purpose is to reduce technological dependence 
on Japan through greater acquisition of U.S. technology by small and 
medium businesses.  Some nine high-tech fields have been targeted. 

   In April, the South Korean Government and large conglomerates 
will begin joint funding of an ROK-U.S. Industrial Technology 
Cooperation Foundation, aiming at "transfering U.S. technology to 
South Korean small and medium businesses" (SMB's), the 17 March 
MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN reported.  Half of the foundation's 1994 
operating budget of $4 million will be paid by its parent 
organization, the Federation of Korean Industries, and the balance 
by the Korea Traders Association and the ROK Ministry of Trade, 
Industry, and Energy (MOTIE), the newspaper stated.  By 1997, the 
annual budget reportedly will have grown to $20 million. 

   According to MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN, the new foundation will 
support SMB's developing technology for semiconductors, computers, 
machine tools, aircraft, communications, medical and environmental 
equipment, auto parts, and "development facilities."  South Korean 
SMB's which invest in the United States will be eligible for up to 
$500,000 in low interest loans, while those forming joint ventures 
with U.S. firms in South Korea can receive up to $300,000. 

   The 17 March CHONJA SINMUN described the foundation as a "private 
organization" formed last February under the leadership of the 
Federation of Korean Industries, according to a plan agreed upon by 
the ROK Commerce Minister and the U.S. Secretary of Commerce in 
April 1993 for increased technological "cooperation" between the two 
countries.  The newspaper cited a federation source as saying, "The 
foundation's activities will have the effect of reducing South 
Korea's technological dependence on Japan by absorbing U.S. 
technology, while reducing the trade friction that recently has been 
rising between the ROK and the United States." 

   FEATURE:  South Korea Responds to 'Technical Trade Barriers' - 
SUMMARY:  Advanced countries allegedly are using exceptions in the 
GATT relating to environment and safety as a means of excluding ROK 
exports, according to two Seoul press reports.  South Korea's Trade 
Ministry is responding by devising quality standards that will 
enable exporters to prepare for these "technical barriers" in 
advance, and is cooperating with other agencies to maintain a 
database on technical standards by product and country. 

   The South Korean Government's Industrial Advancement 
Administration (IAA) has concluded that "advanced countries" are 
using exceptions in the General Agreement on Trade and Tariffs 
(GATT) involving environment and safety to strengthen their 
"technical barriers" to ROK products, the 11 March CHONJA SINMUN 
reported.  Identified by the newspaper as "hidden barriers" that 
focus on particular technologies, both CHONJA SINMUN and the 11 
March HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN (HKS) accused the United States, Japan, 
and other countries of exploiting the allegedly harmful effects of 
these technologies to exclude ROK products. 

   As an example, HKS cited a GATT notification prohibiting use of a 
"cancer-causing" dye in ROK textiles imported into Germany, and the 
use of PCP as a preservative.  The newspaper also complained about a 
contradictory requirement that plastic materials imported by Denmark 
and other European countries pass a non-combustibility test, but 
that a key material used to retard flammability in the products 
cannot be used for environmental reasons.  Similarly, the paper 
stated the United States is considering banning all 
chlorofluorocarbons products, while Canada and Japan may set limits 
on radiation emitted by portable communications equipment. 

   To combat these barriers, the IAA (part of the ROK Ministry of 
Trade, Industry, and Energy) is developing a comprehensive plan that 
includes establishing and disseminating nationwide standards for 
export products and building a database of regulations by product 
and individual country, CHONJA SINMUN reported.  For goods with a 
high export ratio, the South Korean Government will enact quality 
standards to be followed by domestic industries based on the 
standards of the main importing countries.  Individual companies 
will monitor their compliance with these standards themselves.  For 
newly developed products which "have a high probability of causing 
bodily harm," separate safety standards will be created and the 
products will be subject to government inspection, according to HKS. 

   CHONJA SINMUN reported that the ROK Government will build a 
database in the first half of 1994 on "trade and technology 
barriers" by country and product and make this information available 
to domestic exporters.  Finally, the Korea Trade Promotion 
Corporation will join with government in maintaining a system that 
tracks "technical barriers" set by each country.  A committee will 
be established within the IAA to form "countermeasures" that reduce 
the effect of these barriers. 

   Samsung Electronics Indigenizes Several Technologies - Samsung 
Electronics has developed an indigenous point-of-sale (POS) terminal 
after 16 months of research and an investment of 2 billion won ($2.5 
million).  All parts for the terminal--except for the central 
processing unit--were developed indigenously.  Prior to this, ROK 
firms had not developed a print mechanism or POS application 
software indigenously, but rather had to contract with Japan to 
obtain it.  Samsung's mechanism can print out three 24-character 
lines per second, which is faster than the competing Japanese-made 
product.  Having the ability to produce the software domestically 
will allow firms to develop programs suited to the domestic 
environment and to easily adjust programs as conditions change. 
(Seoul CHONJA SINMUN 8 Mar 94 p 5) 

   Samsung Electronics has also developed a thin-film transistor 
liquid-crystal display (TFT-LCD) for use in camcorders.  This is 
expected to raise the competitive ability of ROK camcorder 
producers, which previously depended completely on imported TFT- 
LCD's.  Samsung began its research on the product in 1991, investing 
500 million won ($625,000) in the project.  The company developed 
the TFT-LCD's using a high-temperature complementary metal oxide 
semiconductor process, which has also been used in Japan and 
England.  Samsung plans to begin full production in the second half 
of 1995.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 18 Mar 94 p 21) 

   Competition for Color Printer Market Expected To Heat Up - 
Hyundai Electronics and Lucky-Canon have joined Samsung-Hewlett 
Packard (S-HP) in the color printer market.  In addition, expert 
printer companies Kyuniks Computer and Sambo Computer will be 
marketing new color printer products in the first half of this year. 
At the same time, new printers have come on the market and their 
price range has dropped, from between 1 and 3 million won ($1,250- 
3,750) to between 400,000 and 800,000 won ($500-1,000). 

   S-HP's Deskjet 505K printer accounts for most of the low-price 
printer market, and its 400,000 won ($500) price is similar to 
black-and-white dot matrix printers.  S-HP is working to bring in 
the Deskjet 1200C, but thus far has not been allowed to import it. 
Hyundai Electronics began marketing its recently developed dot 
matrix printer in January and, after only one month, had supplied 
more than 100 machines.  The company plans to increase production 
and is working to improve the machine's capabilities.  Lucky-Canon's 
BJC-600 bubble jet printer is able to handle hangul, and is the 
company's answer to S-HP's Deskjet 505K.  Competition for sales is 
expected to heat up after this model hits the market.  Sambo 
Printer, the largest domestic printer supplier, has signed an 
agreement with Japan's Epson to bring in printers and equip them to 
handle hangul.  They plan to complete this and begin marketing the 
machine in the first half of this year.  In the same period, Kyuniks 
Computer plans to introduce a color printer that uses a Canon 
engine.  The ROK color printer market was very small through 1992, 
but in 1993 business increased, and 6,000 machines were produced 
each month.  Beginning in October 1993, this figure climbed to 
12,000-15,000.  This year, production is expected to reach 150,000 
machines.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 3 Mar 94 p 14) 

   Daewoo To Expand R and D Centers at Home, Abroad - Daewoo 
Automotive will expand its existing research institute in South 
Korea, and will set up other R and D centers in Germany, England, 
and the United States.  The firm will invest 190 billion won ($237.5 
million) through September to expand its existing research institute 
into a larger general research institute, adding 500 new employees 
to the current staff of 1,300.  In Germany, Daewoo will set up an 
auto technology center to promote the internationalization of its R 
and D sector.  The center will employ 80 foreign technicians and 80 
ROK technicians, and will be tasked with developing an indigenous 
model passenger car to be produced after 1996.  Daewoo has already 
taken over IAD, a British automotive engineering firm, and is 
considering setting up automotive research centers in Detroit and 
Los Angeles in the United States.  By setting up centers like these, 
Daewoo hopes to strengthen its development of advanced technologies 
that advanced auto makers "dislike" transferring to other firms, as 
well as strengthen the technical cooperation between its overseas R 
and D centers.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 21 Feb 94 p 11) 

   Statistics for First Quarter Exports Reported - ROK exports 
(based on customs clearance) reached $7.63 billion in March, while 
imports totaled $8.3 billion, according to the Ministry of Trade, 
Industry, and Energy.  This resulted in a $665-million trade deficit 
for the month.  For the first quarter of this year, the total trade 
deficit was $2.57 billion, an increase of $793 million compared to 
the first quarter of 1993.  (Seoul YONHAP 0615 GMT 4 Apr 94) 

   In the same quarter, ROK car exports increased 10.1 percent over 
1993 levels, according to industry sources.  In March alone, car 
exports shot up 26.5 percent, following rises of 20.2 and 9.9 
percent in January and February, respectively, compared to the same 
periods the year before.  These increases come as a result of the 
economic recovery of the United States, which is a major market for 
ROK car exports.  (Seoul THE KOREA TIMES 3 Apr 94 p 8) 

   KINITI To Promote Tech Transfers for Small Firms - The Korea 
Institute of Industry and Technology Information (KINITI) has set up 
a Technology Transaction Information Center to promote the 
introduction and exchange of technologies in and among smaller 
companies.  KINITI said it plans to raise 5.89 billion won ($7.363 
million) by 1997 to promote tech transfers.  The newly established 
center will gather information about new products and technologies 
that can be commercialized, and will provide the information to 
local companies via an on-line computer network.  (Seoul THE KOREA 
TIMES 2 Apr 94 p 8) 

   ROK-DPRK-China Shipping Route To Open in April - A Pusan-Chongjin 
shipping route linking North and South Korea will open around 10 
April.  The ROK shipping company Samson Shipping announced on 2 
April that it has finalized a joint-venture agreement with Xianhu 
Group, a company specializing in business with North Korea.  Xianhu 
is managed by an ethnic Korean living in Yanbian, China.  The new 
joint-venture--Sonho Shipping--will contract with third countries 
for 4,200-metric ton semi-container ships and transport cargo 
between China and the ROK via Chongjin.  Xianhu Group has exclusive 
rights to use Chongjin port under an agreement with DPRK 
authorities.  (Seoul CHOSON ILBO 3 Apr 94 p 11) 

   ROK Firms Receive Shipbuilding Orders From Hong Kong, Canada - 
Hanjin Heavy Industries has received an order to build four 15,000- 
metric ton ships in Shanghai.  The order, worth $100 million, was 
placed by Paraco, a Hong Kong firm.  However, the Shanghai Shipping 
Company, the second largest shipping company in China, is known to 
be the actual user.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 14 Apr 94 p 11) 

   Daewoo Shipbuilding has received an order from the Canada 
Maritime Company to build two 2,200-TEU container ships that can 
travel through frozen seas.  The order is worth $100 million.  The 
ships will be equipped with modern devices, including global 
positioning system navigators and pollution prevention devices. 
(Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 11 Apr 94 p 11) 

   Firms Invest in Overseas Spinning Plants - The Kabul Spinning 
Company will increase its production capacity by building four more 
overseas plants.  These include a $24-million investment in Jiangsu, 
China (subject to PRC Government approval), a $15,000 investment in 
Tajikistan, a $15,000 investment in Pakistan, and possibly a plant 
in Alabama.  The Tajikistan plant will begin operating in the latter 
half of 1995.  Kabul is still reviewing its plans for the Pakistan 
plant and has just secured a plant site in Benton, Alabama.  (Seoul 
MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 11 Apr 94 p 10) 

   Taenong has begun operating its cotton spinning plant in Qingdao, 
China.  The company invested $19 million in the plant, which can 
produce cotton thread, linen, as well as finished garments.  (Seoul 
MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 9 Apr 94 p 9) 
   Daewoo Gets Financing From Exim Bank for Overseas Plant - The 
Korea Export-Import Bank has approved an $80-million overseas 
investment fund loan for Daewoo to build a car factory in 
Uzbekistan.  The loan will carry an annual interest rate of 6.72 
percent and have a 10-year payback period.  The total budget for the 
joint venture, called UZ-Daewoo Motors, is $635 million.  Daewoo and 
Uzbekistan's Selcho Znash will each invest $100 million and borrow 
the remainder.  UZ-Daewoo Motors will produce 200,000 vehicles 
annually and export 78 percent of them to neighboring countries.  In 
Uzbekistan, the government has taken steps to boost the project, 
such as lowering various taxes for the joint venture.  (Seoul YONHAP 
0210 GMT 13 Apr 94) 

   Hyundai Active in Saudi Power Plant Construction - Hyundai 
Engineering and Construction Co. has won an order to build an 
extension to the Tabuk Gas Turbine Power Plant II.  The Saudi 
Arabian Electric Power Authority placed the order for the turnkey 
project, which is worth $61 million.  The project will include 
installation of two 65-megawatt gas turbines.  Hyundai will begin 
the project this month and complete it in two years.  The company is 
also negotiating an order for a 110-km power cable project and two 
other orders worth $100 million from the same Saudi authority. 
(Seoul THE KOREA TIMES 14 Apr 94 p 8) 

   SOUTHEAST ASIA - BURMA:  Joint Venture Brewery To Be Established 
- The Asia Pacific Brewery of Singapore and the Union of Myanmar 
Economic Holdings, Ltd. recently signed a memorandum of 
understanding to establish a $30-million brewery in Rangoon.  The 
plant, expected to be completed in 1996, will have an annual 
capacity of 45 million cans of beer.  (Singapore THE STRAITS TIMES 9 
Apr 94 p 47) 

   INDONESIA:  Cambodia To Use Palapa Satellite Transponder - P.T. 
Telkom Director Setyanto Sentosa stated that the Cambodian 
Government has leased a 30-channel Palapa B4 satellite transponder 
for television and radio broadcasts throughout the country. 
Cambodia's Posts and Telecommunications Minister So Khun predicts 
that the country will need more transponders in the coming years as 
the country continues to develop its telecommunications capability. 
(Jakarta BISNIS INDONESIA 5 Mar 94 p 1) 

   IPTN-Airbus Industrie Flight Test Agreement Signed - The European 
consortium Airbus Industrie has signed an agreement with Indonesia's 
aerospace industry IPTN to assist in all aspects of IPTN's N-250 
turbo prop aircraft flight test program.  (Jakarta KOMPAS 21 Mar 94 
p 5) 

   MALAYSIA:  FEATURE:  Islamic Money Market Established - SUMMARY: 
Malaysia recently established an Islamic money market, becoming the 
first country with a "full-fledged" Islamic banking system.  Its 
success facilitates an "ambitious goal, a meaningful Malaysian role" 
in a future international Islamic banking system, according to 
recent Kuala Lumpur dailies. 

   The 21 March UTUSAN MALAYSIA and 22 March BERITA HARIAN reported 
that Malaysia established an Islamic money market in January 
becoming the first country with a "full-fledged" Islamic banking 
system.  The papers said this important milestone came when the 
Central Bank issued the first bonds based on Islamic principles. 
They are redeemable at par upon maturity or on demand at the Central 
Bank.  The borrower is not obliged to reward lenders for their 
benevolence but may do so.  Thus, the government has absolute 
discretion whether to reward bond holders--and if so, by how much, 
the papers said. 

   According to the 22 March BERITA HARIAN, Malaysia now has the 
three criteria required to have a comprehensive Islamic financial 
system--an Islamic interbank money market in Islamic financial 
instruments, Islamic interbank investments, and an Islamic interbank 
check-clearing system.  The latter element is somewhat limited. 
The paper also said that Bank Islam Malaysia Bhd. and other 
institutions offering interest-free banking can trade in Islamic 
financial instruments (such as the newly-issued government bonds) 
among themselves.  BERITA HARIAN also detailed the Islamic interbank 
investments, where one interest-free bank with surplus funds can 
invest in another that has a deficit.  The term for such investments 
ranges from overnight to one year (similar to a conventional money 
market), and the minimum investment is $20,000.  Profit-sharing 
ratios, generally determined by the Central Bank, are 70 percent for 
the provider of funds. 

   The 21 March UTUSAN MALAYSIA noted that at the end of January, 
barely a month after it was launched, the Islamic interbank money 
market reported a trading volume of $90 million.  The paper also 
stated that the Central Bank granted Bank Islam Malaysia Bhd. 
permission to operate an Islamic stock brokerage firm, thus paving 
the way for a domestic Islamic capital market. 

   Both UTUSAN MALAYSIA and BERITA HARIAN stated that the success of 
the Malaysian Islamic financial system has been recognized by many 
Islamic countries as a model.  Saudi Arabia and Sri Lanka have shown 
keen interest in studying the Malaysian system in order to implement 
a similar arrangement.  Within ASEAN, Malaysia has assisted Brunei, 
Indonesia, and the Philippines in establishing interest-free 
banking.  These papers noted that many Islamic countries would like 
to have an Islamic financial system, and some tried in the 1970s. 
The papers concluded that if infrastructure can be established 
between countries to link their Islamic banking systems, many 
countries will be able to participate. 

   PHILIPPINES:  International Consortium Seeks To Operate Bataan 
Nuclear Plant - A Malaysian-U.S. consortium has submitted a proposal 
to the Philippine Government to convert the $2.3 billion Bataan 
Nuclear Power Plant (BNPP) with a capacity of 600 MW, into a 1,890- 
MW power facility, on a 25-year build-operate-transfer arrangement. 
The consortium would raise $1.5 billion to cover such costs as 
installing the transmission lines, building the necessary 
infrastructure, establishing a natural gas vaporization plant, 
laying a gas pipeline, etc.  The conversion plan also calls for the 
plant to use pollution-free liquefied natural gas from Malaysia, and 
its output is to be sold to the National Power Corporation 
(Napocor).  (Kuala Lumpur BERITA HARIAN 20 Mar 94 p 7) 

   THAILAND:  Oil-Related Joint Venture in Vietnam Reported - The 
Petroleum Authority of Thailand and Charoen Phokphan plan to 
establish a $28-million oil-related venture with Saigon Petro.  The 
new company, PetroAsia (Saigon), will establish oil depots and 
terminals, a retail oil network, and a liquefied petroleum gas 
distribution and trading operation.  (Bangkok BANGKOK POST 12 Apr 94 
p 15) 

   First Quarter Rice Exports Reach 1.3 Million Tons - Thailand 
exported about 1.3 million tons of rice during the first three 
months of this year, compared to 960,000 tons during the same period 
last year.  The increase in exports should lead to an increase in 
the domestic rice price of $220 a ton.  (Bangkok Radio Thailand 
Network 0000 GMT 14 Apr) 

   Firms Form Consulting Company With Burmese State Agency - GCN 
Holdings Ltd, Siam Commercial Bank, and the Union of Myanmar 
Economic Holdings, Ltd. recently announced the formation of a new 
consulting company for investors wishing to explore business 
opportunities in Burma.  Thai investors own 30 percent of the new 
firm, called Myanmar Consultants (Thailand) Co. Ltd., while the 
Burmese partner owns the remainder.  (Bangkok THE NATION 8 Apr 94 p 
B2) 

   CP Group To Invest in Shanghai Industrial Park - The Charoen 
Phokphan Group plans to invest $400 million in an industrial park in 
Shanghai, and has identified three counties as possible sites- 
-Pudong, Songjiang, and Jiading.  The company has asked the governor 
of Shanghai to grant investment incentives similar to those offered 
in Pudong regardless of which county is selected.  Incentives in 
Pudong include a 15-percent corporate tax exemption for the first 
two years, a 50-percent tax reduction in the following three years, 
exemption from the 10-percent tax on profits transferred out of 
China, and exemption from import duty on machinery and equipment 
used in the project.  (Bangkok XING XIAN RIBAO 7 Apr 94 p 16) 

   Regional Banks' Loan Package to Refinery Company - Seven 
Singapore-based banks--Development Bank of Singapore, Citicorp 
Investment, Deutsche Bank (Asia Pacific), Dresdner (Southeast Asia), 
Fuji Bank Singapore, LTCB Merchant Bank Singapore, and Westpac 
Singapore--have joined 14 other banks and the International Finance 
Corporation (IFC) to arrange a $1.2 billion loan package for the 
Star Petroleum Refining Company.  The loans, with maturities from 10 
to 13 years, will be provided by the IFC and 58 financial 
institutions from Asia, Australia, Europe, the Middle East, and the 
United States.  The funds will finance the construction of Star's 
130,000 barrel-a-day refinery in Rayong Province.  (Singapore 
STRAITS TIMES 31 Mar 94 p 22) 

   Firm Signs Memorandum on Lao Hydropower Project - Siam United 
Services signed a memorandum with the Lao Government to construct 
the Nam Theun 1 hydropower project.  On 25 March the company was 
granted a concession from the Lao Government to build the Nam Theun 
1 hydropower project in Khammouan and Bolikhamsai Provinces.  The 
Lao Government will invest at least 30 percent of the total project 
value.  The Nam Theun 1-2 project is expected to be completed in the 
year 2000 and produce 400-1,400 megawatts for sale to Thailand, 
earning Laos about $136 million annually.  The hydropower project is 
seen as a solution to the water crisis in Thailand.  (Bangkok THE 
NATION 4 Apr 94 p B2) 

   Bank Reports Decline in Foreign Investment - Direct foreign 
investment in Thailand declined by 27.5 percent last year compared 
with 1992 as investors shifted to other countries they considered 
more attractive, a Bank of Thailand spokesman said.  Foreign 
investors pumped $1.56 billion into Thailand in 1993 compared with 
$2.15 billion the year before.  Net external borrowing in 1993 
dropped by 42.4 percent to $1.59 billion from $2.77 billion in 1992. 
Singapore, Japan, and Hong Kong were the main lenders to Thailand. 
Net investment in the Stock Exchange of Thailand increased sixfold, 
from $460.48 million in 1992 to $2.7 billion. (Bangkok BANGKOK POST 
6 Apr 94 p 24) 

   VIETNAM:  FEATURE:  Export Processing Zones' Development Reviewed 
- SUMMARY:  There are five licensed EPZ's nationwide according to 
press reports.  Total investment amounts to $305.5 million. 
Investors from 25 countries have registered to build factories and 
invest in the EPZ's.  Only one firm has produced and exported 
products.  State Committee for Cooperation and Investment (SCCI) 
Vice Chairman Lu Minh Chau said that no more EPZ's should be built. 

   The 16 March issue of THOI BAO KINH TE SAIGON reported that the 
SCCI recently held a conference in Ho Chi Minh City to review work, 
achievements on EPZ's. 

   There are five EPZ's in Vietnam.  Total investment capital of 
licensed projects including infrastructure projects, amounted to 
$305.5 million or 4.1 percent of the country's total foreign 
investment from 1988-1993.  Nearly 100 companies from 25 countries 
have registered to lease land at the EPZ's in Tan Thuan, Linh Trung, 
and Haiphong.  These projects will primarily produce or process 
sports equipment, electronic games, garments, bags, yarn, food and 
agricultural products.  Ground-breaking ceremonies were held for the 
Can Tho and Da Nang EPZ's in March. 

   The 9 February THOI BAO KINH TE SAIGON reported that according to 
the SCCI, the five EPZ's are: 


  EPZ          Location     Date         Size in     Infrastructure 
                                                     investment 
  Name                      Licensed     Hectares    in millions 
  Can Tho      Can Tho      2 Nov 93     57          $8.1 
  Da Nang      Quang Nam-   21  Oct  93  120         $24.0 
               Da Nang 
  Haiphong     Haiphong     12  Jan  93  300        $150.0 
  Linh Trung   Ho Chi Minh  31  Aug  92   60         $14.0 
               City 
  Tan Thuan    Ho Chi Minh  24  Sep  91  300         $89.0 
               City 



   Another article in the same edition reported that, according to 
the vice chairman of the Haiphong EPZ Board of Directors, the EPZ is 
located 16 km southeast of the city and 12 km from Cat Bi airport. 
It is a joint venture between the Haiphong City EPZ Development 
Company and the Hong Kong Very Good International Company Ltd.  It 
will be the largest in Vietnam with  investment worth $2.5 billion 
and will be expanded to 980 hectares, with 300 hectares for 
manufacturing firms and some 600 for hotels, a golf course, offices, 
housing, and a recreational area.  Industries being promoted here 
include textiles, garments, leather goods, paper, packaging 
materials, electronics, machine and transportation equipment, 
precision tools, chemicals, food products, and consumer goods. 
Companies operating here can import equipment and materials and 
export their products all tax free.  Manufacturers will pay a 10 
percent income tax--15 percent for services companies--four years 
after they start making profits. 

   The 9 February THOI BAO KINH TE SAIGON also reported that the two 
EPZ'z in Ho Chi Minh City have "gone far" in building infrastructure 
and organizing a state management apparatus to license projects. 
Infrastructure at Tan Thuan is expected to be completed in 1994. 

   So far, eight enterprises have been licensed at Tan Thuan and two 
at Linh Trung.  One firm started to export its products to Europe in 
December, two more are expected to be producing at the end of the 
first quarter of 1994.  More than 30 investors from Taiwan, South 
Korea, Japan, France, Hong Kong, Thailand, Indonesia, and China have 
paid fees to operate in the two EPZ's. 

   The same issue of THOI BAO KINH TE SAIGON reported that the Da 
Nang EPZ is organizing its managment and getting ready to build 
infrastructure.  Soon after the EPZ was licensed, companies from 
Malaysia, Japan, Thailand, Singapore, South Korea, Europe, and the 
United States signed up to invest. 

   In contrast with other EPZ's, local companies alone are building 
Can Tho's infrastructure.  According to the vice chairman of Can Tho 
People's Committee, the EPZ is "quickly" organizing its management. 
Thai, Singaporean, Indonesian, and American firms have registered to 
invest in food processing. 

   The 16 March issue of paper reported that SCCI Deputy Director Lu 
Minh Chau, who is also director of the Ho Chi Minh City EPZ's 
Management Board, said that for the time being, no more EPZ's should 
be built.  Instead, there should be studies made on other types of 
investment such as industrial parks, special economic compounds, and 
free trade zones.  Pilot projects must be established for these when 
conditions are favorable. 

   Thai Firm To Build Industrial Zone at Bien Hoa - Bang Pakong 
Industrial Park, a Thai real estate development company, has reached 
agreement with the Vietnamese Government to develop the former U.S. 
military base at Bien Hoa, near Ho Chi Minh City, into a large 
industrial zone under a joint venture arrangement with a Bien Hoa 
company.  The government will give 800 hectares to the joint venture 
company free of charge. 

   After site preparation work is completed, lots will be sold to 
"influential companies" from Thailand, Japan, Europe, and the United 
States.  The amount of investment capital for the new company has 
not been decided, but total investment in the project will come to 
$400 million. Bang Pakong's president will also serve as president 
of the joint venture firm. 

   In June 1994 Bang Pakong will begin selling lots to Thai and 
Japanese companies.  The first 100-hectare section of the zone will 
be completed by August, and construction of the entire zone should 
be completed by August 1995.  Some 200 to 300 factories will be 
built, with the focus on those devoted to "labor-intensive 
production." 

   Bang Pakong, which was established in 1987, has completed the 
development of a large industrial zone in Chonburi, southeast of 
Bangkok, where it has sold lots to Japanese firms.  (Tokyo NIKKEI 
SANGYO SHIMBUN 26 Mar 94 p 3) 

   Ministry's Plan for Development of Auto Industry - The Ministry 
of Heavy Industry will propose that future SRV automobile production 
be based on the number of vehicles per thousand population and per 
capita income. 

   According to the plan, by 2005 the Vietnamese market will need up 
to 17,300 passenger cars and up to 63,600 commercial vehicles per 
year.  To maximize return on investment in the auto industry, the 
number of joint venture assembly plants should be limited to three 
to four for commercial vehicles and two for passenger cars.  One 
hundred percent foreign-owned plants must be probihited, unless the 
output is for export only. 

   To avoid letting any one country dominate Vietnam's auto 
industry, it will be necessary to acquire technology from the United 
States, Western Europe, and Japan.  Technology transfer is seen as 
more important than profit. 

   The ministry should recommend that the government stop issuing 
permits to build assembly plants in order to encourage well known 
international manufacturers to enter ventures as Italy's Ivesco has 
done with the Mekong Auto Plant. 

   In 1991, joint venture licences were issued for the Co Loa 
Factory in Hanoi, the Cuu Long Machine Factory, and the Hoa Binh 
auto plant with ROK and Philippine partners.  In late 1993, a third 
joint venture with Daewoo was licensed.  At present, the Mekong Auto 
plant and the Vietnam auto plant "VMC" have started production. 
These two plants have a capacity of nearly 5,000 vehicles per year. 

   To support the local auto industry, the government has increased 
the import duty on fully assembled vehicles from 100 to 150 percent 
and has reduced the import duty on CKD vehicle kits to 20 percent. 
(Hanoi QUAN DOI NHAN DAN 15 Mar 94 p 3) 

   Park Resort Venture With Singaporean Company - Hanoi's Tourist 
Hotels Company under the Hanoi Labor Union recently formed a joint 
venture with Singapore's Keppel Group's Straits Steamship Land 
Company to build the Ho Tay-Quang Ba National Park in Hanoi.  Total 
investment is $98-$110 million.  Prescribed capital is $56 million, 
of which the Vietnamese partner will contribute 30 percent.  The 
park resort will include a golf course and a five-star 300-room 
hotel with tennis courts, and will be completed in 30 months. (Hanoi 
THOI BAO KINH TE VIETNAM 16 Mar 94 p 

   Minister Outlines Measures to Facilitiate Investment - At a 
January meeting, Minister Dau Ngoc Xuan, chairman of the State 
Commission for Cooperation and Investment, discussed foreign 
investment and viewed eight issues which require prompt attention: 

   1.  The government is urgently drafting policies to promote 
investment in afforestation and industrial crops in the mountainous 
and central regions.  It will improve its tax policy and will soon 
promulgate legislation governing labor, commerce, real estate, and 
mining. 

   2. During the second quarter of 1994 at the latest, two plans 
will be completed concerning investment in export processing zones 
and to assist a number of sectors facing tough competition, 
including beer brewing and automobile- and motorbike assembly. 

   3.  In the capitalization of joint ventures, steps will be taken 
so that Vietnamese partners no longer contribute primarily real 
estate.  Firms will be allowed to pool capital with foreigners, and 
capital will be raised from the population for projects certain to 
have high economic return. 

   4.  The government has tasked the Ministry of Industry, Science, 
and Environment and specialized branches to develop a policy on 
machinery imports.  Technical and industrial consulting firms will 
be formed. 

   5.  Regulations on labor conditions and pay at foreign firms will 
be issued.  There will be inspections to protect workers' rights and 
to avoid "regrettable" incidents. 

   6.  By the end of first quarter of 1994, the state's oversight of 
foreign industries will be improved, with many administrative 
procedures  simplified.  Projects involving less than $5 million 
will get permits in not more than 45 days.  Approvals will be 
primarily based on the recommendations of the city or province and 
economic or technical agency concerned. 

   7.  Procedures for the initiation, development, and government 
review of investment projects will be simplified to the maximum 
extent possible. 

   8.  About 2,500 Vietnamese cadres work in joint-venture firms. 
Most are appointed by local authorities.  Very few have the 
necessary qualifications and experience needed to work with foreign 
investors.  In the future, cadres for joint ventures will be found 
through competitive testing.  Courses to train these cadres will be 
organised quickly. 
   Minister Xuan said that Vietnam is past the stage of "testing the 
waters on the concept of foreign investment."  Efforts must be made 
to attract some $14 billion from 1991 (as published) to 2000. 
(Hanoi THOI BAO KINH TE VIETNAM 26 Jan 94 p 5) 

   Prices, Export-Import Value Increase in First Quarter - The price 
indices of goods and services in the first quarter of 1994 showed an 
average increase of 2.6 percent per month.  Goods available were 
diversified and their prices rather stable.  The total value of 
retail sales--of which the state sector accounted for 23 percent- 
-increased 25 percent over the same period last year.  The total 
export-import value in the first quarter was estimated at about 
$1.418 billion.  Exports--mainly rice, garments, textiles, and crude 
oil--were worth $670 million, up 27 percent.  The total import value 
was estimated at $748 million, up 12 percent over the corresponding 
period last year.  The Ministry of Trade plans to achieve a total 
export-import value of $3.3 billion in the first half of this year, 
an increase of between 23 and 27 percent over the first half of 
1993.  (Hanoi VNA 0555 GMT 5 Apr 94) 

   Heavy Industries Increase Output in First Quarter - In the first 
quarter of 1994, business and production establishments under the 
Ministry of Heavy Industry achieved a total output of $2.8 million, 
8 percent better than the same period last year.  (Hanoi Voice of 
Vietnam 1100 GMT 2 Apr 94) 

   Taiwan Firms Join Sugar Production Venture - The Sugar 
Corporation No. 1, Thanh Hoa Sugar Company, and Taiwan's Taiwan 
Sugar Corporation, I-Mei Foods Company, King Car Foods, and Fu Mei 
Foods have signed a joint venture contract establishing the Vietnam- 
Taiwan Sugar Ltd. Company.  The venture is expected to process 6,000 
metric tons of cane per day, becoming the biggest sugar producer in 
Vietnam.  The $66 million project is expected to begin this year and 
create nearly 10,000 jobs. (Hanoi VNA 1439 GMT 2 Apr 94) 

   HCMC Lists 265 Projects Needing Foreign Investment - Ho Chi Minh 
City has listed 265 projects that need foreign investment between 
now and 1995.  According to the plan, the city will have 15 
industrial areas for mechanical, processing, electronics, and hi- 
tech businesses.  Other projects include 13 infrastructure projects, 
22 technical construction projects to modernize residential areas, 
transport, airports, ports, and post and telecommunications 
networks, 130 development projects in mechanical, metallurgy, 
processing of agro-forestry-fishery products, chemicals, 
construction material, and textiles, 26 projects in agricultural 
products, and 29 projects for upgrading tourist centers and hotels. 
The total capital for these projects is envisaged at nearly $9 
billion.  (Hanoi Voice of Vietnam 2300 GMT 29 Mar 94) 

   Coffee Output Reported; Exporters Using Direct Contracts - In the 
first five months of the 1993-1994 coffee crop, Vietnam exported 
more than 100,000 tonnes of beans.  Exporters have won direct 
contracts to sell their products abroad, reducing exports through 
intermediaries to 41 percent, down from 60 percent last year.  This 
year Vietnam has about 137,000 hectares of coffee, yielding an 
average of one tonne per hectare. It is expecting to harvest between 
125,000 and 135,000 tonnes. (Hanoi VNA 1358 GMT 5 Apr 94) 

   Cashew Growers Earn Over $40 Million in 1993 - Last year, 
southern cashew growers earned over $40 million by exporting 53,000 
tons of cashew nuts.  The 1994 harvest is expected to yield 70,000 
tons.  Vietnam ranks third among cashew exporters after Brazil and 
India.  Twenty-two cashew processing enterprises with a total 
capacity of 75,000 tons per year are now operational.  (Hanoi VNA 
1346 GMT 6 Apr 94) 

   Transformer Manufacture With Switzerland Reported - The Ministry 
of Heavy Industry and the ABB Transformer, Ltd. of Switzerland 
recently signed a joint venture agreement to manufacture 
transformers and other electric appliances in Hanoi.  The Vietnamese 
partner will contribute 35 percent of the $8.7 million, 35-year 
venture.  (Hanoi VNA 1459 GMT 9 Apr) 

   First Quarter Foreign Investment Figures in Dong Nai Reported - 
The Mekong Delta Province of Dong Nai reported eight additional 
foreign investment projects in the first quarter of this year, 
amounting to $46.85 million.  Presently, there are 65 foreign 
investment projects in Dong Nai with a total capital of $878.85 
million.  Prominent among these projects are the Hualon Dyeing 
United Enterprise, capitalized at $242 million, the Vedan Stock 
Corporation at $216 million, and the Vietnam Soda Chemicals at $76.7 
million.  (Hanoi VNA 1424 GMT 13 Apr 94) 

   National Power Company To Start Operation in May - The 
Electricity Company No. 2 announced that the national 500-kv power 
grid will start operation in May.  The grid will have the capacity 
to provide power to 19 provinces and cities in the south, spreading 
from Ninh Thuan to Minh Hai.  (Hanoi Voice of Vietnam 1100 GMT 7 Apr 
94) 

   Construction Begins on Bach Ho-Ba Ria Gas Pipeline - Petrovietnam 
and Hyundai Heavy Industries on 9 April started building a gas 
pipeline from the Bach Ho (White Tiger) Oil Field to the Ba Ria 
Power Plant.  This is the first phase of the $400 million gas 
collection and transportation system from the Bach Ho field to the 
Thu Duc Power Plant in Ho Chi Minh City and is scheduled to be 
completed by October.  A 107-km pipeline will be built from Bach Ho 
to the Ky Van area in Long Hai Township, and a 19.5-km onshore line 
will be built from Long Hai to the Ba Ria plant.  The line's 
capacity is 300 million cubic meters of gas per year.  Phase two 
will involve building an LPG plant in Ba Ria and about 85 km of 
pipeline to the Thu Duc plant.  The gas collection and 
transportation systems will have a capacity of 1.5 billion cubic 
meters per year.  At present about 3 million cubic meters of gas is 
burned each day at Bach Ho. (Hanoi VNA 11 Apr 94) 
EAG/20APR94/ECONF/TECHTF/EAST ASIA GROUP JEG 21/0031Z APR 





</TEXT>

</DOC>
